[2013, "season4"]	["A Thai person recommended this spot to me so I already knew this was the good-good. \n\nHidden gem in Las Vegas. \n\nSuperb. Excellent. Met my expectations. \n\nGet the fried garlic shrimp. My favorite thing on the menu and well worth the price.", "Actually would give it 2.5 stars. Food is ok but I liked the place, very large 2 dining rooms and don't feel like the traditional Thai restaurant. Had chicken basil thai style thai hot and it was hot! Small portion and flavor was ok. Had wontons which were also ok. Liked being off strip and need to find more local finds.", "After a long drive to Vegas, my friends and I were hungry for something fulfilling and reasonably price. Since most restaurants on the strip are priced with $$$, I suggested Lotus of Siam to my friends knowing that most dishes will not break the budget. \n\nAlthough most people stated that a reservation was a must, we took a chance on a Friday evening and was quoted a wait time of 1.5 hr. The good thing about Lotus is that you can leave your number with them and they will call when the table is ready. After 45 minutes of waiting, we were promptly seated and ordered the following items: Garlic Prawns, Drunken Noodles w/ Crispy Duck, and Nam Prik Ong.\n\nI highly recomment the Garlic Prawns and Nam Prik Ong as they were the biggest hit at our table.", "After seeing Lotus of Siam on Top Chef Masters, I took a daytrip from LA to Vegas to try this place.  The garlic prawns with shells and the spicy chicken wings are stellar and not to be missed.  The crispy jerky (pretty tough, but that's jerky for ya), duck curry, tom kah kai soup, chicken pad thai, sai oua (Northern style sausage), and drunken noodles with soft shell crab are all really good, not awesome.  For 5 adults, the bill was just under $150 with an 18% gratuity already included.\n\nApparently, the section of their menu that is the Northern Thai section contains dishes seldom found in the US.  There are some dishes that are not listed on the menu, but appear on their website.\n\nI will certainly dine there again the next time I'm in Vegas.  Still dreaming about the amazing garlic prawns...  The service is fine, and the wait staff tries to be quick even though it's always busy.  Our waiter was happy to explain what their specialty dishes were.\n\nI don't drink, but my wine-loving friends say there's no Thai place in America with their top notch wine list.  There is also a lunch buffet option for about $10, which looked good but not very unique.", "All this and more.  It is always a delight to find the borderline sketchy strip shopping center and (from the outside) non-descript family-run restaurant that, upon entering, immediately informs of an otherworldy food experience.  Literally thought we had the wrong place at the door then walked in on a packed, multi room place buzzing with activity and chatter and one wall lined with a cellar containing nearly 50% Rieslings.  Settled on a moderately priced Mosel that beautifully married with whole roasted pompano and spicy sweet sauce, preceded by beef salad and pork apps.  First place for chow on return visit to LV.", "Ambience is lacking inside and out  ... I pulled up in a cab to a deserted looking mall and wondered whether I wanted to keep my lunch reservation ... I'm glad I did.\n\nI had the black pepper garlic chicken wings.  They were not greasy, yet crispy and flavorful.  I loved the salty, slightly sweet garlic spice rub they put on the wings prior to frying.\n\nThe pork fried rice was initially just okay -- but after doctoring it up, it was great.  They initiallly got my order wrong, but even on the second try it was lacking in flavor so I asked for some of the spice rub for the wings and I mixed it in along with some of the thai bird chili and fish sauce (from the chili cart you need to ask for).  Pork is cut into  larger, thinish squares ... I prefer thicker and longer slices (typically a bit moister).\n\nService was prompt and friendly.", "Best Duck Panang I've ever had. World class Thai food. Service often is extremely slow, but the food makes up for it!", "Best Thai food I have ever had!\n\nBased on the recommendation of a cabbie, we drove north to Lotus of Siam.  We shared two dishes, the Chef's Special Sea Bass with veggies, spices and wide flat noodles and Panang Curry Chicken.  I ordered the Panang with wide flat noodles as I prefer the noodles over rice with some dishes.\n\nAnyway - WOW!  The food was fantastic and worth the drive off the strip on the north side of town.\n\nWe arrived around 1:30 pm for lunch.  They were still busy.  I'll admit that service was slow.  The waitstaff was friendly and knowledgeable.  Cost was maybe a tad on the high side but we both felt the food quality was worth the price.", "Best Thai food I've ever had and I live near San Francisco so have had some great Thai.  The atmosphere is very casual (which I actually like).  The menu and fine wine list are extensive.  I recommend the garlic shrimp and salad with steak.  We went back a second time the weekend of our visit.  Great place!", "Best and most authentic Thai restaurant in Vegas. And possibly in the U.S. If you are looking for the hidden gem in Vegas, this is it. Expect to wait for table, but that only means you are at the right place. If you eat at one place while you are here, this is it. And it's not some overpriced over hyped joint on the strip. Its the best Thai in the country buried in a dumpy strip mall, not far from the strip. Food. All curries are fantastic.  Tom kha kai is perfect, try the version without the coconut milk. I want that recipe!", "Best pad Thai I've ever had! HUGE wine selection (60 pages), at 1130 there was a line of people waiting for it to open. By 12 every seat was taken. Great service, food came fast! Weird that it's in a strip mall, but keeps it quiter.", "Boy did we have the right idea showing up before the restaurant opened, though we did eat here for Christmas dinner. There were about 30 people already in line at that time which attests to the popularity of this restaurant. \n\nAs for our experience, the beef satay was spot on and our egg noodles in a creamy coconut sauce (medium spicy) with chicken were so tasty.\n\nVery reasonable prices and excellent service. \n\nWe'll definitely return during our next visit to Vegas.", "Came here to check out whether all the hype is true. Well, I'm happy to say that Lotus of Siam (almost) lived up to the expectations.\nFood is delicious and service is friendly but I always get grossed out by places where they use those big plastic bins to clear tables. Wine list is decent but not as sophisticated as Chada Thai's.\nThe bottom line: Lotus of Siam is decent but I prefer Chada Thai.", "Can't add much more to the many many reviews on yelp about this place.  A few tips: 1) the entrance to the restaurant is from the back/parking lot area, not the main street; 2) the drinks at the bar while you wait for your table, and yes, you will wait (we did even with a reservation) are not horribly priced.  No hard liquor; and 3) make a reservation.  We called on our way into Vegas for the next day, so don't be scared off by this fact.  Just call, take the late night reservation time, and enjoy the food. \n\nStarted with fried wontons, which honestly were tasty but nothing new or interesting or astonishing.  Then, had the beef with peppercorn, which is a ton of little peppercorns on the vine (?) which surprised me; but this was delicious.  Never had something like this before!  Also, tasted the garlic prawns.  All the talk on yelp, so I'll leave that to the serious seafood eaters. \n\nGiant parking lot, so that's one less thing to worry about.  Also, lots of cabs hanging out in the case you want to take one over from the strip and just step outside to head back.", "Despite the reviews cautioning against dreadful crowds and long waits, we had no trouble getting seated immediately at 7 pm on a Friday night. This is probably the most spacious Thai restaurant I've ever been to - in addition to accommodating multiple large party banquets at the time of our dinner, the restaurant was also serving patrons seated at the full bar (a traditional Thai restaurant with a full bar - classic Vegas; complete anomaly). \n\nDespite the strong fight put up by the drunken noodles and the tom yum noodle soup, I ultimately went for the pork larb ($8.95) with a side of sticky rice ($2) per my waiter's recommendation on the basis of both popularity and healthiness. According to him, the larb - consisting of \"lean\" ground pork mixed with red and green onions and cilantro bathed in a spicy/fishy chili lime dressing, accompanied by a few cucumber slices and a petite wedge of raw cabbage - is prepared with no fat and is one of the most popular menu items. While the dish was undeniably tasty, I found it to be wildly underwhelming on the whole - the flavors tasted exactly identical to the seasoning packets used in Mama brand ramen (which I love but don't need to pay restaurant prices for). The biggest disappointment of all was the dismally poor quality of the pork. Contrary to my waiter's word, the meat was EXTREMELY fatty, and I found myself picking out the visible chunks of fat as I ate. I definitely should've gone for the shrimp instead, but we were in a hurry and didn't have time to wait for a new dish to come out. The sticky rice was a more moderate disappointment - the rice used is a longer grain than what I encountered in Thailand, so it was more fluffy than sticky. Save yourself $1 and just order the regular steamed rice. \n\nEven though I wasn't impressed with what was a solid 2 star meal, I attribute that more to mis-ordering than bad establishment. Service was fantastic, and you can tell the chef takes great pride in the restaurant and cooking/her food in general. I'm not sure along which basis people can claim this is the best Thai food in America, but I'd be interested in returning if I ever get the chance to try the more specialty / creative menu items, such as the drunken noodles and various seafood offerings - I'd just recommend staying away from the pork.", "Don't judge a book by its cover. This restaurant is located in an unassuming shopping plaza but the inside decor & food is definitely worth the visit if you're ever in the area. The Thai iced coffee was good. We shared a few dishes family-style:\n\nAppetizer: \n- Chicken wings: very good\n- Fish cake: flavorful\n- Papaya salad: refreshing but the dressing is a bit spicy\n\nEntree: \n- Green Curry: def recommend!\n- Stir fried vegetables w/ crispy pork: def recommend!\n- Seafood drunken noodles: recommend; lots of flavor\n- Pad Thai: ordinary, nothing too special", "Everything was a tad off. Service was slow and the food came out sporadically. Seems they need to improve on their customer service.", "Excellent.  Three good reviews that are more specific have been right on the mark and the lesser reviews were extremely picky. We got here at 545 and there was already a wait list, but the bar is accommodating and the meal was great, unique and delicious.", "Excited to try this place because of its reputation being \"the BEST\" Thai food in Vegas and having a James Beard award.\n\nUnfortunately, the experience fell short for us. I encourage everyone to really LOOK at the food photos and the presentation. The food is OK. It's OK/average but not great.\n\nWhat we had:\n1. Meatless shrimp rolls (fried). OK, nothing to write home about.\n2. Wonton Soup (cup) - very nice chicken dumplings nice light flavor. Veggies in soup were disappointing.\n3. Crab Salad - crab was battered and deep fried but it was not melt in your mouth, perfectly soft yet crunchy as a good crab salad should be. The accompanying vegetables were perfect and a beautiful combination. It saved this dish.\n4. Sweet and sour chicken (for my kids) - Awful. Sauce was too sweet, pineapples looked like they were canned, white meat chicken were morsels not slices. Disaster.\n5. Red Tofu Curry - Flavor was again just OK, not amazing. We've had much better.\n6. Fried Banana, Cocunut ice cream, sticky rice - The fried banana was like an egg roll with banana inside. Very typical but good. The coconut ice cream was a disappointment. The sticky rice tasted old and consistency was not sticky. it felt like frozen sticky rice that was thawed. Completely awful.\n\nTo me this restaurant is like \"Americanized\" Thai food.\n\nOverall, I would not recommend this place. Plus it's pricey for what you get.", "Favorite Thai place ever!!! Food & service is always great. I've tried several Thai restaurants around Las Vegas but there's no comparison. Lotus of Siam simply the best!!!!!!", "Five stars might be a tad high, but level with me here. I live in Tucson, Arizona- the land of Sonoran hot dogs, thousands of Mexican eateries and like five very mediocre Thai restaurants and one extra crappy one. So LOS really hit the spot and somehow we managed to get a table within fifteens minutes after arriving on a Saturday night! The service was a little odd, though. We had one server who took our order and didn't come back until we paid. The rest of the time we had a busser working his tail off. We don't quite know who got the tip. Our food was delicious. We ordered green curry with beef, pad Thai with Chicken, the special mango salad with shrimp, chat broiled prawns, and saut\u00e9ed veggies. The green curry wast personal favorite and it was super spicy. I'm never sure what to expect , so we went with medium and it was definitely on the high end of medium spice. My only quibble were the portion sizes. A touch on the small side but satisfying and fresh nonetheless. I ordered a Singha to drink but their wine list is certainly expansive. I'd skip most restaurants on the strip and take the short cab ride to this place. Plan ahead and try to make a reservation. We simply got lucky with out short wait time. I can't wait to come back for a bigger tasting of their menu. But this first visit was worth reviewing and it did not disappoint.", "Food was really delicious. We had 7 people. Ordered 4 appetizers and 6 entrees. We made a reservation beforehand, which is highly recommended. \n\nWe got the drunken noodles with soft shell crab, butterfly shrimp, a bunch of curries, and dumplings. The soft shell crab was good but not amazing. Same with the butterfly shrimp. Dumplings were delicious as were the curries. Their spiciness scale is off. We got 2/10 spiciness and it was quite spicy. \n\nThis place is off the strip so if you have a car and want something relatively affordable it's worth checking out. It's pretty expensive for Thai food though.", "Found Lotus of Siam through internet research 3 years ago and it was the best food find in Las Vegas I've ever had.  A trip to Las Vegas isn't complete without coming here for dinner. Make sure and research the menu prior to coming as there's literally over 100 entrees to pick you 2-3 choices.  Getting recommendations from your server is good advice.  You can't go wrong as the food quality is top notch and expect some of the best Thai you've ever had.  It's a $20 taxi ride from LV strip and make sure and get reservations.  Be aware they only hold your reservation for 5 minutes, so get here early if on Fri-Sun night.", "Good food but a little over priced. Portions are normal and not huge for what you would expect (considering that it's Thai food and for their prices) However, the food is good and they have a decent wine selection. Not fit for a wine snob but if you just want a glass or bottle with dinner it's perfect. \n\nThe lunch buffet is decent and good (not amazing) but I typically hate buffets so this saying a lot!  It's just an easy spot to fill up at esp if you're in the area w big eaters so indecisive people.", "Got a referral to lotus of Siam. It was a taxi hike off the strip but worth it. Didn't have a reservations but it was only an hour wait. I was surprised by the wine selection. Had a nice Pinot noir.  \n\nOrdered the tom yum soup w shrimps which had a nice balance of spice and flavors. Ordered the deep fried sea bass drunken noodles which was nom nom. Green curry w chicken was delish. And mixed vegetables Ka Pow style. Everything was great. Service was good too. \n\nHighly recommend.", "Great find in Vegas, especially if you enjoy N Thai food, the Khao Soi was super! They have a buffet lunch for about $10, but I suggest ordering one or more of their specialty dishes. We will be back again to try more items on the menu as everything was delicious. Good tip - you can walk up to bar and have a drink while you wait.", "Great food!  My stomach was very happy and I couldn't stop eating. They serve the food fast too so you don't have to wait long. And they got a good selection of wine as well.", "Great food, very authentic.\n\nIf you are from out of town, you need to make a reservation at least a week in advance.\n\nNoodle with soft-shell crab is our favorite, everything else was delicious also.\nThe sauce, the flavor .... was incredible.  Portion is a bit small which is fine, this way we have room to try other dishes.\n\nI would give it a 5-Star if rating the food alone.\nI gave it a 4-Star because the restaurant decor, the ambiance, and the entrance are a bit out-dated and stuffy.", "Great restaurant where you least expect it.  When you want great food that's reasonably price and away from the craziness of the strip.  Service is great and great wine selection.", "Heard a lot of great things about this place and finally decided to check it out. It's located in an odd spot in one of Vegas's older strip malls... if you're dining here at night you're in for an adventure, there's definitely a lot of unique neighbors. I came here on a Thursday night at 8:45pm with two of my friends. They were pretty busy but not packed and we were able to get seated immediately.\n\nIt was an interesting place; in the middle of the restaurant they had a huge wine selection concealed behind a glass wall. Additionally like a lot of popular asian restaurants there always seems to be more Americans than asian patrons. \n\nAnyways... after we were seated our server Jim, (I don't think that was his real name), was a phenomenal guy. He must have been working there for a while because he knew everything and anything about the menu! Jim made some great recommendations from the menu and always checked back to see if we were doing fine. \n\nWe ended up ordering quite a bit of food, but my favorites were #14. Nam Kao Tod, which was rice flavored with lemon, it was very savory and #13B Moo Dad Dew, which was the best beef jerky I've ever had.\n\nOverall it wasn't a bad experience. I would rate this place 3/5 but we ended up finding hair in the drunken rice and that was an immediate red flag. Especially the way the server had handled the issue. Our other server, (not Jim), wasn't even sure how to go about it. His first response was to bring us a new plate; we pretty much had to send back the entire dish until they removed it from our check.\n\nWe ended up spending $44 for 3 people. (That was after the drunken rice was taken off of our bill).\n\nLotus of Siam is definitely your typical mom & pop shop, there were handwritten \"out of order signs\" on paper place mats near the restrooms and you could clearly see the cleaning supplies in the restroom. Also the seating in the restaurant is a bit crowded, there's tables randomly scattered everywhere. You can literally place your arm on someone else's table if your not careful!\n\nTips: This place is a bit overhyped, the food isn't bad but it's like any other traditional Thai restaurant just with more reviews.", "Hidden jem of Vegas! Recent discovery was the spicy chicken wings, oh my god they were amazing! I love this place!!", "Hidden secret!   Man!", "I came here with a friend between classes and first impression is that I didn't expect to see what was inside. From the outside the business doesn't look too impressive but in the inside it is very spacious, modern looking and was pretty crowded during lunch time.\n\nI decided to have the buffet which was $10.99. A little pricey but had to try it out. I would have to say that all the dishes at the buffet were good but not great. I tried the Pad Thai, fried rice, fried banana, chicken curry (Good but a little spicey) and egg rolls.\n\nOverall, like I said the food was good but not the best I ever had. Con was that there was not much variety but was satisfactory. Next time I will be sure to try the entrees.", "I could not stop saying how great the food was while wee were eating. Fresh ingredients and amazing flavor. Was just voted best Thai food in the world by  a thai food critic for the Wynn. Amazinggggggg", "I had high expectations for this place based on it's \"fame\" and high reviews. I have been here a handful of times and never impressed. I tried to give it multiple chances but never has excellent food or service. Probably won't return, as there are too many fabulous choices in Vegas!", "I have had a lot of Thai food in San Francisco, Los Angeles, and Las Vegas and I have to say that Lotus Siam is the best I've ever had.  The food here is worth the visit to a part of Vegas I would otherwise go to.  If you are a fan of Thai food, this place is a must visit.  What makes this place special is the subtleness of the flavors.  Thai places often overwhelm - but here, the flavors are amazing without being overwhelming.\n\nMy favorite dish of the dinner was the Drunken Noodles with Crispy Duck.  We also had the Tom Yum Kai Soup, Spicy Thai Beef Salad, a Yellow Chicken Curry, and the Nam Prik Ong.  I would recommend all of the dishes we had - particularly the Nam Prik Ong.  Thank you to everyone on Yelp who recommended this dish!  This place is also a great value.  Great food + great value = five stars in my book!", "I read about this place in Los Angeles magazine and was impressed by what the writer of the article had to say... \" I would put Lotus up against anything I've had in the U.S. for Thai food. I'm blown away by the level of execution and consistency of their dishes.\" (http://www.lamag.com/features-hidden/2013/05/16/vegas-chefs-choice) \n\nReally now mister fancy chef dude? With all of the top notch Thai places in LA that is a rather bold statement and I decided I must witness such cuisine myself. \n\nMy wife and I are in Vegas and we decide to make the trek from the strip to this place that is located in an oddball shopping center. We saw the place and were skeptical... we walked in and our nostrils were immediately welcomed by delicious Thai aromas. Skepticism melted away as we walked past the bunch of people waiting around for a table. We put our name down and the wait was long - I wish we had made a reservation. That right there folks is the only gripe I have.\n\nWhen the hostess took us to our table she warned us that since they are busy the wait for our food might be lengthy. At that point we had already invested too much time to turn back and after looking at all of the yelp reviews we were ready to try this stuff, so that warning did not detour us. We were then greeted by a friendly waiter and he took our drink and food orders efficiently. The hostess' warning turned out to be unnecessary as our food came out in a very reasonable amount of time. \n\nOkay, enough semantics. The FOOD. Oh, the glorious food. The drunken noodles with soft-shell crab were stunning. I took the first bite and I felt my eyes pop out of my head. The flavors were so amazing! Then the panang curry with crispy duck was unbelievable. I've had \"crispy duck\" before and never, never in my life has it been as delightfully crispy as it is here. Perfection!  \n\nMy wife and I dine at some pretty spectacular places when we are in Vegas and we have talked about this meal more than any other. I will certainly be returning to this place each and every time I go to Vegas. So, yes. Mister fancy chef dude's bold statement is absolutely valid. Yes, I too am blown away by their amazing Thai food!", "I really love thai food. So given that this place was so close to me and I'd never tried it, I really wanted to like it. The outside is shady to say the least. However when you walk in its ten times nicer. Staff was good. But overall the food just wasn't that great, especially for the price. I had two of the most commonly raved about dishes. The drunken noodles with soft shell crap and the crispy duck in curry. Both were less than awesome. I did have the tom kah which was pretty good. But overall the food just felt...greasy. And not all that tasty. Blah! I just feel like I've had so much better thai food in Los Angeles for half the price. I'd save your money, or order one of the lesser expensive dishes.", "I really really really wanted to like this place, especially seeing all the wonderful reviews and all the awards this place has gotten....but I just couldn't :(\n\nThe ambiance of the restaurant is alright, nothing fancy but the service is wonderful. It is located in a strip mall and if you don't have a car you will need to hire a taxi. If you have a car there is plenty of parking but beware it is easy to miss the turn into the complex.\n\nOn to the food!! The food was well disappointing :( The chicken satay was good, but not \"oh wowey here go my taste buds\" good. My mom did say that they tasted exactly like the ones she had in Indonesia when she was young, so maybe it is more of an authentic taste and my Americanized taste buds didn't like it??? \n\nOn to the panang curry!! We just had panang curry at Wazuzu the other day at the Wynn and I gotta say the curry at Wazuzu and this one were identical and I would go as far to say the one at the Wynn was better :-O So not what I expected from a place with so many accolades. The other curry we ordered was alright....not much flavor and well kinda bland....*sad face*\n\nAll in all the food was alright, not the best I have had. My suggestion.....go somewhere else I know I won't be coming back here again.", "I was here over the Thanksgiving Holiday from SoCal.  I must say that the food here is excellent.  One of the top 5 Thai places I have ever been too.  Definitely try the Crispy Duck with Panang Curry and Drunken Noodles with Sea Bass.  The service was excellent.  Make sure to show up early as this place gets packed with locals and visitors from out of town.  Definitely worth any sort of wait.  The only negative was the people wanting to wash my windshield and wheels on my car in the dark parking lot outside.", "I was so excited for this authentic Thai restaurant and was sorely disappointed. The only good thing we had was the Thai beef jerky. Everything else was unmemorable as I literally can't remember what else we ordered.  Very greatly disappointed =(", "I wasn't impressed at all with this place. It didn't seem very authentic to me, nor was the food as good as people say. This is not the kind of Thai food I grew up eating, and my family is from Thailand and Laos. \n\nWe got 6 dishes which we were to share amongst each other. Specifically: Chicken Kao Soi, the Crispy Duck in Chili Mint Leaves, Beef Pad See-ew, Spicy Chicken Wings, Papaya Salad, and Pork Larb. \n\nWe started out with the Papaya Salad and Larb. Holy crap, were the portions tiny. I make papaya salad and also cucumber salad (same concept but with cucumber) every week, at home, in huge portions and it's a very inexpensive dish to make. There's no reason why it was served in such a small portion and at that price. It does come with sticky rice, but still, more would've been nice. Especially between 6 people. The Larb was tiny too. Each of us had a tbsp full on our plates. lol. It was cute, but also quite sad. Both dishes were gross to me, personally. Since when do you put sesame oil in either of those dishes? It must be a regional thing. I don't know. Either way, it was gross. I don't make it that way, nor do any of my family or friends whom are from Thailand and Laos. The Papaya salad had very unbalanced flavors too, which is Papaya salad blasphemy. It tasted sweet and spicy, but no salt or tartness. Weird. The Larb would have been ok if it wasn't drenched in sesame oil. I liked the spices, which were different, but good. \n\nThe Entrees were also very tiny and mediocre. For a place with so much hype, I expected to be amazed. I wasn't. At least with most of the entrees. I didn't actually get to eat the duck or chicken wings, but I heard they were fantastic. My brother is a piggy, so he ate most of it. I pretty much sacrificed my food so everyone else could eat. Needless to say, I went to bed hungry that night. :(\n\nAs for the service, it was ok. Waiter didn't yell or throw stuff at us, so that was good. :P", "I went in for a quick seafood soup, tom yum, I think it's called.\nThe broth was just too bland compared to the ones I've had at \nKrung Thai and Pin Kaow.  It was like water and it had a weird aftertaste.", "I've heard so much about this place being \"THE BEST\" Thai food ever so we were very eager to go try it.  I have to say I'm disappointed.  Not sure if it's what we ordered but we tried the top 3 yelped items.\n\nLocation:\nIt's located slightly off the strip so very convenient to get to however the strip mall is old and ghetto.  When we came at 5p it looked dark and abandoned however by 5:30p when they open for dinner there was a huge line waiting to get in.\n\nService:\nGood and FAST, we got our food a few minutes after ordering it surprisingly.\n\nFood:\nNam kao tod - The first bite of this salad was amazing.  The crispy rice is crispy and is packed with flavor.  However by the second and third bite, it was way too salty.  Would not order this again\n\nTom Yum soup- Salty but standard\n\nCrispy duck and drunken noodles- The duck was very crispy and good.  However the duck to noodle ratio seemed off.  There was like 80% duck and 20% noodles which I guess most people would feel is worth it but I like having more noodles.  After a few bites we were out of noodles and were just eating duck alone\n\nOverall:\nGood but not the best Thai food I've ever had and it's a bit pricey.  I feel like you can have the same type of Thai food at other restaurants for cheaper.\n\nTip:\nLong lines sometime but the restaurant is HUGE so it goes very quickly.", "In Vegas for a few days and this place came highly recommended. We got there right around 1pm on a Monday - today and it was busy. We had to wait about 35 minutes for a table of 2. We were told by the waitress that the buffet was closing in 25 minutes so we could order that or order off the menu. We chose to order off the menu.\n\nWe ordered an appetizer and two items off the Chefs Choice.\nFor drinks we got a Thai beer - Singha and then a Thai Iced team - which tasted like candy.\n\n\nOur appetizer was  GARLIC BLACK PEPPER CHICKEN WINGS - the wings were big and fried perfectly well. The garlic was definitely in full force but really yummy.\n\nEntrees included: GARLIC PRAWNS - which were really fantastic. Cooked perfectly and seasoned very nicely. The prawns came on top a small bed of lettuce, carrots, cilantro and a delicious sauce. This would be a great appetizer even for the table if you had a party of 4.\n\nand\n\nKHAO SOI BRAISED SHORT RIB - this was really great. the short rib was incredibly tender. The curry was just the right amount of spicy. \n\nService was a little slow. It seemed like they had just gotten slammed and we were coming in right at the end of lunch rush. It took a while to get our food and it took a while for them to take the food away, get our bill and then for them to take  and run the credit card so we could leave.  I felt like they were rushed and so some customer service steps were definitely skipped. like checking back on us after we got our appetizer so we could order our drinks. I had to ask the food runner for drinks when he dropped off the entrees because the waiter never popped by to check on us. Not a huge deal - but when we placed our initial order we told the waiter we were debating on our drinks and asked to keep the menu so I was pretty sure he was looped into knowing we wanted to order drinks.\n\nFood was pretty killer and I would highly recommend it. My hope is next time we come with more people so I can try many more things and I want to thank my hubby for eating a curry dish when hes not the biggest fan :)", "It was good but sorta pricey for what we got. Four of us spent about 100 after tax/tip for lunch. Not the best thai food I've ever had but probably the best bang for your buck in Vegas. Especially if you go for their buffet from what I hear. \n\nIf you really want thai food then go here, but I doubt I'll come here again. Next time I'm in vegas I'll hold off the thai food cravings until I'm back in Cali.", "It was okay. I was expecting some truly amazing food or theme.  In reality, it was just average. I base it on the fact that I have some pretty good Thai food where I live, priced the same as here and pretty comparable environment that in comparison, I'd have to say this is nothing special to go out of your way for.  \n\nI would recommend this place only if you want some decent Thai food off the strip, in a local popular restaurant.", "Ive never written a review before but i just had to for this place! Would've been a 4 stars if their service was better!  I had really really high hope for this place due to the high ratings! The green curry was really good but the soup and appetizer were both cold as if they have been sitting at the kitchen for awhile... they took forever to bring us our food... we ordered pad thai and got pad see eww... our appetizer didnt come till the very end and we had to ask multiple times... no one came to bring us our bills... we waited and asked twice after 15 mins of waiting... we just walked up to the cashier ourselves!  Horrible service!!!", "Just awesome! This was the best food I've had.  This was great and so worth it.", "Just had to add to the 5 star reviews. My coworkers and I found this restaurant off of yelp and thought 1300+ people cant be wrong. We didn't know what kind of area this would be located in Vegas, and it turns out this restaurant goes off the beaten path. The food is just amazing. I've been to a lot of Thai restaurants before and this makes my top 10. I have to attend a conference every year for work. My coworkers and I have agreed - this is now A MUST every trip.", "Located off the Strip in a seedy looking little industrial strip mall, you probably wouldn't give this place a second glance. But you would be missing out! Lotus of Siam has amazing food and a wine selection to rival most fine Italian restaurants and steakhouses. \n\nMy husband and I first dined here in March of this year. He had heard about it on Yelp and all the reviews said to try the buffet. Unfortunately it's just a lunchtime buffet and we had missed it for the day, so we ordered off the menu. We were not disappointed. Our server suggested the Drunken Noodle Prawns and we also ordered Pad Prik King chicken. Both were outstanding. Our server was friendly and attentive and the restaurant was very clean. We had a wonderful Italian red wine with our meal that made it absolutely perfect.\n\nToday we had the opportunity to try the lunch buffet. It's $10.99 and served from 11:30-2:30. While there aren't a whole lot of items on the buffet, the dishes they have are fantastic. Drunken Noodles, Green Curry Chicken, and Pad Thai were my favorites. The Chow Mein, not something I would normally order, was also very good. We tried the two Thai beers and both were quite good. \n\nI have nothing but praise for Lotus of Siam. I've added it to the list of places I have to visit when in Vegas.", "Lotus of Siam is in a strip mall so don't expect great decor, but with the amazing food, who cares!  Be aware that the food is spiced on a Thai scale not an American scale so round down!  But I will come here every time I'm in Las Vegas.", "Lotus of Siam is one of those hidden gems as they say.  Yet everybody from the local foodie Las Vegan to celebrity chefs and Hollywood folk have been to Lotus of Siam.  Voted one of the top 50 restaurants in the USA.  Truly a great place with amazing food and a wine list that goes on and on!  We frequent Lotus once or twice a month, highly recommend if you get the chance !  Not pretty on the outside, but the food and service (interior pretty nice considering the exterior) surely make up for the curb appeal.  Hard to find, but well worth it!!", "Lotus of Siam really lives up to they hype. \n\nWe had a 5:30p reservation. We arrived at 5:20p and there was already a huge crowd at the door. Now the 5 minute reservation window makes sense. \n\nWe ordered a number of items and each one was delicious. How often can I say that? The thai iced tea isn't as sweet as at other Thai restaurants. The duck curry was amazing. I always order it at Thai places and this was one of the best. My Dad isn't big on eating out and he enjoyed this restaurant. That's saying a lot. \n\nI also loved all the framed photos of famous people on the walls. It is so fitting for a Vegas establishment. I spotted Alton Brown (on the wall)!  \n\nLotus of Siam is a must try!", "Lovely to find a Thai buffet in Vegas for lunch. The tom kha is really good, spiced up the way i like it. The fried bananas where good too, we especially liked the pad Thai, most places I've been to don't make a good pad thsi, this place does.", "My family and I decided to give this place a try, especially seeing what great reviews were said on yelp. We got there during the lunch hour, for a table of 8 we had to wait 45 minutes which was understandable. When we were waiting inside, we noticed the buffet option but opted to order from the menu since the lunch buffet looked basic. When the food arrived, we all agreed that the food was delicious but many other Thai restaurants down the street offer the same great taste for half the price and double the size. Food may be great but their service was horrendous. For a restaurant with such great reviews, I was surprised we had to wait 30 mins for water and made many, many attempts to gather a waiter's attention for our check. Our party left unsatisfied and made a quick stop at Mcdonalds because we were still hungry. Based on price, portion, and service...I wouldn't return or recommend this place which is why I give two stars.", "My favorite buffet Mondays only because of the beef soup. Good food reasonable price. Chicken , noodles ,fried rice, all part of the buffet. Plenty of things to eat. Very busy all the time. Not in the best area but I still go. Lots of celebrities come here to eat.", "My husband and I have been waiting to come here but never get the chance to. From what I understand, there is always a long wait. We decided to come right when try opened for dinner, so the wait wasn't bad at all. \nWe ordered their soup, which was a little on the sour side, but still tasty. Their crispy duck was very tasty, but the portion was smaller than expected. Their pad see ew was very good! Even though we were very full, we decided to try their fried bananas with coconut ice cream. It was delicious! \nTheir service was outstanding, which a quite different than what we are used to getting at Asian restaurants. \nWe will definitely be back!", "No no and NO. \n\nWhile yes, the authenticity of the Thai food served is authentic and tasty. The price for the portions served along with the service are not. \n\nOverpriced with small portions and a server stealing your change is NO GO for me. \nSimply put, I've been to authentic Thai places that serve more food and at half the price. I'll admit it might not be AS good as Lotus of Siam, but for those that aren't foodies or even tasted authentic Thai food, you won't ACTUALLY notice the difference except for the hype. \n\n18% gratuity is automatically added for large parties.\nThough I don't necessarily agree with this, if the service is at least decent I won't complain. \n\nHowever, if they don't return the change (even if it were only $3) after an automatically added tip, this is absurd. \n\nAs a bonus, after our waiter took the check, he ignored my table for 10-15 minutes until I gave up and left. I was with a big party and needed to leave. \n\nSTAY AWAY. There are so many better places to spend your money at in Vegas and THIS IS NOT IT.", "No trip to Vegas was ever complete without visiting Lotus of Siam. My fianc\u00e9 and I have been going to Lotus of Siam every time we have gone on a Vegas trip. However, I have to say this might have been the lady trip to Lotus. The lunch buffet selection looked totally different with more Chinese food than usual and the Pad Thai, which was the one thing that I always looked forward too wasn't the same. The Pad Thai was light in color and bland. Usually, the Pad Thai is very orange and the flavorful, so flavorful that sometimes when I'm back in CA I contemplate on going to Vegas just so I can eat the Pad Thai at Lotus of Siam. Also, besides the Pad Thai being bland all the other food just didn't taste the same and was a little off. I don't know if the little Thai lady isn't cooking the food anymore because I didn't see her or maybe they sold it? But, whatever you changed Lotus of Siam, PLEASE change it back to what it use to be, it's just not the same. I'll probably try it one more time on a different Vegas trip because that's just how much I loved lotus of Siam and I hope they just had a temporary cook for the day.", "Oh my gosh! Wow! Best Thai I have ever eaten. I wish I would have pictures but 'Plar' whole fish, Satay, and Tom Ka Kai soup were phenomenal! I will come back next time I am in Vegas!", "Overall: 4/5 for good service and good food (1 star off for the imitation crab). \n\nWe arrived at 530 with no reservation on a Monday evening and were seated right away (when we left around 620 people were waiting at the door).\n\nOverall the price is very reasonable ($10 for most dishes). My friend got the cashew nut chicken (7/10 spicy left a very strong almost burning aftertaste which is amazing). Overall the dish was great (4/5).\n\nI had the drunken noodles with seafood. It was like pad see ew (delicious!) with a variety of seafood on top. The shrimp and squid were pretty good but the imitation crab (the biggest part of the dish) was a let-down. If I order that again I would specifically ask to leave the crab off. (3/5) \n\nI'm excited to go back and try even more on their expansive menu.", "Prepare to make love to your food.\n\nThe tom kah Kai soup -- the flavors are so complimentary. So distinct. I could eat this almost daily. You must get at least a cup. I split a cup with a friend and it was perfect.\n\nHad the drunken noodles with soft shell crab. Was good but I was almost more surprised by how not in love I was. It was ok. Good but I would definitely get something else next time.", "Really a 3.5 stars.  We opted for menu rather then buffet (kind of an expensive alternative, bill was $65 without drinks versus $22).   Chen was the server and was so fantastic.  \nLocation: In the ghetto in the shittiest shopping center I have seen.  I honestly expected to get shanked on the way in.  I think I have been to the tranny bar in the corner of this exact shopping mall on a seedier Vegas trip (not joking).\nFacility:  Surprisingly nice.  Updated and some nice finishes.  In typical Thai restaurant fashion, a bit hodge podge, but it was clean.\nFood:  The garlic pepper prawns are amazing.  Soups were flavorful and super yum.  I wish I had ordered the bowls as the cups were not enough.  The Papaya salad was good, but not very flavorful (where is the chili?!?).  The north thai coconut curry dish was relish....\n\nThis would have been a 4 star but there was a BIG BLACK HAIR in my food.  Ewwww.  I got Chen's attention and subtlety pointed it out without saying a word to not embarrass the restaurant or draw attention.  A quick apology and they remade it (about 10 minutes later).  But, come on, give us a drink or an appetizer while we wait or something.  \n\nGlad we tried it, would not return.", "Review of Buffet:\n\nUGH!  It was very very underwhelming. \n\nMaybe regular menu is great, but do not get the buffet IMHO.  About half the restaurant was eating the buffet... unfortunately I was in the idiot half of the crowd.", "Right. So I was recommended to try new things. By this, I mean things I would never normally eat at a Thai place. Scratch pad Thai and standard red curries.\n\nBegin food experience that went above and beyond any Thai experience I've had before. I rate the staff as the friendliest and most enjoyable staff I've had in Las Vegas. Bonus. Line when we got there, must be good and worth the wait. True.\n\nHad the fish cakes and the jerk pork appetizers. The pork was good, the sauce made it happen. The fish cakes? Out of this world. That sauce... The best I've had. \n\nThe only miss on entrees was the jack fruit curry for me. Still, with that said, it wasn't bad, but jack fruit, like egg plant, always is a miss for me. So with that grain, I rate the place five stars as the best Thai I have ever had.", "So I was in vegas for four days for a work conference. In the spirit of team building about ten of us decided to go to this restaurant. It was recommended by a friend of a friend's cousin...so we were a little skeptical. This place is in a shopping center away from a main road faced opposite from the road, so we were again a little sketched. As you walk in it looks like a normal restaurant, except I noticed a bunch of James Beard Awards on the wall...okay getting better. The menu was extensive. They had every thai food you could think of and then some more. Well instead of us searching, contemplating, arguing and then making up about the menu, we asked our server (that was the advice people kept givving us). \n\nSure enough, the server recommended item after item, and instead of getting just one thing per person we went family style and shared everything. It was a celebration of Thai food. The curried lamb and chicken were amazing. The noodles and tofu were just right. Everything was spot on and on point. I now see why they received all of those James Beard Awards. We also imbibed on some Thai Beer \"Singha\", they have a large or a small...i would go for the large. They are good. \n\nNext time I am in Vegas I am definitly going here. The atmosphere is great, the servers are very helpful and they know the menu inside and out. Just make sure you make a reservation ahead of time...that place can fill up in a minute.", "Some of the best Thai food I've ever had!  The place is in a strip mall, very nondescript, but the line of cabs outside shows you made it to the right restaurant.  The place was very full on a Monday night, but we got in and out of there quickly to make our show.  Service very friendly and efficient.  We got the pad thai, which was the best ever!  Usually the noodles taste bland, but these had a real tasty flavor.  We also had a curry pork which was also very good.  Other Thai restaurants could learn from Lotus of Siam!", "Surprisingly, this place is legit. A lot of the time these super-hyped places are just that, hype. Commercial Center, where this is located does not convey how nice and clean it is on the inside. \n\nPanang chicken and shrimp was very good. The shrimp, unlike a lot of places were big and tender. \n\nThey do have a lunch buffet with a decent offering, and I don't know if they change it up daily or not, but it didn't tickle my fancy.   Our group of ~16 was almost evenly divided. \n\nThere are two major cons to this place. \n\n1) I like spicy food and usually order a 7/10 wherever I go.  In this instance I went with a sizeable group of people, all who like it spicy. In this instance 7 was way spicy. More like a 10 or 11 and I wasn't the only one with this assessment. \n\n\n2) While the food was very good, $11.95 for the lunch portion just seemed too high. \n\nI'm only giving this a four star rating due to the price. If it was a little more in line with lunch entree pricing, it would have been a five.", "The ambiance was much better on the inside than out, and I must admit I was expecting a lot more food. My family and I love Thai food and we've been to a few spots already. So leaving hungry wasn't good but it was still a nice restaurant. Not a fan of feeling claustrophobic while waiting to be seated; however I will still say the food was good but I've had better. I LOVE FOOD! Looking forward to trying more Thai food places as this one didn't leave a lasting impression.", "The food as usual was delicious. My favorite dish is the fried bass with drunken noodles. The fish is boneless, sliced in to strips and fried to perfection. Perfect with the side of drunken noodles. The tom yum soup was not very good tonight. It normally is spot on. This place is always so packed, the service lacks. You should definitely make reservations if you go. \n\nOne issue I have with this place is the neighborhood it's in. There are lots of panhandlers here and it never fails that I get hit up for money. I just don't feel safe leaving here after dinner alone. Definitely go with company! Aside from that, you can expect good thai food. :)", "The food was amazing! I'm not sure what I ordered since it took a while for me to write this but from what I do remember, the food was great! The garlic shrimp is a must have. It was deep fried and huge, like mini lobsters, and as good as the reviews said. The crispy duck was pretty damn good too. The three of us waited about half an hour to get seated. Only downside was our waiter, who forgot one of our orders and gave my wife an attitude when she couldn't make up her mind about what to order. But then again, we didn't go for the service; we went for the food.\n\nPROS: Deep fried garlic shrimp, crispy duck\n\nCONS: Waiter giving wife attitude, but whatevers. Garlic shrimp!", "The food was good but based on all the hype, I was slightly disappointed. Not to say that I didn't enjoy the meal, because I did, but I was just expecting a little more.\n\nWhat we ordered: crispy wontons, tom yum soup, pineapple fried rice with chicken, seafood drunken noodles (spicy level 5), garlic prawns and roasted duck in panang curry.\n\nAs appetizers, the crispy wontons and tom yum soup were very good. The soup however left me slightly disappointed because it wasn't HOT when it came out. It was more like, warm.... why?\n\nOut of our entrees, the roasted duck in panang curry is AN ABSOLUTE MUST. It was a favorite of the entire table. Perfect in every way possible, I wish I could eat this everyday! The garlic prawns were ordered per the server's recommendation and I'm so glad we did! It was perfectly seasoned, perfectly crispy and not drenched in oil. I even tried eating the shell and it was so good! :) \n\nI loveeeee seafood drunken noodles but these drunken noodles were just okay in my opinion. Again, it didn't come out very hot so that was disappointing. And the spicy level of 5 (which I heard would be pretty spicy) was not spicy at all. Also, I'm not a fan when restaurants (especially with such a hyped up name) uses imitation crab meat or anything for that matter, so that was slightly disappointing. The pineapple fried rice had yellow curry in it so that was interesting, but not quite my preference. It was just OK and I'd never order it there again. \n\nSo with that said, the roasted duck in panang curry (under chef's selection) was amazing so make sure you try that! And the garlic prawns as well! Make sure you call ahead to make reservations. It may be hard to get a hold of them, but persistence will pay off in the end.", "The sea bass on drunken noodles is my personal favorite, but so far every dish I've had here has been delicious. And great service to boot, but don't be surprised to wait for a table. The word is getting out about how good the food is.", "They gave us a small table for 5 people. How do you expect us to have a dinner if you can't even fit all the food on the table! Zzz excellent food. Almost everything we got was good and well cooked and seasoned . I usually don't like Thai food but it satisfied me.", "This is one of my favorite places for Thai food.  Whenever I get the opportunity, I try to go there and bring friends and family.  It is incredibly deceptive in its appearance as it doesn't look like much from the outside and is in kind of a seedy looking strip mall.  I just park near the lights and remember to hide anything valuable.\n\nThere can be a bit of a long wait depending on how many people are waiting (a bit of a gamble on when to go).  However, it is always well worth it.  \n\nI love that the food is representative of so many different places and regions.  I love the Yellow Curry and the staple I always order at every Thai restaurant, Pad Thai.  The curry isn't soupy but a good consistency and the Pad Thai is delicious as well.  While the portions can be a bit small compared to other places (I'm 6'0, 190), three dishes is usually enough for 2 of us easy.", "This is probably the priciest Thai food restaurant I've eaten at. But if I had to rate based solely on the food, this place was incredible. \nMy favorite was the Tom Kah Kai. It had an intense spice and was slightly sour, something I would not expect in this soup. \n\nLike everyone else, I tried the drunken noodles with soft shell crab and it was sooooo good. The fried fish cake had a lovely lemongrass flavor and the penang sauce with the crispy duck was very flavorful. \n\nI think I'll stop by everytime I visit Vegas.", "This place is definitely tasty, but not the zOMG I was expecting considering all the raving reviews. \n\nWe ordered fish cake (meh... kinda greasy and meh. I've had better.), Prawn appetizer (a good sized shrimp, but that's all it was ... crispy wonton wrapped around shrimp), Nam Kao Tod, Chicken rama, Braised short rib Panang (very nicely cooked and the curry was excellent to drench the rice in), khao soi beef, ginger sea bass (this was OK... It reminded me of authentic Chinese dishes, which has better flavor... probably because of the MSG), and crispy duck drunken noodles (again, this reminded me of authentic Chinese dishes which I like more). Despite me liking the Chinese versions more, these dishes were still pretty good. \n\nI also had pretty solid Thai Coffee and a very bold glass of Riesling wine. \n\nService was fantastic even though they were obviously running around because it was busy. \n\nIf you go here, you will have an enjoyable meal and friendly staff. Do not be deterred by the shadiness of it from the outside. Inside is quite welcoming. Bright and clean.", "This place was just okay.  I feel like it didn't live up to the hype.  I went with the drunken noodles per the yelpers recommendations. It is a dish I am not experienced with, so maybe it just wasn't for me, but it was nothing special.  My wife had the pad thai with chicken which was okay but not great.  With all the rave reviews I was really hoping to be blown away.  The staff here was also suspect.  They seated us at the bar while we waited for a table but then didn't come to offer us any beverages.  I understand that it was near the end of the shift, but close the restaurant when it is closed, not when it is almost closed.  The bartender ignored us and just went about cleaning up his area.  Lame.  I would be willing to come back here and give this place another try, but I truly was let down this go around.", "This review is based on having the lunch buffet which is available on weekdays for $10.99. Long story short, I wouldn't recommend this place for lunch or for the buffet because not only was the food meh but the service was horrendous.\n\nWhen we got there, the host asked how many were in our party to be seated. We told them that our friends were already here and asked if they minded if we took a quick peek around the corner to see if they were seated already. The host said no problem and we walked past him. After looking for about 5-10 seconds, he walks back in front of us and says \"maybe they're not here yet\", as if to call us liars and try to seat us anyways. We walked back towards to entrance to call our friends to see where they were. The host follows us around the whole time as if we're not allowed to walk freely in the lobby. He continued to challenge us even after I told him nicely that our friends had texted us that they were seated somewhere inside before we even walked in. We eventually found our party, which had been seated towards the back. We ignored the host and just made our way towards them. \n\nAfter being seated it was impossible to get someone to stop at our table to ask questions about the buffet and menu. I thought about ordering off the menu,but my group wanted to go for the buffet, so I thought why not? Once we started eating, the only time we saw a server was when we needed refills on water and soda. No one ever stopped by to ask us how we were doing or took our plates. I even grabbed some plates and threw them on an empty bar where nobody was sitting because they were piling up. I also had to get up and grab my own sauces and napkins from the waiters' supply corner...no customer service whatsoever, but this is an Asian restaurant so who knows if they even care. There was also not very many people there for the noon lunch hour compared to what you would expect when experiencing a lapse in service. Maybe 2/3 of the restaurant was full if even. Had the restaurant been completely full, I would've taken that into account. There was also some confusion when we were paying our bill so it seems like the hostess' don't know what they're doing either.\n\nThe buffet featured items such as chow mein, pad thai, garlic wings, mint chicken and other typical buffet foods. The selection was small as there were only 2 tables worth of food. Most of the food was bland (pad thai especially) and some of the fried items were 90% dough and not much filler (egg rolls, fried banana are examples). The only thing that I really ate more than a couple bites of was the chow mein and garlic wings...show I really just filled up on wings. Not really what you would expect at a Thai restaurant.\n\nWhile I was eating, I was already thinking about how I was going to word this review because I was unhappy the entire meal. Keeping in mind that it was only the buffet that we had, makes me want to go back and try ordering items from their menu. However, the service was a real turn off and I've had better service at fast food joints than what I had today at Lotus. I doubt we'd be back in the future. Not sure how this place got their Zagat rating because I'm pretty sure service counts for something.", "This was probably the only proper meal I had during my bachelorette trip to Vegas besides Monta Ramen. Great Thai food! Not light handed on the spice so be warned. It's off the strip by cab in a lonely looking shopping mall and there's most likely going to be a wait, but it's definitely worth the wait. Anything you order will be good, but my fave was the Thai fried rice. I know, pretty typical, but isn't that how you judge how good a place is - by the standard dishes? At least that's my method. Enjoy!", "This was the second time for us at Lotus of Siam and we tried the lunch buffet.\nThe lunch buffet was nothing special, the dishes that was available was on the cheap side like steam rice, salad, sliced oranges, fried wonton, fried rice, etc. Being from out of town, the first time we ate here was a couple of years ago and had fond memory of the food. We ordered a couple of side dishes with the buffet and yes it was good but  was really surprise on how little you get for the cost", "Total find! Delicious Thai in an unassuming Las Vegas strip mall. Extensive wine list. They were able to accommodate my fish/vegetarian needs and everything was wonderful. Will definitely go back for more.", "Very special place. Best authentic thai food in Las Vegas. Its not in the best location\nMaryland/sahara but the food is amazing. Large menu choice, fresh ingredients and always busy. There is even a taxi line that many tourist go to this place. Its that famous. Love their soups and fish dishes. Great Vegetarian dishes too.", "WHO: For the lovers of Thai food!\n\nWHERE: In the Korean plaza on Sahara & Commercial.\n\nWHEN: For lunch, they are open from 11:30a-2:30p. They are closed from 2:30p-5:29p, and reopen for dinner at 5:30p-10:00p (I learned this the hard way because I was actually craving their food today and went at 2:45 only to find out they were closed... wahh! My excitedness got the best of me because I didn't even bother checking their hours. WOMP WOMP WOMPPP!)\n\nWHAT: Prior to coming here for the first time (Yesterday, December 9th), I have always passed by, heard from other people, and have actually seen them on TV! Thankfully one of my best friends has been wanting to come here, so we made it a Date!\n\nWe came for dinner (I heard they have a buffet for lunch *wink wink*), and waited about 15 minutes to get seated. The restaurant was pretty huge for what I thought it would be, and it was definitely ON AND POPPIN' because every single table was taken.\n\nWhen we were seated, our server helped us to a glass of water right away, and constantly checked if we were doing okay. My friend and I finally got to ordering:\n\nWe both got cups of soup, which I love, because not a lot of thai places offer cups of soup! =D (Or at least the ones that I have gone to). My favorite soup ever is Tom Kah Kai (because of the coconut milk added). My friend got a tamarind base soup, which was remarkably soothing on a cold winter night.\n\nFor our main dishes, we both got curries. I tried the Musaman curry with veggies and tofu, which was extremely tasteful, my friend got the Green curry with a kick of spice- really good as well!\n\nThere were so many other things I wanted to try on their menu, but I think my eyeballs were playing tricks on me because I for sure wouldn't have finished it all!\n\nSo... GO, GO, GO! I'll probably be back in a few days because I want to try their CRISPY DUCK. MUAHAHA!\n\nGOOD LUCK, GET THE CRISPY DUCK! =)", "We odes takeout from this place,  and it was pretty good,  though some of the dishes seemed a little overcooked. I'd like to go back there sometime to eat in the restaurant and see if the food improves at all.  Overall, I would recommend this restaurant based on the selection, speedy prep.", "We spent a long weekend in Vegas and made a point to have lunch here our last day based on Yelp reviews.  We were not disappointed!! Ordered the crispy duck Panang and grilled prawns in garlic sauce.  Prawns were good, but seemed more like an appetizer than an entree (entree size, but finger food).  Duck was delicious!  Next time will come back and try khao soi, pad thai, and green curry.  Recommend taking a taxi.  We took monorail from MGM to Sahara and then a cab.  Next time would just take a taxi.", "We went here and had the lunch buffet. For $10.99/person, the food was great and full of flavor. My favorite was the beef soup and red curry chicken...Good stuff!", "Went for luncheon buffet.  Pad Thai was good, but not the taste I'm used to.  Chicken wings very good.  Chicken with mint very good.  Soup OK and very spicy.  Some of the other dishes were pretty average.  We were there a few years ago and found that both the number of offerings, and the really hot spicy food had diminished somewhat.  We would go again.", "Went here based on the recommendation by other yelpers. I was surprised that the place is pretty big for a mom and pop establishment. \nWe reached on a Saturday evening and packed with at least 3-4 groups waiting for ahead of us. I was amazed how quickly they moved people around. Just waited for 5 mins!!!\n\nAmbiance / D\u00e9cor: Nothing great about the ambiance, standard run of the mill place. The location of the bar is a little strange, its right at the end of the dining area, so you see a lot of people moving around while waiting for the tables. \n\nServer: Our server was very attentive and friendly. He cracked a few jokes and kept the conversation lively. Also checked on us time to time.\n\nFood: The food was good. We tried drunken noodles and green curry. I found that they used more basil compared to other places... I love basil in all forms, so had nothing to complain. Their spice level are a little inconsistent, on a scale of 1-10 we ordered 7 for both our entr\u00e9e. Drunken noodles were not spicy whereas the green curry literally made me sweat due to spice.\n\nOverall: Good food. If you love Thai food this place will not disappoint.", "Went here while on my mini-moon in Vegas this past November.  The strip mall it's in is sorta ghetto and depressing (tons of parking, though), but the restaurant itself is nice and quaint.  I heard that it's tough to get a table, so we got there about 10 mins before they opened on a Wednesday.  There were already two other people waiting for them to open, as well.  A steady stream of folks were filling up the seats as soon as they opened.  By the time we left, almost all the tables were full.\n\nThe food is good, but to be honest, didn't blow my mind.  I think all the hype set my expectations pretty high.  The food was still great, though.  We ordered the larb to start.  It was tasty, but there was definitely a lot more rice than meat.  We also got the crsipy prawns, which was my fave. They take the shrimp out of the shell, but still leave it connected, then they deep fry it, so you have one part fried shell and one part fried shrimp.  Really tasty.  We got the drunken noodles, too.  They were OK - was like a brothy pad see ew.  I was expecting a thicker sauce, but it felt more soupy than saucey.  We didn't order wine, but their wine cellar was HUGE and they had a bunch of awards on the wall for their wine list.\n\nThe service was AMAZING!  Extremely attentive, friendly and knowledgable.  They really made the experience great.  They also have a huge menu, so there's a lot of dishes to choose from.  \nOverall, I'm glad we went, just so we can say that we tried it.  If we're in that part of town, will ddefinitely go again.", "What a find!!!\n\nThis restaurant located in an obscure mall somewhere outside of the Las Vegas Strip was a real diamond in the rough!\n\nFirst off, their wine list was longer than their menu--which is a great sign because I believe that you don't need to have a great wine list unless you have great food first to match it.\n\nWe started out with the Tom Yum soup which was delicious and full of flavor and fresh chunks of mushrooms, but that was only the beginning.\n\nOur second dish was the Fried Pompano and it was so well flavored and moist in the middle--not to mention probably one of the biggest pompano I have seen (I was expecting something considerably smaller) but still managed to be tasty and NOT dry as you might expect from a large fish for it's kind.\n\nThe third dish was the Crispy Duck w the Penang Curry--soo good, but so bad for you, but just generally sooo awesome!  It is as described by other yelpers so I will let their reviews make you drool.\n\nIn the end, the two of us left there happily stuffed and hoping that we will be back in Vegas soon to try more.  With all the great food in the bay area, not too many places outside northern California impress me, but I am a big fan of this place now and can't wait to get back there!\n\nHappy Eating!", "What a great experience!\n\nThe restaurant is located in a shady shopping complex and the exterior is as low key as you could imagine. However once inside there is no hesitation that atmosphere is excellent.\n\nThe staff was very friendly and willing to answer questions about the dishes to anyone who needs it.\n\nFood was awesome and plate licking good!\n\nWill be going back ASAP", "What can I say about this place that hasn't been said already?  It's no nonsense great food. Get the catfish!", "Wow was this place soothing on a freezing winter night! Eating Thai warmed us up to our toes!! \n\nAMBIANCE: 4 - it's really warm inside in the winter, which was a really good change from the freezing cold outside lately! It was very homey and comfortable. Even though the tables are spaced far enough apart, it's a bit crowded from all the people! \n\nSERVICE: 4 - Service was good, they answered all our questions about the menu and are very kind. However, they were a bit slow and didn't refill our drinks! \n\nFOOD: 5 - The food was very good!! Every dish is delicious. Me and my friend had 2 curries and Pad Thai and 2 soups to have a whole variety of items, and it was all delicious! The noodles were the best dish, I might go back just for that dish! \n\nThe special dishes were a bit on the expensive side. I'm gonna save up a bit and go back! It's worth it!!!\n\nThis place is worth visiting, it's one of the best Thai food places I've ever had :)", "Wow, it's been awhile since we visited this restaurant.  But, we hadn't forgotten about it.  We always thinks about the Garlic Prawns (Chef's Choice).  Since this was an impromptu trip we didn't have a set plan for anything special, except to have Garlic Prawns.\n\nWhen we reached our hotel we immediately called the restaurant only to find out they are completely booked this evening and tomorrow evening as well. They said it could be up to an hour or more wait.  We decided to chance it since we wanted our guests to try the Prawns. My husband went into the restaurant and place our names on the waiting list.  we decided to cruise the strip thinking we had at least 45 minutes, well, within 20-25 min we got a call saying they are ready for us.  I was thankful we didn't drive further into the strip , we may have lost our spot if we didn't return on time!\n\nTo not make this any longer, we got our prawns and we were pleased just like the first time.  Our guests enjoyed it just as much.  We enjoyed the Peking duck curry, yellow curry, nam sod, and fried banana and coconut ice cream for dessert.  Everything was excellent, including the customer service.  \n\nOh, how I long to return already!", "heard that Anthony Bourdain had visited so we stopped by on recent trip to Vegas. AMAZING food. and even more amazing wine list. both pretty surprising given nondescript location and underwhelming exterior. be sure to order something you have never had before to take advantage of the regional specialities offered that you won't see anywhere else.", "wow\neat here! this is a must for any traditional thai food lover.\npapaya salad, green curry, drunken noodle prawn best I have ever had. EVER."]
[2014, "seaons3"]	["1. Food:\nA) Tofu Green Curry: Flavorful and perfect. I somehow ate all my rice soaking it up with the curry\nB) Steam Ginger Sea Bass: Fresh and tender, a bit pricey but very healthy choice\nC) Fried Rice: Chicken or was it Crab spicy something, either was it was so good. A tad bit oily but our whole party loved it\nD) Curry Noodles: Not bad, but not my favorite\nE) Raw shrimp: They had it with their special sauce and with lemon, it was so good\nF) Tom Kai Soup: It was good but too sour for me. We can skip it for next time. \nG) Whole fish: Forgot what it was called but its one of the fish that was a whole fish not fish and they deep fried it with pour sauce over. \nH) Thai Tea: Delicious\nI Wine: They have quite a big selection, so we had the Dr Loosen 2012 Sonnemhr: Not pricey and went well with the meal\n2. Decor: Simple asian restaurant. \n3. Price: Fair, not cheap but for how good the food tasted it def wasn't considered pricey. \n4. Service: Really great and attentive even as busy as they were. Walk in's were at least 1 hr to 1.5 hr. So make sure you reserve before hand. My coworkers and I always go here after our convention so we make sure we plan it beforehand.", "10 entree's and everything was great. My favorites were the sea bass and the BBQ shrimp, specifically 101 B. Make reservations well in advance.", "Aaaamazing Food! Great Wine Selection.\nGet the Deep Fried Catfish and a bottle or two of NxNW red. :)\nSuch a great night!", "Always an hour or more wait but well worth it food is absolutely delicious in that restaurant is always packed", "Amazing Thai food in Vegas. I don't think anyone can beat this place.\n\nFantastic line up for wine. Great for business dinner as well.", "Amazing food, very flavorful, and incredibly helpful service who advised against some items we were getting that had a similar sauce and then recomended something else that was amazing. And the price is so reasonable! Definitely worth the cab ride off of the stip.", "Amazingly delicious! I am now a believer in the Lotus of Siam's hype! The steak tartare salad was awesomely yummy! The beef jerky was out of this world! Those two were my favorite! Everything else were scrumptious too.", "Ate lunch here. It Was Pretty good. I saw a wall full of famous people that came to the restaurant,  such as Alicia Keys, Nicolas Cage and some famous stars from the Food Network. Can't remember all the dishes we ordered, but we got pad see ew, crab, red curry, and some other dishes. Service was good and quick. I would recommend this place if you're looking for a good authentic Thai restaurant near the strip.", "Best Thai food I had in the USA. Service was great too. Only take is they charged me %18 automatic gratuity when we were two adults and three kids. Although the food is one of the best I ever had, yet it was still undermined by their greed for money. It's a shame they did that. I didn't I object because we were late and they accepted us anyways.\n\nI will still go anytime I am in Vegas.", "Best Thai food I've had in America. Some of the dish portions were smaller that I expected but we were in a large group and all the dishes were gobbled up really quickly. I loved the duck curry and Thai ice teas!! Wish I had more time to go back again! It's a must stop for international foodies!", "Best Thai food by far in Vegas. Drunken noodle Seabass and spicy Thai beef salad is a must. You won't regret this choice whether you're a tourist or local. Best in town", "Best Thai restaurant in Las Vegas. Some say it's the best in the USA and it would be hard to argue otherwise. Mind blown. Don't let the trashy 1970's communist Russian-style strip mall discourage you. Lotus of Siam is as good as any Thai food that I have ever had. I like my Thai food spicy and authentic and you can get both here is spades. The wait is long but worth it... prepare for at least 1 hour. Four of us ran up a tab of $250 with just a few beers and a good 15 dishes, we just couldn't stop eating.", "Busy so don't expect to be seated immediately, especially on weekends", "Came to LV for a trade show and wanted to dine near our hotel on Karen/Paradise.  Saw this place with great reviews & walking distance and decided to give it a try.  The walk was a little scary through a sketchy neighborhood - but well worth it!  I've never heard of Drunken Noodles before and my wife and I don't eat much Thai food, but these were awesome! Our waiter also recommended the charbroiled prawns, & pork satay.    We ordered a little too spicy at #8, but ate it up!  Excellent service as well.  We'll definitely be back.", "Crispy Duck Panang.  Had it consecutive times in Vegas.  The panang curry was so delicious, that we scoop up til the last drop.  This dish is a must every time I go here.\nTom Kha soup broth is the best tasting ever.  Too bad they use white chicken meat\nSea Bass was excellent too. Had it with drunken noodle, but it should be good with anything else.\nCrispy garlic prawn was interesting and good, but a bit salty.  Must eat that with the cabbage that is served with it.", "DUCK NOODLE SOUP. \n\nI've never had anything like it...the broth was sweet, tangy, and addictive. I've had duck noodle soup at various other Thai restaurants in California but Lotus of Siam makes it incredibly well. Came here at 6pm on a Sunday night with 3 others. We made a reservation, so we were seated promptly. When we left at 8pm, there were about 20 people waiting in line. I would not come here without making a reservation.\n\nWhile vacationing in Vegas, several people were telling us about Lotus of Siam. Some went so far as to describe this restaurant as the best Thai restaurant in all of America. I'm not sure if I can confirm that statement, but it is pretty darn good Thai food. \n\nWe ordered:\nPanang Curry: (5/5)\nPad See Ew: (5/5)\nPad Kee Mau: (5/5)\nCatfish soup: (3/5) I would not get this again\nDuck noodle soup: )6/5) When can I come back here?!! Can't get enough of this stuff. \n\nRandom fact: they have an extensive wine menu and a poppin' bar area.", "Damn Lotus of Siam, why is your food so damn expensive for these itty bitty portions!  When you think of Thai food, you think sweet, sour, spicy, and decent portions!  This place is definitely over-hyped and overrated.  \n\nThe wait is long, but I'm sure most people already know and are prepared for that (The wait time for my large party was 2 hours.).  The dishes I admit are delicious, however I left very unsatisfied and still hungry. \n\nGarlic Prawns - These were quite delicious.  I hate that there are pieces that are empty.  Worth a try but not worth eating more than once, very simple dish that you can probably make yourself with a deep fryer.\n\nPapaya Salad - Nothing special here, don't get me wrong it is good (you can't really mess up with papaya salad).  Again such a small portion, what are they expecting to feed, a baby rabbit??\n\nPad Thai - Tasty but nothing out of the ordinary.\n\nSoft Shelled Crab Drunken Noodle - The soft shelled crap was crispy, and alright.  This was okay for me, it was quite salty but the blandness of the greens evened it out.\n\nSweet Coconut Rice, Fried Bananas - I enjoyed this very much however, again overpriced for something that tastes the same almost everywhere else.\n\nTom Kah Kai Hotpot - The soup was delicious, however the chicken was like rubber!\n\nHonestly after my group finished our dinner, we were hella confused because all of the other good reviews.  We are from Cali and there are Thai restaurants everywhere, for the amount of our bill, we could have had good Thai food for a week!  Don't feed into the hype people, I'm sorry Lotus of Siam, you disappoint and probably are popular because all these people are being suckered by the other hyped reviews (a sad cycle).", "Delicious and worth the wait. Come ready to wait in line, and take some time to review the menu or go next door for the massage. The stuffed chicken and shrimp noodles were exceptional. Enjoy a great dinner off the Vegas strip.", "Did not disappoint.\n\nMy fave is the garlic prawns, crispy and flavored right.\n\nLiked the preparation of kra pow moo krab but maybe need to review portion size or increase price.\n\nOther items are ok like sea bass pad see eww and panang curry .\n\nComing back if in vicinity.", "Dive of a location BUT great interior, quality food and great service-- Pelegrino water only comes in large for $7 - not bad but could be a shock if you're eating by yourself as i often do while business traveling \nTheir Fuji water may come in small bottle but ask", "Do you watch parts unknown? Do you like Anthony Bourdain? Yeah, that's pretty much me. And this place was recently featured, I thought I'd go  check it out for myself. \n\nOrdered some of my fav dishes...\npad kee mao aka drunk noodles\nPad Ka Prow aka mint/basil leaf chicken\nCrying tiger\nCrispy duck paneng (favorite, eat it while its hot)\nAnd the Sai Oua sausage\n\nSplit among 3 people, we killed it.\n\nPortions here is not the best for the price. But each dish was tasty. Not to sound snobby or anything, but us angelinos are really spoiled by the diversity of our city. The flavors here is not something I haven't had before for a lot cheaper. I mean, I guess in Vegas, if you must have authentic Thai, this place will suffice. But if you are just like me, an Angelino visiting vegas, no need to make the special homage to this restaurant.", "Don't judge this restaurant by its sketchy location. I really wanted a view of my car while eating at this place for that reason, but the food made up for it.\n\n I decided to get a little weird and try the octopus salad. Tasty. Then, I tried bits and pieces of some co-workers' entrees and they were all delicious as well. Next time, I'll have to drench something in their yellow curry.\n\nThe dessert I had was delicious as well. It was a combination of lychee ice cream and some thing warm resembling fresh toast? I really can't remember the name, but if you see the word lychee, order it!\n\nI would give the restaurant four stars, but the slow service brings my review down to 3 stars.", "Don't let the curb appeal keep you from this restaurant. It's in a very unlikely location but the food is a good as it gets. Try the combo fried rice and the drunken prawns. Can't wait to go back. I recommend you have them bring out 1-2 things at a time. Otherwise they will bring it all at once and you can feel a bit rushed. Last thing bring you wallet. It's fantastic but you pay for it.", "Don't waste your time here. This is the kind of place people go to simply because a lot of other people go.\n\nWe arrived at 5:20 PM Sunday (they open at 5:30) and there was already a big line outside in 102 degree heat. People in Las Vegas must not have anything better to do than stand in line?\n\nOnce the doors opened the staff was adequate. We were seated quickly and the food came out fast enough.\n\nThe problem is how unbelievably small the portion size is. I literally took 4 spoonfuls of my $12 massuman chicken curry and the bowl was empty. The chicken was tough, dry, and tasteless. No spice to the very thin, watery sauce at all. I was literally done eating within 5 minutes. My wife had $13 Pad Thai and it was very small too. \n\nWhen we were leaving, the lobby was stacked with people waiting to eat. It really makes no sense to me.", "Expensive. Over rated. Long lines in the simmering desert heat. No thanks.\n\nOne or two dish that is different. The deep fried prawn dish is good.\n\nOther than that, I would not recommend this place when there are so many restaurants in the desert.", "Fantastic experience.  Amazing flavors and great service.  Go to the back of the menu for the northern cuisine.  Can't wait to go again.  Much better value than any restaurant on the strip.", "First time trying Thai food and I'm so mad I've waited this long. The food there was amazing. I was impressed and will go back again. The only complaint I have is about the waiter. It was close to closing time and it seemed as if he was ready to go. Service can have been better especially after I let him know it was my first experience with Thai food!", "Five stars all around for this fine establishment. The appearance may be tricky at first, but don't judge a book by its cover. This hidden gem, In a plaza on the outskirts of the Las Vegas strip has some of the most delectable, mouthwatering Thai food in the country. From their amazing Pad Thai, to the crispy chicken wings, the curry duck and there amazing wine selection. lotus of Siam is a meal you won't want to miss. \n\nPS. Get there early at lunch time to make sure you get a table. \n\nEnjoy", "Food: Combination Fried RIce, Pad Thai, Curry were delicious. Deep fried Pawns were Decent.\n\nService: Decent. We had a party of 6 and the place was packed for dinner on a weekday.  We waited 30 min to be seated and it took another 10 min or so to get our order through. Food came out quickly.\n\nFacility: Could be better. Floors were sticky and there wasn't a baby changing table in the bathroom!\n\nThe place is a little far from where i live (N. Las Vegas) but i would drive down there again to eat me some goooooooood Thai food.", "For Thai food in the Vegas area, it's fantastic. For Thai food in general, it's okay.\n\nDespite being off the strip and in a secluded plaza, Lotus of Siam is hyped up by almost any Vegas native/frequenter who recommends Thai food to you. The head chef is a chef who formerly worked at the Wynn, so it's easy to see why people are excited about it. The place is usually packed with people, so reservations might be recommended (although we just walked in and had no problem getting seated).\n\nThe food itself isn't bad. It's chock full of flavor, but I can't say it's the best Thai food I've ever had considering each dish is in the double digits. (Not unusual for Vegas.) We ordered the Pad Thai and sea bass with drunken noodles with two Thai iced teas; everything was decent, but not worth the money, in my opinion.\n\nLotus of Siam is worth checking out if you're craving some Thai food while in Vegas, but keep your expectations lower if you come from an area that is familiar with Thai food.", "Forget the service charge I talked about last time. Their food is so damn good I am willing to pay more.\n\nAmazing food. Service is nice with a smile. Need to book in advance or risk standing in line.", "Garlic Prawns? BFD. Papaya salad ok, nice heat. The other dishes were so-so. Talk about resting on your laurels,or banking on 4 star reviews. However I do enjoy the time machine decor. We felt hurried as well.", "Garlic prawns...With shells that taste like Potato chips...what is not to like. Make reservations or get here early to assure quick service because your mouth will be watering.", "Go for the buffet. It's worth it. Menu changes every day for the buffet. Friendly and nice service", "Great Northern Thai food and wine list that will not disappoint.  We had Garlic Prawns (5*), Sea Bass drunken noodle (4.5*) and crispy duck panang (4.5*) all medium spicy, we like heat, and a Riesling to top it off. If u like Thai food this place is great. Bonus points for the very nice and clean restrooms (Not common in the more authentic asian restaurants)", "Great Thai food in an unsuspecting strip mall off the Vegas strip.\n\nMy coworker took me here as he had been many times. I will definitely come back next time in VEGAS.", "Great Thai food. A bit expensive, but I wasn't paying! ;)\n\nI don't feel like repeating things that were already said, so if you're interested, get in line early and order fast! \n\nMy party was in and out in 30 minutes. \n\nFavorite dish was the Pad Thai, but the Crispy Duck Panang was equally amazing!", "Great authentic Thai food.  I love Garlic prawn and Larb Squid.  Food is great but a little bit overprice with small portion.  It's a very busy restaurant, make sure to make a reservation 2 days in advance ifnot you have to wait at least 2 hours.", "Great prices, really tasty food. I took a girl here, we ordered the Yom Yom Shrimp (I think) we had some spicy coconut cream chicken with white rice. It was delicious. The drunken seafood dish was kind of clunky, and I didn't need it. I want to go back and try some of the other options. The green tea was good ;). I liked the check the best, very manageable for the amount of flavor and fun we had. The service was flawless.", "Hands down the best Thai food in the country! I saw truly say this because of it's sophistication and how it's evolved through the years. I went there ages ago when it was a small strip mall restaurant. This time around they got more space next door and a walk in wine cellar, really?! \n\nSo you would imagine that the food quality would suffer it bit because of the volume of traffic, NOT A BIT! I actually found subtle hints of improved flavor profiles and a combination of natural ingredients. There's no heavy salt and powdered spices to mask the otherwise dull flavors that most places have. \n\nMost ethnic restaurants have the ideology of heavily spicing road kill and people would buy it. But if you really knew what it was you would puke before it got to the table. Anyway, what I mean is that you can easily mess up fish and spice, but not here. They really get it.\n\nThe menu is vast and complex for those who don't know much about Thai food, so ideally you want to go with a large group and get as much as you can to taste. \n\nThis is also probably the only Thai restaurant in the country that I know of that has such a well selected wine list. I think I know wine but when I saw this I was shocked! Pairings from regions beyond us so you go in blind and it just works! They know their stuff and will guide you well.\n\nSo now it's an annual event during convention time to go to Lotus. I look forward to my meal next year again.", "I LOVE this place.  The reason for only 3 stars has to do with how they run the business (see last paragraph).  I've eaten Thai food all over the country - California, Oregon, Colorado, New York, Florida, etc and this by far is the best Thai food I have ever tasted.\n\nFavorite dishes are of course the Chicken Pad Thai, Rad Na, and a soup I had with coconut milk, veggies, mushrooms, shrimp (forgot the name).  I ordered a beef type of salad last time and it was so fresh.  Love the little cucumber salad that is served with the Chicken Satay appetizers.  Thai BBQ chicken was very good - and the sweet and sour sauce that homes with it is homemade and delicious.\n\nGet there as early as possible as there is always a wait.  You can make reservations, but not for the same day and they will only hold your table for 5 minutes so be on time.\n\nMy complaint is they should have some kind of voicemail that has their hours and not just let their phone ring and ring for people to guess.  I've also called during business hours and their phone isn't being answered (I'll call back several times and it just rings and rings).  Frustrating to call when I'm in town and I can't get through to make a reservation or place a take-out order.", "I am glad I had a chance to visit this restaurant.  I never heard of this place, until my most recent trip to Vegas.  Dishes here are more expensive than the usual Thai restaurant.  In Vegas, you are going to be shelling out tons of money all over the place.  Maybe cut back on a few drinks at the club or a few lap dances less to save a few bucks to try this spot out if it would make you feel better. \n\nYou will find some dishes here that you may not have encountered at other Thai restaurants.  This place gets real packed.  Non-stop taxi's dropping off people every minute it seems.  Make a reservation a day in advance if you have a large group.  There are very limited reservation slots.  \n\nOrdered the Sausage, Deep Fried Garlic Prawns, Fried Peking Duck in Panang, Thai Beef Salad, and Drunken Noodles with Sea Bass.  \n\nMy favorites are:\n\nDeep Fried Garlic Prawns - nicely fried, battered, and garlicky.  Enjoyed eating every part of the shrimp.  The skin is separated and deep fried as well.\n\nFried Peking Duck in Panang - I normally do not eat duck because it has a certain taste, but there are certain meats or dishes that you may not generally like, however, prepared a certain way and you might just fall in love with it.  I certainly enjoyed this dish.  Maybe because it was fried and sliced into thin pieces with thick skin.  Throw it in panang curry and perfect fusion flavor.  Some in the group thought it was a bit oily and greasy, but I did not mind.\n\nThai Beef Salad - rib eye beef, salad, and thai sweet lime dressing.  Tender beef, good sauce.  This was delicious. \n\nSausage and the Drunken Noodles with Sea Bass were good, but were my least favorite.  Sausage had a lot of flavor, but I did not find myself enjoying it more than other sausages that I've had.  Sea bass was cooked well, thick piece, but standard.  The noodles with deep fried soft shell crab sounds something more to my liking.  Maybe I will be back to order that someday.", "I came here with a large group, so we had a decent amount of food (bill came out to be ~$250). My Thai friend ordered all the dishes for us so that we could share family style. \n\nFirst off, this place is pricey. Secondly, the food is not worth the price both taste-wise and proportion-wise. So I won't come back, unless I'm with friends who want to go. Considering I got to try about 10 different dishes from here, I'm pretty sure my mind won't change. \n\nWe had various dishes. So here goes. Shrimp pad thai - according to my Thai friend, authentic pad thai is with shrimp. It wasn't bad, but the portion was really small. As a little Asian girl, I easily could've eaten the whole plate without sharing. I also didn't like how it didn't come with nice helpings of limes, vegetables, and peanuts on the side like how almost all the Thai places in southern California serve it. The noodles weren't cooked well and often clumped together. Good pad thai doesn't clump. Crispy pork - this was disgusting. I tried 2 pieces and had to discreetly spit it out into my napkin. It tastes like bone marrow. I know that sounds odd. But basically, the pork was fried so much that the meat and breading tasted like old bone marrow. Sounds gross? Well it was gross. Tom kah kai - the soup was not good. Usually this soup is really flavorful. This was bland. Drunken noodle - like the pad thai, the noodles here were not the perfect consistency. They were cooked too long and therefore clumped. Fish curry - according to my friend, this is a special dish that isn't often served because it's hard to make. Well if this place did it right, there's a reason why it's not often served; it's because it tastes like old fish flopping in mealy sauce. But it'll probably taste better somewhere else. Northern larb (pork) - it tasted like unseasoned ground pork. Wasn't impressed at all. Red curry with chicken - like everything else, it's not as flavorful as I've had at other places. I'm sure there were some other dishes I tried, and since I don't remember them, they probably didn't strike my fancy either. \n\nWhen I think of Thai cuisine, I typically think of complex flavors perfectly orchestrated together to create sweet and savory dishes that stimulate all your taste buds. I'm not sure how many times the word \"bland\" comes to mind when I think of Lotus of Siam. To me, that is an atrocity for Thai cuisine. And if the food wasn't bland, it's because it tasted gross instead, which means the flavors were jumbled and not properly managed. To top off the bad food, the prices weren't good. Each person barely had a full plate of food and had to pay $25. I could get more bang for my buck by going to a buffet.  \n\nThis place was very disappointing, considering the many reviews. But honestly, I should learn by now that I probably need to hold Las Vegas to a different standard from Los Angeles. It's like the dumber child that you just have to come to accept as it is.", "I dream about finding restaurants like this.\n\nHuge menu, lots to explore, and a whole section on Northern Thai specialties.  The waiter says \"you really prefer Northern Thai food?\".  No, I'm just smart enough to make sure we include things you can't get at every strip mall Thai restaurant in the country.\n\nThey are in a strip mall, by the way :)\n\nI need to explore more, but let me recommend a few things we liked: NAM KAO TOD, KHAO SOI BRAISED SHORT RIB, THUM KA NOON (with Jackfruit!).\n\nMy biggest regret is the number of times I went to Vegas and didn't know about this place.  Last trip went twice in 4 days.  Couldn't get enough.\n\nThe food is outstanding and underpriced.\n\nI would take you there right now if I could.", "I entered Lotus of Siam knowing nothing of real Thai cuisine. I had only really had Pad Thai and basic curries - so my 5 star might be taken with a grain of salt.\n\nI found the food to be delicious and exciting.\n\nThe crispy duck with basil was phenomenal - tender meat, uber crispy skin and flavorful sauce.\n\nThe sticky rice with mango and coconut ice cream was enlightening. Simply but one of the best desserts I've experienced.\n\nI also had the Pad Prick Ong, egg noodles and green papaya salad. The next time I go to Vegas I'll eat dinner here every night to explore the menu more.\n\nMust get reservations!", "I found this place on yelp on a whim and knew I had to go here.\n\nAll I can say is that if you like Thai food... You must try Lotus of Siam-- you won't know good Thai food until you do!", "I found this place via Yelp and was also influenced by magazine articles about good and reasonable food outside the Strip.Taxi from and back to our hotel (Mirage) was speedy and reasonably priced.\n\nThere was a short line to get in and the wait was not very long. the restaurant was crowded and reminded me of other nicely decorated Thai restaurants. However, stacks of boxes could be seen in the bar area.\n\nThe Panang curry was excellent. Great mix of heat, salty (fish sauce) and sweet(sugar added usually). The crunchy duck was a greaat contrast to the Panang curry and I really enjoyed it.\n\nOrdered Nam Kao Tod a \"crispy rice\" dish and it was unusual and quite a surprise due to the sausage. \n\nOrdered the sweet and sour fish (whole pompano) and it was excellent. the sauce is so unique...haven't figured out what makes it so.\n\nWill definitely eat here again!!", "I frequently visit Las Vegas. With so many celebrity chef restaurants around the strip, This was the first time I had ever thought of trying Thai restaurant in Las Vegas. The restaurant wasn't too far away. It was approximately two miles away from the Stratosphere. It is located in a rather big plaza with plenty of parking. The restaurant exterior was not much to look at. However, the interior is decently decorated and clean. After looking at the menu, my initial thought was this place is way too expensive for Thai food. Gave it a try anyway. I had the famous curry duck and various other plate, Which I do not recall the name (please refer to my pictures). They tasted really good, and I would go back for more given a chance. I would have given this place a five stars if the price is a little lower.", "I have had Lotus of Siam on 3 occasions since moving to Las Vegas, 1 in the restaurant and 2 times for take out. \n\nThe food served in the restaurant was a lot better than the experience I had with take out. I ordered the yellow curry and spicy noodles with shrimp for my first take out order. The styrofoam box the noodles were in looked like it had been stepped on, their was sauce all over the bag and it leaked on my counter. After preparing my first plate of food I noticed a black and white hair in my food. My friend and I were disgusted because it looked like an animal hair. I immediately called back Lotus and told them I would be bringing the food back for a refund. When I went into the restaurant I showed them how sloppily they had packaged it and the unknown hair in my food. They said it was probably a hair from one of the girls clothing and I told them it looked like a cat hair. After this they handed me my money and I could see they wanted me out of their restaurant.\n\nFast forward a few months later, Lotus is still the closest Thai restaurant to my place and I don't like Komol. I told my friend I wanted to order take out again and she was completely surprised I wanted to give them another chance. I ordered the panang curry with vegetables and asked what vegetables were in the dish. Penny, the owners daughter said carrots, cabbage, and broccoli. I also ordered the Thai spaghetti with chicken. This time my order was packaged correctly but I noticed the panang curry was more oily than usual and contained very little sauce. I also saw that there was baby corn, various peppers, onions, and green beans. Penny described inaccurately what vegetables were in the dish. What if I was allergic? People need to be careful these days and not say things unless they are 100% sure. Both the panang curry and Thai spaghetti were a solid three stars, but after my shocking take out order and misdescribed dishes the most I can give this restaurant is two stars.", "I heard about this place from Anthony Bourdain on his show. My husband and I love Thai food. We was very excited to try the best Thai food in America. \nI am Thai and live in DC area. I gonna say only ok Thai restaurant in DC area much better than that. Curry has too much coconut milk test.  \n\nService was ok and pricey.", "I hesitated between a 2 and 3 star. The food is a solid three star. Value for your dollar is a big fat 1 star. Maybe I hyped it up too much in my head because of all the rave reviews and also the long line waiting outside even before the restaurant opened.\n\nWe got basically most of the popular items.\nDrunken noodles with sea bass, we asked for level 7 spicy and it had a good kick and the sea bass was very moist and tender with it. However, for almost an $30 dish, it was not very much  noodles and just barely enough fish for our group of 4 to split.\nCrispy Duck Kha Soi (Sp?), this was a creamy coconut based sauce with egg noodles and crispy duck. I have to say, the duck was perfectly cooked and delicious, the noodles was good too, especially coated in the sauce. Again for the price of $25 it was barely enough noodles to split between 4 people.\nThe fried shrimp everyone seemed to get. I do love how crispy the shells are, completely edible and full of shrimp flavor. It looks like a big plate of 10+ shrimp, but it's more like actual shrimp meat is 4-5 pieces and the rest of just shell. \nThe spicy chicken wings were just OK, tastes like Costco wings tossed in the Asian sweet chili sauce, would skip next time.\nWe got the red chili dip, it was very smokey but that was about the only flavor it really had, not a fan of this one either.\nOrdered a curry dish, it didn't have coconut milk and was another one lacking in flavor, didn't finish this dish because it just didn't taste like anything, just a lot of boiled veggies in a red watery soup. \n\nYou'd think after 6 dishes between 4 people we'd be full but ended up having to order another drunken noodle dish but this one with just veggies. Sadly this second round was not as good as the first one with sea bass. We also go their mango sticky rice for dessert.\n\nOverall, some of the dishes were very good but not good enough to justify the price.", "I liked this place, but it was told that it was going to be the \"best thai food ever.\" It was not the best curry I have ever had, however, the summer rolls (wait, were they spring or summer) were the best I have ever had. Fresh minty deliciousness!!!! \n\nThey also have a daytime buffet that closes early, so I wasn't able to get it (folks in line said NOT to get the buffet), but I wished I had since I would have been able to try more dishes. \n\nPlus, this joint is only a quick but fun drive from The Strip. I saw a tranny trying to light she/he/their crackpipe in a storefront so I drove around the block a few extra times it was so entertaining! Score.", "I love Asian cuisine.... Heck I love food in general! LoS was introduced to me from a Vegas native. It is off the strip in a more residential commercial area. There is definitely a wait during dinner time enough the restaurant is huge! \n\nI enjoyed every single dish! Even the waiter agreed that all my dishes are great choices (maybe he says this to all his guests). \n\n1. Roasted Duck Curry- Yanno the Peking duck that is roasted in a lot of Chinese restaurants? Yeah! That one. BUT Crispier. Smother some red curry over it. BAM\n\n2. Tom Yum Soup with Shrimp- Ya can't go wrong with lemony-spicy soup!\n\n3. Drunken Noodles with some kind of fish (Sea Bass??) I am not sure, but the fish was soft, the noddles were extra carby, and the sauce is nice and savory.\n\n4. Thai Iced Tea- Duh!\n\n5. Fried Garlic Shrimp- Crispy, Garlic-y, Great dipped in that curry sauce!", "I saw this restaurant featured on Anthony Bourdains without borders and had to try it. We ordered only from the back of the menu for their famed Northern Thai food and did not regret a single item. We ordered the Nam prik ong, Nam kao tod & the Khao soi. The nam kao tod was out of this world I highly recommend it!!!", "I think the biggest mistake I made coming here was that I was expecting to be blown away. Afterall, some people say this is \"America's best Thai restaurant.\" That being said, the food was really authentic, the shrimp were fresh and huge, and the service was warm!\n\n1. Thai Iced Coffee - Oh My Heaven, I would've chugged this all day if I could have!\n\n2. Garlic Prawns - yum! I'm don't always love fried shrimp, but these are perfectly golden fried (not greasy), are tender, and have a subtle seasoning\n\n3. Chu Chee Shrimp - Oh my goodness NOM! This was similar to a Red Curry but was super fresh and light tasting. \n\n4. Kao Soi - I'm not in to soupy noodles, but my friend ordered this. His mom was raised in Thailand and he has had the dish at home and in Thailand many times. He thoroughly enjoyed it!\n\n5. Thai Iced Tea - this was fine, though I would've preferred a stronger tea flavor (it was a little bland due to too much milk)\n\n6. Mango Sticky Rice - I suppose it's hard for this dish to ever really blow anyone away. It was good, and the seasoning on the sticky rice was a nice contrast to the sweet mango\n\nTip: make a reservation for dinner to avoid a 2+ hour wait. You should be fine for lunch though (we have no wait at 1:45pm on a Friday).", "I used to come to this place more frequently and always loved there lunch buffet but this time we came back it was not there any more . I was so disappointed with our visit first we sat at our table for more the 15 min before anyone came to us and then we asked for water with lemon and it took about another 5 min to get the lemon had to ask several times for it. Our service was horrible we waited about 30 min to get our food and during that time the waiter never came to the table to check up on us well he didn't come up to us the whole time  we were there we had to look for him . When it was time to order dessert that took about another 20 min and again the waiter never came to apologize for the wait he didn't even look at us every time he passed the table it was like we weren't even there . I used to love this place but I don't think I will be going back . I gave it 3 stars only because I know how good it used to be otherwise I would give it 2 stars", "I was there at the Lotus Siam week of 4th of July.  Per Anthony Bourdain recommend trying garlic prawns.   Yes, it was the best thing I ever eaten next line to soft shall crab!  I wish I could have tried other dishes...  Perhaps next year July,  I would definitely visit again.  Btw, it is hard to get a cab service between 2:30 to 3:30.  Plan accordingly!", "I'm not sure what the negative comments are all about, but this was hands down the best Thai food I've ever had. I was in Vegas for a couple days and had to have a meal due to at least 5 recommendations from friends.\n\nThe food was flavorful, crunchy and tender when needed, and portions not overly huge like most places. My friend and I shared the Mikrob and garlic prawns, and I had the crispy duck with drunken noodle. All were absolutely delicious!!", "If I could give them a 10 I would!\n\nCame back here and ordered the specials in the back. Best decision of my life.\n\nCrispy Duck Panang - $24.95 - BEST CURRY OF MY LIFE!! I got level 8 again and it was not spicy enough. The Panang curry was life changing. It the creamy coconut flavor was amazing. The taste is indescribable! The duck was cooked perfectly. The skin is so crispy even though it is covered in curry. You get a huge portion of duck. I was so full afterwards but it was so good I had to finish. \n\nGarlic Prawns - $23.95 - OMG CRISPY!!! If you like deep fried shrimp, this is freaking legit. The shrimp are huge! The batter creates an amazing garlicy crispy texture. They even deep fried the shells! I actually liked the shell the most because of the strong shrimp flavor. Comes with rice. Only issue, as a meal, you get tired of it eventually. If this was served with a side of any thai noodles, it would be shrimp perfection! \n\nWarning, prices went up from a few month ago!\n\nThis was hands down top 3 meals of my life.", "If you come to Vegas, you have to eat here.\n\n  Most importantly, the food is amazing. Thai food is my favorite and there is no better place than here. They give very generous portions for the prices you're paying and it tastes incredible. Everything I've tried here has been amazing. Your Vegas trip is not complete unless you eat at Lotus of Siam!!", "In 1998 I moved to Las Vegas on my 21st birthday. I worked at Casino Royale on the Strip as a bartender and sometimes just showed up at the Cheetah and jumped on the pole. There was a pomegranate tree growing outside my window on Gypsy Lane, and hummingbirds would fly up to feed at it. Air travel was wonderful in those days, so I would often take off for the weekend, to LA, SF, CO or NM. Nobody knew how amazing Lotus of Siam was, and it was my favorite place to eat.\n\nI moved back to NYC later that year, but I returned to Las Vegas in 2003 to get married. Having seen many other friends tie the knot since then, I will say this. Las Vegas weddings are the best. Don't just do a bachelor party. Make it one big party for everyone. No parents, no kids. Everyone arranges their own travel, and then block out some hotel rooms for your guests and have fun. \n\nNow that you have an idea of what I call romance, Lotus of Siam is a great date spot. It's been forever since I've been back to Vegas, but I recall this was tucked into a strip mall with a shooting range, a bail bonds, a pawn shop, a check cashing and a trashy lingerie shop. Basically, everything you want one stop shopping, even if you have to beg, borrow or steal, and why not go for the hat trick?\n\nWhy am I remembering them? Because that was a seriously awesome time. They opened a NY restaurant, had a falling out with their business partner, who tried to make it fancy, and I respect that they wanted more management control, though they're so old, it was too much for them, running two locations. I appreciate how passionately they feel about the food and their reputation. That also means long waits and big crowds, so I will fondly remember those halcyon days and that delicious Thai food.", "Incredible hole-in-the-wall Thai place! Went with 5 other friends and split ten dishes all family style - all delicious. Definitely recommend the Khao Soi Braised Short Rib, the spicy chicken wings, and the garlic prawns", "James Beard award winning restaurant in a ghetto stripmall in Vegas? Why yes there is! Had to convince my friends and family to actually stop in but once we got there, sat down and tried their lunch buffet everyone was thanking me! One of the best Thai food places I've been and it was a buffet. I don't really like buffets because I'm always concerned about the freshness of the food. This place was amazing and crowded but the best pad Thai ever!", "Just know that once you eat here your expectations will be very high.  I have been to SEVERAL thai restaraunts since moving from Las Vegas and have yet to find one where the food and service can match up.\nThe dishes are authentic, the flavor and spices are amazing (especially the Panang Curry), and the servers are extremely attentive.  \nMy advice is to come early or make a reservation because you WILL have to wait (even on a Tuesday night it can get crowded).\nDon't be turned off by the sad strip mall and the pan handlers in the parking lot (especially the couple on their bikes)...it's what's inside that counts.", "Last time we were in the Vegas area we tried Lotus of Siam. We had heard rave reviews and knew celebrities even frequented the place. When we first pulled up, we were a little surprised by the restaurant's appearance. It's definitely not fancy, and isn't in the nicest of neighborhoods. Nonetheless, we had heard such great things about the food so we were excited to give it a try. When we walked in, the inside was pretty cute. We had quite a long wait (as other reviewers said, reservations are a good idea). We thought we'd just go to the bar and have a drink while we waited. The bartender was AMAZING. I'm very picky about wines, and she let me taste a couple before ordering the one I wanted. When a table finally opened up, the dinner service was absolutely fantastic as well. Everyone was so friendly and attentive! As for the food, it was by far some of the best Thai I have ever had. I had the calamari garlic. I love calamari, but sometimes when I order it in restaurants it's really tough and chewy. The calamari here was SO tender. The sauce was spicy and fragrant: lots of garlic and cilantro. I just wish I could have it more often! Especially for the quality of the food, the prices are incredibly reasonable. Highly recommend Lotus of Siam... just be prepared to make reservations or endure a bit of a wait!", "Lotus of Siam is a bit off the strip, and sits in a sketchy area. There is nothing special about this place, inside and out. After reading so much about it, and hearing Andrew Zimmern rave about this place, it was on top of my list for my last Vegas trip. It goes to show, all of the top restaurants aren't inside the popular casinos and resorts. Most of them are all commercialized and owned by restaurant groups. Lotus of Siam is one of one. It makes it unique and special, and is a part of Vegas as much as any of the popular resorts.\n\nWe started things off with something exciting and new. The Koong char num plar, raw prawns marinated in seasoned fish sauce was a favorite of ours. With the spicy fish sauce, fresh garlic and roasted chili paste, the dish definitely had flavor. Ironically, I used a bunch of that fish sauce to get rid of the rawness and \"fishy\" flavor. Spiciness met sweetness from the shrimp. The texture of this was spectacular. A bit on the sticky side, the texture took some getting used to. Still a great way to start.\n\nMy personal favorite was the Nam Kao Tod. It was a crispy rice mixed with minced sour sausage, green onion, fresh chili, ginger, peanuts, and lime juice. Texturally different from the raw shrimp, this had a nice crunch, and the crunch played a great role in this dish. The ginger flavor popped and the citrus was key. It was delicious and refreshing.\n\nThe dish of all dishes-the one to get here always Is the Drunken Noodle Prawn. Thick rice noodles are on fried with deep fried prawns. The shell I kept on and the frying process makes the skins edible. The special blend of garlic sauce and Thai basil was perfect. The prawns were cooked perfectly and the crunch of the skin was amazing. This dish is pretty hard to pass up -- a definite must order here.\n\nTo end everything, we ordered the coconut ice cream with sticky rice. It was a great neutralizer form all that garlic, shrimp, and spices. The coconut flavor was mild and not too overpowering. My favorite was the sticky rice. Everything just had such a delicate flavor and nothing was overbearing.\n\nBack home in Los Angeles, there are a bunch of Ktown style Chinese restaurants that have pretty good food. From spicy seafood noodles to fried pork and beef dishes, they are all delicious, but you won't find any of these in China. The menu hasn't changed ever since the first time I went, and that is the quality of the places. You know what you will get, and its the same no matter when you go. Lotus of Siam is kind of like that. The menu hasn't changed in forever, and the food, though may not be genuine Thai renditions is delicious.", "Lotus of Siam is the only Thai restaurant I have tried in Las Vegas  so I cannot say that this is the best Thai restaurant in town.  But it might be hard to beat Lotus of Siam to be named the best Thai.\nWe went in as a group of twelve without a reservation and we followed the restaurants correct advice to arrive fifteen minutes prior to opening. To my relief we were seated all together!!\nRestaurant is located in a strip mall with unassuming store front facade but once you enter, the dining room was expansive, \nWe ordered three servings each of six or seven dishes. My favorite was the steak tare tare.and the papaya salad. Service was courteous and prompt.\nIf I go back to sin city,  I will definitely go back to Lotus of Siam.", "Lotus of Siam, often referred to as the best Thai restaurant in America, has by now garnered a ton of accolades and press. Still, it sits in an easily overlooked and unassuming strip mall away from The Strip. The walls are adorned with famous celebrities as former patrons. There's still a wait, although much of that may be to create the illusion of a packed dining room (it's not). We waited about an hour for a table for six, although the table had been empty the entire time. \n\nThe menu itself is huge and includes dishes from Northern Thailand not found in your average Thai restaurant. Based on prior reviews, we ordered the nam kao tod and the sea bass drunken noodles. We added on some typical Thai plates such as pineapple fried rice, pad see ew, and the spicy garlic chicken wings. The nam kao tod beef was good, but inconsistent. Some of the pieces were perfect, while others were more tough and dry. The must-try dish of the night was the sea bass. The fish was perfectly fried, but the drunken noodles left much to be desired. The pineapple fried rice was and pad see ew were average. \n\nWe finished with a mango sticky rice for dessert, which was amazing. The mangos were as sweet as can be and the sticky rice was topped with just the right amount of lavender to give it a floral aroma with every bite. Overall, the sea bass was a bit pricey and the other dishes were okay, but it was a good meal, albeit pricey for Thai. I have to return to try the garlic prawns. Come with a group of friends (but come early) so you can try as many of the 150 dishes as possible.", "Lotus sits in a ghetto Korean plaza away from the Strip.\nAnd so I was a bit concerned until I saw the line of customers forming by the door before the restaurant even opened.\n\nThe interior is much larger than you'd expect and much nicer than you would hope.\n\nThe restaurant runs like a well oiled machine. Customers are seated quickly and orders are completed quickly in what I'd imagine to be a gigantic kitchen. Staff is also attentive and prompt.\n\nI suggest \nPad Thai - good\n#58 - don't remember what it was, just eat it with the lettuce it sits on\nPapaya Salad - fresh and strong\n\nI ordered the crispy garlic prawn as many yelpers suggested and was not impressed..\n\n4 stars because of high prices and below average quantity; will still return.", "Love love love this place. Hands down best Thai in the state! Very authentic and a complete surprise when you walk in the door", "Meh.  Everyone raves about Lotus of Siam and I think it's good, but I don't think it's great.   It's expensive, crowded and loud.   I would rather eat Thai elsewhere.", "Musamon curry with fried tofu and shrimp is amazing ! A friend who is a Thai food neophyte got the sweet and sour chicken . I was skeptical , but it was delicious , too .", "My definition of ZE BEST Thai restaurant in Vegas! I love love love their fried garlic prawns! It's a must have item on your order! We tried the crispy duck curry, sea bass with onion & ginger, soft-shell crab drunken noodle, pad see yew, tom yum goong seafood soup. They were all very delicious! For dessert, we tried the fried banana with coconut ice cream. The sticky rice & mango was out of season so we couldn't have it thus time. The experience was great, we love their food and service. Definitely will come back every time we're in town.", "My favorite Thai food in the freaking USA!  I've been all over Thailand several times, and I swear this food is just as delish, except you won't get diarrhea from eating it haha.\n\nI don't even know what to recommend...my mom is super Asian, so we just let her take the reigns and order to her heart's delight, family style.  I know we usually get the hot pot with seafood (not chicken, it's not as good), fried catfish salad, this peppery steak dish that I'm drooling for right now, and stuffed poultry legs of some kind.\n\nIf you reeeeaaaallllly want to know what to order, PM me and I'll ask my mom.  No joke.  She is like an Asian food master queen, and I'm that passionate about this restaurant.\n\nThis place is definitely a little hole in the wall, is always packed, and the area is more than a little sketchy looking.  There is even a sign that says to not leave valuables in your car.  Be prepared to encounter some homeless American citizens in the parking lot.  But it is so worth it.  Plus you'll forget about your car getting robbed for the hour while you are eating because the food is so good.\n\nOh and afterwards...go to the massage place to your right when you exit the restaurant.  Way cheaper and just as great as anything you will get on the strip :)", "Nam Khao Thod and the Tom Kha is definitely a must try in here. Coming from Asia myself, I must say this is definitely one if the best and authentic Thai food I have ever had. I am so thankful to the friends who introduced us to this place. It has become our go-to everytime we are down in Vegas.", "Now, I have seen Bourdain eat here, I've read up on the joint from various food blogs and on-line culinary magazines, but other than remembering to order from the Northern Thai section of the menu all other specific knowledge went out the window because I was so god damn drunk! Apparently, I am told, I couldn't even recall where the bathroom was despite the fact I had just relieved myself there only fifteen minutes prior.\n\nF*cking Slot Waitresses. F.S.W.\n\nBut I did remember to take pictures dear readers and I can say everything we ordered was not only downright delectable but tasted just as good, if not better, than anything that I ate in the four weeks I spent in Thailand.\n\nYes. I said it. And I stand by it with my FlavorBoner held high.\n\n\nNam Prik Ong (Red Chili Dip w/ ground pork) intended to be a starter to your meal, is not too spicy and has just the right amount of sweet from the ground pork. It is awesome with the crudit\u00e9s and chicharones served with it. The cool from the vegetables and the heat from the dip work really well together, even for a drunk ass like myself.\n\nHey. It was a long drive, all right, and I was on a mission. So... whatever.\n\n\nNam Kao Tod (Crispy Rice) The center of the rice was perfectly moist and soft and the outside was sensationally crunchy. How they did that I have no idea. There was an overall wonderful ginger/lime flavor going on in this dish with flame coming from the green onion and fresh chilies.  Yum!\n\n\nSai Oua (Northern Style Sausage) Fresh, house made, Thai spicy pork sausage. Enough said. Either you get it or you don't. No need to sell it.\n\n\"A guy don't walk on the lot lest he wants to buy!\"\n\n-- Alec Baldwin, Glengarry Glen Ross\n\nGarlic Prawn. Deep fried in their shell, this dish has a potato chip crunch to it and it's so frickin' garlicky. And I mean that in the best possible way. This is a not to be missed dish for those of you who do not dig anything with hoofs.\n\nThen there was our little crispy drunken Daffy, the Crispy Duck Drunken Noodle. The skin on the bird was indeed crispy and salty. Her meat tender and juicy. The vegetables were cooked yet firm and the bird-based broth that the slippery, wide noodles bathed in was the perfect compliment to the other spicy dishes as it smoothed everything out.\n\nNow not all of the dishes we ordered were from the Northern Thai portion of the menu that everyone recommended, some were chef's choices others, like the drunken noodle, were personal favorites.\n\nJust order what you want. It's your meal. Everything here will be good. You are not going to go wrong.", "Ok, so we showed up with no reservations.  Not a great idea, but it was early and they got us right in.  Dinner was on our table in less than 15 minutes.  Crispy Duck and Garlic Prawns what else can I say?  The food is always awesome at this place.  A tad bit pricey but well worth it for the quality you receive.  This place is always on my must do Vegas list.", "One of the best thai restaurants in Vegas I've been here twice and both times I left very full and satisfied. The service lacks alittle but the food is well worth waiting for. \n\nPapaya salad_ really spicy but addicting\n\nAngel wings_ so crispy and good we ordered 2\n\nFried catfish_we weren't aware how big it would be but we killed it among 5 people\n\nYellow curry_flavorful and had a nice kick. We got spicy level 7\n\nPad Thai_ can't really go wrong with this dish.\n\nFried prawns_ crispy and they also fry the heads so they are like chips\n\nSweet and sour chicken_ I think this was my least favorite. Nothing to special\n\nMango sticky rice_ great way to put you in a food coma\n\nDefinitely would come back here when I'm in town", "One of, if not the best Thai places in Vegas. Huge menu with great choices all over. The Thai Iced coffee here is pretty good too, but you know the iced T is better. The  nam prik ong is so good I had to recreate that for parties.", "Outside the establishment, taped to the window is a sign: do not leave valuables in car. I took note, but when they had it posted again inside the restaurant, I made sure to go back and grab anything that even looked remotely interesting to the zombies that were milling about. \n\nLittle did I know that the real robbery would occur after we got our food. \n\nThe curry was very thin, almost water. All of the dishes came on shallow plates, five dishes later the three of us were still a bit hungry. The spicy beef salad was drenched in sweet dressing. \n\nI've definitely had better. They seem to be doing ok, judging by all of the celebrity photos and the fact that there were several large groups there that night. But I don't see a reason to go back.", "Overpriced, overrated, and tiny....I mean tiny tiny portions. The deep fried prawns with the shells were great. Everything else was just ok. Pad thai wasn't your typical ketchupy tasting fast food pad thai but the portions were so small it was a joke. Same with the papaya salad and most of the people eating there were white. Think about that for a second. I'm not saying white folk don't know their Asian food but an Asian restaurant with no Asians eating there tells you something. Food was slow to come out but service was good. They kept coming back and checking on the table. Maybe one too many times in fact but I guess it's better than bad/no service. If you are looking to try the place because it was on tv by all means. Not a whole lot of value for your buck though. You can basically get just as good or better somewhere else. The difference if there is any is marginal at best.", "Pretty decent Thai food in Vegas! Super busy though. But I would definitely come back", "Ridiculously good Thai. \n\nGreat service with full range of menu options. We shared the sea bass and some chicken plate that was fantastic.  You can dial up or down the heat as desired. \n\nIf you are in the mood for thai.... This is It!", "Saw this place on Anthony Bourdain, and it is pretty good.  Really surprised on how well it was", "Seriously love this place!!! And their fried tofu app yummmm. I'm from Arizona an my boyfriend and I love it here when we come to Vegas no other thai place compares to this spot. This trip how ever they are closed till 5:30 (Sunday) so we won't be able to eat here our flight leaves soon. But we will be back. With big appetites !", "So here's the diggity... The food is above average (taste) and the prices are cheap, hence why almost 2k reviews and 4 stars... I got 3 dishes, beer and wine, and got out for $60, with an excellent meal.  \n\nIn other words, don't put yourself out and wait crazy time to eat here, it's not like the food is earth shattering or anything you can't find at another Thai restaurant, but if you want a great meal, cheap, with a massive wine selection, (and willing to wait an hour) this is the spot.  Call for resos!", "So many celebrities on your walls. What am I?  Cottage cheese?  \n\nI ask you all. What's more important. Food or service?  I would say food but  I'm biased.\n\nI'm not a pain in the ass. But a brother can only take so much. I'm like Rambo walking into town all nice and what not, and you keep pushing me, pushing me, till you draw... First Blood. \n\nIt's not that bad. I didn't get water hosed. But damn are these dudes ornery.  I didn't break up your monarchy or destroyed any semblance of democracy you might be holding onto, nor did I call you a \"Shim\"\n\nI just made a reso, ordered from your baller wine list (German and Austrian) and ask for basic table maintenance. Plates cleared so I don't gotta stack it on my head or lap.  Asking for a chopstick should not be paramount to you to tilting your head back as if  I'm giving you a table side abortion. \n\nI know you Thais and Philippinos like using the spoon and fork thing. That's bad ass. But don't deny your ethnicity. I know you guys be using chopsticks in the closet.  \n\nAnyways. Food is dope. Only reason to go unless you are Anthony Bourdain. In that case, they physically put a server under your table to suck your Bouchon.  Just kidding. \n\nEverything tastes like something my aunties would not send back. It's a huge menu and it comes out fast. Totally and utterly delicious. I just want someone to treat me like I get treated when I'm in Thailand. Without the surprise penis.", "So of course I had to check out what all the hype was about! The food was absolutely amazing. There was so much to choose from, we ended up going with a few of the servers suggestions. We had the nua Nam tok (beef dish) Tom kah kai (coconut soup)kao soy (curry w/ egg noodle) and a pad thai. The flavors were rich and definitely authentic. I appreciate this restaurant stays true to thai ingredients. My only complaint was the portions were slightly small, but other than that everything was great!", "Some people deem this restaurant the best for Thai food in the world. I wouldn't go that far as I have had my fair share across the globe but it is definitely one of the better restaurants in Vegas for Thai. The location is far from exceptional but the staff is friendly and the food is extraordinary. If you come on a weekend without a reservation be prepared for an extreme wait time.", "Such great food! It is fresh, and so yummy! It is a must go to when in Vegas. \n\nDon't judge it by the outside, it is in a pretty crappy looking strip mall... but so worth it when you go inside!", "Thai food is not my first food choice but I could eat here every single day. \n\nNo one cares about decor when the food is this good.", "The 5 stars is based on the food alone, because the location and ambiance kind of stinks. But this is a place I almost always hit when I'm in Vegas. Haven't had a single dish that hasn't been fantastic. Highly recommend the Tom Kah Kai soup, which is just so complex and fun. Garlic prawns, crispy duck on drunken noodle, and northern pork curry are fantastic. Always get sticky rice with mangos and coconut ice cream when it's in season....", "The BEST thai in LAS VEGAS, this place is amazing.. It is a bit overcrowded but man was the wait worth it... The service was excellent and the food was delicious!  Crispy Duck curry was very good.. It still had the crispy skin taste and hold it flavor even with the beautiful curry taste... The Tom Yum soups are amazing with very good spice.. I should've order for myself instead of sharing-HaHaHa :D but come here if your looking for a good time.. They serve beer,sake, and many selection of wine... :D enjoy! Because you will when you come here to dine...", "The best musaman curry in the in the country. I have had a lots of them.this is the best.", "The crispy duck is killer good. The rest of the items are typical. You can find similar in LA (We are very lucky and have great Thai places in LA). The duck is a must try but $25 is a little pricy.", "The first time i came here, I was heavily underwhelmed.  What did I order? The first two items I saw pop up on Yelp.  Nam kao tod and drunken noodles.  So yes, the nam kao tod is more unique fare than what you get at other thai restaurants but it is FAR from what i would consider crave-worthy.  And wtf, Drunken noodles? Yes they're good, but if you've ever had pad see ew, it's pretty similar and way cheaper at other places.  \n\nSo why five stars for this place?? CRISPY DUCK W/ PANANG CURRY and GARLIC PRAWNS!!!! There's a reason I hesitate now whenever I think of going into any other Thai restaurant...  I want those two specific dishes and no one but Lotus of Siam can deliver.  These two dishes combined were life changingly good for me.  Yea they're expensive and yes the portions COULD be larger, but it's pure crack I tell you!  So don't putz around with the other items unless this isn't your first time and you wanna try something different or you somehow don't like crack laced food.  Drooling as i write this review...", "The food was \"5 star worthy\", but I chose to give 4 stars because the wait is EXTREMELY long. I highly recommend calling ahead for reservations (if you can get through). The wine list is a mile long, for you wine drinkers, and the portions are a little small. I will say however, that the egg rolls are the best egg rolls I've ever had! Service was so-so. Andddd the last part is, it's off the strip, and you'll need a taxi to and from.", "This is as good as it gets. You should add this to your top 10 list of things to do in Vegas. Worth the wait and the wait is long. if you want something quick go to a drive through. Drunken Shrimp is a must try dish.", "This is my daughter's favorite Thai restaurant, so she took me here for my 70th birthday.  I always have Green Curry the first time I try a Thai restaurant - and was extremely happy!  One of the best, anywhere!\nUPDATE:  Since the Lotus is a bit pricey for me, I tried the other two restaurants there, and found Arawan to be the best of the three. Just saying...", "This is the best Thai restaurant in Vegas, for that matter, best Thai restaurant you'll find pretty much anywhere.  It's in a shady looking strip mall - don't bring your Lamborghini.  \n\nThe place is big, tons of tables, multiple rooms, but there is almost always a wait after 5:30.  Get there early, and enjoy the experience.\n\nThe menu is ginormous.  The service has always been comprehensive when I've been there - waiters are attentive, and help out with other tables when they're not busy.  \n\nThe food is great - think of it as \"upscale\" Thai without inflating the price too much over your neighborhood \"meh\" Thai place.  \n\nFour stars because the location is weird, the ambience could be a little better, and because I can never betray my heart, which says that nothing in Vegas should ever, ever get five stars.  Ever.  Because, Vegas.", "This is the best thai restaurant in Las Vegas. The place is a little bit ghetto and scary from the outside but don't let the outside fool you. The inside is very nice.", "This is the best, most authentic Thai restaurant outside of Thailand ! \n\nMost Thai restaurants in the U.S. are really set up for western taste buds. Meaning, they are not really the type or the taste of food you get in Thailand. At Lotus of Siam, yes, they have the Pad Thai and things like that for those who do not like the spiciness of traditional Thai food, but what they also have is a great selection of true traditional Thai dishes, meaning they are spicy. \n\nIf you want to eat true Thai food, look on the menu under the Northern Thai section and the Chef's Choice. The food is great !\n\nThis restaurant also has a vast selection of wine. This is very unusual for a Thai restaurant. Personally, though I love a nice bottle of wine, I don't really think of wine in association with Thai food. But, they do have it, if you want it. Plus, they also have a good selection of beer, Thai Iced Coffee, and other drinks like that. \n\nThis restaurant is located in a strip mall. Though there are several other international restaurants around it, the outside is not inviting. Don't let this scare you off. Once inside the restaurant is very nice. \n\nFinally, this is a very popular restaurant. People pack the place every day and night of the week. It is best to make a reservation or you may be waiting quite a while for a table.\n\nHighly Recommended !!!", "This is the bomb when it comes to Thai food. Looks like a shanty strip mall  from the outside but opens up on the inside. Surprisingly most of the customers are Americans and hardly any asians.\nThe Garlic Shrimp is a must. Dont go there unless you gona order the garlic shrimp. Or else you deserve a punch in the face. Northern Thai cooking is their specialty and it is spicy. So if your a wuss about spicy food, then go to McDonalds on the same street and order a bic mac then kill yourself. If you want great spicy thai cooking then plant yourself in this place, save it on your bookmark and gps and enjoy... Now STFU, stop reading and freaking order, NOW!!!!!!", "This is the one. I mean the #1. Like the best Thai I have ever had. Saw a review from someone complaining about the pad Thai or something.....really?  You visit a Michelin star rated restaurant and order a dish you can get at every Thai restaurant in America?\n\nThey have so many super unique dishes I would really suggest asking a waiter for help because they are really helpful and knowledgeable. I had the crispy duck in the parang curry and it was unreal good.  Can't remember the other two dishes by name but the flavors with wonderful.\n\nTrust me the wait is worth it. You won't get this kind of food on the strip", "This place had been an wonderful experience for me and my wife. We are thai food lovers and can be sometimes too critical about the food quality. They have one of the best foods we have ever tested and also a lot of variations.", "This place rocks. Break out of your Pad Thai rut and order Northern specialties like the Kao Tod appetizer - spicy sour sausage salad, and the whole catfish, charcoal grilled. Ask for the two sauces, chili-lime and tamarind. Order a glass of Riesling from their extensive collection. You'll be glad you did.", "This restaurant was on Travel Channel's Best Eats Episode. Winnas! Great Tai Food. Garlic shrimp, Drunken Noodles with pork, and their famous chili dip-Nam prik Ong (combo of ground pork, tomatoes, n dried spices)", "This was on my list of must-try places in Las Vegas. I think it was a bit over-hyped. Or maybe I just didn't order properly. I've had some amazing Thai food and can't say this was better than anything I've had in the past. Some of the Northern style dishes I can't compare but I don't think they were spectacular based on their own merit. But the celebrity endorsements and accolades on the wall can't be wrong can they? \n\nLet me just start by saying that this restaurant is in a totally sketchy neighborhood. There's even a sign in the restaurant that says that you shouldn't leave your luggage in the car. They have luggage storage in the restaurant so you can bring your stuff in with you. The whole strip mall looks like a bombed out war zone and I'll bet it's pretty scary when it's dark. Like zombies-come-out-and-attack scary. \n\nIt's a nice surprise when you enter the restaurant and see it bustling with, not zombies, but living humans - totally the opposite of the ghost town outside. There does seem to be the illusion that it's busier than it actually is (at least when we walked in). We requested a table for 4. They told us 45 minute wait. We said we'd come back, then they chased us down the parking lot and said 30 minutes, then as we were walking away again, they said they had a table available. When we got in, there seemed to be quite a few open tables. \n\nAs for the food we did as advised and mostly ordered from the Northern dishes at the back of the menu.  \n\nThe Spicy Chicken Wings (regular menu) were delicious. My son said they were the best chicken wings he'd ever had. They were crispy and came in just enough chili sauce so the chicken didn't get soggy.\n\nThe Seafood Soup (regular menu) was okay. It was pretty spicy. The bowl came with one scallop, two mussels, a prawn and some squid. It was okay but not the best Thai Seafood soup I've had. \n\nThe Red Chili Dip (ground pork in chili sauce) served with fried pork rinds and veggies was pretty bland. It needed salt or something. Everyone basically ignored it after one taste. \n\nThe Garlic Prawns were FABULOUS. Crispy prawns, battered, fried with heads, shells, tails and all. Honestly, the best part were the fried shells - they were like potato chips. My hubby thought they could've used a sweet and sour dip and I agree that might have been nice, but I liked them just fine the way they were. \n\nThe Crispy Duck with Mint Leaves were served on top of noodles in a sauce and topped with some herbs and peppers. Personally, I don't think crispy duck should be served with anything wet (like sauce) because it makes the crispiness go away. I've had some amazing crispy duck and this duck didn't really do anything for me (or my hubby who LOVES crispy duck). \n\nFried Bananas with Coconut Ice Cream for dessert was good. Nothing special. They didn't have the sticky rice with mango available. The bananas were wrapped in wonton wrappers then fried. Nothing wrong with that, but I can also make this at home. \n\nAll of this and a couple glasses of wine came out to about $132 before tip. The prawns and the duck were both over $20 bucks. Otherwise, everything else was around $8-15. \n\nAll in all, spicy chicken wings and garlic prawns were good. Everything else: MEH. I might go back and check out the front of menu next time. There are some pretty fine Thai restaurants in the Silicon Valley/Bay Area that I think are MUCH better.", "Throughout our trip in Vegas, I encountered cab drivers of all kinds. Nevada natives, Ethiopian, Vietnamese, and Nigerian ex-pats and a fiery Argentinian abuelita [although she didn't look a day over 50] were some of the most memorable faces.\n\nYet our driver on our trip to Lotus of Siam,  with whom I built the strongest rapport, was the most interesting of them all. Ironically, he was himself, Thai, and a former restauranteur in Las Vegas proper. We spoke of thai dishes, international travel and our mutual distaste for pad thai sauce in a bottle.\n\nAt some point during our dialogue, I asked the lingering question, \"So...is Lotus of Siam REALLY as good as they say it is? Is it the best Thai restaurant in the country?\" To this, he replied with a simple shake of his head and a \"No\". \"If you want good Thai food, go to Thai Town in Hollywood.\" He clarified.\n\nI am grateful to this man for lowering my expectations of Lotus of Siam, it's never a good idea to go into a restaurant experience believing that the food should be the \"BEST\" -- a recipe for disaster. So with a newly acquired, down-2-earth perspective, I entered the packed Lotus of Siam and prepared for a memorable experience.\n\nAmbiance:\n\nAfter the Travel Channel stakes claim to a restaurant, one of two things are bound to happen. Either the restaurant will cling to or completely abandon it's former character in the face of extreme \"over-night\" popularity. Fortunately, it seems that Lotus of Siam, while extremely crowded, has apparently retained most of it's pre-celebrity essence.\n\nIt looks like...well...a family-run Thai restaurant. The only difference was an entry w/o standing room, a policy that reservations are lost after 5 minutes of seating time [if a \"no-show\"], and an elaborate walk-in wine cellar in the middle of the restaurant.\n\nFood:\n\nThe Pad See Ew, Fried Rice and Mint Chicken where all winners; but the two dishes which stood out in my mind where the Garlic Prawns and Jackfruit Curry.\n\nGarlic Prawns: Full prawns, shells included, which where completely edible from head to tail. Crispy, moist and \u00fcber flavorful.\n\nThum Ka Noon: This northern-style, non-coconut milk curry is made with young jackfruit and shredded dried fish. The curry broth was like none I had ever tried. It was a fan-favorite around the table for dipping, showering over rice or straight up slurping!\n\nSo...who was right? Andrew Zimmern or my Thai cab driver? Is this really the best Thai food in the country? Clearly I am not qualified to answer this question. Yet, I can assert that the food was quite memorable and some of the best Thai food I have had to date. Additionally, their unique specialization of Northern Thai cuisine is hard to come by outside of Chiang Mai.", "Tried this place on the advice of Anthony Bourdain... It was not a disappointment !  Not a large amount of food but plenty and large on flavor.  Dishes are prepared from scratch. Service was prompt and friendly.", "Very disappointed after all the hype. Too sour: crispy rice. Very weird: garlic prawns. No vegetables in panang curry.", "Waiting is worth it. Food, wine, atmosphere, THE BOMB!\n\nHighly recommend if you are in Vegas and want best food, best price.\n\nNot far off the strip, maybe a $12 cab ride from Wynn.\n\nWine cellar is HUGE.", "Wanted to try this place about a year ago, but didn't since we needed to catch an early show and didn't want to rush dinner.  Knowing that this place gets pretty busy during dinner time, one friend suggested that I call in to make a reservation.  I called and staff said all reservations were full, but walk-ins were welcome.  Okay, no reservation.  So either we go in for an early dinner (before 5:30) or a late dinner (after 7:30).  We decided on the late dinner.  And yeah, we ended up eating pretty late.  We got to the restaurant at 9:30, half an hour before it close.  When we walked into the restaurant I was surprised that there were still so many people there.  Besides us, there were even people waiting to be seated.  I thought that with it being almost closing time, restaurant would be pretty empty.\n\nWe waited for about 5 minutes before we got seated.  We got to sit at a bigger table so there's plenty of room.  The staffs were friendly and efficient.  Our food orders came out quickly.  \n\nfried tofu (bean curd) -- nicely fried tofu with cabbage strips on the bottom and a side of plum sauce.  The tofu was crispy on the outside and silky on the inside.  I like it a lot.  \n\nroasted duck curry -- the flavor was good.  You get pieces of roasted duck with pineapple pieces and the usual veggies.  Not too spicy.  Good for people who like some heat but don't want to start sweating from it.   But for people who like extra spicy food or who wants to sweat, I think you can probably ask them to make it more spicy.  Entree comes with a side of rice.    \n\ngarlic shrimp -- jumbo plump shrimps deep fried with the shell on.  The shrimps were butterflied before frying so it's so crispy that you can actually eat the shell .  The flavor was on point.  If you like you can dip it in plum sauce, but there's enough flavor where you didn't have to.  I enjoyed this dish.\n\npad se eww -- Nice flavor, well cooked, and not overly greasy.  The flat noodle was cooked just right so that it's not dry.  The noodle did not stick together.  The vegetable was tender.  Liked it.    \n\nThis is a nice restaurant to eat at.  I enjoyed my meal.", "Was expecting a lot better. Sadness. \n\nPad See Ew (2.5 stars) Pretty bland, not much flavor. Got a level 3 spicy and it was a good amount if you're a mid to low spice person.\n\nDrunken noodles (2.5 stars): More flavor than pad see ew, but again nothing too great.\n\nGarlic Prawns (4 stars): This was good, but pretty pricey. Garlic-y and crispy. \n\nCrispy Duck with Panang Curry (4 stars): They don't give you much duck but it was good and the panang was good too.\n\nGreen curry (2 stars): Tasted very bland. Do not get this. \n\nI guess only a few things here are worth having. I wouldn't get the regular Thai food items because those are definitely not flavorful here. \n\nWe had a birthday and asked the guy if they do anything. He said he could bring out ice cream with a candle which was nice (= \n\nSERVICE (3.5 Stars)\nPretty good service for a busy restaurant. At first we only got like 5 menus for a group on 12...weird. I don't think the have enough for the restaurant. They brought out all the food at the same time, and kept refilling the rice when we asked. \n\nATMOSPHERE (4 stars)\nReally big, tables are spaced out so you don't feel crowded. There are all these pics up of celebrities who came to the restaurant, but I didn't know more than half of them, haha. Waiting area in the front is crowded, and when you're done you feel the glare from the people waiting as you walk by hoping they get your table. The plaza it's in doesn't look like anything fancy. You wonder how this place can charge $23 for some dishes in this location, haha. There are taxis coming up dropping people off to try this place. I think it's just really hyped up. If it's supposed to be good thai food then the regular Thai dishes should have flavor too!", "Was in vegas for the weekend and with one night left, talked with my wife about nice places to go. I was thinking steakhouse, seafood/sushi, etc. Something expensive and fancy on the strip. She said a friend told her about a Thai restaurant(she loves thai and im starting to) that she HAS to go to. She called him to get the name, and we went to Lotus of Siam. Overall, absolutely phenominal. The duck in creamy curry(no clue what its actually called) was the best. Fried rice and garlic prawns great as well. Spent 40-50 on round trip cabs but it was worth it.", "Was once a great place.. Now has jumped the shark.  Had a late dinner.  Felt very rushed to get us out the door.  Has lost its personal feel and now pushes out rushed average cuisine where once meals defined my Vegas trip.  \nTo add a personal touch.. We walked out with no thank you or good bye and the first thing we see is a new Benz parked in the first space with a LotusSiam licensed plate.  I guess owners car and if true very tacky.  \nI'm all about making money but you better not lose what made you great in the first place.  I hope they focus on food and customer service in the future.", "We did have a rather larger group and attempted to make reservation. The receptionist was lacking in her duties. She made comments as \"make sure you come, ok?\" Put us on hold for a long time.\n\nAs we arrived for our reservation, we got a little wait as a party before did not part ways right away. So we waited a bit. The hostess was trying to be as accommodating and upbeat as possible but still unprofessional.\n\nWith a large group of us we got to try over a dozen dishes. Tom yum prawn was excellent. The best I have ever had. Chicken satay was ok. Lamb gai was ok. The toasted rice salad was great. Fried fish was good. Soft shell crab drunken noodle was great. Crispy Duck Chu Chee was amazing. Curry chicken bamboo was great also. Thai issan sausage was good. Beef jerky was great. Beef salad was good. I can go on because we came here two days in a roll. The food is very authentic and flavorful. All of the best ingredients.\n\nI also ordered fried bananas during our first visit. It was ok. The second day we came we had the mango with sweet coconut rice and that was fragrant and gently sweetened but not super sweet. It was the perfect combination of flavor. The Thai tea was also good.\n\nOur waiter was great.\n\nOverall here is my breakdown of what I would like to rate this place. The food is a 5 star. The hostess and reception area 4 stars. The ambience is a 4 star. I would have loved to give this place a 5 star based solely on the food but the phone and seating experience was not the best. 30 mins wait with reservations the first day and about an hour wait the second day without reservations.", "We had a group of 9, so we were able to try about 14 different entrees and 6 appetizers in our 2 visits (Yes we went 2 days in a row). ALL the food was great! Definitely the best Thai I've ever had, except the chicken Larb Salad, which was only ok, as I've had better in 2 other places. A few items that stick out were, garlic prawns, drunken noodles with soft shell crab and the duck with chu-chee. I also enjoyed the mango rice for dessert. Overall, I would give this place 4.5 stars for food, 4 stars for service. Also, be sure to make reservations or you will wait up to an hour.", "Well, the \"American Spicy\" vs \"Thai Spicy\" convergence point has finally been met. Spiciest food (I had the pork larb @ 7) in years. Be careful here, the 1-10 scale is serious. Good traditional offerings at the back of the menu under Northern Thai. \n\nService is a bit surly, they're really trying to turn tables over here quickly.\n\nMango sticky rice was the perfect end to a great meal.", "Went for first time tonight. We didn't make a reservations. Big mistake.  Waited 1 1/2 hours, but well worth the wait.  The best Thai restaurant I've ever eaten at. An incredible menu.  Much more than the standard Thai fare.  Service was typical for an Asian restaurant, but everyone was very friendly. When in Las Vegas, this is the place to go for Thai food.  It's in a dumpy strip mall, but you're going for the food.", "When members of my family came to town, they solicited the help of me. My years with Yelp gave them full trust to come to me with recommendations around the valley. On one of those nights, everyone was in the mood for Asian food, so I decided to take them here. I've taken food out of this place before but never really sat in and ordered. What a great opportunity!\n\nThis place is located in a very weird shopping center. Lots of different shops and bars, to say the least. There are a couple of gay bars, a swingers club and a lot of Asian food joints. Also remember that if you don't make reservations days before, they will not take reservations that day and you will have to wait. A long time. For a party of 10, we were quoted up to 2 hours and ended up waiting an hour and 15 minutes. The waiting room is pretty tight but filled with awards, reassuring you that this place was going to be the bomb! The service was great. They were efficient, didn't say much, but got us what we needed in a quick timely manner. The place was a little drab. Dark carpets and wooden paneling made for an outdated look. The main focal point however, was a wall full of wine. An actual wine cabinet filled with hundreds of bottles. Super dramatic and awesome! There's also a bar down the ramp inside, so you can drink something while you wait for your table. \n\nFor dinner, me and my party decided on the following:\n\nGarlic Black Pepper Chicken Wings for $8.95: Wings seasoned with garlic, black pepper and other seasonings. The garlic was prominent in this dish and made the wings soo delicious. One of my favorite things that evening!\n\nMoo Yang for $14.95. Marinated charbroiled pork served with spice sauce. This is always my go to dish. The pork chop was super tender, the sweet marinade and the sauce really seemed to enhance the dish. HIGHLY RECOMMEND this if you like pork.\n\nChicken Pad Se-ew for $9.95. Stir-fried wide rice noodles with eggs and Chinese broccoli with black soy sauce. This was the best Pad Se-ew I've ever had! The flat noodles were soft but not mushy, the sauce was mild and salty and really made that dish pop out!\n\nPork Drunken Noodles for $9.95. Pan fried flat rice noodle topped with, saut\u00e9ed choice of meat with fresh & dry chili, Thai basil, served on beds of greens. I loved the basil in this dish. It brought a clean flavor to the overall taste. \n\nAll dishes were served family style and was awesome! People always talk about this place as being great. You really need to try this out, for sure! I remember waiting in the front at the beginning of the night and everyone that kept coming in, made a comment like, \"this place is in a sketchy neighborhood, but trust me the food is out of this world.\" It's not until you experience it yourself that you will truly believe that statement. If you're ever in the neighborhood, don't pass it. Stop, and give it a try. You will NOT be disappointed!", "With so many reviews, I'm not sure I can add anything that hasn't already been said.  \n\nIt I could only eat at one Thai restaurant the rest of my life, this would be the place. The Pad Thai is perfect, not overly sweet like you find at too many places.  The curry dishes have are more complex than I've had at any other place.  The shrimp are always fresh, good size and perfectly cooked.  I can't believe I waited so long to try the crispy duck panang curry - will never get chicken @ LOS again!  \n\nThe service is not as good as the food - but if ever a restaurant deserves five star, this is it.", "Worthy of the hype! Here are my suggestions:\n\n1. Make a reservation, or you're sure to wait about an hour (yes, even on a random Monday night).\n2. Order the drunken shrimp! Huge, juicy, flavorful shrimp with flat noodles. \n3. Spice levels are normal/reasonable, go with your gut! \n4. Dress casually; hella people come from the strip in taxis dressed like they're going to a $$$$ restaurant, but that's not necessary! \n\nService is really nice and of course, the pad thai is also great. It's famous, you might as well give it a shot!", "Wow, how have I not written a review for this place yet?\n\nYou can't go wrong with any dish here, which is what makes this restaurant so great. I'll admit, not every dish is amazing, but at least you won't be stuck with something yucky. It all just comes down to how much you love Thai food.\n\nThe wait is typically fairly long (waited 1 hour last time for a table for 3 on a Sunday night), but this time we only waited 15 minutes for a table on a Friday night. Luckily, tables for 2 typically get seated much quicker.\n\nWe ordered:\n- Panang Curry: The curry had really good flavor, but I thought it was kind of plain. They don't give you any additional vegetables.\n\n- Pad Thai: The noodles are different from your norm (they're thinner), but the flavor is good. I got mine with fried tofu and the fried tofu is really yummy! I normally don't like meats with my pad thai because they are normally made dry, but next time, I'll definitely try it with chicken. I don't think Lotus of Siam will disappoint.\n\n- Mango Sticky Rice: THE BEST PART OF THE MEAL.This is the best mango sticky rice I've had. The rice is not actually too sticky and is made perfectly! MUST TRY.", "Yes indeed this is the best Thai restaurant in North America. Does it have some fame and press with all those famous chefs and celebrities that frequent this place, Yes, but it delivers in quality, creativeness and authenticity. Its not cheap since you are paying a little bit for its reputation and fame but the food is great. A must when you are in Vegas. Go before 6:30pm to avoid the long lines. If you are new to Thai food and are the adventurous type, just ask the waiters to order for you. Tell them your likes and dislikes and approximately how much you want to spend and let them take care of it. It is the most fun way to eat.", "Yes, the location is a bit sketchy, lock your doors or park near one of the Bentleys (really).\n\nYes, it's crowded and noisy, the line is usually long and they don't pick up the phone...\n\nAnd yes, it is the best Thai food you will ever eat! The food here will replace your previous perceptions of what good Thai food is, to the point that the mediocrity everywhere else will become unacceptable.\n\nBe careful of the 1-10 heat scale, it's real!\n\nIf you don't like flavor and texture, this is not the place for you. Bland is not on the menu (except for white rice).", "You guys have heard all the hype. All the awards, national media attention, the famous chefs of the world saying how great this place it. Now after a couple of visits I can confirm with all of them, LoS was probably one of the best meals of my life!\n\nI've read a lot of reviews about many of the other Thai places in town. And, a lot of people would rather chose those spots to eat at, rather than go to LoS which they feel is overhyped. I've been to a lot of those places as well.. So what's the conclusion? I don't think this place is overhyped at all. I believe that LoS deserves every single accolade it has received. It probably deserves more..\n\nPlaces like Komol, Weera Thai, Pan Asian, Archi's etc. etc., they make really good, in fact, they make really great Thai food! LoS is completely on an entirely different level. For example, take the classic, drunken noodles. At all the great Thai restaurants, they all make excellent versions of this dish, and they each have a common trait that says \"this is drunken noodles.\" At LoS, it still says  \"this is drunken noodles\", but it's totally different from every one I've ever had in my life. And, I mean different in a totally amazing, uniquely personal, life changing sort-of-way... That goes for EVERY dish on the menu. Also, if you haven't had the crispy prawns, do try them, quite possibly the best thing I've eaten this year (them prawn shells..)\n\nWhenever I eat at a restaurant, I always come in with an open mind regardless of what others have experienced, positive or negative. This restaurant isn't just one of the best restaurants in Vegas or the entire country, this is a world class restaurant. This restaurant will continue to rack up the accolades, and deservedly so. Well done Lotus of Siam.. Well done!", "yes, it's good. and yes, the prawns are good."]
[2014, "season1"]	["+ yes it is pretty tasty\n+servers are friendly and attentive\n+im pretty sensitive to MSG but I felt okay after eating here.\n-----\n- it is expensive. \n\nPortions are ok but expect high end pricing for 8/10 food. \nNothing was to die for imo. \nPresident's thai in east pasadena is more flavorful and cost 50% less. \n\nThey have a lot of wines... in house cellar maybe?\n\nParking is big. You have to go in  and park in the back where there is front door to the restaurant.  It appears to be a little run down outside. \n\nWent here after seminar... people at the seminar recommended.  \n\nIll try something else next time.", "4 of us just came out of the restaurant very disappointed. Compared to most Thai restaurants this place lacks in quality of food and atmosphere and the prices are high. It's in an ugly strip mall and we expected authenticity instead found low quality and high prices. The place is designed to feed many with marginal service.", "A little difficult to find, park behind the building and enter from the parking lot. Not the nicest area but the food is worth it! Absolutely delicious! We had 5 dishes, and would order all again. The standout was the sea bass over wide noodles, (recommended by our waiter) unbelievable.  Lightly fried, flaky and moist.  We could not stop eating it!  \nWill definitely return here~", "A little over a year ago I watched the Top Chef Masters dine at Lotus of Siam in Las Vegas and ever since then this hole-in-the-wall Thai restaurant has been on my Yelp bookmark list, just waiting for my next trip to Vegas. Lucky me that trip came this year and I knew that Lotus of Siam was the ONE place that was a must-do for me.\n\nLocated in a nondescript strip mall about a $15-$20 cab drive away from the main strip, Lotus of Siam is unassuming from the outside but has been praised as one of the best Thai restaurants in America.  We gave the doorman at the hotel the address and as the cab pulled up all he said was \"Lotus of Siam\"...no address needed. When you pull up you might be questionable but trust me, looks are deceiving!\n\nLotus of Siam is open for lunch and dinner and while we had initially planned a lunch visit, we got distracted and pushed it back to dinner. We didn't have a reservation and they were booked for the night so we arrived early right before they opened to secure a seat. If you plan in advance I would definitely make a reservation if you want to eat at a more \"peak\" time, but they do have a bar where you can try a glass from their lengthy wine menu while you wait.\n\nI had done my fair amount of research ahead of time (because I'm a nerd like that) so I knew exactly what I planned on ordering. Lotus of Siam is a bit unique because they offer quite a few Northern Thai dishes, which you don't see on the menus of most Thai restaurants. Our first dish was the very popular Tom Kah Kai soup. Chicken, coconut milk, mushrooms, lemongrass, and lime...this was quite possibly one of the best soups I've ever eaten. We chose a spice level of medium for all of our dishes and found it to be perfect for our taste-a good amount of heat but nothing that was searing away our taste buds.\n\nAfter the soup came the Garlic Prawns. This is one of their most popular dishes and it's no wonder why...deep fried prawns with shells that crisp up like potato chips, saut\u00e9ed in a tasty garlic sauce and cooked to perfection.  Delicious!!\n\nNext up...Braised Short Rib with Panang. The short rib wasn't the best I've ever had but the sauce-a red cream curry with cognac-was fantastic and absolutely made the dish. It definitely took some restraint to stop from licking the bowl!\n\nOur last dish before dessert was one of my go-to Thai carry-out choices....good 'ol Pad Thai. But this was no ordinary Pad Thai-this was the best Pad Thai I've ever eaten, and I have eaten A LOT of Pad Thai. The flavors, the spice level, the crispy vegetables, and of course the noodles....I wanted this whole dish to myself!\n\nLast but not least was dessert. We were on the brink of stuffed but I couldn't leave without a few sweet bites. This was actually my first time trying sticky rice and I really enjoyed it. The warm rice with the beautiful, fresh, sweet mango was a great combo and  add in a cold bite of the coconut ice cream...the perfect ending to a great meal!\n\nFrom start to finish, from wine to dessert and everything in between, Lotus of Siam lived up to all of my expectations and then some. If you're in Vegas I highly recommend venturing off the strip to give Lotus of Siam a try for yourself, I know this has now made it onto my must-do list for all future trips to LV!", "Absolutely delicious from start to end.  Drunken noodles are the bomb. Garlic noodles too.  In fact, everything was terrific. The fried banana and coconut ice cream were the perfect end to a great meal.", "Absolutely delicious. This place came highly recommended, and it is clear why. We shared a variety of dishes and everything was wonderful. The drunken noodle prawns were a favorite, and the pad Thai was the best we've ever had. They also had a seriously impressive and extensive wine list, and great service.", "After reading plenty of good reviews, I ignored my instincts and took the wife to lunch here.  Full disclaimer - I'm not a huge fan of thai food since I don't like coconut.  We looked over the giant menu, but settled on the lunch buffet since that's what the majority of people were eating (there were at least 10 people at the buffet the entire time we were there.)  It was cheap, both in terms of price and quality.  Nothing really stood out to me - I'm having a hard time remembering what I even found edible.  I wanted to like this place, but everything was pretty mediocre and forgettable.  Maybe if we'd ordered off the menu, my review would be different.  But I doubt I'll get the chance to try that - too many good restaurants in Vegas to return to one that left me this underwhelmed.", "Ate here on 12/25/13. Got there a half hour before they opened. The mall they are in is pretty run down, but there is plenty of free parking. Don't let the outside of this place dissuade you from eating here. The restaurant inside is much bigger and better than the outside would suggest. We were going to leave, but a line quickly formed before they opened so we figured we should stay. This is the best Thai food I have eaten in the US. Service was excellent, food came out quickly, and best of all, the food was excellent. They also have a huge wine selection if you drink wine. Ate the Drunken Noodles with soft shell crab, Massaman curry, crab fried rice, Tom Yum soup. The curry was sweeter than I've had before but was quite good. Highly recommended. Honestly, not sure what the difference would be between a 4 and a 5 star rating. I can't imagine a Thai restaurant being better than this. Maybe I should give it 5 stars.", "Awesome in every respect. Great staff. Great food. Super spicy (on request). \n\nWill be back again and again.", "Awesome!", "BEST Thai Food I have tried since visiting Thailand! The food is extremely authentic and tastes amazing. I had the crispy rice as an appetizer.. it was an explosion of flavor in my mouth! Each individual piece of rice was packed with fresh lime, Thai chile, and cilantro. There was onions, tomatoes, and peanuts mixed in which put this dish over the top! I also got the Yellow Curry-medium spicy and it was very good. The serving size was perfect, and the flavor was great! The service is also great!", "Being a Concierge for over 14 years, I can count how many times they answer the phone. They are not courteous and friendly. They can only hold the reservation for 5 mins. The restaurant is very tiny. Its fire hazardous. Since they are very popular, they should extend their restaurant and have some kind of reservation agent for booking. This is such a task for us in the industry as well as for our guests.", "Being that yelpers loves this place, we decided to try it. Overall, the food was good. However, I have tasted similar dishes elsewhere and it was normal for me. We had the duck curry, fried fish, pad Tai, drunking noodles seafood, salad seafood and tom Yum soup.", "Best Thai food in Vegas. Very fresh and a great menu selection. The wine cellar addition isn't half bad either!!! Always packed, and worth the wait!!!", "Best place in town. Everything is so good! It's always busy, and the decor isn't great- through its huge! I would totally stop here if your in Vegas and are craving Thai- take it from a local!", "By far the best Thai food we have ever had in the US.  First off it looks like a complete dump from the outside and you go inside and it is very nice.  Huge Wine selection, nice decor, great staff, clean bathrooms. \n\nThe food is unbelievable.  The pad thai is simply amazing.  The shrimp for appetizer is lightly breaded and fried and you eat the whole thing which is odd at first but so good.  The drinks were great. The duck was probably the best we've ever had, very crispy.", "Came here Friday 1/4/13  @ 6PM because of the reviews and before a show at the Wynn. Almost missed the location from the Sahara and thought it was a mom and pop, 10 table HITW. Walked in on a tiny waiting area for a surprisingly large restaurant. Hostess said it would be a 2 hour wait (for 2), OUCH! Packed with diners and food coming through looked good so helped ourselves to the bar area where we could see many enjoying themselves. Really bustling and waiters earning their tips. Ordered a SINGHA pint and enjoyed conversation and reviewing menu with my lady. Met a great couple from Houston who also came bc of Yelp and made the wait short. Actually, wait was only about  45 minutes and they were ready to take our order + another round. Ordered pork satay, seafood pad thai, spicy catfish and fried bananas.All delivered to our table diligently and well presented. Was all very tasty but will definitely order off the beaten path next time around. when in Vegas.", "Consistently awesome. I've been coming here for years on annual trip with friends and the food is just incredible.  The crispy duck in red curry, drunken crispy prawns are favs.  I enjoy these dishes at other places but they nail it. It's beyond discovered so make reservations", "Didn't like anything.  Yeah, I said it.  I  didn't enjoy Lotus of Siam.  After all of the hype I was really disappointed with this place.  I didn't like the food and can't believe people actually wait in line for this place.  \n\nI can appreciate an \"Old School Gem\" but this place is just old. What a dump!  This hole in wall is in a terrible area of town too.\n\nNot a fan and will never return.  \n\nMy taste buds deserve better~", "Este restauranteesta fuera de Las Vegas Strip, a unos 20 minutos caminando.  Pueden tomar el monoriel y parar en la ultima estacion del Norte y ahi se puede tomar un taxi.  La plaza donde esta situado se ve abandonada, pero vale la pena visitar.\n\nMuy buen restaurante, les recomiendo la sopa de coco y el sea bass con noodles.  \u00a1Espero regresar pronto!", "Excellent food! Excellent service! Drunken noodles are the best. I've been to Thailand and this was just as good or better!", "First of all, it's almost impossible to make a reservation there because nobody answer the phone.\nSecondly, the host/hostess are not friendly at all.\nI understand one person is not that important since they have a lot of good reviews.  HOWEVER, one could be back to many reviews if you guys keep treating people badly. There is Archi's which is also Thai restaurant. Now I only go there since they have 3 locations in Las Vegas. They are friendly and treat even one person good enough.", "First of all, you would NEVER know how to find this place unless you were specifically looking for it. It's off the strip in an area of town you wouldn't normally want to visit... I mean, unless you're interested in the transvestite strip club down the plaza. Who knows, maybe that's your thing? :)\n\nAnyway... if you do happen to read a review or have someone in Vegas (a cab driver or another local?) recommend this place, it's for good reason... it's simply amazing. \n\nYou would never guess from the outside... or for that matter the interior (unless you examined ALL the celebrity pictures up and down the walls of course) that this place was in fact just simply amazing in every possible way. The wait staff is knowledgeable and extremely helpful, the food is DELICIOUS and with a full service bar even if the food takes some time (which in my experience it doesn't) you can enjoy some nice drinks. \n\nBest of all? IT'S AFFORDABLE!!! Get five star food for two $$ prices... \n\nJust go here, that is all.", "First thoughts: Vegas sometimes feels like the city of AYCE, so why not Thai food too?\n \nThe menu at Lotus of Siam is extensive with the menu split into regional cuisine. (Northern, Southern, etc.) My bf and I had decided early on that we would eat at the lunch buffet instead so we arrived at around 11:45 am and the restaurant was already pretty packed. Lotus of Siam opens at 11:30 am and the lunch buffet is served from 11:30 am-2:30 pm.\n \nFor $10.99 a person, the lunch buffet is worth the price because there were many different options (steamed, stir-fry and fried) to select from. There was your standard sliced fruit (green melon, watermelon and pineapple) and salad. The Thai food included steamed white rice, Thai fried rice, chow mein, pad thai, pad see ew, chicken green curry, a tofu stir-fry and another vegetable stir-fry. The fried food included: egg rolls, curry wontons, tempura and delicious fried bananas! There were also 2 types of soups available: a hot and sour soup and a soup with clear broth. My bf preferred the soup with the clear broth and vegetables.\n \nFor me, the stand out dishes were the pad thai and green chicken curry! Both were tasty and the green chicken curry had large chunks of both vegetables and chicken. I even went back for seconds of the curry! \n\nThe service was good. It looked like there were only 1-2 people working the front of the restaurant and our waters were refilled.\n \nBottom line: This Thai place may be out off the strip but it is well worth the drive for good AYCE Thai food. If I return, I will probably order off the menu next time to compare with the AYCE food.", "First time trying Thai and it was DELICIOUS! The options were vast and the customer service was wonderful! Glad I found something different off the strip!", "Food took forever, but it was delicious.\nI wish I knew what I ate, but my cousin the foodie did the ordering.\n\nMy first visit here last September, I didn't love the food because she ordered a bit too exotic for me. \n\nThis next visit, she played it safe and ordered the beef and noodles, some jalapeno shrimp on cabbage thing, and I can't remember what else. \nI must say the \"noodles,\" which aren't very noodley but rather flat and wide and irregular shaped, were fantastic. The shrimp dish was good, but I had to wipe some of the peppers off.  our appetizer was yummmmmmy too, chicken on a stick :)\n\nThe mouse-sh*t pepper condiment nearly killed me, but they were delicious.\n\nOnly complaint (besides the wait between appetizer and entree) would be the rice. It was a bit hard in my opinion.", "Get the crispy duck. The crispy duck with basil/mint is the best of the crispy duck options.", "Got our usual Pad Thai & Garlic Prawns, which again, ARE A MUST WHEN GOING HERE! We also got to try te Som Thum Seabass today. It was good. Kinda pricey at $29.95. But it was nice, refreshing, flavorful, and spicy. SPICY! I should say. Note to self, order mild next time. It was packed for lunch! It's always packed! Make reservations! So much better to go in big groups, so that you can order more dishes to try. But hey, when in Vegas, this place is a MUST. We get it to go if we have to, or I'll even have lunch by myself if the bf is at a conference. LOVE THIS PLACE!", "Great food and excellent service. Server made thoughtful recommendations with what I actually wanted in mind. I'm not local, I'll be coming back here when I'm in Vegas! Don't let the rundown look of the outside turn you away. Lotus is the real deal.", "Great place to find wonderful Thai food. We had the pad Thai and garlic prawns with drunk noodles! Also had the Tom Kah Kai soup and egg rolls. Delicious, and the bill was only $53!", "Great spot for lunch. Opens at 11:30 so there was no wait since we were a little early. Yes, it's in a sketch part of town. Yes it's in an odd old strip mall. I decided to do the buffet for lunch since I was having a breakdown committing to one dish. I'll probably not do the buffet next time, but it was a good gateway intro to Lotus.", "Had lunch at the famous \"lotus of siam\" everyone talks about so I wanted to see it for myself..\nOrdered stuffed chicken wing . Chicken satay . Spicy fried rice with basil . Pad thai . And panang curry beef..\nAll the dishes were okay.. not awesome.. The problem was at the curry.. As shown in the picture there were almost no curry in there.. 5 spoons at most and I told the server I don't see any curry in there and he said that's how it is... I ordered curry not beef with curry sauce... mediocre taste and expensive portions small... guess that's what happens when you make too much money and busy.. lose quality..", "Had the Squid salad and beef Chow Mien.  The squid salad was refreshing, very good.  The chow mien was good.  Not that much meat, but very good.", "Holy crap this place is good. Eat the crispy duck drunken noodle and achieve ultimate happiness. Don't let the exterior fool you - this place is badass", "I came here on a Saturday night in Vegas. When I came in through the front door there were about 11 seats in the waiting area which were all full of customers waiting already. I put my name on the waiting list and was told it would be a 25 minute wait and that I could wait at the Bar. When I went to the bar all the seats were taken as well so I had no choice but to wait outside the restaurant. Luckily, it wasn't very busy that night and I only had to wait for 15 minutes for a party of 2. BEWARE usually it's about a 2 hour wait. \n\nI ordered the Nam Kao Tod which is a crispy rice that's quite sour tasting. In my opinion it was a little too sour for a rice dish. \n\nNext I had the coconut chicken soup (Tom Kah Kai) and it tasted like coconut milk mixed with chile oil. It was sweet so it seemed like a dessert but it had chicken and mushrooms which also made the dish savory. This mixture was a bit too odd for me and I would definitely not order this dish again. \n\nThe Drunken Noodle with Soft Shell Crab was also pretty disappointing considering the price. It was 18.95 with a small plate of noodles with a sprinkle of soft shell crab legs. Out of all the dishes I ordered I only liked the Musaman curry which was OK. \n\nIf you came here on a busy night and had to wait longer than 30 minutes I would recommend not coming here considering the price. If you do decide to wait it out DON'T order the Nam Kao Tod, Tom Kah Kai, and Drunken Noodle with Soft Shell Crab.\n\nOverall the service was good, the items I ordered were pretty bad with the exception of the Musamam curry, and I would probably not come here again.", "I came to this place after hearing great things and reading about how many world class chefs have ate there. Finally after visiting, I have to say that I am a bit disappointed with the food. The service was impeccable, and having worked in a higher end restaurant for several years, I could not find a single flaw. The food doesn't feel like it lives up to the standard of the service. I came a large group of people and we ordered the nine most popular dishes. And I must say that nothing about any of the food stood out.  I couldn't find a flaw with the taste or texture, but nothing about the food captured me. It was a bit of a let down, the food was still good, but everyone I was with felt the same way. Overall I would give it an 8.5 out of 10. If the food matched the service, it would be the best restaurant in the world.", "I don't normally enjoy eating Thai food, but this place was pretty good! \nI really enjoyed their pad tai (don't know how to spell any Thai food), and other dishes.. some fried rice, stuffed chicken, two kinds of soup (same soup but different main ingredients- one had chicken and the other one had shrimp), another type of noodles, and some other stuff.  Since I made a reservation the day before we didn't have to wait and were seated immediately. The area was pretty ghetto. We weren't sure if we were at the right place at first...but yup! It was the right place! Willl I come back here again? I will if I'm ridiculously craving Thai food.", "I eat Thai food all the time, have eaten at numerous Thai restaurants across the country and in Thailand and am of THAI/American ethnicity.  That being said, this place is really good.  To be fair I would probably say a 4.5, but there are somethings that could improve.   Definitely the best in LV that I've had, and I used to live here for part of my life.  I'm sure some people have had a bad experience for various reasons, but here's my take...\n\nGood news:  Phad see ew, drunken noodles, and curry's are some of my favorite dishes.  Phad Thai is also good here (and I'm not even a big fan of that- we had fried tofu in ours- delicious!)  If you can handle the heat try the green papaya salad (som tom)-  It's a small serving but your mouth with be crying tears of joy and pain from all of the fire.  I wanted to try the beef salad but haven't had a chance yet.  I also love Thai deserts so Khao Neeo (sticky rice) with coconut and mangoes was good here (mangoes weren't super sweet, but weren't in season so not necessarily their fault).  \n\nBad news:  the area is sketchy, and there is really no way to make reservations (the email thing is useless), so show up before it opens if you have a large party to put your name on the list or be prepared to wait.  The portions are smaller, but everybody at our party was stuffed (party of 7) for only about $130 (no alcohol).  That's  deal for good food in my mind for Vegas.  So order tons of dishes and do what we do. . .share.  \n\nOnce your inside the service is good and the people are friendly.  \n\nWe usually make it a point to eat here when we are in town.\n\nArroy Mak Mak!  (very delicious)", "I live in sgv so I'm exposed to lots of Thai food. Lotus of Siam is a good, but not great. I had the crispy duck, which is one of their specialty. It taste good but not good enough to worth $25 dollars. I don't think I'll come back, unless I have a party that wanted to come.", "I need to come back and try another entree.  This is a good Thai restaurant.   All the cab drivers know how to good to it and it was easy getting a cab back to the strip.  The shopping center is fine or average.", "I now understand what all the hype is about. The dishes that they do well are incredible, some of the other options where lack-luster, especially when you factor in the price. I have to say they gain at least a star on the wine list alone. Great selection and variety. I know for my palate I would stick with a white wine, but some of the more complex duck dishes would be a great excuse to try some of their red varietals.\n\nThe staff here is kind,fast, and knowledgable. Every recommendation was spot-on. Dishes I will go back for include: \nDrunken Noodles with Crispy Duck or Sea Bass\nSalt and Pepper Prawns\nChinese Broccoli and Pork Belly\nSoft Shell Crab Salad\n\nI was underwhelmed by:\nThe Beef and mint\nSatay\nChili Basil Seared Scallops\nStir Fried Eggplant\n\nI'll have to go back with a different group and take advantage of the staffs suggestions.", "I remember visiting my grandma and eating delicious Thai food. I also remember her house had various Buddhas, Thai figurines, elephants, and a picture of the Thai king and queen adorning her home. Going to Lotus of Siam is like going back to my grandmas house except they charge me and I have to share this place with other people. It's in a sketchy strip mall, it's insanely busy ALL the time, but I'd brave it all to come and eat here. The food is authentic (seriously my grandma would cook this stuff, I didn't know that Pad Thai was \"Thai\" food until much later in life) and I can't imagine a place that does some of these staples anywhere else. If you come for lunch you have the option of doing the buffet. DO NOT DO THE BUFFET. You may as well just hit up Buffet Asia. Don't go to any restaurant that has a James Beard Award and even think about the buffet. \nI've been here so many times that I can't list all the dishes I've had. NONE of them disappoint. If you're nervous or unfamiliar with Thai food ask your server for some recommendations. If you're familiar with Thai food, but not so familiar with Northern Thai food order a few familiar items and get at least ONE thing you've never had before. There's a reason it's busy,there's a reason it's won awards, there's a reason I feel a real sense of nostalgia for grandma's house when I'm here, and there's a reason my mom (also from Thailand) has trouble eating Thai anywhere else. This place is good because they showcase authentic Thai cuisine and they try to honor the culture via taste buds. If you want to go, but hate waiting (I feel you man) visit at lunch when they first open and make a reservation.", "I say don't be fooled by the area that this restaurant in, because in this case, looks can really be deceiving. \n\nYou wouldn't think a nice restaurant would exist in the area this place is in. The outside looks like it's a subpar restaurant, but when you walk in, you'll be surprised, or at least I was. \n\nThe menu has a vast selection of Thai dishes to choose from. I was slightly bit overwhelmed, but I wanted curry, and they have a dedicated section for curry. A few seem like the same but under a different name, but I'm not very experienced with Thai food. \n\nI ordered the musaman curry and I admit it was tasty. I could taste the coconut and it blended really well, especially when topped on white rice. The meat reminded me of Vietnamese beef stew and it was quite delicious. It came with a few pieces of potatoes, tomatoes, and carrots. I wasn't very impressed with the amount of food I was given and my table was given. We all were surprised at the amount of food we were given with the amount the food is. The $12 curry had the portion size of something $8, but I guess when it comes to quality, you can't argue right? I wouldn't mind coming back, but this wouldn't be my first choice for Thai food", "I stopped in my last trip to Vegas and ordered the crispy duck panang. It was amazing. This is now a staple of my Vegas trips although it is not on the strip. The stuffed chicken wings are fantastic and they have a great wine list. Well worth the trip every time.", "I think maybe it was too hyped up for me. I mean, people driving hundreds of miles just to eat here? Not buying it. Overall, the food was very good but it didn't really knock my socks off or anything. Though I sometimes wonder if Thai food can ever knock my socks off. \n\nWe went on a Monday at about 7 pm and there was no wait at all. The restaurant is in a questionable appearing strip mall with plentiful parking. The inside of the restaurant is deceptively huge. \n\nOur waitress was very nice and informative. When we asked for recommendations, she knew her stuff and was ready with some excellent options immediately. The medium spicy was actually a little on the spicier side which makes me shudder to think of what their spicy is....\n\nI do, however, highly recommend the Panang short ribs. Less impressed by the garlic prawns. The tom kha gai soup was good but not the best.", "I was in Vegas with my brothers a few weeks back. We wanted to try a place off the strip & had heard about LofS. We were starving but it's a quick cab ride from the northern end of Las Vegas Blvd. so we arrived in less than 5 minutes. Once inside, the short wait for our table naturally led us to their bar for beer & sake. \n\nImmediately after getting our drinks we were seated & ordered a bunch of food to share. It was so delicious that half way thru our meal we ordered more to take back to our room for the following day! Haha! \n\nThe guys at the table next to us were regulars. They told us some really funny stories about the restaurant. And as they were leaving they gave us an expensive bottle of sake they hadn't opened. Score! It was soo smooth too! After our entrees we were full but had to order dessert. We ate like pigs! \n\nIf you want to leave the strip for a few hours to relax in a different environment I really recommend LofS. The food is fantastic, the staff is very friendly, the mix of good people is diverse and it's all pretty inexpensive. I can't wait to go back!", "I was in Vegas with my wife last weekend and heard about this must go, best in country Thai restaurant. I will say that our first impression of this place was not good at all. It's not the unassuming building or the location. It's the buffet lunch that they put out there. DON'T try the buffet lunch. Again, DON'T get the buffet lunch. It's terrible. We were there around 12:30 on a Friday and  the steam table trays were half empty. They also took their time replenishing the food, which was slightly better than mediocre, which is not saying much. Service for the buffet was also terrible. Seems like the wait and kitchen staff were more intent on taking care of the menu customers than the buffet customers. I don't understand why restaurants do this. If you are going to offer a buffet, at least keep it hot and full at all times even if the food is not good. If we didn't know about this place, the buffet experience would have turn us off completely and we would never come back. I am tempted to give this place a 3 star except that the food off the menu was so much better and a better representation of this place.\n\nWe came back again with great trepidation to try out the menu. Our buffet experience was so bad that we almost didn't come back. We were glad to give them one more chance. They have a great menu and offered northern dishes that we don't see a lot. Food came out quickly and the wait staff was always attentive (unlike the Buffet). Garlic Prawns were fantastic as were the sour rice salad, Khao Soi and the other dishes that we ordered. Their food certainly had more depth to it than what you would find at a typical place.\n\nUltimately, was this the best Thai restaurant in the nation, probably not. The lunch buffet was a waste of time and money. It shouldn't even be offered for a restaurant like this, where the menu is the gem. However, the menu item were certain unique and good enough that we will come back next time we are in town. for the menu items, NOT the buffet.", "I went to this strip-mall restaurant based on Yelp reviews, and they were right. This is one of the best Thai restaurants I've been to, and I'm a big fan of Thai. The crispy rice appetizer was completely new to me and really remarkable. All four people in my party loved their entr\u00e9es as well.  The only down side of this restaurant is getting there - you really have to have a car to get there. The place looks like nothing from the outside, but we arrived 15 minutes before they opened for the evening and there was already a line to get it.", "I'm going to say 5 stars for the crispy rice dish, and 2 stars for the jack fruit curry (it was interesting, but really not what I wanted), 3 stars for the drunken noodles, and 4 stars for the crispy duck on top of the noodles... It's a wash. \n\nReservations are highly recommended! I made reservations for 2 a few weeks in advance, and they actually said that my first choice for time was unavailable. When i got the restaurant, a few parties of 2 walked in and were told that the wait was 45 minutes (!?). \n\nThe service was prompt and the menu is overwhelming! I liked that they have Isaan food. However, I think that I may have ordered the wrong thing...I was intrigued by the jack fruit curry, but it was ok...It was really watery and more like tomato water with herbs :( The drunken noodles were ok. The crispy duck on top was really good, though, which sort of made the dish, but the noodles on their own were average. \n\nI do have to say that the crispy rice dish, though, was FANTASTIC! Very flavorful, in all the right ways. \n\nThey say that it's spicy. I got a 3 (out of 10). I can handle spicy food, but they warned us that 3 or 4 packed a lot of heat. The crispy rice was spicy, but the drunken noodles and jack fruit curry could have had a bit more spiciness.", "I've been visiting Las Vegas for nearly a decade now, and I started to hear rave reviews for Lotus of Siam on my second or third trip.  I love Thai food, but didn't get a chance to dine here until we had a car to drive off-Strip to the back of a sketchy strip mall.  I wasn't put off by the location (I love a good dive), but it didn't seem like somewhere I really wanted to catch a cab.\n\nWe visited at lunchtime, tired and hungry from early-morning flights, and decided to hit the buffet.  I think this was our critical error.  The majority of the 5-star reviews here are for their menu service, not the buffet.  But we were starving and the limited options on the buffet seemed like a reasonable trade-off for instant gratification.  I wish we'd looked at the buffet before agreeing to be seated in the dining area around it - one glance and I think we would've opted for the menu dining room instead.\n\nIt was a small buffet and very little on it was Thai cuisine.  Mostly, it offered the typical Pan-Asian dishes you find on cheap buffets - rice, lots of stir-fried veggies and meats, some noodles, some broth-y soups, sliced fruit, crispy fried appetizer things, etc.  The Pad Thai and a veggie dish were the only recognizably \"Thai\" dishes out there, the rest were pretty uninteresting.  Nothing seemed particularly well-made or seasoned, either.  The highlight of the buffet was the fried banana wontons.  We ate so many of those once we discovered how mediocre everything else was.  \n\nI'm sad to give Lotus of Siam a 2-star review, but the buffet doesn't deserve anything higher even if you're dining in a room literally lined in photos of the celebrity guests who have dined there (and a gigantic glassed-in wine cellar, which was incongruous with the buffet).  I'd be interested to return for a real menu dining experience.  I don't often give second chances to places that let me down this badly, but I know I must be missing something here.", "If I could give more stars, I would.  This place is absolutely amazing.  Wait was 45 minutes, which wasn't bad; but with 2 kids they were pretty frantic when we were seated.  Our gracious waiter rushed our appetizer order so the kids could eat.  Also, it was our first time trying Thai food and our waiter made great recommendations.  Can't wait to go back.", "In LV on business, and decided that I would make the trip to what was described to me as \"Mecca if you love Thai food.... outside of Thailand, of course.\"\n\nI drove my rented minivan to the strip mall (yes, you read that right a minivan. Me. In a minivan. Oh, and the strip mall too... and no, there weren't strippers at the strip mall) on Sahara. As I hustled to the door (it was very cold!) the small, completely unassuming store front seemed quiet for a Wednesday night. And then I opened the door. \n\nThe place was positively cavernous, given the little entryway. I put my name down and went to sit at the bar while I waited the estimated 30 minute wait (it was less!). The bustle of the place is amazing. The smells, the service... there's a great energy and an extensive list of beers and wines to get you started. \n\nEarlier in the night DH had told me to ask if they had a tasting menu (they don't, but what a great idea!) so that I could try more things. It was only by the stroke of luck that my neighbours at the bar and I shared a similar last name, country of origin, and is turns out, passion for food. When we were seated next to eachother, they ever so graciously shared their appetizer (heaven on a plate) and I shared my tom ka kai (holy crap was that good).  The Ginger Sea Bass was perfectly delicate. You'd expect the thai flavours to overwhelm the fish, but instead it was perfectly balanced and prepared, with the fish still having just the right bite.\n\nI'm a Pad Kee Mao aficionado. I eat it everywhere I can because it's my favorite and I'm always looking for the most amazing one. And thanks to my new super BFFs, I got to try not one, but two ways that Lotus of Siam excels at it - one with prawns and one with crispy duck. People, you can not go wrong. Order either. Order both. Eat all the things. \n\nI will absolutely, positively, with 100% certainty be back. Because there is soo much more to try and everything was truly flawless (including the service!)", "Just went to Thailand for 2 weeks in October. Haven't be able to find authentic Thai food in the states until last night. Felt like we were back in Chiang Mai. \n\nGreen curry level 10 was perfect. Tom Yum was incredible. Drunken noodles / soft shell crab is a must.", "Lotus is legit. You know it's legit when your cabbie perks up immediately when you mention that you want to be taken there from your hotel on the Strip. During my most recent trip to Las Vegas a couple weeks ago, I boarded a cab from the Palazzo and indicated to the cab driver to take me to the Lotus of Siam. He simply said in his Yugoslavian accent: \"best Thai food in Las Vegas...hell, best Thai food in the country! I love that place.\" It seemed like an honest review, but not Yelp Elite caliber. \n\nSo here goes mine, hopefully a bit more fleshed out:\n\nLotus lets people in around 5:30pm for dinner service. Knowing this, if you arrive a little before this time, you will see a group of people standing outside, all wanting to be the first one in. There's no order to the way people congregate outside, but there's an unspoken rule to just keep a mental tab as to who arrives after you, and when the doors swing open, to make it inside the restaurant before them. The sooner you sit, the sooner you eat! No pushing or shoving, though the temptation to invade others' personal space is strong as you try to think of what to order in advance in your head.\n\nAs you shuffle inside, you'll be greeted by newspaper snipets featuring Lotus in the local papers. You'll see plenty of photos of famous people (both American and presumably Thai) over the years, enjoying the food at this Las Vegas institution.\n\nAccording to others in my group, the restaurant was expanded relatively recently to include the empty neighboring space. That effectively allowed the owners to add a wine bar and a wine storage room, as well as more dining space. It doesn't seem like there's much activity going on at the strip mall where Lotus is located, so the whole wing of the building can be converted to more Lotus as far as I'm concerned. It would be way better that way, really.\n\nService has always been kind and friendly whenever I come here, as per Thai tradition. I've only been a couple of times, but with all the stuff I've ordered and shared with my group (it's an extensive menu), I did not find one thing I did not like.\n\nI recommend the jumbo fried shrimp/prawns to open things up. You can, and should, eat the skin. I don't usually do so with any fried shrimp, but the way it was cooked with the peppering and seasoning, it was almost like having twice as much prawn. Those will disappear in a couple of minutes (because of some secret crack-like substance that the cooks sprinkle into the batter, I'm sure), so I also recommend the yellow curry (though I don't think the color matters...they're all really savory and the spice level can be adjusted to your liking) and the fried, boneless catfish (either with curry paste or garlic pepper sauce). Eat that with a side of salad and some white rice and wash it down with some Singha, and you'll be golden.\n\nAs mentioned earlier, you can take a cab here from the Strip if you're visiting from out of town, or drive your own car here. The only problem is getting a cab back to your hotel or next destination. You may want to have the host arrange a ride back for you before you sit down to eat, otherwise, you may have to go out into Sahara Road and flag one down yourself or pray that you find one just emptied of passengers intent on coming here in the parking lot. That would be called \"Lotus luck\" or, winning the Lotus lottery.", "Lotus really was THE place to come in Vegas for great Thai...4 years ago...\n\nLotus does a lot right.  They have a great menu with many options from the Northern and Southern regions of Thailand.  But they got too popular for their own good, and like often happens, the quality slipped away.  They are the quintessential spot for inconsistency in my book--putting out incredible dishes on one trip, and offering up apathetic shadows of a former self the next.  I have been over a dozen times and the last 4 or 5 times left me with this sentiment deeply ingrained in my heart, soul, and mind...when they are on though, they certainly do put out some special dishes!", "Love the Northern Thailand pork dishes like pork stew and ground pork.  Curries, noodles and traditional dishes are well executed.  Worth a trip to the ghetto Commercial Center.  Coming  in between 1-2  is best to get in quickly.  Buffet is mediocre so go for the al a carte fare. The curry dishes, Thai style, is the best in town.\nExpect a line on the weekends.", "Made our way to the much celebrated Lotus of Siam while in Las Vegas and had a decent meal but left unimpressed. Billed as the best Thai in the country, I was surprised to find most of the food to be comparable to the good Thai places I eat at while at home. The prawns were awesome, everything else we ordered was nothing special. Pretty good, but definitely fell short of the hype and expectations.", "My first visit, more than four years ago, was not remarkable by any means, but I decided to give Lotus of Siam a second chance. \u00a0Hallelujah that I did.\n\nLotus of Siam has definitely expanded since my last visit, having taken over the space next door so that the location is now huge. \u00a0I worried upon arriving, resevation-less, on a Sunday at 5:30pm, opening time, and seeing guests lined up at the door, but once I set foot into the seating area, I could see that accommodating us, along with anyone behind us in line, was a non-issue.\n\nThe menu, 15 pages with at least 10 offerings per page, can be overwhelming, so try to do your order research ahead of time. \u00a0The two of us went for the following, and boy did we hit our max:\n\n- Nam Kao Tod (4 stars): unlike anything I've eaten before. \u00a0Spicy, tangy, and citrus-y with crispy rice (love)\n- Roasted Duck Curry (3 stars): just your standard duck with red curry. \u00a0Passable, especially with other much more enticing options\n- Sea Bass Drunken Noodle (5 very enthusiastic stars): at $29, definitely not inexpensive, but worth every deep-fried and wonderfully crisp, rich, and succulent sea bass bite. \u00a0Request mild if you can't handle spice because this delicious dish is packed with Thai chilis\n- Mango Sticky Rice (4 stars): perfectly sweet and smooth mango coupled with coconutty sticky rice\n\nThis was most certainly the best meal of my trip. \u00a0I am not much a fan of Vegas and have avoided the city for the past four years after countless previous trips, but now I am looking forward to returning if only to eat every meal at Lotus of Siam (of course with the Seabass Drunken Noodles).", "My sister, her husband, and I ate at Lotus of Siam on 1-7-2014 (for the first time) and found the food we ordered to be excellent.  I had the spicy shrimp soup and spicy chicken wings (an 8 in hotness) as an appetizer, and they were excellent.  The Lemon Grass soup with chicken her husband shared with us was excellent.  My sister ordered the Yellow Curry and was excellent (I thought is was surprisingly mild) which we all ate portions of.  We craved more chicken wings and ordered another serving of even hotter (10 this time) and were just right. My only complaint was the servers could have removed finished dishes sooner and had to be asked to do so. My sister and her husband have lived in Las Vegas over 35 years and said this was the first time that they had been by Lotus of Siam where there was not a line waiting to get in, as they had wanted to eat here before, but had not wanted to wait in line to get in.  I would say this place would set the standard for all Thai restaurants to aspire to.", "NO STAR!!!   Worst Thai food I have ever had!!!   I can't understand the awards and hype they received!!!   My friend and I have lived in Vegas all our lives...past this place a million times but never tried it.  Finally here...and Wow!  We felt like we were being punked.  The restaurant was packed. But as each course we ordered came out...I wasn't impressed at all!!!   \n\n$40 per person later...left feeling like an idiot for listening to all the hype.  \n\nNever again!!!  I would have been happier at Pin Kaow or Archi's and would have saved some money too.  \n\nWhat a disappointment!   Another Yelp fail!", "Not the best in town, and no clear vegitarian/vegan options. I always have to adjust my order to fit my dietary needs and then pray it comes out correctly. My suggestion is to walk across the parking lot to Komol Thai, way better and more bang for your buck!", "Ok it's more like 2.5 stars.. Il make this review quick n straight to the point..the food is good.. I ordered the pad tai,  pad see wu,  Isaan sausage,  stuffed chicken wings n hot n sour soup.. Liked everything especially the stuffed chicken but not worth the wait and my biggest downer.... The portion size! . I know plenty of Thai restaurants w same quality food w way bigger portions.. I get the food is good but give us more!\n\nOne more thing.. One of there desserts was the mango w sticky rice. When i tried to order it they said mangos were not in season... Uh I just bought mangos at the market n had mangos at a restaurant in aria.. So how can it be out of season.?", "On my last night in Vegas, I figured I'd hit the strip for some tried and true authentic Thai cuisine at none other than the famous Lotus of Siam. Located in a dilapidated old strip mall north of the main strip, you'd easily miss this place if you sneezed but make no mistake, this place is the real deal folks! At check in, we were told it would be a grueling 45 minute wait. We were then invited to the bar to pass the time.  Needless to say, we enjoyed a shot or two at the bar and made some new friends in some cool gals.  Before we knew it, our table was ready! Way less than 45 minutes I might add.\n\nOur server was kind courteous and very helpful. She took our orders and within moments, our tasty dishes were basking on our table.\n\nSea bass drunken noodles - if you like chow fun, you will enjoy every bite of this phenomenal dish! Order it medium spicy and top it with the buttery sea bass and you'll be good to go! Satisfaction guaranteed!\n\nCrispy duck - served with a coconut panang curry sauce, I was blown away by the incredible texture and zesty tang of the panang curry, awesomely delicious!\n\nGarlic prawns - jumbo prawns served nice and crispy with the most enticing aroma I've experienced in years. It will make you drool at first whiff and the explosive garlicky flavor will keep you pining for another decadent bite!\n\nOverall, awesome service, impeccable food and good times = A+++ from this guy \n\nHappy Eats!", "One of the best Thai I've had the pleasure of eating.", "Overall good Thai food. It was annoying that they really skimp on the rice and charge for extra. Recommend the Khao Soi.", "Pros: super friendly staff, great quality food, fresh ingredients, efficient busboys\n\nCons: small waiting area, super small portions, way overpriced \n\nTip: call way ahead for reservations (even like a day or two before) or else be prepared to wait... We went on a Thursday evening like 6:30ish, an hour after opening, only waited 30 mins... Can only imagine if we showed up later!", "SOLID FOUR STARS. \n\nWe had the crispy duck in penang curry and the soft shell crab noodles (both Yelp recommendations).  Both were awesome!!\n\nWe like it so much we had dinner there again 2 nights later!!\n\nOne tip is to get there early (when they open).  We got there at 5:30 and didn't have a wait for our party of four.  By the time we were leaving the waiting area was full...\n\nThis place has ruined me for other Thai places.  It will be the place I will compare ALL other Thai food to!", "Scuzzy outside , creepy parking lot, 40 minute wait. A tiny price to pay to get to eat here! OMG. I could eat here everyday! Here's a tip. Make sure to lock your car , and make reservations !!\n\nMust try; all the soups . Stuffed chicken wings and something you can't pronounce!", "So I decided to brave Lotus of Siam again, and admit that it's winning me over.\n\nThe crispy garlic prawns were a step down though; not very garlicky at all and I think the batter wasn't fully cooked.\n\nYou can totally eat the shells, but I'd still stay away from the tails, which have a tendency to poke you in your mouth. Ouch!\n\nThe nam prik ong was pretty fucking awesome. No wonder why it was featured on \"The Best Thing I Ever Ate.\" The cool veggies (carrots, cauliflower, cucumber, string beans) offset the heat of in the spicy pork dip (my medium was plenty spicy).\n\nBut nothing is better than dipping pork rinds in pork. I mean, it's all the same animal, so it's meant to be.\n\nMy Thai friend Amy ordered an incredible crispy duck dish during our previous visit, and I was trying my damndest to remember the name. Oh well, next time.\n\nThe parking lot still sketches me out though. There were a few ambulances there when I went ... God knows what ... or who ... went down at the neighboring brothel and bathhouse.", "So glad I trusted the 4 stars on 1600 reviews and experienced Lotus of Siam. After eating overpriced crap food everywhere on the strip, my palate and entire body was screaming with joy here.\n\nFirst off, what an interesting interior. The massive wine cellar and list is impressive. It still gave me a hole in the wall feel but it was a very large hole in the wall, unusually. The chandeliers were pretty to look at but it was hard to avoid the emergency exit sign/door that was next to my face from where we were seated. It didn't matter though, I was aching for some tummy comfort.\n\nPapaya salad, Musamun Curry and Salt & Pepper Prawns. Holy eff. It did more than the trick and I literally cried when the bear wouldn't let me eat the leftovers after we got back to the fridge-less hotel & they had been sitting out for a couple hours, I was aching for more of that deliciousness...\n\nI really wish I had gotten more chances to eat here and try some of their other specialties. Some of the best Thai I've had, ever.", "Solid Thai restaurant but totally overrated by the press.  There are other Thai restaurants in Las Vegas for the same price that are just as good.  You will definitely need a reservation for this place.  \n\nI've been here about 3 times now.  All the noodle dishes are excellent.  Soups are just ok -- nothing to write home about.  They have a huge menu, so there are definitely a lot of dishes that I haven't tried yet.", "Soup was just ok. I enjoyed the drunken noodle with prawns but preferred the crispy duck with panang sauce. So delicious!! Price was on the high side.", "Spoiled rotten with my first time eating Thai food.\n\nFrom the outside, you will say \"wow, really? This is what people are raving about?\" in a sarcastic tone.  When you get your food, you will say, \"wow, really! This what people are raving about!\" enthusiastically.\n\nI am a very pedestrian eater when it comes to ethnic food. I don't like spicy, I don't like weird things.  So I was dreading my visit.  I was expecting to like 1 or 2 of the 10 things we ordered, in reality, there were only 2 of the 10 things I did NOT like (the spicy things)!\n\nSince I do not have a baseline, I will just say everything was great, so from a picky ethnic eater, here was what stood out:\n\nMee Krob - interesting.  Just thought South Park made this word up.\nSea bass with Drunken Noodle - waiter recommendation over another sea bass pairing.\nCrispy Duck with Panang - another waiter audible. Was spicy, but a great taste.\nPad Thai - again, interesting my unrefined palette\nMango Sweet Rice combined with Coconut Ice Cream - never had mango before, this was a treat! Definitely a great closer. Mango is only served in season. Wait for it.\n\nFinally, the Thai Iced Tea was really cool.  Warning, do not let this water down in the ice, it will destroy the epic flavor.\n\nBy now, you should be reading this from the restaurant.  Just go!", "Such a great find!  The location is a strip mall and at night empty, except this place. We ordered the garlic prawns and a soup. The food was delicious and service was great. I would suggest the garlic prawns as a must have.", "Surprisingly nice interior considering the ghetto commercial area this place is in. Would be hard to find unless you were looking for it.\n\nThe food and prices here are on par with the Thai restaurants in SGV, which is a good, but not great thing. I had the pad thai and red duck curry, both which matched that description.", "THE BEST Thai food in Vegas, by far. I don't even feel the need to write more than that, but I will. \n\nChef Saipin was gracious enough to greet me and wish me a happy birthday while me and my family dined here. Their staff made excellent suggestions as to what to get. Papaya salad, soft shell crab noodles, drunken noodles, pad thai, fried prawns, the soup... that could have been my last meal and I would've been fine with that.\n\nDon't let the location around the Lotus of Siam fool you. This place is well known for a reason.", "The 45mins wait for crispy duck on panang curry was well worth it. Must try! A reservation is highly recommended.", "The BEST Thai food I have ever had. Mind blown. Didn't think it could be so good.\nShort Rib Panang bomb.com, Garlic Prawns and Pad Thai... So good!!!", "The food here is good, but i have to admit i was a bit disappointed. Everyone kept saying this is the best thai food they have ever had, so i had to try it. The food was a bit dry and didn't taste fresh. I understand the place is always packed, we waited over an hour for a table, but the food needs to be fresh. I just feel like if you wait for so long the food needs to be amazing. It was definitely good, but in my opinion not worth that wait. Have to say this place is really overrated. But try it for yourself, and see what you think.", "The food was amazing, but there were some major trade-offs:\n\n1. Our 45-60 minute wait lasted about 80 minutes. We had enough time to go back to our room, change, come back to the restaurant, and still wait long enough to be pretty hungry by the time we were seated. \n\n2. I got food poisoning. While we shared all of our dishes, one of them had individual soft shell crabs, which was the majority of what I puked out later in the evening. I've since read about other food poisoning reports here, particularly connected to seafood, so I think there must be a problem. It left me sick for a full 24 hours, and worse, my immune system was so down from the dehydration and the dry winter weather in Vegas, this was followed by a cold that lasted several more days. \n\nAs terrible as my illness was, I had a very tasty dinner before the aftermath, which makes it hard to write Lotus off completely:\n\nRed curry - amazing\nFried spicy catfish - solid\nDrunken noodle soft shell crab - good noodles, bad crabs\nFried banana w/coconut ice cream and sticky rice - good but a bit too sweet\nThai iced tea - standard", "The food was decent. Not the best. I've definitely have had better thai food. Overrated and overhyped. I read most of the yelp reviews with 3 or less stars and I agree with them. The portions are a little small.  My pad thai tasted like they burnt something in it which ruined the taste. Same with the moo yang. The yellow curry tasted okay. I did like the bamboo shoots with red curry sauce. Service was pretty good and fast. \n\nWe went at night and there were a bunch of bums walking the parking lot asking for money. Not very comforting. \n\nHonestly I like komol way better which is just across the parking lot and their menu has pictures. Haha", "The hype, the fame, the name, the desire to be able to say I've been there and recommendations bought us here.  However, David V. captured it best when he stated that L.O.S. appears to have been \"the\" Thai spot a few years ago. \n\nAMBIANCE\nL.O.S. is located in a sketchy little strip mall off Sahara. The interior is a clean, no frills decor, and the restaurant lacks a waiting area.\n\nFOOD   \nFollowing Yelp recommendations, we ordered:\n\n-Garlic Prawns                                            (5 STARS)\n-Drunken Noodles w/Soft Shell Crab     (4.5 STARS)\n-Chicken Pad Prig Khing                          (3.5 STARS)\n\nOur meal was good/okay, but when I think of L.O.S. I smile more about the people watching (which was super juicy) than the meal.", "The location is in a funny side of town, but the food out beats it; their 12:00pm to 2 \n:00pm all you can eat lunch buffet is quite the catch.", "The menu is huge! but the portions small and the price just not ok for Vegas especially for a Thai Restaurant. I guess the taste is OK, Unfortunately had better or I may have just ordered the wrong thing.\n\nDefinitely make reservations. We waited for about an one hour cuz of the people rush from the outlets and you got people going in front you cuz they were smart...also weird from a regular thai restaurant\n\nAlthough they had a big menu it was a difficult to understand or I was just exhausted...but what's funny is that after going here...thai menus are so confusing..for one they actually put names in thai and describe the ingredients to you...but everything is almost the same...\n\nWe ended up ordering four things, pad thai, minced ground chicken salad - i think that's what it was, and the wings...the people i went with didn't want soup so that took out a quarter of the menu. couldn't do the fried rice because we were getting white rice another quarter of the menu. got the pad thai can't do the other quarter of the noodles. There was the fish but it was market price (so expensive). We thought you know its thai big portions we were still hungry! so we asked for the menu again and it took so long for us to look and find we want and we just told the waiter what he recommended. We ended up getting something that was off the menu - chinese brocolli with fried pork and hoisin kind of sauce with garlic. Took forever though but it did the trick!", "The restaurant front looked less than impressive, and I was slightly turned off by the ghetto strip mall vibe, but took a chance because a friend said I would love it. \nOh boy, did I!! Be ready to wait up to an hour during regular dining time (6:30-8:30), but don't worry, once the food gets in your mouth you'll totally understand why so many covet this place. This is probably the best thai food I have ever had! It is no wonder why they have so many Zagat awards!The decor is whatever, but honestly I would eat in a card board box as long as they would serve me. \nWe ordered the crispy duck panang, the seafood drunken noodle and the thai barbeque chicken. Delicious! Everything was amazingly prepared and I got so excited I had to be stopped from ordering more to go. I can't even say what I loved the  most! I will definitely come back to try more! It will be my new Mecca of every trip I take to Vegas!", "There's something satisfying about stuffing my face with delicious Thai food moments before slipping on a bodycon dress for a night of clubbing on The Strip. God bless being in my midtwenties.\n\nGet anything with the chu chee sauce. You won't regret it.", "They have gone down-hill since their expansion a couple of years ago.  I used to rate them 5-stars, now it is two.\n\nFirst the very positive: If you want the best and amazing flavors, this is the place.  They have their flavor profiles totally dialed in to perfection.\n\nNow, the problems... all of the proteins (meat, chicken, etc.) are too over cooked.  Bad texture and chewy.  The other problem is their \"heat scale\".   I have ordered food to be medium, and it can be all over the scale from barely spicy, to so intense it is inedible.\n\nThe last experience we had last week delivered the flavors to perfection, but our proteins were way overcooked, and we had a salad that was inedible because it was extremely over-saturated with pepper heat, even though we ordered it medium.\n\nI had been going their for over 10 years.  Last week was my last time.  It is so sad.  I used to love this food.   Now I cannot eat it.", "This is Thai food. \n\nIf you:\nThink Thai food should be eaten with Chopsticks\nThink mild salsa is too \"spicy\"\nThink Pad Thai is basically the only thing to eat at a Thai restaurant\nAre driving 100's of miles to eat here, and are usually surrounded by lots of good Thai food choices\n\nDon't come here.\n\n\nNo seriously.\n\n If you like Pad Thai, great but lets be honest- most places make pretty good Pad Thai, and it would be hard to make it better than most of the 4 million other restaurants. \n\n \nIf you:\nReally love authentic Thai Food\nAre adventurous and want to try new things without going to Thailand \n\nThis is the place to go.     \n\nLotus of Siam is really good, not only for the quality of the food but the variety on the menu. If you are a stickler for quality curry, and like when you can tell from the color of the curry how hot it is. This is your place.", "This is our first time here. I would never have known it was here if my husband hadn't heard about it from one of his fellow actors. It's a hidden gem. DH ordered the pork Moo Yang, I had crispy duck Panang (spice level 7). We got the tempura as an appetizer.\n\nThe service is incredible. They work as a team, rather than assigning a particular waiter to a table. This means your needs are always met without waiting, and quickly.\n\nThe wine was overpriced and only meh.\n\nThe food, however - OMG. After my first bite of the duck, I needed a towel and a cigarette. Really good. It was perfect crispy, not too fatty, and spiced just right.", "This is the best Thai restaurant this side of the Pacific Ocean.  It is hard to find.  Highly suggest you take a cab!!  Order the Crispy Duck on Drunken Noodles.  They do Duck to perfection!!  Love, love love this place!!!", "This is the best Thai restaurant. I eat Thai in every city that I travel to. I would recommend if you go with a group, order multiple entrees and serve family style. Two must entrees. Duck panang curry and Seabass drunken noodles. However, I've tried most everything and there is nothing I didn't like.", "This is the kind of place that has recieved so much fanfare and hype that it is impossible for the restaurant to meet such high expectations.\n\nI ordered take out on Mondy night as I was travelling through the city. The place was packed. I ordered the thai beef salad, beef jerky, and some sort of curry with beef short ribs. The beef salad was AWESOME. Exactly how I like it. The meat was tender and full of flavor. \n\nThe jerky gets a mixed review. The pieces that I was able to chew and eat were really great. Great beef flavor with a great mix of spices. No sauce needed. However, there were a couple of pieces in the order that were inedible due to being too chewy and fatty. \n\nThe curry was forgettable. The beef short ribs were not that great either. I ended up throwing away a lot of it. \n\nI definintely want to try other items on my next trip through LV. Worth the visit, but please order take out and avoid the crowds.", "This local favorite has earned a national reputation for its great Thai food. Although I have ordered off the menu a few times, I usually go to Lotus for their lunch buffet, and that's what we did today.\n\nAt first glance, the buffet doesn't look like much -- especially when compared to other buffets offered on the Strip. But for $10.99, you get a pretty thorough representation of traditional Thai offerings. I'm not sure if the selections change daily, but today there was no beef or seafood; however, there were plenty of chicken, tofu, and vegetable dishes to go around. There was also a lot of fried fare, including egg rolls, shrimp and curry puffs, tempura vegetables, and fried banana (basically, a banana egg roll). \n\nI steered clear of the fried food and headed straight for the chicken noodle soup, which is one of my favorite things at Lotus. I don't think this is on the regular menu, and it's not what you would consider traditional chicken noodle soup, but I could eat this all day. It looks like a hot and sour soup with ground chicken and wide rice noodles, but it has a hint of spice (anise?) that's addictive. I've had this with duck on the buffet before and it was fantastic, but this is almost as good. My husband was not as pleased with the egg drop soup, which could more appropriately be called \"cilantro soup with egg.\" (He has that weird gene where cilantro tastes like soap, so any cilantro at all is too much for him. I love cilantro, but it was a little overwhelming for me, too.)\n\nThe main courses included pad thai, pad woo sen, curry chicken, chow mein, and ginger tofu (listed in order of my preference). There are orange slices and cantaloupe for dessert along with the aforementioned banana egg roll. (I consider this last item a dessert option. Don't be like my husband and mistake it for a savory dish -- it sure tastes crappy with soy sauce on it!)\n\nNewbies and foodies may want to order off the extensive menu, but for anyone in search of a quick and tasty Thai lunch, I suggest trying the buffet (if, for nothing else, one of the best soups in town).", "This place has really good Thai food, the service can be hit or miss but the food is almost always good! It's also pretty reasonably priced for what you get.", "This place is amazing!!! The flavorful combinations of spices are like nothing I have ever experienced.  Every dish is so unique and flavorful!!   All the other reviews say enough I just had to add my 5 stars.  This place is amazing and I will not ever leave Vegas without eating here.  The staff is amazing,  it is quite intimate for being such a busy place, and the food is exquisite!! \n\nYou must try this place!!", "This place is as good as everyone says it is. Everyone I bring here goes back themselves.", "This place is awesome!! \n\nLocation:\nGhetto ass shopping center that if you go at night, looks pretty docile and empty everywhere else in that area.\n\nFood:\nI had the Nam Kao Tod appetizer which was great. Good amount of food for an appetizer dish and it tasted amazing. I would order this again. For the entree I had this Pad See Ew noodle dish over grilled duck. Since I was with a bachelor party, I got to sample many noodle dishes with mine probably being the most popular. If you love duck & you love Pad See Ew, this is a MUST try! There are other duck dishes w noodles, but the Pad See Ew option was my favorite. \n\nService:\nWe had a group of 12 or so and it worked out great. Service was fantastic and tended to us well. Everything came out in a timely manner too. I'd def recommend doing reservations here because it's that serious. If not, you'll be waiting a long time to eat.\n\nOverall:\nOne of the best Thai places I've eaten at. Def would go back to try what I haven't yet, and to get another noodle dish. Prices are fair and the menu is HUGE! That was the only tough part for me since I'm so indecisive. However, being in a large group and sharing everything, it made it easier that night. Cab here from the strip isn't that pricey at all!", "This place is legit. The dishes are full of flavor and have the perfect blend of spices. Crispy rice and fried chicken dumplings were fantastic!", "This place is more like 1.5...slow service .....small portions..expensive...eh taste...whats not to like...haha...what blows me away is the throngs of people who come here and actually wait online outside before they open....and whats with those weird ass hours...This place reminds me of langers neighborhood in los angeles...better come with a shotgun to ward off the baseheads and 5 dollar hookers as you pull into the shopping center.....but if you want to go to a swingers club or a tranny bar your in luck there across the parking lot ...woo hoo !", "This place is over hyped.  Every dish we ordered had barely anything on the plate. Lotus of siam, you disappoint me.", "This was my second visit and I was just as pleased as the first.  We found Lotus of Siam via a new acquaintance last time we were in Vegas.  We were unable to get a reservation (the history on my phone shows 27 attempted calls, all of which received a busy signal), so we showed up at 5:20 on a Friday night.  They open at 5:30, and we were not the first in line.  We walked in right after the door opened, got a great table, and enjoyed a fabulous meal and glass of wine.  \n\nI am gluten-free, and have been pleased that they will accommodate different preparations of certain dishes to meet that dietary need.  \n\nTheir wine list is impressive, and not ridiculously overpriced.\n\nWhen we left a little after 6:30 every table was full, the vestibule was packed, and several diners were waiting outside (yes, in the skeezy strip mall).  The moral of the story is that this place is worth the stop, even at what many would consider the \"Senior\" dining hour.", "This was my third visit here (first was tourist then second and thrid as a local) and I was not impressed with the food at all.  This place is overrated!  It is understandable for tourists whom donot know any better and always wanted to try places with longer line or impossible to get reservation.  But for local folks, there are better Thai food in Vegas.  My YUM WOON SEN SEAFOOD salad was salty and sour.   The same salty and sour taste was presented in PLAR DOOK O-CHA (Whole Fried Catfish).  The golden fried tofu was soggy, cold, and over price ($7.95).  My friend ordered the Tom Yum Kai soup and he said it tasted nothing but spicy hot.  My other friend got the Pad Se-ew and she was disappointed.  She is a local and said it tasted better several years ago.  She told us to try different places next time we come to Vegas and don't come back again.  My friends got wine and they said it was OK.  We skipped desert (fried banana) because there was no point after the soggy fried tofu.", "Very delicious. Great flavor. Their medium spicy was indeed medium. Recommend the green curry :)", "We made the mistake of trying this restaurant without a reservation the first time and were told that it was going to be a 2 hour wait.  Oops!  We turned away and went to Border Grill instead, and made a reservation for 2 nights later.  I definitely agree with the reviews that mention the sketchy parking lot - divey area, surrounded by questionable businesses and we were accosted by several homeless people in the parking lot asking if they could wash the windshields on our car.\nThe menu is huge with tons of variety!  Several of the people in our party were very concerned while looking at the menu because so many of the dishes are listed with chicken, beef, or seafood, but like so many Thai restaurants, almost anything on the menu can be made vegetarian.\nMy friend and I shared the spicy beef salad, the roast duck curry, and the northern larb.  She raved over the curry, we both enjoyed the salad (although definitely the least interesting of our dishes), but my standout favorite was the northern larb.  Perfectly spiced, really interesting flavors, and something that is pretty unique.\nPrices were reasonable, service was good.  Food was delicious.  I definitely recommend reservations.", "We ordered the crispy duck Panang curry and my oh my!!!!!! My tastebuds exploded into millions of joyful happiness! \n\nTasty, crispy duck. Juicy as well. definitely true to the Thai Panang curry flavor. The serving however is a tad small. We licked the plate clean. Screw the stares! Lol.", "We wanted to come here because whenever we asked local people they said this place is must. When we arrived on after lunch time there were still line ahead of us and waited 30 minutes. It was huge restaurant with full of people and we tried famous dish from yelp review and very disappointed. Either too salty and too fried. Every dish has same sauce. We orderd 6 dishes and everything was same. Meh. \nSimply Not Good.", "We were recommended to this place by a couple the next before.  The restaurant opens at 5.30pm for dinner.  We got to the restaurant at around 5pm and there was already a line outside.  \n\nWe ordered the stuffed chicken wings for appetizer,  chicken larb for salad, and drunken noodles with soft crab shell and dry pork curry noodles for entrees.  One word - Delicious! Delicious! Okay, I lied, 2 words.  Now I understood why the wait to get in.  \n\nThe place is clean and spacious, and the servers were really friendly.", "What can I possibly say about one of the most memorable meals I have ever had. This place is in the top three of best restaurant meals that I have ever had. We started with crispy rice that was so well balanced I am almost afraid to go home and cook again because I know I will never get to this kind of balanced flavor in any meal. For dinner we shared pad thai, short rib panang curry, and crispy garlic prawns. Everything that we had was better than the last. On a whim before we left we ordered some sticky rice that made the meal even better when I really thought that was not possible. I have dined at joel rubichon, Estatiario Milos, Nobu, and the list goes on of Vegas spots you cannot miss that I have not missed. This one topped them all, and for a bill of under 100 for three including drinks and dessert. I cannot wait to come back!", "While being on the road to Vegas for a grueling ten hours, my cousins and I were very famished. I wanted a buffet, but majority ruled on getting something off the strip. Then my cousin suggested eating at one of his MUST EAT AT restaurants in Vegas, Lotus of Siam!\n\nWe just got to the restaurant just in time before closing for dinner service. The hostess sat us quickly and hand us our menus. I wanted to try some of their popular menu items, but I had to hold back on them. Since it was the season of Lent, I had to avoid beef, pork, and fowl foods. Being in the city of sin, I decided to be good on a Friday. It was a hard decision for me, but I went with the pad see-ew.\n\nOur entrees were served withing a couple minutes. The pad see-ew was composed of stir-fried wide rice noodles, eggs, and Chinese broccoli all mixed with black soy sauce. Although the pad see-ew had egg in it, it was one item that I could have while observing Lent. The noodles were nice and chewy. The Chinese broccoli was crispy and fresh. The egg was in the scrambled form, but added the protein element to the dish. To complete the melody of the dish, the black soy sauce gave the right amount of saltiness. Just like one of my favorite dishes, Chow fun, I really did enjoy this dish.\n\nI do need to come back again and try the other popular dishes when in Vegas and not observing Lent.", "Worst Thai food and very rude staff.\n\nThis place blows after wait of 40 min just to be seated my expectations were very high. However, the servers are rude and take for ever to even bring out food and the price of the food does not meet the quality of the food... High prices for nasty take out food. Don't waist your time or your money. Their are several places do eat out rather than this place.", "Wow! I don't know how anyone in our group found this place or heard about it, but after spending so much time on The Strip, a trip off the beaten path ($15 to $20 cab ride - and the cabbie knew the name of the restaurant, didn't need the address or anything) was very welcomed. Went on a Sunday night with a group of 4....so not a super big group or a super busy night, but we had to wait 45 minutes for a table. Always a good sign.\n\nOur waiter was super helpful and always had an immediate opinion when we asked for help deciding between 2 dishes, 2 wines, etc. Highly recommend appetizer #14 (the crunchy rice), any of the fried catfish sides/dishes, and the sea bass with drunken noodles. Best green curry I've ever had, and this is my litmus test at any new Thai restaurant I visit. Spice/heat is totally customized on a scale of 1 to 10. Our group ranged from 6.5 to 9.5.....definitely felt it, but sooooo yummy!\n\n\"Normal\" prices and generous servings....we were all heartbroken we didn't have a fridge for our leftovers and couldn't take them with us. Will definitely go again on a future trip.", "Wow, I was really disappointed. In my opinion this place is very overrated. I've had much better in Seattle, California and Ithaca (believe it or not). \n\nI asked for recommendations, and the waiter recommended drunken noodles, and duck panang curry. I was a little disappointed because the dishes sounded ordinary, and I felt like he may have assumed we were not adventurous by our appearances. I may go back and order dishes off the northern menu, or make it clear I'm adventurous. \n\nAnyway, off of recommendations online and from the waiter we got the garlic prawns, crispy rice, and duck with masaman curry. \n\nThe crispy rice really didn't appeal to me. It tasted overwhelmingly of ginger and even had large strips of ginger in it. A little ginger goes a long way! It also had too much lemon grass. Eating it made my mouth fatigued and overwhelmed and not in a pleasant way at all. The sausage was really not good. The flavors just weren't balanced and the texture of the rice was good but not great. The pig skins in there were very good - I wish there had been more. \n\nThe garlic prawns were really not good either. the shrimp meat was overcooked, but my main complaint was the flavor. The fried shrimp shells were very interesting and the texture was pleasing, but there was just no flavor in the dish at all besides black pepper and an oily fried food taste. Some kind of dipping sauce would have been ideal, but proper seasoning might have been enough to make it good. I kept dipping it in the red curry that came with but I would've preferred something acidic or sweet. Really ANYTHING to balance out the oily taste. It was served over slaw, but that was not dressed either - it was just there to catch the excess oil. \n\nThe duck dish was very good. The duck was excellent, but I don't think it paired that well with masaman curry. I would order this again with a different sauce. It was silly of me to order the curry because, c'mon, you can get that kind of curry anwhere! But the curry tasted good. It didn't blow my mind, and I would've preferred if it wasn't broken. Overall, very disappointing. It wasn't worth the stomach ache of three deep fried dished, that's for sure! \n\nAlso, yes it's easy to get a taxi there but how do you get back?? I had to wait an hour for a taxi to come get us after the meal and they had no idea where it was and couldn't find the restaurant.", "Wow, this place is very very hyped up.\nIn my opinion kind of overrated.\n\nThey have pretty yummy soups. \nThey are always super packed so they take FOREVER!\n\nI think the food is good, but honestly I had better.\nThe menu is a freaking encyclopedia, so maybe I just haven't ordered the right thing?\n\nIt is a local fave, so maybe it's worth giving it another chance.", "Yeah, well once you get over the fact that\nYou're in a beat down shopping mall in a beat down part of town, you enter a nice clean restaurant hopping with natives and tourists alike. The staff is excellent- they are very busy, so respect that, but they enjoy the small talk and are helpful and quick. \nI look for vegey dishes, so it's a bit limiting, but I've been here several times and have always enjoyed my food. It's actually quite good, just wish the portions were larger. Price is extremely fair.", "Yuuuuuum, this place is great! I came here during a weekday so there was no wait, but still a lot of patrons! So be careful if you're going to come here during the weekend. By the way, don't let the outside fool you. It's pretty big inside!\n\nThe food here is so flavorful! The service is uhhhhmazing and if you're Asian, you know it's rare you get good service at Asian restaurants. We started off with the tom yum soup, level 6 spicy. The spice level would definitely go up next time. It has just the right hint of hot and sour. Next we got the pad thai which totally blew me away. Pad thai is something I always need to get at a Thai restaurant to compare and this dish surprised me with how good it tasted. The papaya salad was good, but nothing really special. Garlic prawns were huge and crispy and I could taste the slightest hint of garlic! I hate it when food items claim they have garlic in it but you can't taste it for shit. Next we got the drunken noodles w/ soft shell crabs. MMMMMM, so gooood! Crabs was good and drunken noodles had the right amount of flavors. Last, we went with the mango sticky rice. The rice could be sweeter in my opinion but overall, not bad.\n\nI love this place and would continue to come back when I'm in Vegas. Until then, I'll be dreaming about it.", "\"Most Important Restaurants of 2013\"!  Good food, decent price, and friendly service.", "best Thai food I've ever had in my whole life!!!!!\n\nmy bf and I went here during our spring break trip to Vegas. he heard of this restaurant from a Foodie friend and really wanna take me here. I was not very impressed during our first visit as the restaurant is located in a shady, shady, shady neighborhood. we arrived there at 3pm that afternoon only to find that the restaurant only open for lunch 11ish to 2:30 and dinner starting from 5:30pm. so at that moment I felt somewhat relieved.\n\nthe next day we were looking for places to have a quick dinner before heading to the airport. as I was curious how this restaurant was able to deserve such a good review on Yelp, I proposed we try this place! we arrived exactly at 5:30, hoping to get in immediately when it opens. and guess what? there was already a very long waiting line in front of the restaurant! definitely a good sign! \n\nas soon as we were able to get into the restaurant, a waiter comes to us with a charming smile asking if we had a reservation or not. (so apparently they take reservations and can be overly booked) we expressed our need to catch a flight and the waiter was very kind in finding a seat for us as quickly as possible. when we sat down and started to checking out the interior of the restaurant, we realized where the  owner have spent all her money. the interior decoration looks like a fancy, high-class dining room with chandeliers, hard wood tables and chairs, mirror-like clean floors and a huge wine collection!\n\nit's quite unfortunate we were not able to try the wine due to time constraints and we only had one dish as neither me nor my bf was hungry. we tried the crisp duck curry  as recommended and it turns out to be really really great! the duck was crispy outside, juicy inside and when the curry swims in your mouth, you would want to bite your tongue off! I also ordered a Thai ice tea and it doesn't fail to surprise me either!\n\nbtw, the waiter is very tentative and knows what dish to get!\n\nwell, enough has been said. this is a must try in Vegas!", "the best Thai food I have ever eaten! Omg!!! This place is a must try if you're in Vegas.\n\nFood- between my husband and I, we ordered five dishes and we cleaned the plates because it was so delicious. We ordered Nua yum katiem (marinated beef), drunken seafood noodles, crispy duck with curry sauce, papaya salad, and sticky rice with mango. Each dish were so flavorful. The only dish I probably wouldn't order again is the Nua yum katiem. It was the only dish that I felt like there wasnt a party in my mouth. Don't get me wrong, it was still very yummy. I wouldn't order it again only because they have such an extensive menu and I'd like to try new dishes.\n\nService- attentive and helpful. I had a very bad experience at a Thai restaurant due to their spice level. If you're from LA, you've probably heard of Jitlada. I ordered a dish and they never asked for the spice level or neither bothered to explain how spicy the dish was. It was to the point my head started hurting and I couldn't eat anything afterward. Well unlike Jitlada, this restaurant explain the spicy level and what was appropriate for each dish.\n\nFYI- wait is always long. It's about an hour wait.", "their khao soi (sp?) dish is awesome! great thai restaurant if you want to eat something off the strip. definitely recommend trying other things besides your typical thai food (pad thai, pad se ew, etc).", "very good thai food for the vegas area.  been here twice, and will come back again when visiting.", "~$12 per person for the lunch buffet. This place is a little off the strip, and it is definitely worth it. The place does not face the main street, so you have to turn into a parking lot before you will see it. It is not the best Thai food, but it is a great deal for a good variety of food. The Thai tea was great. This is a place to go if you have been to the strip previously and want a cheap, filling meal."]
[2014, "season2"]	["04/10/2014:\n\nThis place is a must for Thai food lovers visiting Vegas. It is a bit off the strip, but, worth the drive. And you'll likely have to wait a while unless you were lucky to get through ahead of time to make a reservation. The cab drivers will also vouch for the popularity and demand of this place. \n\nWe had the usual Pad Thai and Papaya Salad for appetizers. The grilled shrimp, green, red, and yellow curries are all good. The squid salad is excellent. The basil and garlic eggplant dish is excellent. You can substitute green beans if you're not a fan of eggplant. If you like your food spicy and your guests do not, make sure to ask for the fish sauce and fresh Thai bird chillies. That gives it a nice kick. Just be careful, it can make a grown man cry. One if our guests tried some and had tears run down his face as he grabbed for the Chang beer. \n\nChang beer is the best pairing for Thai food - IMHO. They have a huge wine cellar and it sure looks impressive behind the glass room. However, I just can't seem to muster up the taste buds to pair this amazing Thai food with wine. \n\nI have been to this restaurant several times before. Finally making the time to recognize this place for the fine food it produces. I've turned a few business clients on to this place. They are hooked too. Always a must for me when in Vegas. Some reviewers describe this place as the best Thai food in the US, it's hard to argue with them.", "About half the menu here is legitimately some of the best Thai available in the US, but that being said, there are some holes/disappointments in the menu here.\n\nFirst: avoid the soups, especially to go, but even fresh, I think both the Tom Yum and Tom Kha Ga were pretty disappointing.  Second, there's nothing particularly wrong with eating Phad Thai or other basic noodle dishes, even if I skip them in general, but it's a huge error here, there are so many things on the menu you cannot find elsewhere, you are really missing out.\n\nHighlights:\n\nLarb, sour crispy rice, drunken noodles (found the sea bass to be over cooked and disappointing, the rest of the proteins I've tried with it have been fine), panang curry (GET THE SHORT RIB), thai beef salad, pork blood soup.  \n\nKeep in mind they have a pretty high heat tolerance, if you order something as a 5 on their 1-10 scale you will have quite a bit of heat, and I don't see a 10 as being enjoyable by any rational person including people who self-profess to never be able to get food hot enough.  I love spicy in general and wouldn't order anything much higher than a 6 or 7 here with the possible exception of the beef salad where the crisp vegetables compliment the heat very nicely.", "Absolutely love this place. The food is amazing! The pad thai is to die for. Service is good. There's always a lot of people waiting but it is definitely worth the wait. I'm so glad I found this place.. It's become a tradition to eat here whenever I have friends in town.", "Add another rating of outstanding to the pile.  \n\nWe've eaten Thai in the depths of Thai Town in Hollywood and some really great places in Long Beach, and this--I have to say--exceeded in quality and authenticity.  \n\nThree and a half days on the Vegas Strip, we ate at Lotus twice.  Yum.  \n\nA note on comparison to SEA (another of our reviews):  Lotus is better, if you will take the short drive to it (and look beyond the scary strip mall it's in).  SEA is good, and has other non-Thai dishes.  Given a choice, Lotus wins easily.", "After hearing raves about this place from Food Network shows, I had to stop by during my Vegas visit. \n\nWe ordered the Crispy Duck Panang, Nam Prik Ong and Combination Fried Rice. The portions aren't as huge as you're probably used to from other Thai places, but that was enough to fill two people up. \n\nThe Crispy Duck Panang was the clear highlight of the meal -- tender duck, crisp skin, spicy & creamy panang sauce. On their 1-10 spicy level, we got a 6 and it had a perfect amount of spice to it. Definitely don't discard the basil garnish -- mix it in with the sauce, eat it with your rice. Yum! It comes with a small pot of sticky rice, so you don't really need to order extra rice, but I'm a fan of Thai fried rice, so we got the combination too.\n\nThe Combination Fried Rice was good -- not any better than other Thai fried rices I've had. The chicken wasn't particularly moist or tender, and it only came with 2 shrimps. I would probably stick to just beef fried rice or shrimp fried rice, since the chicken didn't really add anything to the dish.\n\nThe Nam Prik Ong was what I really came here for -- I'd heard Ming Tsai raving about it on Food Network's Best Thing I Ever Ate -- and honestly, I was underwhelmed. Not sure if they were just having an off-batch, but it wasn't as complex or flavorful as I expected it to be. I was expecting it to be spicy, with earthy flavors, herbacious Thai basil & cilantro, maybe some lime for acidity. It had a bit of heat to it, but it was pretty one-note. It reminded me more of a tomato-based chili than anything. \n\nAll in all, I can see why people flock to this place. The menu is really huge and the prices aren't too bad (considering you're in Vegas).\n\nThe strip mall it's located in is honestly really sad and run-down looking, but once you're inside, the ambiance isn't bad.", "Always a great meal.  Probably the best Thai in Las Vegas. It's off the beaten path but worth the cab ride to get there if you are staying on the strip.", "Always delicious! Fresh food, great service, great menu!", "Always make reservations 1 week in advance!!!", "Are we even talking about this?!?! This place blows my mind every time. Those garlic prawns are a steal at twice the price. \n\nFor a truly incomparable experience come here for dinner.", "BEST THAI FOOD I'VE HAD!\n\nI have eaten here twice and the food is so good. This is now a permenant stop every time I come to vegas. \n\nThe menu is huge, I wish I could have tried more. I love that I can pick my heat level. \n\n- Yellow Beef Curry with Rice - The beef and veggies are nothing special but that curry is so clean and delicious it can make anything taste good. I got heat level 8 which was perfect.\n- Drunken Beef Noodles - Very tasty and flavorful noodles. Not greasy. Wife got heat level 5, we both said it needed more heat to make it perfect.\n\nThe plaza it is in, is very empty and sketch looking. But theres plenty of parking.\n\nCame at 5:45 pm, line was already out the door. They opne at 6! By the time we sat at 6:15 pm, there was a 2 hours wait. Make a reservation if you can or come early!\\\n\nAlso, Komol, down the plaza is a great thai alternativeif you are pressed for time and there is a long wait.", "Bad experience at Lotus of Siam. Food not taste that good. Food come out at room temperature more on the side of getting cold. Service was ok. This is my second time. First time was 4 years ago and it was ok. Anyway so disappointed!!!", "Before heading to Vegas I did a little research and I was a little overwhelmed with all of the big name chefs with restaurants in casinos. I definitely hit a couple of them and they were good but I am always one to seek out the spots off the beaten track. No matter where I did my research the one restaurant that kept coming up was Lotus of Siam. Some reviews have called it the best Thai restaurant in America. I've been to Thailand and I love Thai food so needless to say I was excited. When I called to make reservations I was told that they could only be made one day in advance. So we ended up going somewhere else but made a reservation for the following day. When we got there I was already excited. It's in a run of the mill strip mall and there was already a line out the door. We got there 20 minutes early and still had to wait 25 minutes after our original reservation time. However, this did not bother us because we were told to go to the bar and have a drink. When we finally got seated I was a little overwhelmed with all of the options. That being said as long as you make clear to your server what you like and don't like they will make sure to find something for you.  There were a couple of dishes that I tried that you would be insane not to. My top three favorites were the green papaya salad, the spicy drunken noodles with sea bass and crispy duck with pa nang curry. Every dish was perfectly balanced, very fresh ingredients, spice level was right on and the flavor was undeniably delicious.  I have not eaten at Pok Pok or some of the other famous Thai restaurants around the country but this is officially my favorite. If you're stopping in Vegas I feel like this is truly a must.\n\nwww.612food.com", "Believe the hype.  This is the best Thai food you're ever going to eat.  You're also going to think you're on your way to a drug deal when you near the restaurant (the area is a bit shady).  It's located in a somewhat questionable strip mall... and doesn't look like much from the outside, but have faith, brothers and sisters.  Lotus of Siam is the kind of foodie heaven we all dream about.  Can I get an amen?  Hallelujah.\n\nI went with a large group.  Half hour wait.  The place was packed... and for good reason. \"How different can it be?\", you ask.  \"It's Thai food.\"  First... wash your mouth out with soap and we can have an adult discussion.  Let me know when you're ready.  I can wait.\n\nOk... we good?\n\nI tried a lot (and it was all delicious), but no matter what you get... order this:\n\nPad Thai - 5/5\nGarlic Prawns - 5/5   \n\nGo.  Thou shalt be converted.", "Best Thai I've ever had.  Food and service was exceptional.  Upscale atmosphere with reasonable prices on food and wine.  \n\nFood +\nService +\nValue + (for amazing food)\nAtmosphere +", "Best Thai food EVER! Great service, beyond delectable food at affordable prices. Service was impeccable, even though the place was packed! I would highly recommend Lotus of Siam when in Vegas.\n\nWe ordered several dishes, and shared amongst ourselves. The curries (red and green) were silky and smooth, the chili dip was amazing as an appetizer, and the dessert - fried bananas, sticky rice with mango, and coconut ice cream - topped off our delicious culinary experience here. Hats off to the hard-working staff here. They are amazing! Thank you all for a wonderful evening!", "Best Thai food in the US? Well, I don't know about that but the menu and food is quite impressive. It probably was the best Thai menu I\"ve seen. I had the Thai spaghetti and it was awesome! I wish I could of tried so many other items. The place from the road, looks boarded up and closed. It seems and looks like a Dump! But make no mistake, his place seems to have a huge following and their service is TOP Notch too. I'd go back in a heartbeat.", "Best Thai food outside of Thailand. My go to dishes are crispy duck with Thai basil, garlic prawns, pork larb salad, and the House special catfish. Try to come for lunch, or right when they open or before they close, because peak time will be over an hour wait.", "Best Thai food we have ever eaten!\nThe sausage itself, encompasses all the flavors of this magnificent country.", "Blown away.  Seriously.  If you're looking for some sort of haute cuisine experience, you should probably look somewhere else, but if you want as-good-as-it-gets Thai, this is the place.  Don't be put off by the seedy exterior, get in line at about 5:15 p.m. and enjoy. \n\nThanks Mr. Belushi for the recommend!", "Came here because of Anthony Bourdain!\n\nWe were thrown off at first by the location and how sketchy it is, but don't feat!! This place is one of the best Thai restaurants I've been to. I'm VERY picky with my Thai food(you can blame my Thai mama) so that's a lot coming from me. I went with my family and ordered musaman curry, yum neau(beef salad), chicken sautee, fish cakes, sticky rice, and a dish that's like Thai salsa, etc. You gotta believe me that we were not disappointed at all. My mom was very happy to see that they added in Northern Thai dishes, because most Thai restaurants don't! I laugh at everyone who goes to this restaurant and orders pad thai, there's so much more deliciousness than pad thai!! Service was super slow and they barely came by to check up on us. We waited for our food for 30 minutes, but it was all worth it. The ambiance is very nice. I will recommend this restaurant to all my friends that will be heading to Las Vegas in the future!\n\nIf you want something similar in San Francisco, go to Osha Thai Restaurant.", "Came here with a co-worker on a Tuesday night.  We tried to make a reservation but they were full, so we decided to an and wait for a table.  We were told it would be a 45-1hr wait, so we popped next door to grab a rink while we waited.\n\nMan, so glad we waited. The food was incredible! We had the chicken dumplings, pad see ew, massaman curry and the veggie fried rice. Everything we had was fresh and delicious. if you like Thai food this is a must while in Vegas.  In terms of location, it's a bit off the strip, a 7 min cab ride, and there is not much around it. The restaurant itself is very casual, and most of the clientele is Thai- that's how you know it's authentic.\n\nOverall it was a great experience. The only thing is that they only serve beer and wine, and I would have loved a cocktail, but it didn't take away from the experience at all.", "Came to this place ready to be impressed after all of the hype. Maybe it was the high expectations but we were not too impressed. Great wine list but the food wasn't too impressive. Had the yellow and coconut/tomatoe/duck curry. Food was fine but did not live up to expectations. Veggies in the curry were raw.", "Delicious........ This's Thai food, taste same in Thailand, by Thai girl.  \nI love lotus of Siam.", "Did I miss something? Food was fine, nothing special. I heard about this place last spring during a trip to vegas and have been eager to try it ever since. Yesterday was finally the day and I was sadly disappointed. I'm not sure if I inflated my expectations to Hugh or what. I ordered the chicken green curry since its my favorite thai dish and the fried rice sausage app as recommended by the where as a specialty. So excited to have my taste buds blown away, I sat eating with sheet boredom. The app was just crunchy and sour tasting and the curry was runny/watery not creamy and the spice didn't kick in until I bit a pepper. \nPerhaps I didn't try the right thing but my thinking was everything should have been very good. Oh well.", "Excellent food.  Really helpful staff in explaining the different dishes.   The most amazing Thai food menu I have ever seen.  Also great wine cellar.", "Excellent thai food in a out of the way strip mall. Its not cheap (it's also not as pricing as the restaurants on the strip) but its worth the money. The laab was killer. The drunken noodles with seabass delicious and the Singa's icy cold. Loved it!", "Fantastic Food. Service can be hit or miss depending on your server but I would wait hours to eat the food here. Can't give you one recommendation because everything on the menu is fantastic.  Plan ahead to make your reservations as they book up quickly.  Last time I visited, Anthony Bourdain was filming here and Rocky Patel was dining here with a group from Cigar Aficionado. This place is officially no longer a secret as it was when I first visited shortly after the current owners took over in '99. Bring your appetite and prepare to be treated to a Thai delight.", "Fantastic; well worth the trip away from the strip. I live in LA and eat Thai food almost weekly, and Lotus of Siam is better than anything else I've had in the US.", "Favorite thai.", "First off. I came on a sunday around 7, alone. There was a wait for me of 30 mins. I didnt care because i wanted thai and didnt feel like waiting for another cab and taking it back to the strip. So i sat at the bar and enjoyed a singah until my name was called.\nI like to judge Thai restaurants solely based off the peanut sauce when I order chicken satay. If I want to take a whole jar home, sit in front of the tv with a spoon and eat it, I know their food will be just as good. This place isn't an exception. It was right up on my \"most favorite peanut sauce\" list (yes, I have a list of good peanut sauce restaurants, don't judge me). \nI ordered the chicken stay for an appetizer and na num tok or something...it was beef and beef makes me happy when I eat it. \nI wasn't expecting a crap load of thai basil and cilantro (which I don't care for) being on the plate when presented.  I managed to eat it and still enjoyed it with the exception of the couple cilantro bites I got. Probably wont order it again, but I will deffinetly be back here my next vegas trip. Huge menu and lots of things to try!!", "Garlic prawns and crispy duck curry are the best. I could eat this everyday. \n\nThe place was so packed when we went for dinner Friday night. Our reservation was for 7:30 and yea, full house.  Great service and tasty food.", "Great Thai food.  Amazing wine list.  Do not let the strip mall scare you.  Food is awesome.", "Great thai place! The wait wasnt too bad. The location is not as shady as some people might think as this is a mom&pop looking place. \n\nI loved the extensive wine list. Try the auslese if you like sweet wine that is not necessarily dessert wine. \n\nThe best panang curry ive had yet. Portion sizes were good, not too small for price and not too much where youd have to take home. \n\nOur server wasnt the greatest though. Was not attentive at all. He took forever on everything and i had to wave my hand to get his attention. There were times when he wasnt to be found and others had to pick up his slack.", "Had to try this out, and didn't regret it, not at all.   Skeezy neighborhood, but plenty of traffic to this restaurant, so it's not an issue.  Got there a bit after 5:30 and hardly had to wait at all; by 6, though, the line was well out the door.  Had a crispy rice appetizer with sour sausage, a creamy and spicy Bangkok soup with chicken, and a Northern Thai red curry with catfish, loaded with vegetables.  All very tasty!  Also, they have a great sake selection (tip from the taxi driver).  Was checking it out by my lonesome, yet the staff was friendly and helpful.  As far as I am concerned it lived up to the reputation and I'm very glad I had the experience.", "Hands down the best Thai food in Vegas. Nothing even comes close. The Nam Kao Tod (crispy fried rice) is a MUST ORDER. I consistently love the papaya salad. The curries are all fantastic. Even the basics here are amazing. I love to come in for the pad Thai and pad see ewe. \n\nBe careful though, the spice level is pretty high here. Order the spice level significantly below where you would typically order. They are hot.", "Hmmm a bit pricey but totally worth it. The place was packed did not expect the place to be that great. The Garlic shrimp was really tasty deep fried topped with garlic sauce I think it  was fried at a high temp the prawns  became cracklings you can eat the whole shrimp. Combination fried rice was different from Archi's a bit more salty not so sweet. \n\nThe northern Dish we tried however which is the eggplant with minced pork had a totally different flavor profile from the other thai resto's we tried locally in Vegas.  The dessert with mango and sticky rice had a unique flavor coconut milk with a tinge of chamomile or lavender were still discussing what they added which was a total surprise. \n\nThe whole Dining experience was really good. We will definitely come back for the other northern dishes and Chefs special on special occasion which is coming soon. For Vegas PEEPS as well as Visitors out of the country and out of STATE definitely a must try!!!", "Holy crap, that was a meal. The nam kao tod alone is worth five stars. Super crispy rice, but also super tangy. I had the soft shell crab over drunken noodles, it was good but not life-changing. My mother-in-law had the mussel fried omelette, crispy and amazing. My wife had the Thai spaghetti, it was fine. My father-in-law had a beef dish over noodles that was amazingly tender and also tasty. Mango and sticky rice dessert was ok. We ate everything.\n\nThe location is abominable, though rather than wait for a cab, we took the very crappy 20-minute walk back to Las Vegas Blvd. Man, Vegas needs Uber badly. Definitely still worth the visit, and I did derive pleasure from exactly how phenomenally crappy the external surroundings were.", "I  come here any chance I can when I am in Vegas!!!!\nYou are supposed to get mostly northern Thai food but it is soooo spicy!\n\nEverything is YUM  \n\nWait can get REALLY long at peak hours.  \n\nAgain so good but it is very spicy.  \n\nGreat for groups and they even have a sommelier.", "I am new to Thai food and I love it so much!!! Great food and great prices. Never had a bad experience.", "I ate here a week ago and I have thought about the Nam Kao Tod every single day since dining here. Take me back.", "I came here on a Friday night at 9:30pm with a party of five!  The menu is immense but we did some research before hand so knew what we would be ordering ahead of time.  We had reservations and were seated right away!\n\nTom kah Kai - (3.5 stars)  broth was amazing!  The lime accent was perfect and the coconut was not too overwhelming.  The chicken however did taste old.  If the chicken was more fresh and tender this dish would be a five!  Maybe it was an end of the night issue.. chicken sitting for to long in the back in the pot.\nSea bass drunken noodles - (4.5 stars) the Seanad was super tender and the light breaking was perfect.  The drunken noodles were delicious and the combination was supreme. \nCrispy duck in panang curry- (5 stars!) It had a nice crispy exterior and the meat was tender but not at all fatty. The panang curry sauce was a great compliment to the duck. We finished off the sauce by putting it on everything we could find at the table! \nGarlic prawns - (4 stars) my first prawn was very good with a very nice garlic sauce.  However my second shrimp was very fishy.  So much so that I could not get the taste out of my mouth.  Everyone else that had one said theirs were great so not sure what happened with that one:-(\nNam prik ong - (3 stars) we were super excited to try this as we saw it featured as one of Ming Tsai'd favorites. While it was tasty, the after taste really reminded us of ground beef. Also it comes with a number of veggies for dipping which wasn't as tasty as the pork rinds that also came with the dish. \nKhao soi braised Short rib - (4.5 stars) meat was tender but the real star was the sauce and noodles.  Yummy!\nThai iced tea - (4 stars) very good typical thai ice tea\nFried banana - (3 stars)  ok, not great.  Would not order this again.\nMango and sticky rice - (4 stars) we asked for two orders and they brought them out on one plate.  The mango was delicious but not enough sticky rice\n\nWe were a party of five and they added gratuities on our bill which I found off.\n\nService was ok but not great.  Bus boy was  much more attentive then our waitress.\n\nWe will definitively return!  Our bill ended up being around $40 pp including beers and tip!", "I came here with a large group of my employees and we had an outstanding time. We were able to have a fantastic array of items and each person walked away spending a little less than $35 with tax and tip included. \n\nThere was this one prawn dish with a spicy chili verde-like sauce on top (picture included). It was unreal delicious. Unreal. \n\nMy one gripe is that the start of service was really slow and that's after we waited almost an hour to be seated.", "I don't have too many great things to say about my last girlfriend except that she introduced me to Lotus of Siam. I had heard for several years that many food critics claim it has the best Thai food in America, and this place definitely lives up to the hype. \n\nI've been a Vegas resident for over a decade and dined at almost every high-end restaurant in town, but this is easily one of my favorite spots in the city. There are something like 130 or 140 menu items to choose from and the prices are incredibly reasonable -- especially considering how popular this place is. It's not remotely fancy inside and the location is in a dirty shopping center in a bad part of town, but the food is unbelievably exceptional. \n\nReservations are definitely recommended if you want to eat on a weekend evening at a preferable dining hour, but don't give up if you call ahead and the receptionist says they're booked. Simply walk in around 9-9:15 (they close at 10) and you probably won't wait for more than 20 minutes or so. Ask the receptionist and she'll tell you the same thing.\n\nAnd if you're looking for some cheap after-dinner entertainment, I suggest sitting in your car for a few minutes and checking out the people coming and going from \"The Green Door\" (the supposedly world famous swingers club inside the same shopping center). The people watching from the parking lot there is almost as great as the food at Lotus of Siam. Enjoy!", "I don't really see what the hype is all about. Yes, it's good but the way people rave about it. EH, I wouldn't wait hours on end to eat at this restaurant. When we called in today to see how long the wait would be or if we could make reservation, the girl said nothing was available till monday. WTH? We took our chance, walked in, and only waited 15 min. We ordered the Issan sausage, crispy duck w/mint, nam kao tod, and the tom kah kai. I felt like a lot of the food was overly salty, but maybe its just my taste pallet. Everything was okay, not super amazing.", "I give this place 3.5 stars. This place is way off the strip and you would probably want a car to get there. Taxi would be expensive I bet. We came here for lunch and arrived around noon and there was a line out the door. Some of the people were there for the lunch buffet and after looking at it, I didnt want to waste a meal on cheap fried stuff. The place is pretty big and we were seated with the sit down side and noticed that more people do that than buffet. Overall, the food is pretty authentic but too bad we werent able to explore more of the authentic dishes.\n\nGarlic prawns- These bad boys are quite expensive at $22 but they are fried and yummy. I couldnt help but eat the fried shell as well. They werent spicy and did have some flavor to it but I did have a tummy ache after all the fried stuff. I say if you are a fan of seafood, then go ahead and give it a try. Since I am not an avid fan of it, I could have easily passed on it and tried an entree but my yelper self had to try.\n\nNam Kao Tod- This is an appetizer that Yelp told me to get. I would not reorder this. It is fried crispy rice pieces that have a sour lemon taste to it. I do not particularly like the flavor and it is not something I would ever crave. I would pass.\n\nTofu pad see ew- Average and nothing special about it. I liked the veggies in it though.\n\nMango sticky rice+ coconut ice cream- These are sold separately but they put them on the same plate. This dish is always awesome and it tastes like the others I have tried. The sticky rice isnt that sweet which is nice because you have the mangoes and ice cream with it.\n\nOverall, it is a good Thai place in Vegas and I guess it is similar to Krung Thai in San Jose. Nothing crazy status but a good change than the regular buffet.", "I got food poisoning from here but the food was so good I'll still give it 2 stars.  It was tasty enough that I'd even consider going back again despite the painful and unpleasant 36 post-dinner hours.\n\nThe prices are super reasonable.  Even with the cost of a round trip cab ride you'll save money over eating dinner on the strip.  Also, when they say spicy they mean it.  It was perfect for me but some things were too much for my wife.  She can usually hang too.", "I have had so many people tell me about this place and finally convinced someone to go with me! There were so many options to choose from the menu seemed overwhelming at first - but the food was sooooo good! I will definitely be back for awesome Thai food since I played it safe by just ordering Pad Thai. Also was surprised at how big it was once I walked in - who knew? Totally a hidden gem in Vegas and deserving of all the exposure it's gotten in media and from my peers!", "I have to submit a warning to the true spicy - pan Asian food lovers, this does not offer the hyped experience. Italian wine, Chinese tea and sweet and sour chicken - really? Number 7 I use for new places delivered a # 2 weak punch. The duck was truly crispy- and jerky-like. Seafood drunken noodle had obviously frozen packaged mussel and squid - and large pieces of faux crab. Food was serviceable- but not special.", "I never post reviews on yelp. This place is worth it, came twice in 4 days. Amazing food, come early or late as it is always full. \n\nOrder the #14 (crispy rice) lime cilantro crispy delicious. \n\nOrder the crispy duck with panang, perfect.", "I still remember when this restaurant was called \"EPoys Restaurant\" and this Thai restaurant has much better and healthier food. I'll be coming back next time I'm on this side of town for sure. I recommend this restaurant to anybody that wants Thai food.", "I was in Vegas over the weekend and came to Lotus of Siam two days in a row. After seeing several articles, an Anthony Bourdain episodes, and a James Beard elect (2011) award- I could not wait to try it. \n\nSo I was lucky enough to go twice here over the course of the weekend. I went Saturday (5:30PM- opening time) & Sunday 6PM, both without reservations. At opening, you may see a massive line, but it moves fast and you get a seat almost right away. If you wait a half hour, the wait bumps up to 1 hour. So either get a reservation or go right when it opens. \n\nAfter coming here twice, I have to give Lotus of Siam all around compliments:\n\n1) The staff-  they are very friendly and amazingly fast.   If you are in a rush , you can go from seating to check in 30 min. But at the same time, if you are enjoying yourself and chatting, they do not rush you. \n\n2) The management's ethics- While I was waiting for a table on Sunday, about six 60+ year old customers (not sure which European country they hailed from) came in and seemed highly annoyed about an hour wait. Those of us patiently waiting (which included grandparents and children) watched as one man in the group pulled out a wad of cash,and tucked $40-60 dollars in his palm to bribe the staff for a table. This guy continued to haggle with the staff for about 10 minutes. But the staff continued to decline his bribe and did not let him skip ahead of anyone. They gained a huge amount of respect from me and the the other dinner's who saw these events play out.\n\n3) The food- Delicious and extremely well priced. Now I enjoy a really spicy meal and want to roll my eyes when people ask me \"are you SURE you want spicy...it's really spicy!\"  I usually like it as hot as it comes. But something made me feel like the food was going to be authentic here so I went \"medium spice.\" For me this was perfect, enough to tingle the lips and make the nose run a little, but not too much to make me chug a glass of milk. If you cannot handle spice, go well below medium.\n\nAppetizers I tried: \n-Golden Fried Tofu (like any other place, good but nothing unique)\n-Nam Kao Tod (Small dish but packed with spice and flavor, really loved this)\n\nDishes I tried: \n-Chili & Basil Seafood combo (delicious with rich basil flavor, good kick to it too)\n- Pad Se Ew (basic dish but well made)\n-Thum Ka Noon (Rich, spicy dish with jackfuit but not heavy at all, one of my favorites)\n- Kang Hung Lay (sweet and spicy pork curry, heavier dish but packed with flavor)\n\nDessert: \n-Mango and sticky Rice (basic dish but really fresh mango and rice was not dried, delicious!)\n\n\nThis place was great and will be a must on future Vegas trips!", "I was with the bf and two others visiting in Vegas for my birthday. When my friend told me we were going to eat here and then I saw it a few days later on Bourdain's show, I was pretty excited. \n\nI have to say, I wasn't as impressed as I thought I would be, or as my friends were. We ordered dishes that Anthony ordered and I thought they were just ok. Nothing impressed me as much as the garlic prawns, which we ordered a second helping of because they were so good. \n\nThe dishes from the show were from the Northern section of the menu. The Khao Soi with pork was pretty good and had pork with vegetables in a curry sauce with coconut milk and noodles. We also ordered the Nam Prik Ong, which is a pork and tomato mixture served with fresh veggies and pork rinds for dipping. That was quite tasty. \n\nI just thought, that many of the thai places I've eaten at in San Diego and LA, were better than this. Maybe this is considered really good for Las Vegas? \n\nYou could see a lot of people arriving in taxis and I even asked one of them if they had seen the show and they said yes. Bourdain has a LOT of influence on people, that's for sure. But this foodie was only mildly impressed.", "I'm partial to Anthony Bourdain. Fond of, even. I imagine him narrating my dishes in his poetic prose. Hearing he visited Lotus of Siam put the place in my head, and over I went with the family! It was a 40 minute wait for a table, but we were so very excited.\n\nThe menu is large. Too many choices. \"Quality over quantity,\" as it's said. I would have appreciated the server spending more time recommending traditional Northern Thai dishes, but perhaps I'll have to go when they can spare the attention. \n\nWe ordered quite a few dishes, but not one came out at a temperature that didn't lead you to believe it was sitting in front of a fan on a hot summer day.\n\nSpicy Chicken Wings\nIssan-style Beef Jerky\nTom Yum Kai\nSeared Scallops with Chili Basil Leaves\nDrunken Noodles with Soft Shell Crab\nGarlic Prawns\nBraised Short Rib with Panang\nCrispy Duck with Panang\n\nI don't like to request my dishes be brought back for any reason, but I find the taste of cold fried food incredibly off-putting. The prawns were the only dish I asked of. It would have felt exhausting to request every dish be reheated. And then there's the question of \"how?\" How are you warming my dish? In a microwave, or are you sparing a few precious minutes in a wok?\n\nBusiness is good for Lotus of Siam thanks to the celebrity visits. Maybe with some extra funds they'll invest in better warming lamps for their dishes, or teach their chefs/runners how to better coordinate the timing sending food out. There's so much potential; I know it and I want to believe it. For this reason I'll go back and try again.\n\n(In a perfect world of temperature-hot foods, I would definitely order the drunken noodles and garlic prawns again; everything else was uninspiring)", "I've been coming to this place since it opened.  Been to just about every thai place in town and I always come back to this place.  It's a local secret!!  If your a fan of Thai food, you have to check this place out.  The staff has always givin great service to me but I have been going here since I can remember.", "I've been here a few times. It's really pricy for a Thai restaurant but the food speaks for itself.\n\nThe dishes are really really good with the exception of their curries. I'm just not a fan of them. It doesn't pop out to me.\n\nThe menu highlights to me are the thai beef salad, crispy duck, deep fried catfish, braised short rib, and tom kha kai.\n\nI'll be going back a few more times as well.", "In a suspiciously run-down strip mall far from the glitz of the strip, Las Vegas natives are enjoying beautiful saki and wonderful Thai food at the bustling hidden gem of Lotus of Siam. \n\nOur table ordered several dishes to share. The standout was the red curry prepared with soft, delicious, house-made egg noodles (rather than rice). Also lovely was the spicy green papaya salad. \n\nAlthough we asked for a 'medium-hot' heat level, the food was very spicy -- leaving a couple of us with watering eyes as we crunched into abundant fresh chilies.\n\nThe prices for food and wine were much more reasonable than most other good (and not so good) meals one could experience in Vegas.", "It was just average.  I think I was expecting much more from seeing it on the Food Network.  We got the signature dishes but nothing to write home about.  I have to say, they did have the best Thai Tea I have had in a long time.  You could really taste the actual tea and not just a super sweet and creamy drink.  \nWe got there only 30 mins. after they opened and still had to wait 45 mins.  They do get your phone # so they can call you when your table is ready which I thought was really cool so we could go do something nearby.  \nAll in all it was decent.", "It's all about the garlic prawns! Cooked to perfection and very sizable :) for $21 it better be.\n\nAlso ordered the soft shell crab drunk noodle which was good but I've had better sauce on the noodles before but the soft shell crab tasted good and cooked well.\n\nOverall good dining experience.", "It's right off the strip and pretty easy to find. The shopping center is pretty dingy and run down but don't worry, you are in the right place.  Because most of the other shops are out of business,  there is plenty of parking. If you don't make a reservation, the wait can be pretty long. \n\nOn to the positive things about it, lol. Like it's known for, there are a ton of pictures of famous people that have been there that line walls - my family enjoyed them. Our waiter was really nice and patient, he had to come around a couple times before we had of order ready. For the amount of food we ordered, it came out very quickly. You can tell they don't take any short cut with the food here, you can taste the quality of the ingredients and the layers of flavors in each dish. My mom and aunts are very good cooks and have cooked some of the same dishes before and they're very comparable - meaning it's got the homemade taste and quality to it, because the cooks in my family go all of and don't skimp on anything just to save money. And lastly, the food was very reasonably priced. We had a large group but it didn't cost as much as I'd anticipated.", "It's so hard to rate a Thai restaurant a 5-star because there are so many everywhere and a lot of them taste the same, but in this case, I give Lotus of Siam in Las Vegas a 5-star! It is my benchmark for all Thai places that I visit... This restaurant is a MUST try if you live in, or visit Las Vegas.\n\nLet's go through my recommendations:\n\n1. Tom Yum Kai soup (5/5): The hot pot size feeds 5-6 and it's only $11.95. It's not overwhelmingly spicy, but it has a good kick. The lemon grass and straw mushrooms make the soup taste amazing!\n\n2. Crispy Duck with Panang  (5/5): I would actually rate this a 6 on a 5-point scale. This is my FAVORITE DISH at Lotus. The duck is so crispy with the curry on top of it. This dish is literally to die for.\n\n3. Garlic Prawns (5/5): This is on the Chefs Choice menu - these are deep fried prawns with the shells on them and they are saut\u00e9ed with garlic and pepper. Don't peel the shells! This is one of the most amazing dishes they have! Even though it's $21.95, it's very much worth the price. Get it!\n\n4. Khai Soi Braised Short Rib (5/5): This is also on the Chefs Choice menu - another one of my personal favorites. The braised short rib is so tender; you can cut it easily with a fork. It's served over thai egg noodle in curry sauce, served with sliced red onions, lime, and pickled vegetables. This dish is a little pricey too at $20.95, but worth every penny.\n\n5. Panang Curry with Chicken (4/5): The panang curry is really good here too. We rode it with chicken. It's only $11.95 for this dish, and it's a great traditional Thai dish to get with your meal.\n\n6. Drunken Noodle Seafood (4/5): The drunken noodle seafood is one of their top recommendations. These are pan fried flat rice noodles served with an assortment of different seafood (mussels, calamari rings, shrimp, etc.). It is only $12.95, but I must warn that this is a little bit on the spicy side, i.e. more than we expected.\n\n7. Pineapple Fried Rice (4/5): We ordered this to share with a larger group, and it was surprisingly really good. I normally don't order fried rice when I go to a Thai restaurant because I can make it at home, but this was really good. Only $9.95 too for a good-sized order of fried rice.\n\nYou can't go wrong with any of the options I've listed above. Of course, if there are just two of you going, you aren't going to order all 7 of the dishes (unless you are really hungry), but the top recommendations I have are the Crispy Duck Panang, the Garlic Prawns, and the Khai Soi Braised Short Rib. Not a whole lot of veggies in those options, but ehhhh, these are the best ones. Can't wait to get back to Vegas so I can pay a visit to Lotus of Siam again. The restaurant itself is not in the best of neighborhoods, and from the outside, it looks like it could be a really crappy place, but do not be fooled. Go inside and taste the amazing savory dishes that I miss so dearly. Ok seriously, go there NOW!", "Its very authentic, but I just cannot give it 5 stars, I have had better before.  I love an know my thai, love the service, love the wine, the drinks, the coconut ice cream with fried bananasa, the spicey northern style chicken noodle soup, the appetizer was my favorite, a larb like crispy rice dish with mint, lime, and the best little crunchy rices ever.   I give it a solid, 4, its really a 4.50 if I could cut it here, but its not 5 star yet.   The place is worth the trek to the most ghetto strip mall in Las Vegas Proper, I think it was built in the 50s, its crazy how much parking is in this lot for the number of shops, but its got some really good food in the strip mall.   The decor is classy and the glass wine cellar you can see from you seat with 1000+ bottles is pretty damn impressive.   4.5 Solid stars.   Get hungry , and go!  Spicey Thai with top line service!", "Just about everything is yummy here and the staff is attentive. \n\nBest dishes: \nGarlic prawns - super tasty and the shells are nicely seasoned and has a good crunch to it. \nTom yum koong - the soup was not hot enough but the flavors were there. Tangy and spicy. There was also plenty of shrimps. \n\nWe also had to meat salad, duck, drunken noodle, and basil fried rice. Everything was made well. \n\nTry to make a reservation when you're coming on a weekend night. This place gets packed! \n\nIf you're waiting for a table, check out the bar in the back.", "Just finished dinner. Heard about this place on Top Chef. It is totally worth it! We arrived an hour early for dinner. It would not look like it from the outside but this place is very nice, the service is very good, the atmosphere is so comfortable, and the food is exploding with flavor! We had what the waiter recommended was their most top rated dishes. He was spot on. The prawns were huge and cooked perfectly, crispy on the outside and so juicy inside. The soup had many levels of flavor but everything worked together. I could have a whole pot of Tom Kah Kai. The servers were so polite and quick. I can't wait to come back.", "Just like many others, I longed to visit Lotus of Siam after seeing Anthony Bourdain to there on his show. It seemed fortuitous because I saw the show one month before a planned visit to Vegas. After going there with three other foodies, we all agree that it's a must-stop while visiting Vegas! We went there for lunch, and the large restaurant was full within 30 minutes of opening.\n\nWe decided to order some of the dishes we saw in the show that were from the Northern section of the menu. The Khao Soi with pork was delicious and had very tender pork with vegetables in a curry sauce with coconut milk and noodles. We also tried the Nam Prik Ong, which is a pork and tomato mixture served with fresh veggies and pork rinds for dipping. It was much better than I expected! The star of the show, however, was the Garlic Prawns! This absolutely delicious dish consists of large shrimp that are deep fried with the shell and topped with a fantastic garlic sauce. It sounds unusual, but the shell is supposed to be eaten, and the way that it's prepared makes it almost like a shrimp chip. We liked the Garlic Prawns so much that we ordered a second dish! \n\nIt's true that Lotus of Siam is located far from the Vegas Strip in a remote area, but it's worth traveling to! It can take a while for cabs to come pick you up when called, so I suggest waiting to snag a cab that's dropping off someone instead. I'm already anticipating my return to this excellent restaurant the next time I'm in Vegas!", "Last week, I had the choice of any reasonable place in Las Vegas for my graduation lunch. Having only had the lunch buffet before at Lotus of Siam, I decided to atone for my past errors in judgment.\n\nI had an opportunity to read the articles all over the waiting area in the twenty minutes or so of wait time, so I learned that Lotus of Siam has been open since around 2000. Amazing. I'll bet the plaza in which they're located was also pretty rundown back then, but the quality of their food has probably not lessened and their reputation has only soared. I did my research this time and, along with some appetizer suggestions from my mom, we picked a lot of specialties and Northern Thai menu options.\n\nThe food arrived all at once after perhaps fifteen minutes. Patience is a virtue, as we were rewarded with delicious food. For starters, the tod mun plar (#7, $8.95) was a great take on a deceptively simple fish cakes with nice pickled cucumber. The nam kao tod (#14, $7.95), everybody's favorite crispy rice dish, was definitely yummy but a little too sour for my taste. Also very delicious but not suited for my palate was the yum nuah (#36A, $12.95), which is a great beef salad that's just too spicy for me and paralyzed me in fire and sweat for a few minutes. The spicy catfish with basil leaves (#85, $14.95) was a solid if small portion of sauteed fish in a basil sauce\n\nAfter recovering from the yum nuah, I delved into the Northern specialties. The khao soi (#A, $9.95) was one of my favorite tastes of the meal. To call it an egg noodle curry is not nearly doing it justice, so I'll just say that you'd better order it when you get the chance. The kha nom jean nam ngyow (#G, $9.95) is a non-spicy pork and rice vermicelli dish that reminds me slightly of a certain Vietnamese dish called bun rieu, but I wouldn't have this one again as it seemed a bit boring compared to some other dishes. The last item from this part of the menu was the nam prik ong (#I, $10.95), a non-spicy dish consisting of a red chili paste and various items to dip into it. Pretty nice, possibly worthy of a repeat, but not a palate dazzler either.\n\nI think the best item we had may have been the garlic prawns (on the chef's choice menu, $22.95). They are certainly pricey, and they are actually kinda worth it. Very crunchy, perfectly cooked, and just delicious. And even considering the modest portions of other dishes, definitely a splurge.\n\nHaving finally had items from the proper menu, I can now confidently express my opinion that Lotus of Siam deserves all of its praise. I don't know if I'd tell somebody to fly here just for one restaurant, but when you are in Las Vegas, you must make this a destination. Oh, and you'll definitely want to reserve well in advance if you choose dinner hours. Just saying.", "Lotus of Siam - Thai restaurant average check ~$17. One of my favorite place in Las Vegas and I believe this is the best Thai restaurant in Las Vegas. Service is fair to good. Food is the best, they are really consistent so you can come back anytime and the food would be the same, that what get the score. You don't want to come back a month later and the food taste differently, at Lotus of Siam, they give you the \"wow\" expression when the foods come out. When you see the waiters bring out the food to other people, it just makes you want to order the whole menu because how beautiful and tasty the foods are. I would give this restaurant 5/5 because the foods are amazing and extraordinary", "Maybe it's my fault for having high expectations, but I was disappointed with Lotus of Siam. \n\nWhen you get inside the restaurant, they have a bunch of magazine and newspaper clippings plastered on their walls, prestigious awards (James Beard), and countless photos of celebrities and world renowned chefs. You would think that it would just be the best Thai food you will ever eat outside of Thailand (which I haven't had the pleasure of visiting, yet)?\n\nI have a feeling it's because there aren't much options for Thai cuisine in the neighborhood that they give this place such distinction. I've had better Thai food in Los Angeles (Thai Town) and there is no shortage of Thai restaurants in LA.\n\nOverall, I am sad that it did not live up to the hype. I'll give this place another visit in the future and see if I have a better things to say next time.", "My boyfriend and I tried this place because he saw it on that Anthony Bourdain show. Let me tell you, THE best Thai food hands down that I've ever had. We had the fish cake for appetizer. My boyfriend had the Northern larb (pork) & i had the roasted duck Curry..usually comes in red curry but I switched it for yellow curry. And oh my goodness...they were ALL super amazing!!! The staff was nice but could be more attentive. But nontheless...AMAZING PLACE!!!!!!", "My partner had to make reservation to eat at this joint and it took him three attempts. It looks like a regular restaurant from the outside but it opens up as you go into the restaurant which was a little more pleasant. \n\nIt's very crowded and the servers continuously bump our chairs when they have plenty of space to walk around us. Overrated and this food can be purchase at any Thai restaurant. Not worth the hassle.", "My wife and I flew down from Toronto for a 3 day getaway to Vegas. The day before we left I caught the Anthony Bourdain review on CNN for Lotus of Siam. We were impressed! Went for lunch at noon and walked by the buffet which was very busy but knew I was ordering off of the Northern Thai menu. We started with Tom Yum soup then ordered 3 dishes from the Northern Thai Pages at the end of their menu. Service was great, food arrived quickly and it was \" to die for\"\nWe will be back!", "Not fine dining. \nMediocre service. \nExtremely long menu for food and wine. \n5/5 stars for the food. The red curry is the best I've ever experienced.", "Not really impressed with the service.  When my husband called for reservation, he was told no reservation.  When we arrived, I saw hostess on the phone taking reservation, and they have a reservation book.  Make me to leave right away.", "OK, reading the other reviews here, i will not be very original! This is a great Thai restaurant and the best I had in Vegas so far! The place is in a remote beaten down section of Las Vegas, not very far from the convention center. I came here with friends at the end of the \"National Association of Broadcasters\" convention and the place was packed! My friends made a reservation and were there before so I did not have to wait but I saw people waiting in line for up to an hour while we were there.\n\nThe place itself is plain in terms of setting and the service is efficient but basic... but you forget about all this when eating the food and enjoying the company of good friends!", "Oh my goodness!  We drove here under recommendation of a friend.  It is amazing!   Non descript little strip mall on the edge of town.  When we pulled into the parking lot at 12pm,  patrons were doing nothing short of running to the door to claim their table.  The crispy rice appetizer was a rocket fire explosion of flavors.  We had the Tom Kah Kai soup, Pad Se-Ew with chicken, Crispy Duck with Chili Mint Leaves, all washed down with Thai Iced Tea and Singha and finished off with the delicious banana roll with coconut ice cream for dessert.  As my dearly departed father would have said, \"this meal was a religious experience!\"  Highly recommended!", "One of my  favorite thai restaurants; It's always busy with locals and now more and more tourists from the strip hotels. Incredible wine list and fast efficient service. If you like thai food this is the place to go in las vegas", "One thing I really didn't like about this restaurant is that their portions are SMALL. Between four people we shared four dishes and from each dish we didn't even get the size of our hand (serving size). Another thing, our waiter didn't come around as often as we'd like. Our waters and teas were emptied out and he came around to fill them when we were done. Work on your service skills, you're in Las Vegas. Better service = bigger tips.\n\nOn the outside, this place looks like a true hole in the wall. On the inside, could use a little more remodeling/repainting. Maybe some statues. The wine cellar is pretty cool though.\n\nWe ordered papaya salad, curry, pad thai and pineapple fried rice. All delicious but I wish they gave more.\n\nWill be returning, skeptically.", "Orderd the drunken shrimp noodles, the pad thai, the Nam Kao Tod.\n\nThe num kao tod is amazing. It has so many interesting flavors. The acid is a bit strong at first; but as it subsides you'll see that you can't stop eating it as you discover more and more different flavors: the cilantro, mint, lemon, the crunchy ricelike, etc.\n\nThe drunken noodles with shrimp is an amazing dish. It comes with several fried crunchy prawns and this flat noodle that's been cooked and has so many different flavors: sweet, salty, umami, etc.", "Ordered soup not spicy, it came spicy, we returned it and the same pot, with the  floating chillies came back and the waiter informed us it was just diluted, indifferent wait staff", "Our friend who is now officially a local said \" we are going to the best Thai in the world\". Now as you can imagine that is a big statement and something I was weary of, my trepidation certainly wasn't eased once we arrived to the hole in the wall type front door, but then we entered and the place was packed! Our friend ordered her favourite dishes and we were off. The fish was cooked so perfectly it was like a hot knife cutting through butter, then the crispy rice was a playful tease to the taste buds with the sour notes working fantastically with the sausage. My winner winner chicken dinner moment was the duck breast in a red curry sauce. How the hell did they get the skin crispy, flesh like butter and remain that was until the last piece was demolished? I'm guessing some sortie confit was going on here, either way it was my DOD (dish of the day).\nNow that I have decided my friend could be correct I. Saying this is the best Thai in the world, the second highlight was the eclectic mix of people throughout the restaurant. From little kids to 60 something millionaires with 20 something plastic brides (good on em). It was definitely an eye opener.\nDo yourself a favour and give it a shot!\nFood 9.5/10 service 7/10 decor 6/10", "Overhyped!!! Overpriced!!!  Food was kinda cold and the BBQ chicken was pink inside. \"Raw\". The worst part is that the servings are too small. For being the best Thai food in Vegas, it's pretty weak. The service is not that bad though.", "Probably the best Thai food I've had in a long time.  The stuffed chicken wings were awesome. The garlic prawns, outta this world.  The crispy duck, to die for.  Wasn't the biggest fan of the Tom yum soup. , I've heard a lot about this place and all good things. I would have to agree and will be back here for sure.", "Really good, but I like Archie's better. As a local, I was happy to see this place doing so extremely well!", "Saw this place from Anthony bourdain's tv\nShow. Place was packed on a Thursday afternoon. Got seated right away, avoided the buffet, went straight for garlic prawns and the back menu. Husband at a spicy curry with extra rice and I decided to go for the drunken shift shell crab. DELISH! Thai ice tea was amazing too. Now I see why this place has good reviews, authentic thai food made with amazing spices. Portions were large, and service was nothing to complain about. Just thought it was in a weird strip mall location. Def worth a shot if you're in Vegas and like thai food.", "Simply the best Thai I have ever had!  Staff were very friendly and helpful.  Be prepared for some waiting to get a table though.  There is a bar to wait though.", "Taste: 4\nCreativity/Authenticity: 4\nAtmosphere: 3\nService: 4\nBang for your buck: 3.5\n\nNow how do you rate a thai restuarant that is known for well northern thai food and not \"thai\" food? do i rate it by what everyone is rating it, how can i when they aren't known for their pad thai or pad se ew which is some of my favorite dishes at my favorite thai restaurants. First lets start with atmosphere, the place is way down the strip where i don't normally roam. Located in a huge ass parking lot which looks like a strip mall is this gem in what is or was old vegas. Inside this dead looking place its packed, like i had to push my way through the front (lunch time) to put my name down on this long ass waiting list. Hit the bar in the restaurant where we were given a thick ass drink menu i mean thick!! stuck to the basics thai chang beer but for this place being packed we were seated fairly quick 20min at most. Now to the food... got the northern style food and with nothing to compare this restaurant to I'm going by my experience with curries and asian dishes. Started with crispy rice, the fried duck pannang and the garlic fried shrimp... one word AMAZING!! the crisp rice was good but very heavy on the lemon grass which over powered the dish but was still good. The crispy duck was my favorite, now if you have ever tried duck you know that well most places do not know how to cook it and being Chinese decent we know our duck and well so does lotus of siam, cooked perfectly crispy still even when submerged in curry! next the fried garlic shrimp mmmmm, deep fried and very tasty. The service here was on point and when i mean on point, full waters, back to back beers and fast check turn around. Overall I'm a fan for a very delicious meal, yeah i cant base it for any other northern thai restaurant but as far as taste goes this place is amazing and i will be back thank you Anthony bourdain", "Terribly overrated in almost every aspect. People will then ask: \"Well, why is it so busy then?\" Busy does not translate into a \"quality experience\" - hence the case here at Lotus of Siam. This is a tourist trap since it is close to the Strip with cabbies parked all around. This was also my third and final trip to \"Lots of Siam\". The food lacks flavor, and the Tom Yum soup is virtualy tasteless. The staff fouled up our orders and seemed indifferent to our needs even after it was quite obvious that we were unhappy / displeased. There was a complete lack of care and comfort / concern as well as management presence. Of all the Thai restaurants in town, this may very well be one of the worst I have been to. We will never return.", "Thank to Anthony Bourdain. We went there on Friday night @ 8:30 pm= 1Hr waiting and we had our meal. Service was pretty fast.\n\nNam Kho Tod was flavorful and crunchy--A+ Next time, I will order 3 of this dish :)\nGrounded pork with basil was A-ok--- B+.\nKho Soi was a bit mild----B. \nWine selection was a WOW!\n\nTuesday we went back for a buffet lunch. We were disappointed. Food was just ok. Grounded pork with basil, stir-fried mixed veggies, tom kha broth, clear broth with egg drops, chow mien, pad thai, white rice, fried rice, sweet potato wonton/puff, veg spring rolls, banana rolls, watermelon, oranges, iceberg salad, We ordered chicken panang from the menu and it was just alright. Next time, we try something else.", "The best Thai food in the United States. Period! I am a Thai food snob. I have eaten Thai food all over the country. This little off-Strip restaurant is the real deal. \n\nThey know me by name and they appreciate their loyal regulars. I let them order FOR me. I say make me the best you have tonight. They never disappoint! They fly their seafood in fresh and the chef is world class. I have heard directly from Top Chef Masters that every chef who comes tonVegas has this restaurant on their tour while in town. I believe it! \n\nFav. Dishes: issan sausage, pad Thai, lobster, salmon with panang sauce, Tom yum soup, grilled prawns, anything on the special Northern Menu!", "The best Thai food period. We ordered the lobster, and pad se ew. Not our usual garlic shrimp which is also to die for.  I have not had a bad meal at this one of a kind joint. The waiters and waitress are very attentive. It seems like they are happy to serve you great food.", "The food and service was excellent! The waitor recommended the crispy duck in pagnang curry and the seabass and drunken noodle and both were excellent. The restaurant is in a small strip mall that's a bit shady. And, we waited about 10 minutes to be able to hail a cab back to the strip. I'd go back again for the food when in Vegas.", "The food here is great, but hype doesn't mean you can slack on service. We went for lunch for the first time and arrived at 1:20. They sold us on a buffet they closed 20 minutes prior but did not mention it. We paid for a half full buffet they had no intention of re-stocking and didn't care when we asked about why they didn't tell us. \n\nWe paid $30.00 to not eat here.\n\nSo disappointing!", "The hype is real. I just went here with my parents and we were not disappointed! Wait was long as always, even for a Sunday night at 850pm. However, we got seated at the bar and ordered our drinks first. Thai teas all around of course! Service is pretty darn good here, they sat us down and made sure we got our orders in quickly. Things I would recommend ordering:\n\n1) Crispy duck Penang curry (pricey at $24/dish) the skin is so crispy and the duck is cooked to perfection. I personally think the curry is too creamy but for those that love a coconut base curry, this is a must for you! \n2) Garlic prawns - gahhh damn it's good. They peel the skin but keep it semi attached to the meat of the shrimp so that you get the crunch of both. \n3) Veggie tom yum soup - the perfect combo of spicy and sour. \n4) Pad Thai - pretty good, but not their best dish. But I think it's cuz the other dishes I can't get else where as good! \n\nWish they would expand and bring this to SoCal! But this place is a must for every Vegas trip. Bill came out to be 85 including tip! Pretty good for the quality of food you get.", "The last time I have Thai food this good is when I was in Bangkok. Curry sauce is 6 out of 5. Holly molly gastronomically great food.", "The service was good, didn't make a reservation and they sat me although they were slightly busy for a Tuesday evening.  I can imagine how busy this place gets on weekends.  I kept it simple had the chicken wontons which were great with the sweet and sour sauce, The crab fried rice was good maybe use more visual crab, and the Garlic prawns which were very good however good have been better if they came with a dipping sauce or something.  It looks like a hole in the wall from outside but pretty nice inside.  I would come back again.  They have a very large menu so be prepared to have a lot of decisions to make.", "There's not a lot I can add to all the rave reviews about Lotus, except to echo them - go give this place a try!!  There is more to Vegas than the Strip....\n\nI had to laugh at the descriptions of the location  - yes, it looks like you could be arranging a drug deal or two - but inside nirvana is waiting, so just ignore the shady neighbourhood.   \n\nFavs for me were the curries, but I'd love to return on my next visit to Vegas and try things that are new to me from their extensive menu - or maybe leave it up to the waiters to surprise me  ;-)", "These days, thanks to sites like Yelp and television programs, restaurant hype is more prevalent than ever before.  Lotus of Siam has certainly benefited from positive coverage and word of mouth--just on my flight into Vegas, two groups seated next to me were talking about upcoming reservations.  But hype is a double-edged sword:  my expectations for my dinner were so high that nothing short of an unforgettable, \"I'll be talking about this years from now,\" kind of meal was going to be good enough.  Amazingly, Lotus of Siam met those expectations, and then some.\n\nMy extended family (party of 9) arrived at Lotus, and I immediately got ragged on--I am known for taking trips off the beaten path in pursuit of great meals, with mixed results, since most of my family generally favors \"meat and potatoes\" kind of establishments.  Lotus's location in a less-than-beautiful strip mall did not win me any points, but once inside, the restaurant is large and comfortable.  Because we were warned that the restaurant does not hold reservations, we arrived 20 minutes early, and after a quick drink at the bar, we were seated.\n\nLet's start with drinks--Lotus has all the standard beers and liquors you might expect at a Thai restaurant, but also has a very impressive (and appropriate) wine list, with great options at every price point.  This was a nice, unexpected touch.  Service was quick and friendly, as well.\n\nAs for the food, all I can say is that there was literally something for everyone:  the classics (Tom Kha, garlic prawns) that you can get at most Thai restaurants were made at a higher level.  There were outstanding vegetarian options for those who don't eat meat.  Some of the Northern Thai dishes were things I'd never seen before, and everything we tried (in particular, a green chili pepper dish) was a hit.  The curries were also universally delicious, and for those of you who like spice, rest assured that Lotus isn't afraid of adding real heat.  My brother joked that the menu was like the Cheescake Factory if it was good, and this is actually a pretty good analogy; it takes time to read through the encyclopedic menu and figure out what you're going to order, but at the end of the day, everything we chose was either very good or excellent.\n\nThis was an incredible meal, and I will never make a trip to Vegas without stopping by.", "This place definitely lives up to the hype! My friend and I were in Vegas for 6 days for a conference and planned to come here for lunch on our last day. During lunch hours, they serve a buffet. I'm not sure what kind of food was in the buffet but it seemed very popular. We ordered off the menu and got the Nao Kao Tod, Tom Kah Kai, Garlic Prawns, and Roasted Duck Curry. You could adjust the spiciness for each dish. They go from scale 1-10. We decided on going with 5 for all the spicy dishes. The food took a while to come out but we didn't mind since we did come during the lunch rush. The Nao Kao Tod came first and it was a very interesting crispy rice salad. It was slightly tangy and when you eat it with the cabbage provided, it's the perfect blend of crunchy, zesty, and freshness. I have never had anything like this so I truly enjoyed it! The Tom Kah Kai came out next and this was probably my least favorite dish. I felt like the taste was off, maybe too much coconut milk? I've had better elsewhere. The Garlic Prawns were SO good! A bit pricey compared to the other dishes but the prawns were very big and juicy and were fried to perfection. The seasoning on the prawns was so delicious! The curry was the best I've ever had. The flavors were there and the duck was roasted to the perfect consistency and meshed so well with the curry. Service was great! All the waiters made sure our water glasses were full and always checked up on us. This place is definitely a spot I would need to visit everytime I'm in Vegas. Worth the cab ride from the strip and definitely worth the hype! :)", "This place is BUSY! but hot dang the good was delicious! So clean and delicious! I loved it! Very happy! I am definitely coming here again when I come to Vegas.", "This place is a sleeper. From the outside you wouldn't think much but when you go inside the food and service are great! Very packed when I went so be sure to eat early.", "This place is awesome! Crispy duck chu chee and drunken noodles with chicken so good! Number 7 out if 10 on the spicey scale was just right! Oh, and the fried chicken appetizer, boom, so good!\n\nReasonably priced and fairly busy on a Tursday afternoon, perfect for the day after a night in Vegas. Not very far off the strip either. Not sure about walking here, a bit far, but we had a rental car. Go for it!", "This place is crazy busy.  If you really want to go here and eat without a reservation, get there early.  I was there right when they opened and the restaurant was packed in about 10 minutes.  I heard about this place for their crispy shrimp and it did not disappoint.  They even fried the shrimp shell that was delicious.  Their other dishes didn't knock my socks off, but not bad by any means.  The ambiance is very nice and they have a great wine selection.  Their portions are definitely along the lines of a fine-dine with a higher prices and smaller portions.", "This place is def over-rated and way to expensive for Thai food. The claim is that it's the best Thai food in the country and that's not the case . We ordered the short rib panang, Isaan sausage, soft crab noodles, house fried rice and chicken salad. Although the food had a nice kick to it the fried rice was way too sweet the chicken salad was a plain stir fried chicken dish. I was expecting this place to blow my mind away but it was a major disappointment. $80 for 5 dishes is ridiculous.", "This place is definitely delicious... As long as you aren't ordering take-out.  The prices are a little steep to begin with, and ordering to go is a huge mistake because they become INCREDIBLY stingy.  \n\nThis place is right down the street from my home, and after ordering take-out too many times to count, I just can't do it anymore.  Most recently I ordered a tofu curry that was almost entirely sauce, and literally had two pieces of tofu, two pieces of potato, and two pieces of carrot.  THAT'S IT.  My boyfriend and I and a friend had planned to have a family style dinner at home, and ordered several items that ended up being comparably limited (a shrimp dish with two shrimp, etc.).  It's just unforgivable I'm afraid, especially since we spend about $70 on take-out each time, and tip 20% despite eating at home.   I'll probably go back if I decide to spend the night out, but from now on, I'll be ordering my take-out from Le Thai :/", "This place is truly a hidden gem. My good friends always mention this place to me and told me I have to try this place out. I wasn't really impressed. Maybe I order the wrong items. I decided not to give up on this place and try it out again. I come to vegas around 4 times a year and this place is always on my list to hit up.\n\nI do recommend to always make reservations at least 1 week in advanced. Or you will be waiting for over an hour. I enjoy going with friends because you then get to try different items on the menu.\n\nGet the garlic shrimp! You won't get disappointed.", "This place really strive for quality versus quantity. Unlike most Thai restaurants that I've been to, the portions are quite smaller. \n\nArriving at 5:30pm on a Saturday( right when they open for dinner), the place is already super packed. Lines start to form inside & outside the restaurant. This place isn't at all located in the nicer part of town. \n\nFinally able to seat, we immediately order a round of Moscato, my favorite!! And oh my goodness best moscato I ever tasted. They do have a large selection of wines. As for foods we ordered-- garlic chicken wings, shrimp & chicken pad Thai, That beef salad, and duck drunken noodles. All pretty tasty. I'm usually used to having Thai food that is burning my tongue, so the lack of spiciness in the foods really surprised me. But I can not complain. The food was beyond delicious. The Pad Thai is one of the best I ever had. I love when my noodles come out cooked just right & not mushy and stuck together. \n\nThe service was pretty slow but the place was extremely packed. Our food came out periodically and not all at the same time which we appreciated, so the table wasn't so cluttered. \n\nI definitely would return.", "This place was incredible, and totally lived up to the hype. It is a distance from the center of things, but well worth the trip. Be careful with the heat of things--what is mild to you may not be so much in their kitchen!\n  The place was spotless, the staff super-friendly, and Chef Saipin even took a picture with us. \n  If you are feeling extra-adventurous, order from the back of the menu, for some of their Northern dishes.", "This place was really good, but I wouldn't get the crispy duck again. The panang sauce was delicious, but the duck itself was greasy and hard. I was very disappointed and wished we had gotten a different kind of meat. The crispy rice appetizer was great, and so was the khao soi.", "This restaurant was recommended to us by a local friend. He said it was the best Thai in Vegas, hands down. It's located in an economically--and otherwise--depressed strip mall. (There's a bedraggled \"Adult Day Care\" two doors down with a flickering, half-lit neon sign. Love you, mom and dad.) I'm not complaining about that, though. In my experience if a local tells you that something's the best and it's in a terrible location, you're usually in for a real treat. So I was actually getting more excited. \n\nA few of our party were under 5 minutes late and the staff acted like they were doing us a favor by seating us. They were very busy, but we *did* have reservations. \n\nWhen the waiter came by, he was very much in a hurry. As a NYer, I don't generally have a problem with that, but I rarely see a waiter rush like that, with no effort to be hospitable at all. The guy who filled our waters was far more personable and helpful. \n\nI ordered the Massaman Curry, which is a standard/classic dish. When I got it it wasn't hot, but warm verging on room temperature and it sat there cooling more as we waited several minutes for the rice to arrive. When I tasted it, the flavors were great, but there was no spice at all. The waiter didn't ask me how spicy I wanted it and I didn't ask because usually at a Thai place, they just give you 'medium spice for an American' if you don't specify. \n\nThe prices were very decent and more inline with their location than their apparent popularity, which is good. \n\nLocals seem to love this place, so maybe I just had bad luck. It happens. But based on my experience, the place gets two stars.", "This was my sixth visit and I was just as pleased as the first time in 2005 days after being relocated to Vegas Via Hurricane Katrina.  We were unable to get a reservation (the history on my phone shows 27 attempted calls, all of which received a busy signal), so we showed up at 5:20 . They open at 5:30, and we were not the first in line.  We walked in right after the door opened, got a great table, and enjoyed a fabulous meal and glass of wine.  \n\nTheir wine list is impressive, and not ridiculously overpriced. Fabulous selection of Alsace, aromatic Austrian Riesling... We had a bottle of Trimbach Pinot Gris as well as a divine FX Pichler Smaragd Riesling from 2008. Dynamite with the Garlic Prawns!\n\nWhen we left a little after 6:30 every table was full, the vestibule was packed, and several diners were waiting outside (yes, in the skeezy strip mall).  The moral of the story is that this place is worth the stop, even at what many would consider the \"Senior\" dining hour. \n \nFrom Bern's in Tampa this time yesterday, to In-N-out for lunch, to this for dinner, I'm not sure if I'll be able to survive another 2 days in Vegas. I may have to hit some juice bars tomorrow. After a trip to Mount Charleston in the morning.", "Time for an update since this is the second time I've been here (technically 3rd time but 1visit we did the buffet.... which reminds me... don't do the buffet)\n\nSo once again we ordered the garlic prawns and tom yum koong. Both above average in the scale of deliciousness, i mean WAY ABOVE!! Be warn about the spiciness level on the soup. We did the 7 and would have probably fared better work a 6, and that's coming from people whom normally can spice it up with the rest of em. We also ordered the pud se ew which was great as well. \n\nThis is my personal favorite thai spot now. Too bad i have to cross state borders for it.", "Took two tries to actually eat here. First night (Sunday) I tried to make a reservation and they told me after the waiting list gets long enough, they stop taking reservations - you better just show up and get on the list. So we tried again Monday. This time we showed up in person and got on the list. Not too hard to spot - if you're travelling eastbound on Sahara heading away from the Strip you'll eventually see the backside of a dingy mall and LOTUS OF SIAM quite visible on the wall on the south side of Sahara. You then make the next turn and find a parking spot in the mall close to the restaurant. Shouldn't be hard at night since most of the businesses are either closed or not anywhere near as busy as Lotus Of Siam. We had about an hour's wait and the waiting area only has a few chairs so we decided to venture the mall outside. The rest of the mall is mostly Korean bars or restaurants plus a few sketchy \"clubs.\" None of the restaurants seemed to be \"hopping.\" Lotus Of Siam probably had more people in it than all the surrounding businesses combined. There were lots of shuttered businesses - perhaps this was once a thriving Koreatown in Las Vegas but this mall's best days are definitely in the past. Maybe it's a lot more thriving during the day but walking around there at night gave me a kinda creepy vibe. So we circled the whole place and came back and were seated not long after. I guess some folks couldn't wait any longer and left as a few names the hostess called out did not produce any acknowledgement from the people still sitting and waiting. There were so many people in the restaurant that when we finally got seated almost elbow to elbow next to the people at the tables on either side it felt like we were in a crowded diner. Couldn't they just buy out one of the bigger empty lots around and expand? So anyway, we ordered the crispy duck in Panang curry, the crispy garlic prawns, and our squeamish pal ordered the Panang curry with chicken. The crispy duck was awesome. So were the prawns - you eat the whole thing - shell and all - as we were instructed by our waiter. The Panang curry with chicken was rather lackluster in comparison but that was pretty much eaten by our unadventurous buddy who won't eat seafood and for whom duck was too exotic. Based on the first two dishes I'd say this place lives up to the hype. Portions weren't overly huge and the price was a little steep but we left satisfied. We'll probably be back one day. I'll say it would probably be worthwhile to check this place out if you're actually quite familiar with Thai food. Especially if you flew in from out of town - paying a king's ransom for cab fare from the strip and back as well as the long wait will seem much more worth it.", "Top Chef Masters definitely gave me high expectations. Yup, Lorena Garcia, I have one brow raised at you right now. \n\nI gave in to the hype and put it on my \"Places to Eat At\" list when I recently went to Vegas. Mind you, I was with my family and, my step mom is Thai. I thought it would give me bonus stepdaughter points so I was pretty excited to bring her to Lotus of Siam. \n\nThe Crispy Catfish Salad was great! The catfish pieces were fried crispy perfection and the salad tasted light to me. The dressing wasn't too salty nor too sour. I definitely loved it and was excited to have our other orders come out. \n\nThe food sure did start to come out one by one and sadly, I got disappointed. I don't know if it was because maybe what we ordered weren't their \"stellar\" dishes but oh, boy. I wasn't a happy camper. We got the Tom Yum Goong, Panang Curry, Pad Thai and my dad got an extra bowl of noodles in soup with meatball type things floating. \n\nI'm sorry, but my go-to spot in Thai Town in L.A. does a better job at preparing what I had ordered. That Tom Yum Goong was just pure sourness with no kick whatsoever (my stepmom asked them to make it spicy in Thai). The Panang and Pad Thai were both on the sweeter side as well. My stepmom agreed to what I had to say as well and, she's a straight-up, legit Thai lady herself. I only have the privilege of saying that I've been to Thailand but she's got it all in her blood. Her opinion has to count as something, right?\n\nI'm not ready to cross them out my list just yet. Everyone definitely deserves a second chance and I could have made a mistake in ordering Thai staples but, that's what scares me too. If the staples aren't even close to amazing then what more the dishes they're known for? I guess I'll just have to wait and see.", "Tried the red chili dip, deep fried catfish (our fav), crispy rice, crispy duck panang (THANK YOU, yelpers!!!!!) , and some sort of street noodles. Still our favorite restaurant!", "Unassuming restaurant off the Strip.  The food was amazing.  Three of us shared the garlic fried jumbo prawns (the shells can be eaten like chips and they were the best part of a great meal!), pork jerky, crispy rice, roasted duck curry (had bits of fruit which wonderfully balanced the spicy curry), curry rad nah, and coconut ice cream w sticky rice.\n\nEvery dish was good, with the garlic prawns and roasted duck curry as exceptional.  Bit pricey, nearly $30 a head for lunch, but so tasty that it is worth it.  Service was attentive and competent.", "Was sooo excited to come and try. The garlic prawns were yummmmyyyy but the rice was so dry and hard! Sooo dissapointed. Any Asian person know a good asian restaurant needs good rice to go with it. Wished it was perfect :(\n\nCame back again :) ok so you have to try their northern food - OMG to die for!!", "We usually watch Anthony Bourdain shows for food ideas when we are traveling to exotic international destinations. We don't consider Vegas in that set but we were glad we saw the recent Season 3 show just before a quick weekend trip there.  When our hotel, the Las Vegas Renaissance, also recommended Lotus of Siam, we knew we had to make a visit. \n\nWe took a taxi about 2 miles from the hotel (which is near the convention center) to reach the strip mall -yes, it looks a little unexciting from the outside on a Monday morning at 11:45 am. We met two other traveling friends there, and focused on the Northern Thai food (near the back of the menu) that is Lotus of Siam's specialty. \n\nBetween the 4 of us, we enjoyed Sai Oua (northern Style Sausage), Northern Larb, and two orders of the  Khao Soi, described as a typical Burmese influenced dish is served with egg noodles in a curry base with a touch of coconut cream, with your choice of meat. (We tried both the pork and the chicken versions.)\n\nAll were excellent, and very spicy, although you can request spice levels from 1 to 10. See photos here: http://www.travelingwiththejones.com/2014/05/10/anthony-bourdain-knows-good-food-northern-thai-in-las-vegas/\n\nTake the short taxi ride. Order from the Northern Thai specialties. Enjoy! Perhaps Las Vegas is an exotic international destination after all.", "We went to Lotus of Siam based on a friends recommendation. This was before I even knew that Anthony Bourdain went there in his latest parts unknown episode.  If I would have watch the episode prior to going I totally would have ordered off that northern Thai menu. Instead I'm with my usual of Tom Yum soup and panang.  \n\nI was dumb enough to order it spice level of eight out of 10. Although I thoroughly enjoyed the food, the level of spice made it almost unbearable. One of my friends ordered it at a level of two and said it was the most enjoyable Thai experience he ever had, partially because I was so miserable.\n\nThe service was great, the location was a bit scary at a random stripmall off the main strip, but don't let that deter you from trying this place out.\n\nCan't wait to go back.", "What did I missed  ? \nSeem to be a lot of hoopla about this place, so we were a group of 3-4 Thai ( born / raised in Thailand ) checking this place out.\nBoy, American people are so easily pleased. \nDon't quite understand the dilapidated  location compare to the strip and vast openness of Las Vegas, Is that mean the owner can not quite get it together? \nPeople seem to be begging to eat here, some came in Limousine. \nWe agreed that mass majority of street food in Thailand can beat this place by far,  Price and food test. Pretty sure MSG. is a main corporate of these stars. ( I away get real thirsty after yummy MSG. of a good food ) \nNext day we went to Chinatown ( Spring mountain & Valley road something ) There were 2 restaurants facing each other. We tried one of them which is pretty much same or better by $5- $10 a dish. \nStill not sure what I missed. PS. notice that sugar  and star rating goes in the same direction for most Thai food in America. It does not work that way in the real Thailand.", "What to say about Lotus that hasn't already been said? Probably not much.\n\n1. Location: Scary... Seriously. Don't bring your kids here after dark. Just about every other establishment in the strip-mall screams \"stay away if you want to wake up with two kidneys tomorrow morning\"\n\n2. Food: This is why this place gets 5 stars. This is Thai food that you won't find anywhere else. The Northern Thai specialties lend themselves to some dishes that will take you for a ride. Be adventurous. In my experience asking the waitstaff will lead them to just recommend you the regular \"safe\" stuff, so just pick one yourself. \n\n3. Drink: A thai place with a better wine selection than an upscale Italian restaurant? Sure, why not? \n\n4. Service. Havent been too impressed here - but to their credit they are ALWAYS packed and have to deal with tourists all night (this place may once have been a \"hidden\" gem, but it has most decidedly been found by the tourist crowd now)\n\nAll in all, this place lives up to its great reputation. Try it out.", "When we arrived at the restaurant it looked like a run down building with a few people standing outside. We were shocked when we went opened the door. The inside of the restaurant is actually nice and it was super packed. The wait for a table of 3 took 1 hour. Luckily we were able to leave and come back in an hour. It was definitely worth the wait. The food here is amazing! The best things we ordered were the Garlic prawns and the soft shelled crab salad. Next time I go to Vegas I will make sure I come back to eat those 2 amazing dishes.", "Wow I arrived here at 5 it opens at 5:30 already a line started and this was on a Tuesday. I usually eat white person thaiee food I was eating alone an ass for the recommendation from the waitress and was not let down", "Wow! \nI'm blown away by how great the food and service was ! I am deadly allergic to peanuts and it was nice that they even made our food with vegetable oil instead of peanut oil ! This place is a must go ! Service and food was on point and I'm definitely coming back :))", "Wow. Amazing!!! we had pad Thai,pad see ew, garlic prawn, mussels. Everything was delicious!  Nothing went wrong. Their customer service is great! Nothing to complain about this place!", "YES!\n\nfinally - good food in las vegas!  it seems fitting that you need to take a cab to a random-seeming strip mall to get some good food that won't cost you 100's of $$$.  this place is authentic thai food, which i really appreciated bc i hadn't experienced any authenticity the entire 2 days i'd been in vegas.  \ni dragged my brother away from the casinos on the strip to come here, he was annoyed that we had to wait an hour for a table, but once we were seated and he saw the wine selection he started to come around. the service was really fast, and the dishes were delicious.", "Yeah, it's everything it should be, and more. Food has spot on flavor, nice and hot. I've gone three times, each time I've left satisfied. I'm big on soup and this place masters at them, I recommend the coconut chicken soup. After that venture out and try anything because I'm under the impression that everything they serve is delicious. One of the best if not the best restaurant in Vegas.", "the service staff is friendly and quick. the food is absolutely delicious. you have to get the crispy fried rice and their garlic black pepper prawns. there is a wait but it's not that bad even during busy times.", "we chose this restaurant because it was rated the #1 Thai restaurant on Yelp and it was recommended by people we know who actually live in Vegas.  \n\nwe heard about the long line to get in so we decided to call and make a reservation for the very same day.  they said they were all booked for reservations but the wait shouldn't be that long....so we just planned on driving to the restaurant and hoping for the best.  we went on a Thursday (today) and were in the parking lot at 5:15 (doors open at 5:30).  there was already a small line forming, 3 parties ahead of us.  by the time the doors opened, there was about 30 people in line.  we don't normally eat this early but didn't want to miss our chance at getting seated sooner than later.  we were seated right away (party of 2) :)  \n\nyes, the reviews are true, it's looks like a hole in the wall on the outside but once inside you will be immediately relieved.  hey, any restaurant that has a line of people outside waiting to get in has to be good, right? right!\n\nwe ordered 2 appetizers: garlic/black pepper chicken wings and the tom yum kai soup (cup size).  wouldn't get the wings again because they weren't garlicky or peppery enough for us but they had a good crunchiness to them.  the soup was fantastic, i got it # 5 in spiciness and it definitely had a kick.  our 4 mains included: pad thai (chicken), we both agreed it was the best pad thai ever.  thai fried rice (chicken), we both agreed it was a little bland for fried rice and would not order it again.  green curry w/chicken, it was very, very good and would certainly order it again.  garlic prawns that everyone raves about (i don't eat prawns but i made my husband order them) and he thought they were awesome, although a little pricey (21.95). \n\nwe did not order any alcohol or dessert.  our bill came to about $68.00 before tip.  needless to say, we had leftovers to bring with us.\n\nthe service was friendly and FAST.  the waiters were very attentive at refilling our water glasses and clearing away our plates.  \n\nthis restaurant is definitely worth it.  the reason why i am only giving it 4/5 is because we thought the food could have been a little hotter (temperature wise).\n\nBon Appetite!!", "we tried calling the restaurant to make a reservation and no one answers the phone.  I tried the reservation line on the web site and it didn't work.  How can a person traveling through town even get in.", "went for lunch since dinner is always packed...lunch buffet was nearly over but hostess kindly asked us if we wanted to do the lunch buffet. we decided to do a la carte though. crispy garlic shrimp, duck panong, and soft shell crab drunken noodles. each dish was roughly $20 but they were all the signature dishes, so not even mad about it at all. all of them were bomb. crispy shrimp literally tasted like chips just like the menu description says. so much flavor in that dish. can't handle spicy things too much since I'm japanese but didn't care that these were medium on spice, they were so good at that point it doesn't matter, just wipe the sweat out of my eyes and keep eating. one of the best things about lotus is the amazing wine list...like seriously tons of wines under $50 that are amazing. off strip and kinda in the lightweight ghetto i guess they don't kill ppl with prices. texted one of my go to wine guys and he picked a bomb bottle of riesling for $30 big ones. it was amazing, fresh fruit, crisp and light, perfect for spicy food. \n\nthe only thing that kills me abut that place is the decor, like seriously rip up the 10 year old green stained carpet please!!!! put fake hardwood floor or re due the carpet please. it makes the room so dark and puts a downer on the experience. service was a little slow that day due to the room being busy but every one was apologetic and friendly, and thats all i need. not expecting 5 star service at this type of spot. \n\nso happy with lunch that day and def going back. heard about this place so many times and been here for 9 years, such a mistake not going way back when i heard about this spot. big menu so if you are going for the first time i would recommend the last 2 pages which is the chef selections. a little more $$ but totally worth it.\n\n$30 bottle of riesling + 3 amazing entrees = a great start to a day..."]
[2014, "season4"]	["A culinary masterpiece in Thai Food. Trust me when I say that this place is worth the 2hr wait. Though the prices are a bit on the high end side the food is really that good! Amazing High Quality Thai Cuisine. My family and I come here every time we're in Vegas. Our absolute favorite Thai Food Restaurant. Highly recommended: their Tiger Prawns, Tom Yum Kha, Fried Pomfret and Spicy Shrimp Fried Rice. One thing I wasn't a huge fan of though, was their SeaBass Drunken Noodles...it's not worth  the price. Despite that this place is a Must!!", "Absolutely delicious! \n\nWe went here for a pre-wedding dinner the night before. We love Thai and wanted to compare to our local favorite. \n\nI liked the Tom Kha Gai. The hint of lime was refreshing. \n\nWe also tried several others dishes. We asked for medium spicy but I felt like it wasn't that spicy. However, it was still best Thai food (aside from our usual local favorite) we've tried! We'll definitely come back!\n\nOne small note, come when your not rushed for time. Our waiter and food took a little bit longer than we're used to, but it wasn't a problem.", "Absolutely delicious.  Authentic Thai food from different regions of Thailand. My only regret is that I didn't get to try more dishes! \n\n1. Opened at 11am on Monday \n2. BBQ chicken was moist and flavorful!\n3. Red curry, chicken friend rice, and drunkin noodles were all on point. \n4. Next time I'm trying the green curry and pork sausage! \n\nPortions are small, but the dishes were so delicious! I can't wait to eat here again when I'm in Vegas!", "All the reviews are right.  The garlic shrimp is excellent. The duck with penang curry is amazing. Driving by you would think nothing of this place. Its so plain outside.  If i didnt know i would have thought this place was closed.  It's a definite stop when you go to vegas.  i have found my go to spot in Vegas for thai.  What a lucky find, if only this was the casino", "Amazing food!!! If you're in vegas this is a must. Best thai food in the Western Hemisphere! Be sure to make reservations in advance!!! If you like spicy #35 spicy shrimp salad is SPICY!!! Loved the catfish cakes, and they had a real yummy coconut chicken soup. The roasted duck curry is amazing. I ordered my meal from the back northern menu. Letter G a pork style stew. Don't be afraid of the congealed pork blood. This was amazing. Wish I lived closer. If I'm back in vegas I'll be back to eat at this joint! This is not a place to be missed!", "Apparently this is a lot of our visitors \"go-to spot\"! And I get the hype. Appreciate the hype. And respect the hype. We always have a great time. We always enjoy the food and the experience. However, I will be clear. To me, this is a great institution and a great food experience. Yet, this is not the best or my FAVORITE Thai restaurant in this city. Yes, every dish is AWESOME! I LOVE their pork belly. I love their fried rices, yes plural.  Their scallops. Noodle dishes are good. \nReservations are required in my book, if not, you could be stuck waiting for an hour or so. It's a GREAT place to take visitors. It's a great place to go because there are so many great write ups about this place. However, as a local, this will not be my personal go-to spot.", "As everyone is already saying, the garlic prawns are a must-have. A bit on the pricey side, but I don't know any other thai restaurant that does this. We also had drunken noodles....meh. $15 (?) was way overpriced for a sub-par product. \n\nLocation: the restaurant is difficult to find. it's in a shady part of Las Vegas, so lock your doors! However, once you step inside the restaurant, you feel like you've been transported to a thai palace. weird. \n\nWe lucked out and got in last minute, so make sure you make reservations. Otherwise, order out!", "BUZZ\n- Garlic Prawns (4/10)\n- Drunken Noodles\n\nI ALSO TRIED\n- Tom Kha Kai w Chicken (5/10)\n- Penang Curry w Beef (4/10)\n\nFirst off, I haven't written a review in a really long time! I love the fact that I travel a decent amount for work, so I get to try a lot of new places and write reviews. Ironically, it's because of that travel that I haven't been able to write any reviews lately. I've had so many jam-packed 1-day travels that, I might check in to a hotel on Yelp, but I'll knock out about 20 seconds after, then wake up, shower, and leave - all while still kinda sleeping. Even meals have been rushed. The business dinners might be in nice restaurants, but we're having such fierce conversations about work, that the food might as well have just teleported into our stomachs without ever being tasted.\n\nOK, now that that's out of the way, a little history. Pad Thai used to be what I thought Thai food was. Yes, I know that it IS Thai food, but I mean I thought that was all Thai food was! In 2007, I had Lotus of Siam and we ordered all sort of things and it was amazing. Since then, I discovered more facets of Thai food, namely Tom Kha and Penang Curry. Ever since I tried those, I've been dying to try them at Lotus, because this is touted by some as the best Thai restaurant on the planet!\n\nTOM KHA KAI\nServer asked how spicy I wanted it, and then said \"on a scale of 1-10.\" I was taken aback, because that's a really wide range! Even though I normally order \"Extra Spicy\" at other Thai places, the numbers intimidated me a bit, so I just said 8.\n\nIt tasted fine, but it didn't have anything in there that would make it taste great. No landmines, so that's good. The chicken was seasoned enough, but dry. The Tom Kha (and maybe this is just the style) was missing the tiny bit of sweetness that I've come to like and expect. As for spice, the first spoonful, I thought I got duped, but then after about 3 more spoons, the heat started to rise! Not enough for me to grab water, but enough where taking bites of the hot garlic prawns were painful on the tongue. It really seemed like that if you just had the soup, the 8 would actually be like a 6, but I think the higher the number, the more pepper bits are in the soup, so you just have a higher chance of picking one up, and those peppers themselves pack a punch!\n\nPENANG CURRY\nSigh. It's missing that almost nutty flavor that I've come to like, and it was a little too ginger-y/lemongrassy than I like. Consistency was about as much as condensed milk, and a spice level of 8, tasted more like a 4. The beef didn't really lend any helpful flavors, but hey, at least it was protein! Not the worst I've ever had, but I'm just really disappointed, considering how many people have this as their favorite Thai restaurant. Then again, it could just be different styles, which I admittedly don't know much about.\n\nGARLIC PRAWNS\nI remember when I was little, a friend of mine used to eat the shrimp tail. I was mesmerized! I had never even tried it before. So, I fearlessly started trying to eat the tail, and I was almost to the point of gagging. Fast forward 25 years and here I am at Lotus of Siam. \n\nThe shrimp comes out looking like the letter w. The left \"u\" is the shrimp, the right \"u\" is the shell of the shrimp, both still connected at the tail. The whole thing has been seasoned and deep fried. Now, I've had Japanese sweet shrimp before, where they fry the heads, and it was better than eating that shrimp tail many years ago, but I couldn't eat more than 1. These were definitely better, but it took a lot of mental psyching and determination to eat several. \n\nThe shrimp is good. The shell is actually pretty tasty. Out of all the fried shrimp shell I've had, this was the best. It was more crunchy/crispy than any other one I've had by far. And it had a buttery flavor to it that helped take my mind off of the shell. For me, if I took a bite of shrimp and a bite of shell, that was a tumultuous bite, and I had to fight the urge to spit it out. The trick was to eat the shell by itself, like it was one big shrimp chip. The other thing was to keep my mouth dry. Once I took the bite, I had to keep saliva away (sorry to get so technical here) and definitely resist the urge to \"wash it down.\" When the shell was dry and crispy, it shattered easier, which meant that it ground down finely so it was easy to swallow...like a chip. As soon as moisture was introduced, the shell no longer wanted to shatter, instead it would just flex, which meant that when you swallowed, it was that rough shell-like texture that made me want to gag. \n\nSo all in all, happy I tried it, but perfectly fine with never trying it again.\n\nLOTUS OF DISAPPOINTMENT\nI can't tell you how disappointed I was with the curry and soup. I've been waiting at least 4 years to have an opportunity to come to Vegas to try these dishes, and it didn't deliver. It's not to say this place isn't good. I have had great meals here, but they're not good at my fav.dishs", "Best Thai food I've ever had. I'm from Southern California and we have a lot of Asian food choice as well as a exceptional Thai restaurants. By far I have not had any tastier Thai food till I walked in this establishment. My only complaint is the open sign in front says they open at 11:30am, but they really open at 11.", "Best Thai food anywhere. Pad see ew is incredible. So is the fried rice. If you're unsure whether or not to believe all the hype you hear around this restaurant, you shouldn't. It's even BETTER than what you here :) but be prepared to wait awhile and don't bother calling, their phone will be off the hook.", "Consistently amazing Thai food. The garlic prawns alone are worth the trip off the strip!", "Crispy Duck Panang Curry. Garlic Prawns. \n\nIf you want the best Thai food in Vegas or anywhere within 100s of miles, go here. \n\nGood God it was so delicious and you would never expect it from the looks of the outside. Located in a shipping center off the strip near the older part of town, you expect a hole-in-the-wall and that's what you get walking in. What you don't know is they expanded to the space next to where they originally opened up and it looks like a Michelin Star restaurant. Service was comparable to a Ruth's Chris or any topend steakhouse. Always catering to your needs although very busy. Huge wine cellar in plain site and all the James Beard and Zagat awards on the wall. \n\nThe food. The food though!!! Don't make the mistake of ordering too much at once. Family style and the steamed white rice is endless. Hot pot Tom Kha Kai to start with medium spice. Super delicious, sour, spicy and the best way to start. Dishes came out shortly after. We also ordered the soft shell crab drunken noodles. The dish was super good but I want to focus on the first two I mentioned. Garlic Prawns. Came with the shells which were also fried. Best. Prawns. Ever. So good. But the true star: crispy duck Panang. Duck came in a lake of curry and still remained crispy. It was so good over rice and we ended up ordering another. \n\nGo here. Don't even hesitate. Go. You won't regret it. If you can find a better Thai place in the area, I challenge you to say that LoS isn't better. I CHALLENGE YOU! Aite?!?And bring your friends with you cause you might get embarrassed.", "Crying shrimp! Roast duck curry! Fried Banana ice cream. The #1 Thai restaurant in America has lived up to its ranking!\nExcellent service, quick and thoughtful.", "DELICIOUS! \n\nWe have tons of great Thai food where I'm from in Seattle, and I wish I could take this restaurant home with me. \n\nBest Pad Thai I've ever tasted. Not bland at all. We ordered extra to go! \n\nHuge wine selection. \n\nThis place is hidden away in a dim lit strip mall, but as soon as you walk inside, you'll see it's packed. Make a reservation if you don't want to wait!", "Delicious Thai food and friendly service.  However, it appears to have become a tourist joint with several taxis waiting outside, and while the prices were similar to other Thai restaurants, the portions were smaller than I'm used to.", "Eat. Here.  There is a vast menu, food is reasonably priced. The food is well prepared.  I can keep going on  and on, but I am making myself hungry thinking about this place.  Yummo!", "Eating at Lotus of Siam is the quintessential Las Vegas dining experience. The buffets and fine dining on the strip are great, but the Thai food here is what I must eat every time I visit.\n\nDon't order the typical Pad Thai or Pineapple Fried Rice which can be found at any Thai restaurant. People come here for the exotic Northern Thai dishes instead.\n\nMy all time favorite is the Crispy Duck with Penang Sauce. I actually don't like duck, not even what I've had in France or Beijing, which they're known for, but the duck here so good I've made an exception. It's crispy on the outside and tender on the inside. A rare and winning combination in my book. \n\nAs other reviews have noted, Lotus of Siam truly is the best Thai food in America. There's a reason why people still cab it here even though it's located in a ghetto plaza far off the strip. It's worth the trip.", "Everything we had here was perfect. We had the crispy spicy chicken wings, the best Tom Kha soup I   have ever had, drunken noodles that were perfect and the best pad Thai.", "Food was good . Less option on the vegetarian dishes (no meat). We had ordered fried tofu , vegetable spicy soup and vegetable fried rice. All the dishes were moderate.", "Food was to die for. Great seevice. Definitely did not expect it to be so nice in such a run down pavillion and a not so great area of town.", "Garlic shrimp was okay, didn't live up to the hype.\nAlso ordered papaya salad, tom yum and green curry. Curry was excellent. Tom Yum was weak, too sour and not enough heat. Papaya salad was decent but I have had better.\n\nWe were lucky to get there at 5:30. Make a reservation or get there early if you don't want to wait 2 hrs.", "Gave this spot a few chances, I have not been wow-ed by the food here. Every thing we ordered was lacking some flavor. My mom ordered her food very spicy, came out with no spice...my dish was simply bland, and the portions didn't really match the prices. \nService was swift, but the food isn't as amazing as everyone makes it out to be. I've had better Thai for a better price and more appropriate portion size.", "Gets alot of hype from being on Top Chef. But there are much better Thai restaurants in Vegas and the price is too high. It is a tourist trap.", "Good food but can be pricey with small portions. Busy so hard to get service and tends to be a wait. I would pass on the Tom yum soup, but everything else we had was good (garlic prawns, sea bass drunken noodles, pad Thai, boat noodle, nam kao tod, fried banana with coconut ice cream). Seafood options usually over $20 and everything else we had was around $10.", "Good food, not sure about the \"best\". We had the pad thai, the #55 with beef, and coconut egg noddle soup. Everything had good flavor and service was excellent. Would return here on next trip to Vegas.", "Great Thai in the desert", "Hands down the best Thai Food Experience of my life! This is a must visit for any Vegas Trip. Wine list is extremely deep, menu has too many options... All of which were outstanding! Do not pass this up.", "Hands down the best Thai food I've ever had. Great service. Everyone is so nice. Warning...the spice is serious Thai spice. So be careful I almost burned my tongue off. Get the Garlic Prawns...you won't regret it. The best thing to do is to anything you wouldn't normally get at your local Thai place. Forget Pad Thai, Tom Yum or Satay. Go for the serious authentic Thai and you'll love it. I have to eat here everytime I come to Vegas.", "Hands down the best Thai food I've ever had. One drawback is the wait times. But the quality of the food is top notch and worth the wait. Extensive wine list for excellent pairing with your meal. Go-to's have been the Pad Thai and the Roasted Duck Curry. Go here! Trust the fat kid", "Hard to catch a cab ride back but soooooooo worth it! Crispy Duke Panang a must and the Garlic Shrimp is crispy and saut\u00e9ed perfectly with Thai chillies and minced garlic. Safe to say the best Thai food I've ever had. Sorry Mom!", "Have been going to this place for years, I'm sad that they have done away with the all you can eat lunch buffet because ordering off the menu can get a little pricey, but the food is always delicious!", "Have been here a few times and all three (3) visits were a let-down. The food is marginal as I have found much better Thai food in other locations in town. Marnee Thai was better back in the day, and the Thai Noodle House and Archie's are much better. Additionally, the service here has lacked a great deal upon every visit. \"Busy\" does not necessarily translate into \"quality\". Would never return.", "I don't think I have EVER been to a Thai restaurant as good as this one. It was TOTALLY worth the two hour wait to be seated and the two years it took me to get there. While waiting, many of the regulars (many who come in from out of town) advised us what to order and we looked at the extensive 15 page menu.\n\nTom Kah Kai soup was exquisite. The first thing that hits you is the great aroma. It had layers of flavors-sweet, salty, with a taste of lime and coconut all with a bit of spice throughout. The white meat chicken was thinly sliced and tender and mushrooms that were firm but not overcooked.\n\nWoon Sen soup (Bankok style) was delicious. The first thing noticed was how it was seasoned with the right amount of salt. The Napa cabbage was cooked perfectly, crunchy but not raw as were the cellophane noodles. The black mushrooms and chicken only enhanced it.\n\nThe garlic prawns is one of the most popular items on the menu. Now, I know why. The prawns are deep fried with the shell on and topped with black pepper, having a potato chip texture with a bite. Then, there's the garlic that tasted like it was infused throughout each prawn. This is something that I'd definitely order again.\n\nCrispy duck on drunken noodles was the favorite dish ordered. I was surprised at how crispy the duck actually was, being that it was covered by the sauce of the noodles. The meat itself was moist and flavorful and not greasy like most duck I've ordered from other restaurants in the past. It was placed on a bed of flat noodles that was swimming and over saturated in a sauce, hence the name drunken. The sauce was salty with a sweet and sour aspect in it and a mild spiciness.\n\nLotus of Siam has won award after award every year since 2008 and it's an experience that shouldn't be missed if you are anywhere near Las Vegas.", "I have heard great things about Lotus... Came to Vegas with my BFF and met her friend and former client. Decor was pretty bad - bright lights and in a strip mall but had a great table and really delicious food. \n\nThey came by the table right away and took our drink order which we really appreciated. Had to wait a little bit to order but ended up with a really delicious meal. We started with chicken satay and ended up ordering a second. We had basil chicken medium heat which was a perfect spice level. Overall really solid meal.", "I was in Vegas for a Fantasy Football tournament and I wanted to try a nationally renowned eatery known as Lotus of Siam. It had so many great reviews and accolades that I felt we couldn't lose. But similar to my Blackjack experiences, the house won. I frankly was underwhelmed. I am a Thai food aficionado and have experienced some amazing Thai cuisine in Atlanta and Houston. I was betting that Vegas would blow them all out of the water; er desert, but that didn't happen. The group I brought with me were somewhat new to Thai food so they were blown away with how good it was. \nThe service was 5 stars and the wine list lived up to their wall full of Wine Spectator awards. \nThe Tom Kha Kai soup was nothing special. The stuffed chicken wings left me yawning and the Pad Thai was decent but didn't move me to tears.\nI have heard that it can be very difficult to get reservations here but we had no problem Sunday night.\nI really don't feel this place is that special or worth the 15 minute cab ride from the strip.", "I was not thrilled. A friend wanted to go cause she was sick and wanted spicy soup to open up all her senses and I was so annoyed it was awful!  We were only guest in restaurant and another gentlemen came with a baby in a baby car seat and they sat him on us...like pretty much sat right on us...dude the whole place is full I mean seat guests around we even joked with the man how we felt we were having family dinner with him!!!", "I was so excited to finally go to the famous Lotus of Siam.....\nI had looked at the yelp reviews and planned my dinner ahead....\n\nFirst was the Dassai sake! The big bottle of course! \n\nThe food: \nGarlic Prawns...... The star of the show! This one is definitely all it is cracked up to be! If you go to Lotus of Siam, you MUST get the Garlic Prawns! I will come back for the prawns alone!\n\nCrispy Duck with Basil....... Delicious! Really good quality duck cooked perfectly, with a wonderful basil sauce that accented the dish without overwhelming the flavor of the duck!!!\n\nCrying Tiger.... I do have to say that though the flavors were good, the steak was over cooked! It was medium well almost well done.... we didn't finish the steak or take it home..... this one was disappointing!\n\nDrunken Noodles with chicken.... good... not great... flavors were good, but I ordered spicy 5 thinking this is my first time here and 5 would be spicy but safe.... no... not spicy at all... and for me, I need some spice with my thai noodles!\n\nAll around though, it was very good! Service is great! I will def be back!", "I was very happy to have finally had the chance to try this place, especially with such raving reviews and scrumptious pictures. My husband and I came at a perfect timing, no lines. I could not wait to taste the popular ones: Nam prik ong (red chili dip), garlic prawns, crispy duck with panang and nua nom tok (beef dish). I feel bad to say this....everything was great except the food. They were okay....not as great as a lot of the reviews were saying. I expected food that would just blow my palate away and forever etched in my memory, but unfortunately that was not the case. This place is also overpriced for the food you are getting.", "I would rate this place a 3.5.\n\nWe originally went to eat at palace station oyster bar but the wait was 1.5 hours long so we headed to this place. They open at 530 and we arrived at 5:10 and there were several ppl in the parking lot already. We lined up like there was a Black Friday sale.  At 530 they opened doors and took ppl with reservations 1st. We were seated fast and received great service. \n\nWe went with yelp recs and got crispy duck in panang curry. It was amazing with perfect 8 spicy although very expensive.  We also ordered the soft shell crab with Drunken noodles which was pretty good but it was a small portion and expensive. Chicken wings weren't anything special. Garlic prawns were delish but again def expensive. Portions were small so we had to order 2 more items. Got the beef jerky which I personally didn't enjoy. I'm a sausage fiend so we got the sai oua which I felt was a little dry and missing something. \n\nOverall, I wouldn't wait for 2 hours for this place. Everyone raves about it and I agree the food is mostly delicious but the portions are way too small for the price.  Our bill was $113 before tip between 3 of us.  I'm going back to my fav thai nakorn in garden grove, ca.", "If you like it hot, you gotta get your butt over to Lotus of Siam :)\n\nThe food is amazing. Hands down the best Thai food I have ever had, even compared to LA Thai town! \n\nMust tries:\n+ Crispy Duck over egg noodles - This duck is sooooo flavorful, the curry sauce is divine with the perfect amt of spicy and savory. And the duck is actually crispy! I will definitely be back to order this dish again. \n+ Sea Bass Drunken noodles - So the noodles portion of this was only OK....but the Sea Bass?!?!!? AMAZING. Next time I might order Sea Bass over papaya salad.\n+ Spicy Squid Salad - LOVED THIS. It was very very spicy, but the seafood was incredibly fresh and the kick of lime was perfectly refreshing. \n\nDefinitely order either the coconut ice cream or a thai tea just to cut some of that spice...\n\nYes, if you don't get a reservation, the wait is atrocious. We waited 1 hr to get seated. And we called in ahead of time. But they have a great system where you can literally check your spot in line from your phone and they will text/call you when your table is available. \n\nAlso, expect to spend more $$ than you'd normally spend at a Thai restaurant. We ordered the 3 dishes above plus a sausage dish, plus tea, and spent $100....for 3 ppl....that's kinda pricey!\n\nTips: the parking lot is kinda creepy....make sure to lock the car!", "If you were to type ' Las Vegas Thai Restaurant' , in a search engine, there is a reason why Lotus of Siam is probably going to be the 1st thai restaurant you'll see. Although I think there are a few thai restaurants in town that are better, there is no denying that the menu top to bottom, is impressive, which is why Im giving them 5 stars vs 4. Location sucks, but its very close to the strip, which makes it worth the visit. You cant go wrong choosing this place, if your indecisive on choosing a specific thai restaurant. Their Pepper Garlic Chicken is the best thai dish in the city PERIOD. Id also recommend their chili mint chicken. Soups are above average! The last good thing I have to say is if you order SPICY, you get SPICY, unlike other thai spots in town.", "It may not look like much from the outside, but the inside is nice. The food is great and the staff are friendly. Their pad thai is incredible (which is an understatement). The Khao Soi is also very good. To top it off, its hard to beat the price. My only hesitation is that I have not eaten at too many thai restaurants and so maybe there is something better out there.", "Located in a strip mall that is very easy to pass over because its so sketchy looking, Lotus of Siam is a very pleasant surprise within. \n\nThey have many plates that would appeal to all types, from the adventurous eater to the safe nibbler. Most dishes are definite winners, but word to wise, don't underestimate the spice level. Our table definitely got a swift kick to the mouth with the papaya salad. But our other starters were pretty delicious in my opinion. The deep fried shrimp is what they are known for. The shrimp is succulent and juicy, but I wasn't really a fan of the pieces that were just deep fried pieces of shrimp shell. We also tried the crispy rice. 75% of our table weren't fans, but I thought it was definitely bold on flavor. It was different and I have to admit, I actually enjoyed it and was happy to have not ordered run of the mill chicken wings.\n\nFor our entrees, we tried a variety of Thai fusion and authentic Thai. The garlic pepper scallops were very delicious. The scallops had a nice crust, but were also buttery and smooth. But my piece had a little grit to it, so I'm hoping it was pepper and not sand. The sauce was also an excellent topper for rice. Next up was the mint leaf duck which I found  equally tasty. Again, it was bold on the flavor and was not a winner at the table....but I liked it. The duck was a little gamey, but was balanced nicely by the refreshing mint and sweet peppers. Lastly, we tried the massaman curry which can be compared to a red curry with a kick to it - one that kind of reminded me of the flavor of Tom Yum soup.  \n\nThey have a great collection of wine to pair with their meal as well.\n\nAll in all an interesting experience.", "Lotus is a breath of fresh air in a sea of over-hyped, over-priced pretentious restaurants here in Las Vegas.\n\nThe ingredients are fresh and appropriate to the style.  Dishes are properly prepared and done quickly given the fact that the restaurant is always crowded.  They will adjust the level of \"heat\" to your liking to the best of their ability although some dishes have no choice but to be somewhat spicy due to the pre-prepared sauces used in their preparation. \n\nThey also have a remarkable wine list for a restaurant of this genre.  There are several Grand Cru Bordeaux choices with a range of vintages as well as all the usual suspects.  But, it IS Las Vegas :D\n\nYes, you have to plan ahead if you want to eat here.  People begin lining up out front more than half an hour befor opening time so don't be surprised if you're told an hour or longer for a walk-in.  Even though it is located in a decrepit strip mall you otherwise wouldn't give a second glance, everyone knows how good the food is and acts accordingly.", "Lotus of Siam is a great experience! A must try place in Vegas! Wonderful variety of Thai cuisine with a friendly and efficient staff!\n\nDefinitely recommend making a reservation- this place can get busy!", "Lotus of Siam is hands down the best thai restaurant in Las Vegas. This is the go to restaurant when I have friends visiting. The tofu rad na and fried snapper is my favorite. I highly recommend making reservations in advance because if not you're looking at a 30/45 minute wait.", "Lotus of Siam is really good Thai food.  It is clearly not in the world's best location, but you are going to Lotus for the food, not the massage parlor next door.  The menu is quite elaborate, and there are some unique items.  I typically ask the waiter for his recommendations and go with them. \n\nThe recommendations were all good, but I think that they recommend the same stuff to everyone.  I told him that we were adventurous, but he basically recommended the same stuff.  Jumbo Prawns (so-so), Crispy Duck (good sauce), some coconut milk dish with noodles (bland), Drunken Noodles with Sea Bass (great noodles), and pork satay (yum).\n\nThe main thing that I would have changed with my order was to make things more spicy. I'm a big spicy guy, but this was pretty mellow.  I am confused why he did not ask us the level of spiciness that we wanted.\n\nOverall, this is probably one of the better Thai restaurants in Vegas (and most likely Nevada).  If you are in town, its worth the journey to the north side of the strip to check it out.", "Love this place. One of the few things I miss about living in Vegas! Seafood spaghetti is to die for!!", "Luckily I didn't know about all the hype until we actually got here. I didn't realize it was a famous restaurant. It's off Sahara in the most unlikely spot, and it looks like a hole in the wall, but once you get in it's actually quite big inside. It was crazy busy on this Wednesday night but they were able to seat us about 15 minutes early.\n\nThe service is very fast and Asian-level friendly. We ordered the crispy duck with drunken noodles, stuffed chicken wings, Nua Nam Tok (charbroiled beef slices) and green curry. \n\nThe stuffed chicken wings were a disappointment. I've had better at other restaurants, and my own that i make are by far WAY better. The rest of the food was all really good, and my favorite was the crispy duck. The curry was very normal, nothing special. The Nua Nam Tok was maybe a 7/10. \n\nThe portions are TINY! For three people we probably could've used one more entree. We also ordered a glass of wine each, and it came to about $55 a person, which is damn expensive for Thai food.\n\nAll in all, it was good. I'd like to go back and try some other things on the menu, which, by the way, is HUGE. It's like 10 pages! But I dunno..I would also be just as happy going to the Thai place down the street from me for half the cost.", "MAKE A RESERVATION.\n\nDon't be a dumbass and not make a reservation.  If you are going to vegas and have about a week of notice, you should be able to get a slot no problem.  It's not a ridiculous wait for walk-ins, but it's an unnecessary wait if you just pick up the phone.\n\nThe food.\n\nIn short, thai food executed at a high level without being pretentious.\n\nMy recommendations:  \n\nAppetizers:\n\nSpicy garlic chicken wings - These wings are deep fried to get the skin nice and crispy and glazed in a sweet garlic chili sauce that make for the right balance of sweet, spicy, salty and crispy.\n\nNam Kao Tod:  \nCrispy rice with pieces of pork and green onion.  This dish, if I recall correctly has some spice to it.  Not for everyone, but a nice textual accompaniment.\n\nMains:\n\nPad Thai - A refreshingly light take on something that can be bogged down with sauce.  The right balance of noodles, peanuts and sauce.\n\nPad See Ew - This was good, I don't recall what was in it exactly\n\nGarlic prawns - If you order anything from this list, make sure you order these.  These are large prawns that are breaded and deep fried to the point where the shells are edible (if you don't mind a bit of chewing).  These are my favorite here.\n\nPanang curry - I'm not a curry fan, but this was good.\n\nIn short, catch a cab and look for the weird Green Door massage parlor and you'll see the line out the door for this place.   If you have reservations, you'll have a great dinner.", "My family and I was craving some thai food on our first night in Vegas and we stopped by here before checking into our hotel room. It's located in a strip mall on Sahara. The restaurant was surprisingly big and we got seated fairly quickly. The food was what really let me down. We ordered the shrimp tom yum soup (hot pot size), crab fried rice, thai papaya salad and beef pad se-ew. All dishes came out very petite and not meant for sharing. I would not recommend any of the dishes I ordered. The best dish was the crab fried rice. For the amount of food provided, the prices were high. I will not be coming back...not sure how this place got an average of 4 stars.", "My visit to Lotus of Siam last night was great, so I'm upping my stars to 4. Other than the hefty price tag for tiny portions, this place ROCKS.  Last night we went with a group of 8 and the service was just as great as my first visit. My boyfriend and I shared the crispy duck with drunken noodles and also the beef larb. Both dishes were just amazing and cooked to perfection. However, last time I ordered spiciness with a 3 and it was a tad bit too spicy, so this time I ordered with a 2 and there was no spice at all, lol. I think it's just a Thai thing and it depends on who's cooking that day. Either way, the food was excellent!", "Next to city Thai this is one of my fav spots.  That being said don't hate Grish but this place has the most velvety (as if this is a real word) Khao soi.  Short ribs Thai dish.", "Not sure what the hype is all about but I went with a group of friends and ordered chicken curry duck curry some sour soup crab fried rice. Everything was good, yes but the food is not better than Krung Siam off Spring Mountain. Lotus Siam was way too crowded and loud atmosphere.", "One of the best Thai Places out there, there are only 3 steps you need to follow.\n\nStep 1. Order Garlic Prawns\nStep 2. Order Roast Duck Curry\nStep 3. Eat and Repeat.\n\nEverything else is also really incredible, but the Garlic Prawn and Roast Duck Curry are just so spectacular.", "Ordered Tom Kah Kai soup with 8 level spicy and the Panang again. The soup was good and I don't think I ordered the same soup last time. Oh well. It seemed like it was extremely spicy this time for an 8. The next time, husband would've preferred 6 spicy. I ordered the drunken soft shell crab at 10 spice level. The soft shell crab was over taken by the home made chili and not as much basil that is on the drunken prawns. Texturally the prawns have a crunch that makes that dish shine versus the soft shell crab. In the future, I might try it at 9 spice level.", "Please take the time to peel yourself away from the buffet, away from the strip, and come to Lotus of Siam. This will now be a must-eat for me when I come to Vegas. Believe the hype, it is incredible here.\n\nSkip the stuff that sounds familiar; pad Thai, drunken noodles, etc. and go straight to the Northern Thai section of the menu. We ordered the Khao Soi which had egg noodles in a coconut cream curry base, beef, and pickled veggies. I wanted to dive into that broth it was so good and the noodles were the perfect texture. We also got the Northern Larb which was surprisingly light and spicy, lots of lime and pork. Lastly, we got Kang Ka Noon, the jackfruit curry. It was a nice balance to the other stuff we got, kind of a sweet-hot-sour flavor thing going on. It just sounded weird to us, so we had to try it. \n\nI highly recommend making a reservation, we would've been so hangry if we didn't do so. The wait was pretty long for those who walked in. The menu is so reasonably priced but tastes far more expensive. I'm not sure if I can eat Thai food anywhere else now!", "Probably the best Thai restaurant I've had the pleasure of visiting so far!!\n\nWhen you think you want a spice level of 8 and the wait staff recommend something lower....you should trust them.  We started our foray into their legendary cuisine with the glass noodles and were pre-warned about the heat level.  Those were some of the hottest noodles I've ever had.  It was definitely an experience everyone should have.  The rest of our dishes, which were also very hot compared to what I normally eat, were mild in comparison and at the end of the meal I craved the masochistic spice level of the noodles.\n\nEvery dish was excellent and the 40 minute wait was worth it.\n\nThe strip mall location is very deceiving and before you walk in you expect some sort of \"sleazy massage parlor full of henchmen waiting to kill you\" environment.  But once you walk in the door you are very nicely surprised at the decor, the lively ambiance, and the large array of wines.\n\nAndrew Zimmern's visit to Lotus of Siam:\nhttp://www.travelchannel.com/video/andrew-visits-lotus-of-siam\n\nNext time I return to Vegas I will definitely return here!  There are way too many items to try and it may take 10 more trips.", "Service wasn't the best but the food was amazing. I strongly recommend the Garlic Prawns!!", "Simply put, they live up to the hype, and deserve the accolades.\n\nThe famous garlic prawns definitely left a favorable, long standing impression on their food, so much so that even though we have to pay $15 for delivery, we order their food through the Postmates iPhone app.\n\nCombination fired rice, yum woon sen were also great. We want to explore other items in the future, but the garlic prawns will always be a roadblock for our small-ish appetite. But I can't complain when something is too good to skip.", "Softest pad see ew noodles I've ever had. That's weird but if you have theirs you'll understand... \nYou spend about $3 more on your fav Thai dishes but it really is all so delicious!", "Stopped by for a dinner on a recent trip.  This place used to be a hidden gem off strip, but with all of the press and great reviews, you probably want to get a reservation for dinner even on what seems like a quiet, midweek night.\n\nI had the red curry for my entree, spice level 8 (out of 10).  This is the only Thai place I know not to order their spiciest in the country.  The curry is more of a sou type rather than a stew style of curry.  sampling the broth, I did't notice the spice, but when you get the veggies and the meat, THERE is the spice!\n\nFound the service to be very attentive, food to be top notch.  If you are used to the vegas buffets and monster plates of food you can find other places around (like Hash House A Go-Go), you might be disappointed in the serving size, this is more of a healthy for you meal", "Thai food heaven.  \n\nI came here on a Thursday night around 8pm with no reservations (stupid me), but for 2, we only waited 30 minutes,  which isn't bad at all.  There were many people getting out of cabs and people were walking so fast into Lotus,  like a competition.  \n\nNow onto the food:\nI heard so many great things about this place and wanted to keep my expectations low,  just so I don't hype myself out.  But.. the food was to die for. The crispy duck with penang sauce was really good: the outer crispiness with the tenderness of the duck.\n\nI got a curry dish,  and it was perfectly seasoned. I used it as dipping sauce as well as for other items besides rice. \n\nThe sea bass over drunken noodles was also very tasty. \n\nI wish they had this in los angeles, going to vegas for Thai food is too much of a commute!", "Thai is my favorite. If I find a good Thai place, I am a loyal customer to the end. I even went to Thailand specifically to take cooking classes and had a wonderful time.\n\nI went to Vegas for my birthday weekend and one of my best friends raved about Lotus of Siam and encouraged me to go. So I went first thing I arrived and had my first dinner there. We ordered the stuff everyone raved about for our first dinner -- and I was beyond unimpressed. In fact, I didn't like a single one of the dishes. One of the dishes everyone said was a \"must order\" (Nam Kao Tod, aka crispy rice with sausage) I thought was awful. It was too salty, the rice was not crispy at all, and there was no actual flavor to distinguish that made it taste good.\n\nThe other \"must order\" (and is the cover photo on their home page) is the Garlic Prawns. They didn't suck but anything fried is pretty good as long as it's fresh. Unfortunately, they were dimensionless in flavor and had very little prawn meat (it was mostly fried shell and was overpriced).\n\nAnd lastly, because they're known for their Northern Thai dishes (which is hard to find in the US) and because I love jackfruit, we ordered the Kang Ka Joon (spicy young jack fruit curry) -- what I thought would be a curry turned out to be a tangy clear broth soup and the jackfruit was \"off\"in texture and the flavor was just ... flat.\n\nWe were beyond disappointed and the wait staff never came back to check in on us after delivering our food. We didn't want to throw the towel on the first go, so we went back on our last day to have our last meal (lunch) there. When we went back for our last lunch we decided to just stick with some classics: Pad See Ew, Green Curry Chicken, and Green Papaya Salad. We asked for the salad to be mild but it came out so flaming hot that they had to remake it for us. We asked for a 2 on a scale of 1 to 10, and they brought us a 10. The other two dishes were just fine. A solid B, but not something I would consider as \"the best Thai in North America.\" I love Jonathan Gold (the food writer for the LA Times) to pieces and his reviews are usually spot on, but I have to say that I would never go out of the way to go back to Lotus of Siam because I have had such good Thai all over the country (especially in Southern California and in New York City).\n\nAnd I wouldn't recommend anyone to go out of their way to go there, either. But if you're in Vegas and you have your own car and you're hankering for Thai food, this might be your best/only option. Otherwise, it's not worth the hype or the wait. Just go if there's no line or wait. Fortunately, we only waited 15 minutes for our dinner and for lunch we just walked in.\n\nI really wanted it to work out but honestly, it was just kind of meh. It's really too bad.", "The best Thai food I've ever had. Truly exceptional - tried the Tom Yum Koong soup (level 6 out of 10)- heavenly. I would come back for the soup alone. We also had the garlic prawn (recommend 100%) chicken pad Thai, chicken fried rice (best I ever had) chili basil ground chicken (definitely recommend), garlic wings and a strip steak. My boyfriend swears by the Thai iced tea but I'm more of a regular iced tea girl and both were great. HIGHLY RECOMMEND.", "The crispy duck panang is just amazing. The reviews, just like the flavors of this restaurant's food, is right on point. A bit pricey imo but glad I tried it. Also ordered the pad see ew which was so flavorful. Service was great too.", "The food at Lotus of Siam is so incredibly full of flavor and spice. You know that feeling when something's so spicy it's burning your mouth and you KNOW it's bad for you, but the food is too delicious to stop eating? My nose was in a constant state of runny but I ate so much I could barely make it to my show afterwards.\n\np.s. - There was a second Lotus of Siam that opened in NYC years ago, but it fell sorely short of expectations after having tried the original.", "The food was very good but this restaurant is overpriced.  Servings are small and prices extremely high.  Just because demand for Thai food is up it doesn't mean this establishment should take advantage and rip off patrons.", "The hubs was right ~ the best Thai food ever.  \n\nThe restaurant is unassuming from the outside, but once you step in the doors, a nice wine cellar is the backdrop for the hustle and bustle of a wonderful establishment.  \n\nFriendly service.  Super flavorful dishes and moist, tender meats.  \n\nWe ordered: \n- Crispy Rice appetizer - spicy and sour.  Puckering.  Party in my mouth.\n- Beef Salad - tender beef slices on tasty greens\n- Chicken Skewers - so dainty and tender.  Not your average chicken skewer.\n- Duck Curry - tender and lightly crisp duck pieces over noodles with curry.  Star of the show. \n\nAll delicious.  Very, very good.\n\nThanks, Lotus of Siam ~ you guys rock!", "The line can get ridiculous, but it's worth the wait.  This place is a bit different than your average Thai place, in that they serve both northern and southern Thai food.  Northern Thai is rare in the US, and it really shouldn't be. I had the Khao Soi, and it was delicious.\n\nPS, I would not try walking here.  Either drive or take a cab.", "The menu had so many delicious dishes to choose from. Seemed like there was a 100 different dishes and I love when restaurants offer a great variety. After trying to narrow down what to order, I said fuck it ! Let's order everything.  The steak tartar was almost perfect. Just a touch of sweetness and lime would've really rounded out the flavors but maybe that's not a true northern Thai steak tartar. Also had the Thai prawn sashimi, Panang short ribs koa soi, grilled steak dish , golden prawns, soft shell crab wide rice stir fry noodle dish, Tom yum soup ( soup was just okay) . Everything was pretty flavorful . I came on a Monday around 1:30 and the wait was not very long at all. I will def be back the next time I'm in town. Tried so hard to take a pic of the food but my mouth got to it all first oops", "The more I come here the more I love this place!! I love the garlic spawns and the soft shell crab is delious! My must stop everytime I come to vegas!", "This Thai restaurant is ranked among the highest in Las Vegas with so may awards hanging on the walls. I tried the food and it was good, but I have tasted better Thai food at few other smaller restaurants in Los Angeles. In my opinion, the reason that this restaurant has received so many awards is because this restaurant by far serves the most extensive menu. I don't rink there is any food left in Thailand that is not served at this restaurant. \nStill, I expect this restaurant to serve a better Thai ice tea than serving a ready made one bought in the market. \nI relatively eat spicy food in other restaurants, but I can't handle any Thai food with spice level rated more than 3, while they serve food up to spice level of 9. The spice numbering system is very tricky and the servers need to warn the novice customers when they order the spice level of the food higher than three.", "This a Vegas must go. Every time we come to Vegas, we come here. \n\nMake reservations! Or else you will be waiting forever. \n\nThe location is sketchy but the food is good. \n\nHighlights: \n-Thai Iced Tea\n-Garlic Prawns\n-Nua Katiem (Beef with garlic... Sounds so simple but so amazing) \n-Raw Prawns (not for the faint hearted. This is raw shrimp but sauce) it's so good \n-Crispy Catfish Salad. Sooooooo good!", "This is my 3rd visit here, TBH...it went down hill. All the dishes are extremely spicy, I meant EXTREMELY, almost uneatable and portions are too small. Well, I guess ...this is how they want to make money. Tom yum gain is too sour and cold, papaya salad is barely any, Thai BBQ chicken charged for whole chicken but only tiny little pieces like quail size. Good bye Lotus of siam, you're out of my lead.", "This place has THE BEST Thai food I've had. EVER. And I've had some good Thai food in Cali! 6 out of 5 stars, unofficially. The menu is HUGE, if only I could eventually get to every single one. That would be quite a feat...hmm...new blog ideas brewing. I had the very wonderful fortune of going with veterans of ordering at Lotus of Siam. I don't think I even opened the menu! They just knew exactly what to order, and I merely sat, anticipating each dish to enjoy.\n\nIn all seriousness, though...this place is beyond awesome. All the dishes we ordered were great! Make sure you know your spice levels. I LOVE spicy food, even if it hurts later. Just deal with it, folks.\n\nMy favorite: Tom Yum Kai -- the Tom Yum soup with chicken. WOW. It was the perfect amount of lemongrass and spice. I think by the end, it was a little spicy for us...but just make sure to pace yourself. I love putting some rice in my soup to help balance out the textures and also the spiciness. If you really like the lemongrass taste and the spice, get like a medium level spice (maybe something like a 5) and enjoy! This soup came out with the papaya salad (review of it down below), which was a little too much spice all at once. I saved some of my papaya salad to eat with the other dishes, since that's just a little too much spiciness to have together without anything else to balance it out.\n\nWhat else we ordered (EVERYTHING was delicious):\n\nCrispy duck: wow, it was very crispy and flavorful! Loved this dish, will definitely get it again next time. I see that a lot of people order this as a curry dish. I wonder if it makes a difference in the flavor of the duck itself, or even the curry itself? Well we had already ordered a separate curry noodle dish, so I guess I'm pretty happy with this choice. It keeps the integrity of the crunch and makes it crispy longer, that way. \n\nGarlic prawns: OK, so speaking of crispy. Holy Crispy Crunchy Crackling Goodness, Batman! Cap'n Crunch is put to shame. This is seriously one of the THE BEST crispy prawns I've had. I don't normally eat the shell of prawns, but I ate every tiny little crunchy bite of this prawn down to the tail. Oh my goodness, that's how good it is. Another great idea I had: make this into a bag of \"chips\" and I would buy the whole factory. For reals, though. Could someone please come up with that? It's nothing like the Shrimp flavored snacks that you find in Asian markets. This would have to replicate the crunch and flavor of this exact garlic prawn dish. Do it and let me know. \n\nBraised beef short ribs over noodles: I actually can't remember how this dish was...I think I was too busy with the other stuff above...Ooops. I guess I won't be ordering this dish next time LOL. \n\nPapaya Salad: I don't know why I'm adding this at the end, even though it was one of the first dishes that came out. It was really good and fresh, as far as papaya salads go. I feel like this dish was a little overpowered by all the other dishes, so I'm sorry that this became like the poor neglected pet who gets shoo-ed away when a new baby arrives in the family. \n\nI think I've written enough now. I hope you guys enjoy this place as much as I did! I really can't wait to go back...", "This place is authentic and good. Price is similar to other Thai Restaurants. On a few items they are more expensive. Portions are small.", "This place is way overated! We ordered the tom kha kai; and it was extremely salty and sour. The crispy duck curry and drunken noodle were quite boring, nothing special. Plus they are overpriced! Service was also really bad. With the money that I spent here, I rather go to some Thai restaurant on the Las Vegas Strip to enjoy better food and service. It was like a joke to me!", "This place use to be good.  I'm not sure what happened to their food and portions.   Somehow the food became bland and their portions are a lot smaller.   We had to order more than usual to accommodate the five of us and we still left hungry.   So disappointing.   I don't think we will be coming back here anymore.", "This place. I love this place. I went here based on a recommendation from a friend and it has changed my taste buds forever. Every time I come here, I order a feast of food. \n\nThe crispy duck panang curry is amazing, the beef pad se-ew is delicious, the Tom Kha Kai soup, perfect, and the garlic prawns are a must have. It can be a bit pricy, however the food is truly worth the price (and wait). \n\nI would recommend making a reservation prior to coming here because the wait can be at least an hour on a typical weekday. However, they do their best to accommodate you. The staff is also friendly and the last time I came here, they were very quick to serve the five dishes I ordered. \n\nIf you come to Vegas, please make sure you stop by Lotus of Siam, you won't regret it.", "Tried out Lotus of Siam because it had good reviews on CH and Yelp plus it was on Anthony Bourdain's Parts Unknown Vegas show that we just watched before coming here.\n\nMaybe reservations by phone a few weeks before coming here.  That was easy to do.  Ask them for the cross street, because if you have a dinner reservation it's hard to find the place!\n\nEveryone says to get the Northern Thai dishes at LOS.  So we tried a few things:\n\nKhao Soi $10.95 - egg noodle curry soup.  We thought it was just ok, nothing special.\nSome red onions, pickles, lime on the side.\n\nKang Hung Lay $10.95 - red pork curry.  It was a small dish of just pork and curry sauce w/ some cilantro on top.  Tasted just ok, nothing special.\n\nNorthern Tom Kah Soup $10.95 - a bit spicy and sour without coconut milk soup, chicken is dry, some grape tomatoes flavorless, some mushroom, meh.\n\nSticky rice $2 - for 1 person, meh, dry.\n\nThai ice tea $2.5 - very sweet!  Had to dilute it with lots of water & ice.\n\nHot tea $2 - some container of hot tea w/ tea bag, nothing special.\n\nGlad I tried it, but probably won't go back.", "Truly the most AMAZING thai food you can get in America! My husband and I make trips to Vegas just for this food! \n\nLotus of Siam is off the beaten path in Vegas but any concierge or taxi butler knows Lotus of Siam. I highly suggest you make a reservation, the restaurant is quit large since they expanded but the tables fill up quickly.\n\nThe atmosphere is nothing to write home about but the service and food is perfect. I would recommend getting a wine recommendation with your meal. They have quite an extensive list off Rieslings that perfectly compliment any thai meal.\n\nSeriously EVERYTHING is amazing but I would make 1 special recommendation....it is not on the menu but they will make a fried sea bass in massaman curry that will blow your mind!\n\nIf you love thai food...please go here...you won't be sorry!", "Type. . . . . . . . . . ..Thai Restaurant\nLocation. . . . . . . ..Strip Mall Old Vegas\nPrices. . . . . . . . . ..Below Average, Cheap\nBeer Selection. . ...Unknown, Famous for Riesling Selection \nFood Level. . . . ....Very Good to Excellent\nStaff. . . . . . . . . . ..Prompt, Professional, Top Notch\nNoise Level. . . . ...Lively \nD\u00e9cor. . . . . . . . . ..Outdated Fancier, Celebrity Photo Walls\nGood for Kids. . ...Sure\nParking. . . . . . . ...Private Shared Lot \nCash Only. . . . . ..No\nRecommended. ..Yes\nComments: This has one of the most extensive and authentic Thai menus I've seen in the US beating out many places in California by a long shot. Menu is perhaps too extensive, but everything at our table was fantastic. Notable recommendations would be the soft shell crab pad kee mao (drunken noodles), the crispy garlic prawns appetizer (fried shrimp shells are edible and yummy), nam khao tod (a Lao dish with sour pork and crispy rice). There are curries, massaman, Lao dishes, Issan province dishes, and more. Wine selection focuses on Riesling, which range from $20-65 per bottle.", "Unbelievably tasty Thai food. Enormous menu which makes choosing just a few dishes extremely difficult. Lots of seating, always busy, food absolutely flies out of the kitchen in no time. Service was very friendly and professional. I go to Vegas a lot and will reserve for dinner every time I'm in town going forward. It lives up to the hype.", "Vegas has been 2 for 2 for me as far as venturing away from Buffets!\n\nLotus of Siam did not disappoint, the service was great and attentive.  We got our food FAST!! Seriously, probably within 10 minutes of ordering.\n\nOur list of plates included : prawns, duck w/ panang sauce, sausage, chicken wings and drunken noodles... everything was so amazing! The prawn was so finger licking good that I can probably just eat the shells all day long!  The sausage was flavorful and the wings were crisp!!!  What stood out the most however, was the duck with panang sauce, that was perfection a definitely must try!!! TENDER, FLAVORFUL and full of character\n\nI will definitely be back next time I'm here in Vegas!! :D", "WOW... best thai food I've ever had, this place is probably what I'll miss most about Vegas when I home to OC. \n\nFrom the outside I assumed the restaurant would be a small hole in the wall but when you go inside, to the right of the small dining room is a large dining room (which makes this place a big hole in the wall I suppose) . The decor is minimal, the furniture was kinda old and basic.  \n\nThe food? AAAAAHHHHMAAAZEBALLS! Everything had SO much flavor. Since I came in a party of 3 we were not able to have much of a variety but we ordered 4 dishes. Crying tiger, garlic prawns, crispy duck panang and seafood padthai (off menu item). \n\nEverything was bomb.com but the duck curry stood out to me most. The meat was crispy & sauce was so flavorful. Fried garlic prawns was very garlicy and prawns tasted fresh.\n\nService was nice & friendly. Definitely coming here EVERYTIME I'm in town!", "Was intrigued by the good reviews and that it has been featured on Anthony Bourdain's show! Let me state that this restaurant gets pack, so call in for reservation if possible, even on a weekday. We ordered four different dishes; chicken pad Thai, chicken dumplings, crispy fried garlic prawns and spicy chicken soup(M) all were small portions but tasted tremendous. The star of the show was the crispy fried garlic prawns. That dish alone is well worth the trip to this restaurant. Definitely a must for my next Vegas trip!!!!!!!!", "We did not have a single bad dish. The food is excellent. Don't forget to order from the Northern Menu. The larb is good, the chilean sea bass is delicately prepared. The Garlic shrimp is awesome! The seafood drunkin noodles is perfectly cooked without being too greasy like many other spots.\n\nThe wine pour is very poor. So that is my only complaint", "We got the jackfruit curry and the catfish curry. The jackfruit didn't have any flavor, but that may be due to the fruit being cooked with the curry too long. Br catfish curry was cooked well. We also got wontons and dumplings. Those were excellent.", "We ordered and shared several dishes including roasted duck curry and the crispy rice app. It was all delicious.", "We were recommended this restaurant by a colleague who had heard about this restaurant that specializes in Northern Thai Cuisine. If you are visiting Vegas, invest in the cab ride out to Lotus of Siam because it is worth it! They have many dishes that you would not find at any other Thai restaurant. Unfortunately, since there were only two of us, we were only able to partake of three dishes. One was the thai sausage (they have 2, we got the one in the back part of the menu). It was spiced unlike any other sausage we'd ever had and was very tasty. We ordered pork belly and chinese brocoli (gai lan) in oyster sauce. It was a simple dish made with very fresh ingredients. The last dish we tried was drunken noodle soft shelled crab. This dish was just very tasty. I had been concerned that the medium spicy sauce we had specified would overwhelm the crab, but it just complimented the crab perfectly. The service was terrific, relaxed, informative, and attentive. The atmosphere of the restaurant was very nice. It was full, but it did not feel rushed. I take off one star because of the decor. Once inside, I felt like I was in an Italian restaurant with a huge wine room. That said, I would come back again and again to work my way through their menu.", "We were somewhat disappointed as we had hoped for a better experience. In a nutshell, the food was good but the service lacking. I had the Tom Kah Kai soup which unfortunately arrived lukewarm. Then came my Penang Curry with Tofu which was very good. Unfortunately my wife had to wait for her Seared Scallops with cabbage for quite a while and consequently her rice was cold. She enjoyed the Scallops but........food good but not outstanding and the service was questionable.", "Went back a second time the night before Thanksgiving.  Continues to provide a wonderful experience for your taste buds.  Order the northern cuisine people!  Every trip to Vegas will include a trip to LoS for us.", "What a phenomenal place! My cousin brought me here when I was visiting Vegas from the east coast.  It's located in a quiet shopping center, I couldn't believe how busy the restaurant was until I stepped inside.   \nSo we got their famous garlic prawns - definitely remarkable, so flavorful and perfectly cooked, you can't get this anywhere else!   The crispy duck with penang curry was so good - the duck meat was tender with crispy skin in the flavorful penang sauce.   Pad thai was the best pad thai I've ever had.  \nThis place gets really busy even on week nights, make sure to call for reservation.\nI wish I could have stayed in Vegas for longer and come back a few more times to try other dishes on their menu.  I'll definitely return when I come to Vegas next time!", "What's wrong with getting the flu in a James Beard rated restaurant? Ruining the meal for the table sitting next to you. Guys, I am so sorry. Let this be a lesson to ALWAYS GET YOUR FLU SHOT. I've been here many times and the food is awesome. Though nothing compares to the level of service of the nicest hostess tending to you when you suddenly develop symptoms in the middle of the dining room. I am so sorry. Lotus of Siam remains, in my opinion, the best Thai in the country.", "When we have visitors, they always want to go here because for them it is a real treat! I don't disagree. The food is great! We are always happy to make this the spot to meet and visit!\n\nDo I think it is the best Thai in the city, I have to be honest. No, I don't.\n\nBut they have some great dishes! Crispy Duck! YES!\nThe scallops are amazing! Noodle dishes are pretty great as well.\n\nI know everyone is crazy about the Garlic Prawns. Our order was 25% shrimp and 75% fried shrimp shells. Which our waiter assured us were edible and delicious. Not a fan of them. Sorry. \n\nThe service has always been A+ since we have been going. \nWords of wisdom- MAKE A RESERVATION!! The wait can be a hour+\n\nNo matter how you look, always fun to bring people to a place that has been on so many TV Shows, and frequented by both local and world celebs!", "Who knew I would have a compelling reason to go to Vegas just to get Thai food, something that I could literally find every few blocks where I live.\n\nBut before you get excited to visit this place, you'll have to find it. You really can't see the restaurant from the street, but once you turn into a plaza and notice a huge empty parking lot, you are definitely getting warmer. \n\nI went with a lot of choices as advised by yelpers- the prawns with drunken noodles, the crispy duck in panang curry (it's been weeks since I've been but the name has stuck with me) and the last was a beef dish that I don't quite remember the name. The prawns were gigantic and cooked with such a nice crunch to them. The noodles that comes with it is a perfect accompaniment, even with your white rice! I also loved loved loved the duck. Great crunch on the skin and the curry had a reasonable kick to it- loaded with flavor. Both of these dishes I would no doubt get again. The beef dish- while the beef was cooked nicely was not a favorite of mine. It was doused in something that resembled BBQ sauce that I wasn't a huge fan of (and notice how I said doused, they probably put too much on the meat).\n\nAll in all, it was a delicious meal. It is on the pricier side for lunch but, I personally think it is worth every penny. Don't be shy and ask for more rice if you need something to soak up all that curry. Truly a 5 star for me!", "Worth the wait!\nCame here because of my foodie friend's string recommendation on a  Friday night.  Arrived about 15 minutes before Lotus of Siam's 5:30 PM opening time.  Got our party of 4 seated right away.  So many delicious choices.  The waiter was helpful in making our selections.  The scallops, shrimp, and satay were absolutely delicious.  The Yelp reviews were also helpful.  Definitely coming back - this place is less than 5 miles off the strip.  Easy can ride.", "Wow this place did not disappoint at all and was better than I expected.  Came with a decent sized group so we got to try a few dishes and almost all of them were really good.  The dishes came out faster than I expected which was great since we have impatient little kids.  Make reservations b/c this place is crazy busy on the weekends.\n\nRecommended:\nSeabass in drunken noodles\nkhao soi\nThai Beef Salad\nGarlic Shrimp\nThum Ka Noon - jackfruit with pork\n\nDecent:\nSoftshell crab with drunken noodles: too little crab\nCrispy duck penang - Crispy duck is good but penang curry is like any other red curry at other places\nNua yum katiem - spicy and not as good as the other beef salad\nNam Kao tod - good flavors but not the best appetizer", "Wow, was Lotus of Siam excellent! Wonderful service, the most extensive list of German wines I've seen outside of Germany (and what could go better with Thai food than German wine?) and outstanding food, the best Thai I've ever had. The northern Thai sausage was my favorite item, followed closely by the eggplant and mushroom appetizer. Lots of complex flavors expertly developed. My thanks to Anthony Bourdain for the recommendation.", "Yes, it is located in a shopping strip in an older part of town, but do not hesitate to go. The server was so kind and gracious, the curry was some of the best I have ever tasted, and the value was unbelievable.  Even if you think you don't like Thai, you're going to love this place.", "everything was really good. the garlic prawns, \nduck, \npad thai, \nand wonton soup are things i would recommend.\n\nthere was a long wait (about an hour), so i would suggest making a reservation.", "food tasty\ninside decor outdated and feels dirty\ngarlic prawns was the best\nduck curry was good", "pad thai noodle taste like sweet sour sauce/every dish was delicious,but only this dish was very dispointed,", "went for dinner with 7 people tonight. the place was like a complete circus.\nit was very noisy, the waitstaff were rude and unfriendly and it seemed as\nThough Their own culture were getting service. our food was cold and had to\nBe reheated and interestingly enough they threw the18  percent tip on at the \nEnd. there has to be better thai food in LV, and to be quite frank. This place\nNeeds an overhaul and clearly they have grandiose thinking that they are\nSo great because of prior ratings. I definitely would not waste my time and money.\n\n\nVery disappointing........"]
[2015, "seaons3"]	["2nd visit for us during the 4th of July week! This time I had garlic drunken noodle.  It was delish!", "4.5 stars!\nGreat restaurant! The outside is a little funky and the interior is not fancy at all. However the food is fantastic! Very authentic Thai food. We had spring rolls which were crisp and delicious. Pineapple fried rice and drunken noodles with prawns which was absolutely fantastic! \nAgain this is not a high end experience restaurant just a gem off the strip with really good Thai food that is reasonably priced.", "4.5 stars\n\nGarlic prawns 5 stars\nSliced garlic beef 5 stars\nTum yum noodle soup 4 stars\nChili mussels 3 stars\n\nBeen to Vegas many times and this is my first time here. Will definitely be returning on future trips. Service is friendly and fast.", "A hidden gem for the adventurous.  I had been forewarned that the restaurant was in a kind of seamy strip mall, but was world class.\n\nIt lived up to its billing.  It specializes in a wide range of Thai food, particularly from the north.  We let the waiter suggest an appetizer.  It was so good, we decide to let them impress us with whatever they wanted to bring.\n\nIt was amazing, one of the best dining experiences that I have had in years.", "Absolutely awesome!!!", "Absolutely delicious food. Everything on the menu is so good. Can't wait to go back and try more things.", "Absolutely delicious!!! I'm craving it RIGHT NOW! We first heard of this place on the airplane while eavesdropping, then our friend we were meeting for dinner suggested it. We typically go to fancy restaurants when we meet up with them, but we were totally down to try this place because we know she knows GOOD FOOD.\n\nWhen we got in the taxi from the Wynn hotel, the taxi service man told us that it was voted the #1 Thai restaurant by Zagat for over 10 years. WE were sold!\n\nIt DID NOT disappoint! They have the biggest selection of Thai food and wine! We paired are good with Riesling which was so delicious for balancing the flavor. \n\nI can't wait to come back here. The wait IS long. We went at 9:45pm which is when they take the last table searing. The restaurant closes at 10pm", "After only hearing reviews upon reviews for the past several years, we finally made our way to the infamous Lotus! We ordered the Tom Yum soup, pad thai, another soup based noodle dish (I can't remember the name of) and the garlic prawns.\n\nThe tom yum soup, slightly different flavor from what we were used to, but it was still really good. Pad thai, not the very best, yet it still ranks up there. The other noodle dish, wasn't the best, that's probably why I couldn't remember the name of it. Lastly, the star of the show, the garlic prawns! Very tasty and filling, one complaint that I do have about it was that it was a little dry and over cooked. The prawns didn't have that moist, buttery taste to it. \n\nIt's a very busy place, if you make a reservation and you're five minutes late, you'll lose your reservation. The popularity of this place is well deserved, yet I cannot claim it was the best Thai restaurant I've ever been to. Yet, it is a legacy restaurant and if you're ever in Vegas, you have to try it at least once.", "Always have to stop by this place when I go to Vegas.\nTheir curry is not as good as couple Thai restaurants I have been to. But other stuffs are really good. Khao soi is my favorite here. Service is wonderful. Very busy in the weekend.", "Amazing Food but be ready to wait to be seated.", "Amazing Food! You would never know how great this place is based on it's outward appearance and location but the inside is upscale, elegant and the some of the best thai food in the city!", "Amazing food & decent service.  Make sure you have reservations, there was a line out the door when we arrived and the wait was 2 hours.  The star dish of the night was the drunken noodle soft shell crab but everything was wonderful and seasoned exactly to our taste. Service was friendly and efficient but it was not responsive for refill requests, and replacement forks.  All in All we had a wonderful time and will definitely be dining here every time we are in Vegas in the future.", "Amazing food! I recommend a reservation as it will take a while if you just walk in... but it's so worth the wait.", "Another spot we visited on our trip to Vegas. Coming from San Diego and living by quite a few Chinese/Asian restaurants and having a Chinese girlfriend I expect certain things at a restaurant like this. There stuffed chicken wings were freaking amazing. I would go back for those but only those. There sticky rice was hard and dry, there garlic wings were the same. The garlic wings looked as if they had made a huge batch hours before we ordered them and they had them under a heat lamp waiting to be ordered. They tasted the way they look, dry and old. There spicy fried rice was ok, but for $13 dollars anywhere back in San Diego I would have gotten three times the amount. Definitely not worth what you pay for it. The service was also weird. Both the guy serving our food and the other guy who was walking around, looking like a manager of some sort. They just had very odd personalities and seemed a bit unsure about every thing lol.", "As good as promised.  We ate family style and every dish was amazing.  The wine list is tough to beat.", "Ate here Monday 31st August 2015 and wow it was busy, we had to wait a little bit for a table so I can only imagine what a weekend would be like. There were 6 of us. The 5 other people I dined with are American and i'm British. I don't know if the U.S. is lacking in good Thai restaurants but this place for me was just 'good' despite previously being told by my American friends that this place is amazing/delicious/fantastic...\n\nHalf of us ordered chicken pad thai and the other half of us ordered green or yellow chicken thai curry. We had soup and spring rolls for starters. The food in my opinion was tasty, but nothing that excited my taste buds. The sauce for the curry was a little watery in my opinion and the spring rolls lacked in flavour. If I could give this restaurant 3.5 out of 5 I would as i'm teetering between giving 3 or 4 stars. The service was just ok, not as attentive as they could have been but not impossibly slow. I had a lovely evening but that was mainly more due to the company than the food. I do have to say though that the portions are very generously sized and the prices are reasonable. \n\nI wouldn't go out of my way to come back here next time i'm in Vegas as cab fare is about $25 each way, not too bad if there's a group of you but if there's only you and one other then maybe not. I would only return IF I or someone I was travelling with had a strong craving for Thai food when in Vegas but other than that, I live in the North of England and there are tonnes of Thai restaurants in our city centres of Leeds & Manchester of which i've ate at many of them and have had much better Thai food back home in the U.K. This isn't the worst Thai restaurant i've been to, it's just okay/nice/pleasant.. nothing outstanding.", "Ate there twice this week. Food is great!! What was disappointing was that the hostesses are not welcoming or friendly at all. Servers are ok. Great food, mediocre service. Staff seems burnt out. Kudos to the kitchen.", "Awesome food but pretty pricey.", "Awesome!\nThe location is shady. However, once you walk in, you are transformed into a new world.\nDef worth trying.", "Be sure to bring your high limit credit card to this tourist trap.. leave your appetite at home if you're hungry for a asian dinner, The food was tasty, but so little of it. We ordered several dishes and just enough food was served to barely cover the bottom of the serving dishes.. The service \nwas scanty at best, as I was being taken to our table after 45 min. wait outside the waiter/busman stopped in front of me and pulled a chair out in front of me in the narrow walk area. then looked up and grinned. The beverage boy failed to bring our beverages; that he requested we ask him for. After a very long wait from order placement with the \"waiter\" another person brought the tiny food to the table it was cold. He ran off very quickly.The \"waiter\" was busy bussing the empty table next to us. I am sure that he was anxious to seat another group of victims. The wine by the glass is very expensive. 8.50 for a four ounce serving. We ordered two glasses of syrah from the \"waiter\" after some effort flagging him down. He brought one glass, The amount in the glass was so small, I thought that I was to taste first....He did not understand that the order was for me and my date( two glasses, please ). The food is tasty, but very ordinary few vegetables and meats This is a 4 $$$$ expensive dining experience. dinner is served on shiny tables with paper place mats and a single paper napkin, no spoons, knives, or second fork. Everything must be ordered with the dinner, or you won't get seen again by the staff, before the tab presentation. Glad to get out unhurt, but still hungry. Never Again..", "Been here twice and it is what they all say it is.  I'm drooling already without even getting into the dishes!  It's a pretty busy and popular place despite the location.  A little iffy and sketchy.  Just make sure you don't leave anything valuable anywhere!  Take it with you.  There is a line before it opens, so be sure to get there early.  We got there just in time when they open and we got a seat.  We knew what to ordered immediately.  Service is great as usual.  Placed our orders and waiting oh-so patiently.  The crispy duck panang...mm mmm MMMMM!!!  we had to order two of those.  Pad See Eww with beef was delicious, the fish larb was my first and it was actually really tasty.  I usually get the norm - chicken.  We also ordered the crispy rice salad dish.  That was a good combo, love the crunchiness.  Spicy fried rice was perfect, I don't think you can really go wrong with what you order.  Unless you have food restrictions. And for the finale, you cannot go to a thai place and not order mango with sticky rice!!!  My absolute favorite dessert.", "Best Thai food I've EVER had. Get everything. 'Nough said. \nCome when it opens and maybe you'll be seated fairly quickly.", "Best Thai food I've ever had. The wait for a table is always worth it. This place is in a dump of a shopping center but don't let that scare you. Yum yum yum!!!", "Best Thai food I've had in a long time. This place is off the strip in a shady looking strip mall, but well worth the trip. I hear it can go from \"shady\" to \"seedy\" at night. We went there on a Sunday afternoon for lunch and had no wait to get a table. We had the Tom Yum Kai (hot and sour soup with chicken and lemon grass) and it was one of the best I've ever had. They asked us how spicy on a 1-10 scale. We said 5, and I'm glad I didn't go over that, because it was definitely spicy - not unpleasantly so, but I would probably order a 3 or 4 next time.\n\nFor main courses we got the Garlic Prawns which are as good (if not better) than all the reviews say. The prawns are fried with the shells still on them, and they get crispy \"like potato chips\" according to the menu, and are super tasty. We also ordered the Crispy Duck on Drunken Noodles. There were only a couple pieces of duck that were actually \"crispy,\" but wow was it tasty. \n\nThe only problem with it being off the strip is that it took us ONE HOUR to get a cab to pick us up. Some of the cab companies said they wouldn't even pick us up. I would recommend driving yourself as there's plenty of parking. If you do take a cab or uber, I would recommend calling them before you even ask for your bill, because it might take a while. The food is so good, I'm still giving it 5 stars though. \n\nI will come back here each and every time I go to Vegas so I can try something else on the menu.", "Best Thai food around!!!! Pork Larb and Garlic Prawns were outstanding.  There was a little wait, but it was worth it. Waiter was very good and took great care of us.", "Best Thai food ever, even for vegetarians. Yum", "Best Thai in Vegas.  Hands down.  Crappy location, but great food and very reasonably priced.", "Best dish ever, Drunken Noodles with Sea Bass.  Enough said.", "Big Fan of Mrs. Redd's pies!!! Every flavor, especially lemon.\nBut I am missing them terribly since the Food 4 Less closed in Vegas Valley.\nIt is most unfortunate the Kroger chain does not carry these in every store...ie Smith's. SO Delicious!!!", "Came here and made the mistake of not making a reservation. Waited an hour in the stuffy waiting area.  When we got seated we ordered the pad Thai, the salt and pepper prawns and a beef dish. The pad Thai was really good. Loved the sweet noodles. \n\nThe fried prawns were good but I don't think that's it's worth 27 bucks..... Definitely not worth it for me. The prawns were big and the flavor was good though. \n\nI also ordered a Thai ice tea and it was wayyyy too sweet. I think next time I will order better dishes that are not so pricey. But I definitely will come back and try again... with a reservation.", "Can't disagree with the critics, it is the best Thai restaurant in the country. If you don't eat here you are missing out.", "Chef Jet Tila and Anthony Bourdain: \"Don't order Pad Thai. Go to the back of the menu and order Northern Thai specialties.\" \n\n\n\n Thai food, more specifically, delicious, authentic Thai food is almost impossible to find. Being a traveler, I've been seeking something that would be comparable to what I've tasted when I was in Thailand. For me and my friends, we had to travel to Las Vegas, Nevada in order to experience what I believe is to be the best Thai food outside of Thailand...and it's only an hour flight away from LAX. \n\n Saipin Chutima is a James Beard Award recipient offering traditional, authentic Northern Thai recipes that were passed down from generation to generation. It is a step away from the sweet and tangy flavors that so many of us have been exposed to and are familiar with. \n\nA line congregates outside of the restaurant before opening its doors for service. The menu sits like a book, with numerous dishes to choose from. The d\u00e9cor is simple, casual and a little outdated (but who honestly cares when you're here for the food). Photos of famous people who have visited the restaurant line the walls. And the food...well, it's simply superb. \n \nMY FAVORITE DISH. EN TUAN (HOT POT: $13.95): Spicy and sour soup with beef tendon, bean sprouts and beef slices. I seriously dream about this soup day in and day out after I had my first taste. The broth was full of flavor....bold, luxurious with a lot of depth. Hints of garlic can be tasted in the soup that was seasoned well. The tendon was perfectly cooked with the best texture that ever was put forth in soup. I could slurp this forever and never get sick of it! Thank goodness we got a bowl. It was more than enough for a group of four and the fire in the middle definitely kept the soup hot. We asked for a spice level of 5 and could not taste any spiciness unfortunately (maybe we just have a high tolerance).  \n\n \nLARB WITH PORK ($10.95): Ground pork, chopped onion, green chili, and lime juice served with fresh cabbage. The salad was fresh, with a nice balance of acidity and refreshing. Slightly spicy and nicely seasoned. I enjoyed it but the next time I'm there, I wanna try the Northern larb salad.  \n\nDRUNKEN NOODLE SOFT SHELL CRAB ($22.95): Deep fried soft shell crab with homemade fresh chilis and Thai basil served on top of pan fried flat rice noodle. I loved this dish. The crab was extremely crispy and retained its crispiness throughout the remainder of the meal (although it wasn't long since we scarfed everything down pretty quickly). The noodles were nicely cooked and was a bit spicy. They didn't ask our spice level and I assumed they kept it at a 5, which was the perfect spice for a good kick.  \n\n \nCRISPY DUCK WITH PANANG ($24.95): Crispy duck topped with Thai style red cream curry sauce with cognag. This was absolutely delicious. The duck was extremely crispy. The panang curry was rich and spicy. It was slightly sweet, yet savory and full of flavor. This was definitely one of my favorite dishes and a must order.  \n\nTHUM KA NOON- POUNDED AND SHREDDED YOUNG JACK FRUIT ($10.95): This local dish from the north is unique to the northern part of North Thailand. Made of shredded young jack fruit, ground pork, tomatoes, northern Thai spices and seasoning. This was seriously my second favorite dish. I loved everything about it. It was sweet, a little tangy and a bit sour and spicy. The texture was similar to shredded meat. As full as I was, I couldn't stop eating this dish.  \n\n \nMANGO WITH SWEET STICKY RICE- SEASONAL ($8.95): Sweet, delicious, good. The mangoes were ripe and the rice was perfect. Enough said.  \n\nOverall, you can't go wrong when ordering at Lotus of Siam. Chutima managed to bring dishes that you normally wouldn't find at your local Thai restaurant. It's a special place when literally everything you order tasted phenomenal. I had a difficult time deciding my favorite dish amongst the amazing dishes. When you dream about the food and can't get it out of your head, then you know you've found a gem. The next time I visit Lotus of Siam, I need to try the Nam Prik Noom (just sayin'). Word of advice: Book a reservation because lines form before the place even opens.", "Crispy Duck is really good! The service was fast. The place outside looks like an abandoned place but really cool inside with a big open wine cellar! Must try!", "Crispy Garlic Shrimp - I almost cried it was sooooooooo good. \n\nNorthern Red Curry - YUM! \n\nThe wine list is AMAZING!", "Crispy duck and classic northern Thai dishes really set this place apart. If you enjoy going authentic but are new and are not sure what to order, just ask. The staff are great for noobs. I was only able to do lunch here, however it brought me directly back to both my vacations to Thailand.", "Date & Time:  Wednesday July 8, 2015 @ 6pm\nDining Companions:  Uncle, Auntie, Sister-in-Law, Brother-in-Law, Cousins, Nephews, Mommy & Husband\nScene:  Families & Groups in Tank, Tees, Shorts & Flip Flops\nDevour: Shrimp in a Blanket, Panang Duck Curry, Fried Rice, Pad Thai, Pad Seew, Beef Dishes\nTotal:  $172.63", "Definitely overhyped, but then again I fall for the trendy hyp-est things in the world. It's my own fault. I went with only 1 other person so I wasn't able to order many things, which made me sad, but what made me EVEN more sad was the $30 cab ride it took to get here. SIGHPIE. We ordered:\n\n2 thai teas - average\n1 pad thai - really good, I was pleasantly surprised and the portions are ok\n1 green chicken curry - the sauce is really thin and milky, definitely not enough meat or veggies in this dish\n1 famous fried shrimp - this is probably my FAVORITE thing so far. The shrimp was crunchy and flavorful. Definitely worth the $15 price tag\n1 ground pork with spices appetizer - probably the most disappointing. This dish was unusually sour, like so sour it was hard to even swallow it without a huge gulp of water. When I gooogled this place, this was one of the most popular dishes. I say, if you're used to common simple thai dishes, this is not going to be to your liking", "Delicious , high quality food and the restaurant got nice design . \n\nFood : 10/10 .\n\nWill come back next time when back to Vegas. This restaurant will be on my list .", "Delicious food and clean", "Delicious, Get the beef kao soi #1 heat level with extra coconut cream! It is to die for!", "Does Lotus of Siam need another five star review? Probably not. It speaks volumes that tourists seek out this restaurant located in a seedy, hole-in-the-wall commercial district in droves. It's that good.", "Does this place really have over 2400 reviews?  If you can't tell, the word is out on this place.  And it won't disappoint.  So why would I need to add one more review to an overwhelming outpouring of opinion?  Just to add some cautions:\n\n1) Make the chefs happy and go for the back of the menu where the specialties are.  Don't even think about ordering Pad Thai!\n\n2)  If you like Riesling, they have an overwhelming list.  But we always seem to get a bottle that has gone into secondary fermentation.  If you consider a bit of gas to be a fault (as I do), you'll likely have to return it for something else.  Or just give up and enjoy the bubbly!\n\n3)  Watch the temp on the spice, it gets hot FAST.  Bring facial tissues and enjoy the heat.\n\n4)  MAKE RESERVATIONS, ASAP!  While they seem to make every effort to accommodate those without, this place is ridiculously popular and will always be booked up.\n\n5)  Don't judge a book by its cover.  When you pull up, it will look like a dump.  The area is old, run down and looks a bit scary, though it's largely abandoned.  Go inside and you will find a nice restaurant.\n\nBut do go and try it.  It is really good if you order right!", "Don't see what's the big deal . Very simple place , super packed , 2 h waiting for just average quality food . Oh and you will be served so fast you lol be done in 10 min ... And you will be put under pressure to leave coz next person waiting .", "Every once in a while, we get the urge for salmon tartar....this is where we go! FANTASTIC!", "Every since I saw this restaurant from the food channel, I wanted to come here to try the authentic Thai food. I've been to Thailand only once so it is difficult to me to determine if the dish is authentic or not. But I can tell whether the dish is tasty or not. Thai tea was great. The dishes were very tasty. Unfortunately I don't remember the name of the dishes that I got but I will attach the photos of the food that I had. When I came here which was around 1:45pm, there was an hour wait so be aware of the lines that you need to bear before getting the great meal.", "Every time we've gone to Lotus of Siam we laugh at the surroundings because it's in a huge dead strip mall in Vegas. That being said it is one of the places to go in if you're in the city.\n\nI've heard Lotus of Siam being dubbed the best Thai restaurant in the entire west coast. I wouldn't got that far but it is delicious. You have your usual dishes like Pad Thair or Pad Sew Ew but what you really want to check out is the northern dishes on the last couple pages. These are regional Thai plates that you don't usually see in the U.S. \n\nWe tried the Yellow Curry with Chicken, Chicken Satay, Red Curry with Chicken, and Kha Nom Jean Nam Ngyow. Chicken Satay is pieces of chicken cooked on skewers with a yellow sauce, while the Kha Nom Jean Nam Kgyow is a noodle dish with ground pork in a red soupy sauce. We finished with the fried bananas and Coconut Ice Cream. Everything was great and we wold gladly go back again.", "Everything was very good to fantastic...we started with the fried wantans and Garlic Prawns, the prawns were very tasty...then we followed with the Pad Thai, which was very good.  The main course was where it was at...the Crispy Duck with Panang...it was amazing, and the green curry with chicken...wow.  We also had an order of the drunken noodles which were very good...overall probably the best Thai food I have ever had.  Service was fast and efficient.", "Everything we ordered here was so full of favor. I recommend trying new dishes that you normally wouldn't at a typical Thai place.. You will be pleasantly pleased. I also recommend ordering family style so you can try as much variety as possible. Excellent service, excellent food, will come back for sure!", "Excellent food  Superb & authentic choices. A bit pricey though, and location could be better.", "Fabulous! \n\n Crappy shopping center, but magnificent inside. Monster wine list, including Malbec served in proper long stem crystal.  \n\nI had the short ribs in soup base w noodle.  The bones were all removed and the meat was lean and no fat.  Probably was one of the best short rib dinners I've ever experienced . Impressive flavor.\n\nService was rocket fast.  Fifty (50) people came in all at once at 5:30 opening time.  My waiter came over immediately, and began taking my order.  Glass of wine immediately , and less than 5 minutes for the entree' to appear. \n\nI will be going back!", "Fairly good thai food but they don't really take reservations (they take phone reservations but its impossible to get through) and a lot of people came and left disappointed when we were waiting.", "Famous Dave's has changed their dining menu.  Be careful when you order the brisket.  Instead of the nice lean slices of brisket that you use to get, now you get about three slices of brisket (no longer cooked with sauce on it) on top of shredded brisket full of fat which looks like it was long on the bottom of the pot.  Definitely not worth the money you pay for it.  I did confirm with the management that the menu has been changed to the unsavory item mentioned above.  What use to be a great dish and well worth the money, is now a glob of fatty shredded tiny pieces of brisket taken from the bottom of the pot with a few pieces of brisket on top, no longer cooked with the delicious sauce that use to give it such a good flavor, and no longer worth the money.\n\nSo disappointed.  However if you want good Bar B Que from a great place that isn't trying to pinch pennies go to John Mull's Road Kill Grill.  You will get your money's worth there.", "Fantastic Thai restaurant if you are lucky enough to get a table. Get a reservation!  The service is prompt. The food quality is outstanding. The wine list is all encompassing. You will be amazed with the overall experience. A Vegas must do!!", "Fantastic and authentic food. Loved the currys and soups. Friendly staff, moderate prices.", "Finally visited this place and am glad I did !!! The expectations were not just met but exceeded. Husband and I went for lunch on a weekday so didn't to have to wait for a table. Our server was very happy to answer all our queries about their incredible wine list or the extensive menu to choose from. We ordered chicken dumplings and northern cousine entrees khao Sui and kang ka noon. Khao sui s a wonderful noodles in a curry dish with beautiful colors n texture. It's definitely going to be a staple for us on our future visits. Kang ka noon was a jackfruit n veggies curry, quite flavorful. We ordered a spice level of 9(indians can eat spicy food :P) which meant all our tastebuds went super active. We did enjoy it but might go for a 7 or a 8 in future. Look forward to explore more of their dishes soon.", "First time here, wanted to see what was all the commotion about the restaurant. For sure, they didn't fail. The service was great, attentive, and on point with ordering. The food was delicious!!  Ordered the Pananng Curry, Sa-tay, and the finished off with the mango sticky rice  too good. Have to give to it to em.", "Food is fresh and hot even  on the buffet.  Go early on weekend as tend to get crowded", "For Thai food in Las Vegas this is really the only place to go.  Allow plenty of time on weekend at dinner time because there is sometimes an hour wait just for a table.  And when you get the food you can tell why.  The menu is very extensive.  I've eaten a lot of Thai food and this is honestly the best.", "For the first time traveller to Vegas, it's a little out of the ways from the strip. But WOW!, so worth it. The service was friendly, the food was incredible right down to the last bite and the environment very clean and neat. Will do it again and again the next time I'm in Vegas!", "From the outside a bit sketchy but once you walk in you can tell they take pride in their food and service. If you like Thai this is one of the places you need to visit in Vegas.", "Good food, but the line.... uhh... the line. Waited long to get seats :)", "Great Thai . Had the signature jumbo garlic prawns which were absolutely BOMB! \nAlso we had this sliced beef dish , tender and flavorful.\nGood wine\nSeafood soup was amazing !\nGreat tasting noodles with chicken & shrimp .\nI only wish they didn't forget to put our rice and hard noodles in our to go bag. That was a major bummer .", "Great customer service, clean place. ( a little out dated but that's okay) \nThe Pad Thai was perfect, I was curious to try the Northern Thai menu since it seemed like their specialty dishes.\nI ordered the Kang Hoh and Northern Larb for my BF and I to split. \nThere was a spice in there that had a weird smell in the Larb and turned me off to the dish. \nIt's not to say it wasn't cooked well, it was just not for me. So I can't give this place five stars until I come back and try their regular Thai items.\nI recommend their Pad Thai it's wonderful.", "Great example of Thai, especially its specialty dishes from the more Northern region of Thailand. Kind service, ridiculous wine selection that is to die for when paired with Thai. Five stars!", "Great food ask for spicy. \nStrange location but worth the trip to find.  \nThis is a recommendation of penn Sunday school. Spot on", "Great food in a surprisingly nice atmosphere. Overall, a nice menu with lots of choices. A great meal.", "Great food! Love this place.\nHave tried about 10 different things on the menu, everyone was a winner.\nThere are people that I do business with that are from Orlando, and they insist that we go every time they are here.", "Great food. Cool place to eat!", "Great place, always busy because its one of the best in town.  We went with a group and they treated us great and the food was fantastic.", "Hands down best Thai food in North America! The owner head chef lady is amazing and is on her staff! Been eating here for over eight years and have seen the restaurant evolve but food stay amazing. Skip the Buffett but order everything else! Wine is amazing also", "Hands down the best Thai food I've ever had.  I had the drunken noodles with seafood from the front of the menu for $14.  It was delish.  However, husband had the crispy duck panang curry that is from the back of the menu and it was mind blowing.  Orgasmic.  No joke.  I have had Thai curry from many many places and this made the other places taste like sad watered down imitations.  Holy cow.  It was simple.  Just duck and curry.  No veggies in the curry.  However, that in itself was a flavor explosion.  It's not cheap.  It's $28 but it's worth it.  The portion is not big but it's worth it.  It's simply a symphony of flavors that dance on your palate. Rich and creamy.   Texture of the duck is amazing.  The duck skin is lightly battered and the fat is rendered beautifully. \n\nWe had an appetizer which was the Larb.  I thought it was good but not worth the price at $12.  You had to buy the sticky rice as an extra side at $2.50. Very very small serving.  Maybe two small hands worth.  Again, why are Asian restaurants charging for rice in Vegas??? You need the rice though b/c otherwise you are eating minced meat with...um....nothing.  There's nothing to eat it with b/c it's just a little bowl of minced meat.  \n\nService was very nice and the server gave us very good recommendations.  There was no wait for lunch on a weekday.", "Having lived in Thailand for a couple years and eating Thai food all over the country, I came to this restaurant with high expectations due to the yelp reviews. Here is my opinion of this place. The food quality is pretty basic and authentic. Tastes like a home cook meal - dishes here are a bit more salty, like food made in Thailand. Regarding taste and authenticity I would rate this restaurant as a 2.5*. The prices is over priced. Price/value is 2*. \n\nHere is what we had.\n\nHoh Mok Sea Bass (Hor Mok) - $29 - tastes authentic but lacks flavor. Needs to add some finely julienned kafir leaves - which I could not find present in my dish. This dish is normally cooked and served using a small clay pot. This restaurant cooks this dish inside a foil pouch. The top of portion of our Hor Mok, including the fish was somewhat dried (should have been more moist), while there is excess juice accumulated at the bottom of the foil pouch. (If I had known this, I could have tried to fix this by flipping the pouch for a while before flipping it back upright.... lol)\n\nGarlic Prawns. $22 - I feel our shrimp was a bit too salty and over cooked, causing the shrimp to be dried up. The shrimp should not be deep fried for too long like they did at this restaurant. Once done properly you should get a juicy shrimp with a crispy coating on the outside. This dish is basically prepared in the same way as the Chinese salt and pepper pork chop.\n\nMango with sticky rice. the sticky rice was on the firmer side and not as tender and smooth tasting. Mango was fresh mango.", "Heard the rants about Lotus of Siam, and overall the food was good, service fair and atmosphere hectic. It was a solid A-ok. I would not make it a venture or go out of my way to return as I know there are better Thai places in town, maybe even in Commercial center. Lesson learned, just because a guy on TV rants a place does not mean it is worthy the praise especially when food and service returns to normal and you are not a mucky muck.", "I always go to at least one restaurant off the strip when I am in Vegas. Someone told me that Lotus of Siam was on a food show and the Yelp reviews were good, so we decided to give it a try. This is located in an obscure strip mall. We almost missed it, but we saw a lot of people waiting outside so we figured we were in the right place. We went inside and because there was only 2 of us, we got seated right away. The restaurant itself is very nice, clean and spacious.  The busser brought our drinks very quickly. \n\nWe decided to try the Nua Nam Tok (BBQ beef dish) and the garlic pepper prawns (both under the BBQ in the menu). The food came out pretty quickly. The food was pretty amazing. The beef dish had tons of spices (cilantro, mint, green onion, red onion - just to name a few) that worked well together. It was so good! Be careful how spicy you get it. We got it medium and our mouth was on fire at the end of the meal. The BBQ prawns were my favorite. The shrimp, which came with an amazing garlic pepper sauce, was so good and tender. Its definitely a must try. It's a little on the pricey side at $25 for 8 prawns, but I would definitely get it again. \n\nOverall, I am so glad that I decided to give this place a try. One minor complaint that I have is that we only saw our waiter twice, once to take out order and once to take our check. We ended up flagging down another waiter when we wanted to order additional rice. But, it was not too big of a deal as the other waiters was willing to help us.  I will definitely be back to try other dishes here. (There menu is very expansive and I would like to try other items).", "I came Las Vegas for vacation. This is real thai food (you need to order 10 hot stars).", "I came here again, because I know I can only have the best Thai food in Vegas outside of Thailand. It's a tourist trap, but it's 15 minutes from the strip & people still go here regardless of the difficulty to find the restaurant's awkward green light, shaded doors & dark plaza . \n\nWe followed Anthony Bordain's footsteps & tried their Thai curry noodles, ground pork as well as their sticky rice & pad Thai. Curry noodles were to die for!", "I came here with some friends while in Vegas. Chef Jet Tila made us a reservation, which he offered to do when I took his Thai town tour in LA, so I knew that it would be good! There were 5 of us and we ordered family style, starting with the summer spring roll special and papaya salad. I am a spicy girl, and those spring rolls were spicy! The papaya salad had perfect flavor, but it was a bit watery for my taste. For mains, we shared fried rice, panang curry with chicken, khao soi with shrimp (my favorite) and barbecued pork. I can't get enough noodles right now and the noodles in the khao soi were perfect! The flavors were perfect in everything and I absolutely loved it! Also, at $140 for the whole meal, what a slamming deal for Vegas!", "I can forgive the too long of a wait for fried bananas and 1 scoop of coconut ice cream since the food was out of this world delicious. The khao soi with crispy duck, garlic prawns, northern larb and sai oua (grilled sausage) were insanely good. The papaya salad was just ok and I would probably skip it. \n\nThe restaurant is in a strip mall and it's next to an adult day care center. But who cares?!! As soon as you start eating, you'll be transported to a very happy place.\n\nGlad my parents hightailed it out of NY to retire in one of the suburbs of Las Vegas. I can't wait to visit again and eat here until my stomach explodes.", "I finally got the chance to try this place on a random night with my friend! Since I frequently deliver from this restaurant, I had high expectations from the start. The service is always quick and the turnaround is amazing especially since it is always packed.\n\nBe weary of the incredibly long wait that you will most likely encounter when you arrive at the restaurant - I arrived an hour before they closed and I still had to wait 30-45 minutes before I could get a table! However, they send you a text to see a list of other people who are also waiting so that you can leave and come back once the table is ready. There's also a bar where those who are 21+ can wait -- with their wine cellar who can resist?! (I had to drive, so I had to.)\n\nHere's what I had:\n\nBeef pad thai (4/5) // I wasn't expecting the portion to be as small as it was since I'm so used to Thai restaurants giving a hefty load when it comes to pad thai; however, the quality of the food was top notch and the noodles were thinner than what I'm used to. Usually I can never finish portions of pad thai, but this was just enough to fill up my belly!\n\nMango sticky rice (4/5) // I felt like the mango sticky rice was a little overpriced for the portion they give, but nevertheless the mango was just as sweet as I expected it to be.\n\nAlthough Lotus is so famous, it didn't really blow me away. Maybe it's because I had such high expectations or maybe it's because I've gone to numerous other Thai restaurants that delivered a better price to portion ratio... but nevertheless for my experience I can't say that it's the best, but the Pad Thai was pretty scrumptious.", "I give this place 5 stars simply because I want to keep coming back for the food! The wait is long, the decor is forgettable, the portions are on the smaller side, but all is excused because the food is so good! Try the crispy duck!", "I had eaten there four times previously (in 2005, 2006 and 2007) and enjoyed it as a free-flying single gal.  Then I got married and had a baby.  In our first date in a long while (2012), I booked a table for Lotus of Siam.  The food was okay, but not as good as I'd remembered, but the worst part of it was when I saw a large cockroach--yes, a COCKROACH!!--and I could only gape and point speechlessly.  My husband killed the cockroach and informed our waiter, who took it away but did not apologize or call the manager to apologize.  No recompense was offered at all.  I would have complained further, but my husband did not want to press the issue, so we left quietly.  Maybe bugs are par for the course in an old building downtown, but it was not pleasant to have one sharing our dining experience.", "I have seen this restaurant featured on Anthony Bourdain's Parts Unknown and Andrew Zimmern's Bizarre Foods America. So, was it any good?\n\nMy wife and I came here for a early dinner. Needless to say, I was not so surprised to see the place packed full of customers at 6 pm on a Wednesday. They even have a celebrity wall of fame. We ordered the following:\n\nNam Prik Ong (red chili dip) $10.95\n\nIsaan Sausage $9.95\n\nGarlic prawns $21.95\n\nTom Yum Koong (Bowl) $10.95\n\nCrab Fried Rice $13.95\n\nThe food was very good. I would say the best dish was the crab fried rice. It had a good balance with the egg, tomato, and onions. The dip was okay. It tasted like spicy bolognese (did i spell that right?) sauce thai style that you can dip fresh veges and chicharron pieces into. FYI, the spicy level was a 3 1/2 out of 5 for my taste and the menu stated it was the least spiciest of the dips! The Isaan sausage tasted good. Think sour longanisa but in a good way. I did though take out some of unrendered fat bits out. The Garlic prawns were pretty tasty. You could eat the shells which was plus. It was a little on the greasy side so the extra napkins surely helped. The soup was good but not something I would order again. Overall I would say that Lotus of Siam was a good experience. The staff are very attentive and friendly. They even pack your leftovers for you and answer any questions about the menu in a short yet concise way. I'll come again to try the crispy duck and the crab fried rice again...and a beer!", "I heard this place was the best Thai in Vegas. My friends brag how it's amazing. I've seen pictures of the lines but when I went I think I was expecting too much. I ordered the wontons and the edges were burnt and the meat inside was dry. My friend ordered the \"best\" pad Thai which was ok. I ordered the duck in curry and it too was ok. Service was well... We got in and there was no one at the front desk. We waited awhile before someone acknowledge us. Our waiter took forever to just get our drink order and an eternity to get our food ordered. Perhaps lunch is not a good time to go. I'll give them another try and go for dinner.", "I just love it.  It is simply good.", "I live in Las Vegas and went with a visiting friend.  We waited for nearly 1 1/2 hours to be seated. The Restaurant itself is old and not pretty or pleasant to look at. I'm confused at all the fuss. It was just asian food and certainly not worth the lengthy wait or the price.  I would not go there again.  The one thing I did like was the very strong orange colored ice tea.", "I love Lotus of Siam! \n\nI was not aware about it until my cousins not from town introduced me to this place. The wait time was worth it. We opted to order some drinks at the bar while waiting for our table. We had pad thai, crispy duck with panang curry, garlic prawns and nam prik. The pad thai had a njce combination of sweet, salty, sour and spicy. Noodles were cooked al dente. The crispy duck was really crispy, and I was impressed how the sauce was flavorful and well crafted. Their garlic prawns were indeed garlicky! They included the shells, which I doubted at first but ended up munching because it was crisp and delicious. I was not fond of the nam prik, although the sauce had good flavors and the vegetables were cooked perfectly. I will be back!", "I love red curry! My husband had pad sew with garlic chicken wings.  Mom was scared to try anything so she stuck to fried rice but end up eating hubbies food.  We came in for lunch a few minutes before kitchen closed.  But we will definitely be back.  Nice atmosphere, decor and a book as their wine list lol.", "I ordered the initial En Tuon hot and sour soup with beefon tendon, sprouts, etc. The broth was nice and tastefully spicy. The beef slices, well, most of it was that fat trimmings. I think there might have been actually like two or three beef slices, and like six fat gristle.\n\nI also ordered the pad thai extra spicy, and that's exactly what I received. However, for twelve bucks, the portions were smaller than I had wanted it to be.\n\nThe lack of a lunch special bogs down what would have been a four star restaurant. \n\nI probably would choose another Thai venue than this, and found this place to be incredibly overrated.\n\nDaniel", "I recommend the crispy duck with panang curry. The duck is cooked perfectly - the duck is crispy and dry on the outside and soft and juicy inside. It's one of the better duck dishes I've tried in Thai restaurants. Value wise, the restaurant is reasonably priced and even on the lower end, especially for beers. The food quality is high, although the interior of the restaurant could use some work.", "I refused to go back to Los Angeles until I have Lotus of Siam. It is by far the BEST Thai food that I have ever had! My boyfriend has been asking to go here for the longest time... and in my head.. Im thinking... whats the big deal.. its just THAI food.... omg..  was I wrong!! The food is sooooo amazingly orgasmic! \n\nWhat to order:\n\nPanang curry - chicken or duck... whatever protein.. still bomb.\n\nCrispy Duck Drucken Noodles - the noodles are so good here.. you can tell it is the real deal.\n\nGARLIC CRISPY SHRIMP - if you don't order this... I have no words for you. \n\nTIP: Go during their lunch hour.. its not as busy.... if you go for dinner... be there at 5pm before doors open at 530. My boyfriend and I got there at 545pm... and had to wait for 1 hour. \n\nGood luck!!", "I saw Lotus of Siam featured on the Travel Channel and it received rave reviews as the best Thai restaurant in Las Vegas.  I visited there for lunch and was not disappointed.  This is not only the best Thai I've had, but one of the best restaurants I've ever visited.  The prices are reasonable enough to ensure that I will be a repeat customer.  During my visit I ordered the fried wontons for the appetizer and the Thai spaghetti for the main course.  The spaghetti was delicious and perfectly prepared.  I visited on a Wednesday afternoon and the place was busy for lunch.  Nevertheless, I got a table right away and the service throughout the meal exceeded my expectations.  After the main course I ordered the coconut ice cream, which was the perfect way to end such a great meal.  The portions were all suitable for one diner, negating the need for takeout boxes.  The menu is large enough and features a varied assortment of Thai dishes that will make you want to come back and try something new.", "I went in with really high expectations since they had so many reviews and it seemed like everyone was raving about it. To be honest, I've had better. The drunken noodles were a bit on the soupy side which is not what I am accustomed too, and the hot and sour soup was really lukewarm and too sour. The one thing that did taste amazing was the crispy shrimp, but with a price tag of 27 dollars, I could pass. The yelp reviews make it seem like this place is bustling, but when I went in at lunch time, it was not even half full. Either the food at this place has declined or something is up.", "I went on Yelp to find a good carpet cleaner. After finding Fresh Start and reading the reviews I decided to us them. I am so happy I did. Adolfo of Fresh Start cleaned my rugs and not only did a good job, but did a great job. I had stains on my carpet and he removed all of them. My carpet is 15ys. old and now they look like new. Adolfo and his team respect your home and are completely professional. I would recommend any who needs their carpets done to use Adolfo. I will be using them from now on. I live in Henderson, Nevada not San Fran. Ca.", "I would give this local treasure a 4.5.  We hit up this spot every time we go to Vegas \n\nWait:  lines are super long esp on weekends but it's worth it.  Pro tip call 7 days in advance and get reservations.  They will text you when your table is ready.  If you call same day they rarely pick up\n\nFood\n- best authentic Thai food you will ever experience.  The depth of their menu is impressive.  The food is amaze balls\n- Khao Soi with braised beef:  crunchy noodles & soft yellow egg noodles in a curry sauce is a great texture juxtaposition. the braise beef so soft it's to die for.  \n- Tom Kha Kai soup:  medley of hot sour and coconut soup served piping hot with soft chicken slices.  Very good broth.  Can't go wrong with this dish IMHO\n- Druken noodles fried duck- small portions for $27 Greasy don't know why so much hype over this dish.\nTip:  Thai ice tea average\n \nParking:  big lot it's free.  Most taxis know how to get here.\n\nCons\n-  over the years they've really jacked up the price slowly\n- portions smallish considering it's an Asian place\n- service slow got our check wrong\n\nStill a great food experience and lots of options to try.  Get reservations and save yourself a headache.", "I'll start by saying I love the food here! Their remodel really opened things up and it's been for the better. This is a Las Vegas favorite and a good place to take out-of-towners. \n\nUnfortunately, because of the area, you have to be careful at night in the parking lot. \n\nThe one downside of this place is that sometimes the wait is long. Once I had to continually ask the hostess if we were still on the list and I was afraid to step outside because I just thought I would lose our place in line. While they were busy, I felt ignored that time; it is always nice to get an update when you have to wait a while. Also, there is no real place to wait inside.\n\nAs for the food: Definitely worth the wait. Lots of options and good dishes to share. Traditional and unique dishes for this Thai gem.", "I'm giving this place a 5 star solely on the crispy duck panang.  holy crap I don't think I've ever had a better duck curry.  I can't even begin to describe all the ways that the curry sauce flavors danced around my taste buds.  It's a wonderful creamy red curry paste with coconut flavors.  \n\nThe rest of the dishes, like the garlic prawns, and the crab fried rice were probably very good but I just kept on trying to eat rice with the red panang sauce.  Where do they have something comparable in LA???? Or do I have to go back to LV this weekend.", "I've been here once and have heard many great things as well as it being the best Thai restaurant in Las Vegas. It was very crowded and the food was decent, but there are other places I prefer here in town.", "I've been to Vegas multiple times and I finally got a chance to try this place and wow, the food here is amazing! If you had to order just one thing, it would be the soft shell crab drunken noodles. That's all you need.\n\nWe ordered:\n\n1. Soft Shell Crab drunken noodles - AMAZING. This is one of the very few places where I've tried authentic delicious soft shell crab. They used the right amount of batter to give you that perfect crispy texture! The sauce for the noodles was addicting (hehe, drunken noodles), and everything tasted great! A must try! So worth the $23! (5/5)\n\n2. Pad-see-ewe - The noodles tasted great, and the seasonings were spot on with the beef. One of the best ones I've tasted. But my heart still goes with the Soft Shell Crab drunken noodles. (5/5)\n\nCredit cards are accepted. Plenty of parking. Service is friendly. If I'm ever craving Thai food in Vegas, I would definitely come here again! =)", "If you are reading this review....plan on going there for dinner...tomorrow (at the earliest) as the wait is usually long unless you have a reservation. Same day reservations are kinda hard to get....but worth a try.\nMy In-Laws accompanied my wife and me for dinner here. We had our reservation at 8:00 and walked in at 7:55 PM and were seated right away. The service was quick and the server gave us a quick run down on the popular dishes. \nWe had the crispy duck with noodles which was heavenly. We also had the sausage, red chilli dip and the garlic shrimp. The shrimp seemed a tad expensive but it was so decadent....the red chilli dip was spicy and had a nice flavor. The sausage was slightly sour, spicy and did not seem greasy at all.\nIf you like spicy/hot food....order a 8/10. If you are weak minded and adventure is not your thing....6 should get you there!", "If you're craving some bomb af thai food mosey on over to Lotus of Siam, located just a hop skip away off the strip.  \n\nThis is as authentic as Thai gets in Vegas. Their menu is extensive so there will be something for everyone.  \n\n***Prepare to wait if you don't have a reservation*** \n\nMy recommended, popular dishes : \nSpicy Chicken Wings\nStuffed Chicken Wings \nSpicy Catfish\nPad Thai\nCrab Fried Rice \nPanang Curry \nRoasted Duck Curry \nGarlic Prawns \nDrunken Noodle with Crispy Duck", "If you're in Vegas and sick of the Strip's fare, or not liking what seems like a lack of value in what they are able to offer, try the Thai food at Lotus of Siam. It's some of the best casual food you'll find in the area. \n\nThe location is a short cab ride from the LV Strip in a older little Asian strip mall- don't expect much on that end. On the other hand, the food is great, the prices are good, and the wait isn't too long if you pick a good time to get there.", "In a city where food spots must compete with the best of the best, a Thai place with thousands of reviews and 4-5 stars says a lot.  The restaurant is pretty large, with pictures of celebrities who've eaten there, covering the walls from top to bottom.  \n\nThe restaurant has speedy service, prices a little on the high end for some dishes, but money well spent.  Lotus of Siam offered some of the best, quality Thai food I've ever had, an experience that will get me to come back in the future.\n\nWe ordered the \n- garlic shrimp (skin like potato chips, fried perfectly it buttery batter; $27, but a most order): http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?select=EmtQ-VHVShfszx-JszgebQ&userid=p5RcabsU9DXQEDef9RiRlQ\n- crying tiger, charbroiled beef with hot sauce and sticky rice (nicely marinated, tender charbroiled beef that goes well with sticky rice; careful with that hot sauce if you're driving home the next day - $17 dish): http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?select=PdqT3DYEP3Au93n5zzShsg&userid=p5RcabsU9DXQEDef9RiRlQ\n- Tom Yum soup (spicy!): http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?select=xej3SJkCQu8Sh5K65E6eXg&userid=p5RcabsU9DXQEDef9RiRlQ\n- Coconut ice cream; a must!: http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?select=OjIQUqcaDDYGh8b8ZnF0Mw&userid=p5RcabsU9DXQEDef9RiRlQ\n\nThe entire meal was about $70 for 2 people.  While we could have eaten for less at one of Vegas many buffets and restaurants, I'm happy we got to experience this spot and I'm sure we'll be back for more in the future.", "It was good. In a sketchy area with a warning on the door that they've had a lot of car break ins. Extensive wine list featuring wines from almost any country. I'm not sure that it was amazing enough to travel outside of Summerlin tho", "It was just OK for my taste.  We went there for lunch and it was crowded.  And the waiters were just rushing everything, obviously, we felt rushed as well.", "It was okay, I ordered the Rad Na and my husband had the pad se eww. Both were okay, nothing compared to the food in Westminster, Ca. I found it to be missing some flavors and was very disappointed. From the reviews, I expected a lot. I wouldn't recommend this place to others, especially if it was their first time trying out Thai food. If you can't even get the main traditional dishes right, I cant even imagine the others.", "It's a hole in the wall literally, and in a kind of  shady location, but the Food tastes awesome!! They have a gigantic menu with food from different regions. It's a bit pricey and it was packed when I went on a weekday evening. We waited a little while for our food and was a little underwhelmed with the portion size. The food was delectable though.", "It's as good as the hype. It is a weird shopping center and looks tiny from the out side. But inside it is big and nice and delicious. I recommend getting a reservation though because it books up fast.", "Just go here! It's worth the taxi ride. I go multiple times when I am in Vegas. Don't let the neighborhood fool you! This is some of the best food on the strip!", "Just got another typical response from Cox communications.  I've been complaining about the same problem with my email for 6 months now this was the fourth time I've called it in and after explaining the problem twice and then stating that it was ridiculous that I was having to explaining it again and been on the phone for 40 minutes THEY HUNG UP ON ME! As I said, \"typical.\"  We became Cox customers 7 years ago and now I will definitely be looking for an alternative.", "LORD HAVE MERCY!!!\n\nWe came here to eat dinner for my man's big sister's B-day celebration & I really just want to say OMG!!! I was so full but I WANT EVERYTHING all over AGAIN!!!! O_ O & end my review w/ that.... but I have to EXPRESS what wonderful flavors I got to experience.\n\nService was on PAR they were quick & not once did u see my glass of water ever get below half way. They really had TEAMWORK on point. We had a reservation at 6pm & the place was PACKED even in the little waiting area & it did NOT slow down at all even as we were leaving....\n\nThe plaza that this resteraunt is located literally makes you re-think if you want to be dining there.... but do Not let this fool you or drive you away in any way! Definitely like finding a treasure box in the middle of the desert!\nThe interior was simple w/ not too much cluttering decor. The waiting area & entrance was quite small. There are a whole but of pictures that are framed of all the famous people that have dined here one being the GREAT Chef Joel Robouchon. They also have a glass cellar of wines galour that is one of the only thing that makes this resteraunt give it a CLASSY look hahahaha =]\n\nSPICY WINGS $8.95 - just full of flavor & the right amount of spice to blend w/ the sweetness\n\nSCALLOP DRUNKEN NOODLE $23.95 - Scallops were HUGE & again another flavor packed dish\n\nFRIED WHOLE FISH - this fish was amazing like the bones we're crispy enough to be like chips.\n\nGARLIC PRAWN $26.95 - OMG OMG I could eat a freaken whole plate to myself. The crispyness of this dish is PERFECTION!\n\nPLAR LAAD PORK $25 - I think this one was the curry sauce that went well w/ the rice that it came with.\n \nNAM KAO TOD $8.95 - a nice crispy rice appetizer dish that is refreshing w/ the perfect amount of spice & still refreshing w/ some weggies on the side.\n\nFRIED BANANA ROLL $8.50 - cute little wonton shell rolled banana w/ the perfect crunch to every bite\n\nMANGO & STICKY RICE $8.95 - O_O soon good!! They also do NOT serve this dish if the mango is not to perfection!\n\nYUM NAUH $13.95 - THAI beef salad refreshing w/ a kick\n\nTHAI TEA $2.50 - not the BEST that I've had but it was still good.\n\nBut all in all EXPECT a wait if you don't make a real!!", "Lotus Siam- hands down, the best Thai restaurant I've ever been to.\n\nUgh I think the thousands of reviews of this place already says it all. You really just have to go here to witness its greatness. Almost everything we ordered was top notch. The real standout was the sticky rice and mango. \n\nDon't be scared that it's in the middle of a sketchy strip mall. It'd be worth it- trust me!", "Lotus is a big restaurant with small restaurant service and quality. The crispy pork belly, yellow curry, pineapple fried rice, and summer rolls were ALL 5 out of 5. The veggies in every dish were crisp and fresh! Lotus will basically ruin all other Thai restaurants for you. Sorry not sorry! Make a reservation and if you have to wait - it's worth it. Have a drink at the bar ;)", "Lotus of Siam is one of our favorites near the strip.\n\nIt's a little out of the way and the area may steer you away but the food and service is well worth it.\n\nWe have been impressed by every item that we've tried and often recommend this restaurant to friends visiting out of town.", "Lotus of Siam is tucked away off the Vegas strip in a part of town that looks very sketchy.  However, once you make it past that and the small doorway of the building then you have entered Thai greatness.  The restaurant is actually quite big once you get inside.  They serve what I believe to be the best authentic Thai dishes in the city, and have a huge selection of wines available.  The staff are all very friendly and constantly checking up on the table.  It is a great experience overall, would recommend to anyone looking for quality Thai food.", "Lotus of Siam...what has not been said about this place?   Food is incredible, affordable and unique.  \n\nMust haves:  \n\nGarlic prawns.  Over half the tables have prawns whenever I'm there.  Crispy,  flavorful, delicious.  Don't forget to eat the shell and tail.  It might sound a little odd, but you'll thank me.  One of my favorite dishes in the city.\n\nCrispy duck on drunken noodle.  It's always on my table when I'm eating at lotus.  Great flavor in the duck and the noodles.\n\nNam prik ong.  Ming Tsai called it the best dish he's had in Vegas.  Considering the foodie nature of the city, those are big words.  A non spicy chili dip with ground pork and served  with vegetables.  not sure why it's so good...it just IS.  \n\nONE THING TO NOTE...they specialize in northern Thai cuisine.   Order off that section of the menu, along with the chef specialties.  Don't come here looking for mind blowing pad Thai, curry, or anything you're used to eating at a \"normal\" Thai place.  This is the holy grail of Thai restaurants...order what they do best.  If you have questions...the servers will be more than happy to assist you.  \n\nHappy eating!", "Love the Food, Great Service, Moderate Prices. Do not be turned off by the Dicey looking shopping center, it will be worth it. From Very Authentic to the Beginner in Thai food, this place has something for everyone.", "Love the lunch buffet.  It is the surprise to everyone I take there, and believe me, I take every one who visits me.  Notice that a lot of court officers, judges and other public figures partake of lunch at this hidden gem.", "Love their food here. The line is always so long for a table, so I've gotten takeout here twice now. We tried a lot off their menu since we had a large group of people, but the highlights for me was their garlic prawns and panang curry. I still want to go back to try some of their other dishes, but this is definitely worth a visit if you're in the area and craving Thai.", "Lunch on a Friday, 11:30am arrival. Table for 4, no wait, but the restaurant was packed 30 minutes later. No reservations for lunch, FYI.\n\nIf you're on a time crunch, I'd browse the menu online beforehand so you have a good idea of what you want to order. The menu is like a book! So many options! I wanted to try it all!\n\nWe ordered:\n1. #56 NUA SAO RENU Sliced charbroiled beef served on beds of sliced cabbages, topped with our homemade tamarind sauce and fried dry chili. $17.95\n2. #39 SOM THUM [Thai Papaya Salad]  green papaya, chili, tomato, crushed\npeanuts mixed with lime juice, fish sauce and sugar. $8.95\n3. GARLIC PRAWNS Deep fried prawns with shellls (almost like potato chips), saut\u00e9ed with our special garlic sauce, topped with ground black pepper. $26.95\n4. CRISPY DUCK DRUNKEN NOODLE Crispy duck topped with fresh homemade chili and Thai basils. Served on the top of pan fried flat rice noodles. $25.95\n5. Fried banana dessert $8 plus coconut ice cream $4. These two go together heavenly, but the star really was the coconut ice cream.\n6. Thai iced tea x 4.  The Thai tea here is really good. Not over sweet like other Thai restaurants. The tea flavor really comes through.\n\n\nPros:\n1. Delicious food. Everything we ordered was really good and I would order again.\n2. Lot of variety on the menu. Especially Northern Thai dishes\n3. Fresh ingredients. You can taste the quality.\n\nCons:\n1. Pricey for Thai food, 4 dishes + 4 thai teas = $110 after tax, before tip. Yikes.\n2. Can be a long wait depending on what time you go\n\nVerdict: Totally worth it! The food here is amazing. It's a must visit restaurant on my Vegas list.\n\nPro-tips:  \n1. GO STRAIGHT TO THE BACK OF THE MENU TO TRY THE NORTHERN THAI DISHES \n2. Go with a bigger group if you want to try more dishes!\n3. Beware of the spiciness levels! Thai spicy is no joke! We got level 2 and it was pretty spicy for me and I'm usually great about handling spicy foods.", "Make a reservation before you come! This place has good food but it's not worth the one hour wait. This place has greatly expanded since I came a few years ago but the wait time is still the same.\n\nThe garlic prawns and crispy duck panang curry are just tries!", "Me and my friends went back there again because we have a great time there, but this time the food was not good at all.  So, we asked the waiter and he said they have change the chef.  I wanted to ask him if the owner has change as well, but that would be rude.  So, I wouldn't recommend this place because the food was terrible.", "Memorable thai that was worth the fast-moving line. If you have no reservations, get there when it opens. Delicious.", "Most phenomenal wine list in Vegas complements exceptionally good Thai cuisine.  Worth the cab ride and whatever wait you must endure.", "My hands down favorite restaurant in Las Vegas... EVER!!!! I am more of a steakhouse kinda gal but Lotus steals my heart as my all time favorite. From the salmon panang, the cognac curry duck (special menu)  to even the wine list. Only downfall is now that foodies got wind you will have to make reservations for dinner no matter what night of the week. Good for them!", "My husband and I arrived at Cafe Siena at 5:55 pm.  2 gentlemen arrived and were seated across from us about 5 minutes later.  Their waiter took their order immediately while we were still waiting for our waitress to come and take our order.  The 2 gentlemen received their meals and we are still waiting.  FINALLY received our meal at 6:40 pm.  It was on a Tuesday and there was not a lot of patrons there.  The staff offered us free desert for our inconvenience; we declined.  The Manager, Romina, came over and offered her apologies.  We are NOT happy with the service.  WE WILL NOT BE RETURNING and WILL TELL EVERYONE WE KNOW NOT TO EAT THERE!", "My wife and I are big on Thai food and during a recent visit to Vegas we selected this restaurant based on the positive reviews.  We were not disappointed.  Authentic Thai spiced to the requested level.  This restaurant is difficult to find.  It does not front Sahara Avenue and there is no signage on Sahara to let you know where the restaurant is located.  It is in a small strip mall whose back side fronts Sahara.  Hard to find but well worth the effort.", "National Home Warranty -Las Vegas: Terrible service, don't keep their promises,contracting dishonest contractors, take time to get person on the phone, web page not easy to use, no response to emails.\n If there was rating (-)5 stars I would easily give it to them.\nCan not recomend to anyone.", "Not bad but not great. Excellent wine selections and attentive servers. Food is a little overpriced.", "Now this place is on point!  The menu, the service, the wine list, the food is ALL Amazing! Seriously the only downside is the location! it's in a older , uninviting shopping center if you can get passed that, it is not to disappoint!", "Oh my, this place was amazing. We ordered the prawn with fried rice and the appetizer of fried rice that was crunchy. Our waitress was a total sweet heart and went above and beyond to make sure we were happy. This is def a new lunch spot, quick service and amazing food make this place perfect.", "Ohh Lotus how I love thee. Eating here is always number one on our list of restaurants when coming on our yearly Vegas trip. Yes it's in a gritty neighborhood but I applaud the restaurants efforts in keeping it real and being accessible to all types of patrons. \n     Reservations are a must so we stopped by during lunch hours on Wednesday to secure a reservation for our party of 8 for the following night. We were warned about the 5 minute rule, which is essentially if all in your party are not there within 5 minutes of reservation, your table is forfeited. \n     We arrived Thursday, we're seated promptly and after some time put in drink orders. The selection of rieslings by the bottle is extensive and a bit overwhelming. Placed our order to include the following dishes:\n* Rad Na with shrimp @ $11.95. - 4.5 stars, yum gravy. \n* Braised short rib with panang @ $22.95. - 4.5 stars, tender with spot on curry.\n* Chow mein with chicken. @ $ 8.95. We had 9 year olds to feed, need I say more? 3 stars, but who comes here for chow mein?\n* Chicken Rama @ $21.95. - 1 star. Biggest disappointment of the night.  Got this for 2 kiddos to share and it was rather sad especially for the price. The plate consisted of about 5-6 half doll\nar sized pieces of flattened white chicken on a handful of steamed snow peas and about three asparagus. Everyone was shocked when I mentioned the price. \n* Salmon Nam Tok - @ $22.95.  2 stars. Ordered level 10, not spicy and an overly lemongrass flavor. Didn't taste well seasoned but cooked perfectly.\n* Prim Nook - @ $11.95. 1.5 stars. Excited to try this, totally disappointed. This was bland, even at spice level 7 and just tasted like  can of mashed hatch chilis. \n* Pepper garlic sauce with shrimp - @ $13.95. 4.5 stars. Best dish of the night for me, I will be dreaming about that sauce until I get back to vegas. \n* Spicy catfish with basil leaves - @ $14.95. 4 stars. Catfish have a wonderful crunch and a great spicy sauce.\n* Moo Yang @ 14.95. 3.5 stars. This was a nice dish and definitely a better choice for the kids than the chicken rama. The pork was tender and nicely cooked. The spicy sauce on the side, delicious. \n* Mango with sticky rice @ $8.95. 3.75 stars. Rice was warm, delicious, mango was sweet but a little bit brown around the edges. A bit expensive.\n     We love trying new dishes every time we come and some are hits, some misses. Lotus excels in their sauces and curries especially and has a menu of items you can't find most places.  The portions are pretty modest. I don't have that big of an appetite and could easily eat 2 dishes myself. Also, the pricing is a bit wonky to me, some items are well priced others not so.  Relative to most good Las Vegas restaurants, the expensive items are really not that expensive though. Lotus' reputation is earned with good reason.", "Ok so after my first walk in experience that did not go well I told my self why not give it another try . So I went in there and the girl was really nice she took me to the table then another guy ask me what I wanted to drink and he was polite as well , then my waiter came after 14 minutes and the place was slow not even that busy I was ok with that though since  I was not in a hurry .. He goes are you ready with a rude kind of tone I'm in a hurry way .. When I told him I wanted the soup he told me that's to big for you but again not in a nice way I felt so rushed while I was ordering ....any who then I try to order vegetarian noodles and I ask what my options are so he goes tofu and vegetables so I told him  I'll take that and with a very rude tone again he replies well which one it will be vegetables or tofu I thought they went together sorry don't punch me lol !! Any ways so the soup came out and there was a great amount of shrimp but the soup tasted like vinegar I was like ew !! He went 3 times around all the tables asking how is everything tastes except me I was so sad .. I felt like is there something wrong with me ?? Any ways the noodles were good but boring .. Over all I was expecting sooooooooo much more of this place and to be honest ones the service is not good it  makes everything worst .. I'm sure people love this place and have a great experience !! Mine happen to suck and I had wayyyy better Thai food in other places I swear !! I'm a food lover and I'll tell you it's nothing special just another Thai food place that word of mouth made it famous that's all !! Ps: great parking but over all I will never go back again unless I was there for a birthday party invitation and I had no choice !!!!!!!", "Ok so my brother-in-law is somewhat of a foodie like me... He suggested Lotus of Siam since he went there before and said it was really good. Funny this place is hidden behind a big building and you would never have thought to look for a restaurant behind. We got there at 5:30pm when they open. There were about 40 people already waiting in line outside. Oooh it must be good! When they opened the doors they sat people right away. I was surprised how big the place really was. I said to myself.. man it's going to take a long time to get our food and I was starving. Long story short they took our order and 15 minutes later all our food was there. We had six in our party so we ordered a lot of different plates. I really liked the garlic shrimp but all the dishes were excellent. Wish we would have ordered more but next time I know!", "Ok, this place!! In town for my cousins bachelorette Party and she HAD to come here. We got some stares...but that was ok! The couple at the bar with us actually had just gotten married and she as well had her bachelorette party there. What are the odds?! Anyway.... I'm still full from their amazing Kai Koowah! No, I'm not a huge Thai food buff so I didn't know exactly what to expect but it sounded amazing and my cousin said if it sounds amazing, then it is. And she didn't fail me! The table ordered two bottles of the Ponzo pino Gris along with the papaya salad, egg rolls and beef salad to split. That was all quite yummy as well! More than half of the table ordered the Kao Soi from the \"Northern Menu\" and o had a little FOMO. My cousin said it was her favorite thing ever! The dessert we all shared was incredible too- mango sticky rice with coconut ice cream. Bravo!!!", "Okay place, their spicy shrimp soup could be spicer. I asked for an 8 and still had to add extra hot sauce since there was really no spicyness. \nMaybe I went on a bad day? Maybe I'll try this place again but for now I'll stick to my usual Thai food spots", "One of the best Thai restaurants in the USA and I've been to Thailand for 3 weeks and to some of the top Thai populated places in America (NYC, SF, LA, etc).\n\nLotus of Siam's flavors and prices are just greatness. Don't get the usual boring pad thai and chicken satays, go for the unique dishes like spicy red duck curry, coconut shrimp specialties, and any of the house specials. Everything is great.\n\nIt's only a few min, very short cab ride from the city, you could technically even walk there if you're near Spring Mountain. Yum!", "One of the best meals I've ever had! The chicken wings stuffed with pork and fried duck curry egg noodles were amazing!", "One of the best places I've ever eaten in my life. Get off the strip and check this place out. Very affordable and the best dish you can get in Vegas", "Only word of caution: they're SERIOUS about their spicy hot \"index\". A medium had my sweat trickling down from both sides of my face!! Other than that, flawless!!", "Ordered Zydeco for a meeting at our DT office. Service was great, and food was amazing! We will definitely be going back soon. Great lunch spot!", "Ordered a spicy beef salad and it was pretty good.  Could have been spicier, but I asked them for more spice and they brought me some.  The fried dumplings were good also.", "Over the years I've heard how this Vegas institution dishes out the best Thai food in the states, so of course i had to finally try it.\n\nGoing to lunch hungover was probably a mistake, but I'm guessing that makes up a large portion of their clientele any how. \n\nWe ordered a pretty standard lineup of dishes: crispy rice and ground pork, papaya salad, and pad Thai. When asked for spice, we goofed by going 3, thinking it was 3 out of 5, not 3 out of 10 like it really was. The dishes were good, but I've had numerous better representations at Thai restaurants in LA. Maybe more spice would change that. Either way, it was good if not a little over hyped.", "Pretty good food, with a nicer atmosphere. A little pricey for the quality, but definitely good.", "Probably the best Thai food of my life. There is a place in NYC near Woodside in Queens that also serves great Thai. What makes this better is the two pages of Northern dishes and the salads. Perfect spicy, sweet, salty, sour dressing on all if them.", "Really authentic Thai food! Got the recommendation from the parent of one of my students and when I first arrived at parking lot I was a little skeptical but once you walk through the doors, you're greeted with a nice atmosphere and decor. We were probably lucky to go for a late lunch because we didn't have to wait for a table. The food was delicious! Don't really remember the actual name but the fried whole fish with the sweet and sour sauce was really yummy. Would eat here again the next time I go to Vegas.", "Recommended by my friend Dave from New York. We are both big foodies. Everything here I ordered was delicious.", "Review #2565 of Lotus of Siam. It's that popular!\n\nA little far off from the rest of the places you will visit during a trip to Vegas but worth the short drive.  It is located near Sarhara in a deserted shopping center near Downtown.  I don't see any other reason to drive out here other than to eat here.  Parking is simple with the huge lot and plenty of parking since this is the only place that seems lively...\n\nThere might be a wait if you come during a busy time.  We came around noon and had to wait for around 20 minutes...(even though there were open tables...)  But I think I understand why they did that.  Unfortunately, the kitchen is quick but not quick enough to meet the demand and having people wait in line might be better than having them wait for food.\n\nSo was Anthony Bourdain and all the other celebrities (pictures all around the restaurant) just joking or is this place the real deal?\n\nOrder the garlic prawns! At around $30, it is pricey for 7 pieces of prawns but it was the best dish we had.  Not overly garlic-y and cooked perfectly so to not burn the garlic.  The prawns are huge and butchered perfectly so that you can devour the entire prawn (shell and all).\n\nOrder the Nua Nam Tok (Beef Salad with crushed toasted rice).  The beef was moist and fattier than other Thai restaurants I have had this dish at.  The fat was the difference.  Even though I prefer lean meats, the fat made the beef tender and flavorful.  The sauce was salty, sour, and spicy at the same time with a mixture of greens and a slice of cabbage.\n\nSkip the Crispy Duck with Drunken Noodles or just order the drunken noodles by itself.  The crispy duck wasn't that crispy with our duck fat still not fully rendered.  The duck was not worth the premium to make this dish around $30.  Without the fat rendered out, it was similar to BBQ duck from a Chinese BBQ place...  As for the noodles, they were fried well with a layer of sauce on them.  The portion was a bit small.   Might be bigger without the crispy duck.  Finish the noodle quickly or they start to clump together.\n\nThis place is worth the visit.  I want to try the other items on the menu since they specialize in Northern Thai cuisine.  Will be coming back for the garlic prawns.  Beware of the wait for a table and then the wait for your food but if you have the time, it's a must try.  Just ask the other 3000 reviewers.", "Roma Deli is the best Italian retaurant in all of Las Vegas.\n\nIts owner, Massimo, is an authentic Italian and authentic server of great food and people. He is not only congenial and warm and friendly but he is an expert\nin handling people and food...great Italian food.\n\nI refer customers to Roma Deli all the time when I hear them ask about great Italian food in Las Vegas.\n\nAnd, recently, Bill Gates ate Italian food at Roma Deli after her was also referred to eat there since it is the best Italian Food available in all of Las Vegas.\n\nDo yourself a favor and go to Roma Deli the next time you want genuine and authentic Italian food along with a great casual dining atmosphere that will make you feel like actually are in Italy.\n\nAnd, tell Massimo that Louis and Holly sent you and he will simply give you that big and beautiful Italian smile of his and treat you like royalty!!!\n\nLouis J. Asmo,\nLas Vegas resident and customer of Roma Deli since 2004", "Second time eating here and this time around no wait! We were very happy because we did not have to wait. We ordered the beef jerky for an appetizer, the crispy duck panang, and rad na. The beef jerky was a lil chewy for my liking but it had great flavor especially the sauce it came with. For the main entrees, we ordered the crispy duck panang which was pretty amazing! Def will order that again. The rad na was okay. I wasn't a fan of the gravy. Will def go back to try other dishes!", "Service is not good it was crowded loud few dronk patrons not good atmosphere.I decided to leave and I ate at my hotel room....1/2 hr later I got sick to my stomach", "Service: 5 stars\nFood: 5 stars\n\nAmazing Thai food...probably the best I've had in the USA. Having lived in Asia and frequenting Thailand, the food here is truly amazing and quite authentic. We've tried several items off the menu - duck, sea bass, shrimp, noodles...all were fantastic!\n\nThe server was also very attentive. Our waters were always full, and they responded quickly to our requests. Overall, great experience!", "So absolutely amazing!!! So cool and the food was worth waiting for. Do yourself a favor and make a reservation otherwise you'll be waiting for an hour to two and a half hours. It was so cool the head chef/owner came to say hi and told us that our daughter was the most beautiful baby ever. Order off the back of the menu, Northern Cuisine. Best Asian food anyone has ever had ever!!!", "So many people recommended this place, I had no choice but to go. Located about 3 miles off the strip in a somewhat shady and alarming strip mall- it does not disappoint. \n\nClearly they have chosen to invest in their wine cellar and not their interior. At 70+ pages, with multiple vintages of highly sought after wines (Abreu, Schafer, Spottswoode and more), there is certainly a wine for everyone at every price point. \n\nService was warm and accommodating. \n\nFood was OUT of this world!  I am a new Thai food fan. Green curry was luscious with great veggies and spice. Seabass with ginger was silky and flavorful.  We ordered the highly touted Garlic Prawns which I thought didn't nearly compare with the other two beautiful dishes.  \n\nI'll be back.", "So so so good. Went here with some girlfriends from work while we were attending a conference. Very happy we found this gem through yelp.\n\nWe had the Tom Kah Kai (literally I could like the bowl), garlic prawns, Chicken satay, and crispy duck.\n\nMy friends went here AGAIN the next night because it was just that good! I will definitely return my Next time in Vegas.\n\nTo note: they do not take same day reservations. We went on a Tuesday night and there was a small wait- so keep that in mind. It took about 15 mins to get there from the strip. Price point was amazing!", "Some of the best Thai food you can get. It is off the strip in this hidden but very large shopping plaza. I remember it being super gray and not interesting but I think they recently renovated it and it is now a more interesting yellow. Parking was no problem and when we went during lunch, there was no wait! The entrance seems small but the restaurant is quite large and very roomy. \n\nGarlic Prawns - amazing! these massive prawns are deep fried and lightly seasoned. You get both the meat and shell. The shell is deep fried to the point of crunchy awesomeness. \n\nCrispy Duck in Panang Curry - one of the best Panang curry in a long time and the best Thai dish I have had in a while. The crispy duck is definitely crispy and the duck pairs really well with the spicy curry. Definitely pour some on top of rice to have a great meal. \n\nSoft Shell Crab Drunken Noodles - delicious! There is so much basil flavor and have plenty of soft shell crab to go around! The signature ingredient is the baked/dried basil that gives it a very unique flavor compared to other Thai restaurants that I have tried. Definitely worth ordering!\n\nThai Tea - a must get if you're ordering spicy food. It tastes fresh and not too sweet. \n\nOverall, this is one of the best Thai places I have ever been to. Their specials are a bit pricey compared to the ones in SD but it is WELL worth it.", "Superb never have I complained to a restaraunt of this status and actually got a solution. This has happened here. It's not often the quality of the food remsins  so consistent that i still crave it! Lotus keeps me wanting more!! The girl working the desk remembers me when I go in and for such a busy establishment this makes me feel so appreciated!  This place is awesome! I  lotus!", "THE MOST OVERRATED RESTAURANT EVER\n\nAmericanized southern fake thai food mostly; overpriced tourist trap. To all who read this: Jitlada in Los Angeles is an actual thai food restaurant. This place is highway robbery with hour+ wait times for the same basic pad Thai bullshit you can get anywhere in the U.S. Wow yelpers, get a friggin clue.", "Takeout was sub par. Thin watery curry, raw potatoes, really small portions and all meat in three dishes very dry. Not ok.", "Terrible customer service. Came in with a big group and  their attitude is like they don't even want your business. Granted we didn't have reservation but they simply dismissed us and told us that we have too many kids and will take too long. And the phone is always busy. You would think they'd get a second line. Oh well, glad I didn't have to sit through dinner if their attitude is like this.", "Terrible service to our large party,  doesn't even attempt to seat our large party.   They don't answer their phone.   Even with 5 people waiting ahead,  said they can't seat us.. Wtf.  You don't want our business because she have 10 kids!", "The Four Kegs Bar this Las Vegas Bar used to be the place to go for good cold beer and watch sporting events and get good food back when I moved here in 1985.  We went there yesterday, the neighborhood has aged and a lot of shops have left the area but 4 Kegs remains and the food and beer are as good as it was 30 years ago.\n\nThe stromboli's are to die for, my favorite the cajun fries oh yeah lets not forget the pizza.\n\nA must for those who want real Vegas without all the glitter and high prices.", "The Thai food was different than back home in Hawaii, but delicious none the less. Their prik nam pla sauce is also different then back home, but we loved it as well. Very large restaurant that was very busy. Menu is also very large making it good for big groups. We'd eat here again.", "The amazing reviews do not disappoint. What a fabulous meal! Went with a large group of people so we could try lot of different dishes and everything was great.", "The best Thai food in America!  If you live in Vegas or are just here as a visitor, you must try Lotus.  The location might not be the best, but the food and service certainly are.  They also have one of the best riesling collections I've ever seen at very reasonable prices.  My favorite starter is the Nam Kao Tod, crispy rice mixed with sour sausage, green onions, chilis, ginger, and peanuts.  It's very hard to find on other Thai menus.  I like all the soups, but Tom Kah Kai is my favorite.  All the curries are superb, as are the noodle dishes (especially the drunken noodles with soft shell crab or prawns).  If you haven't tried jack fruit, have one of the northern dishes.  The short ribs with panang is a great dish.  If you have a huge appetite and the chef makes a recommendation, try the whole lobster (I've done it once and will never forget it).  I've lived in Las Vegas for 11 years and have never tired of Lotus.  I've never had a bad meal!", "The best thai food I have ever had hands down. We ordered the crispy prawns, seafood soup, pad see ewe, beef salad, roast duck with some sort of curry sauce and fried bananas with coconut ice cream for dessert. The stars of the night were the crispy prawns and pad see ewe. I am neither a prawn fan nor a pad see ewe fan but those dishes left me wanting more. Oh. My. God. The crispy prawns were deep fried and partially deshelled for ease of eating with a delicious garlic sauce on the outside. The pad see ewe was just perfect, it had the wide thick noodles with just the seasoning. \n\nCan't wait to go back to Vegas for this place.", "The first few times I went to Vegas years ago, my friend kept saying that we needed to eat here because it had amazing Thai food despite it being middle of a sketchy part of town. So, we'd wake up in the morning, and call ahead to get a reservation, and find out that they didn't take reservations, and it'd be like 2 hours before we get a table. So, we never went there.\n\nEventually I made it out there, and my friend was right. Crazy good Thai food at reasonable prices, and it is in a highly sketchy part of town.\n\nFast forward a few years, and now whoever I happen to be eating with, no matter how hardy a Vegas vet they are, is always willing to consider Lotus as a food suggestion. I've tried probably a good third of their menu, and pretty much everything is great.\n\n(As for the \"no reservations\" thing...they don't take reservations FOR LUNCH. You can totally get reservations for dinner.)\n\nIf you're coming here, I'd recommend starting with the Prawns in a Blanket. Expertly unshelled shrimp wrapped in bacon, and that is then wrapped in crispy wonton skin and fried to perfection. Served with a sweet dipping sauce.\n\nThe crab fried rice is great, and pretty much every curry that you order will complement this.\n\nAll of the curries are terrific, and while everything may seem a little on the small side, the combination of the curry sauce and the rice is generally enough to keep me well satisfied. \n\nGenerally, you'll end up dropping about $20-$25 per person here, and have yourself a pretty good meal. I consider this a definite go-to, though I recommend trying to get out there on a weekday rather than a weekend. You'll find the waits much shorter, or may even get lucky enough to walk in and get seated immediately.", "The food here is great. And it's very authentic.\n\nWhat I don't like so much about the place is that it is pretty noisy and you get a feeling that you are in a rush.\n\nConclusion: If you only care about the food, this is one of the best places to eat Thai food. If you are looking for a quiet place, there are better options.", "The food here is so good! It's not as small and quaint as it used to be back in the day but so many reviews and food tv visits let the word out and they had to expand. Part of the fun used to be waiting to get in and everybody was excited to be there. Would be a five star review but the place has definitely lost its ambiance and just tries to pump as many people through the doors as possible. Should've stayed small and make us wait-it was worth it!", "The food is always fantastic. Service tonight was a little spotty, but we arrived just when they opened for dinner to find a line waiting. Tried to make a reservation by calling them, but after several attempts that the phone was not answered we decided to just show up.\n\nStill completely recommend Lotus. Have been going here for ten years and have never been disappointed by the food.", "The food was amazing!  Best Thai I've ever had, great use of spices and never too spicy.  Every dish was on point\u00f7", "The infamous Lotus of Siam. One of the only ways you can drag people out of the strip for a meal. Restaurant completely filled within 15 minutes of opening. \n\nFood: \nI don't quite get the fuss here about the food. I've been here twice and the food is consistent, but definitely not the best Thai Food I've had. \n\nService: \nAttentive staff. They have a lot of employees working here. \n\nEnvironment: \nDefinitely looks better than your typical Thai joint. Makes a good date location. \n\nPrice: \nAverage price for the type of food. \n\nFood: 3\nService: 4\nEnvironment: 4\nPrice: 3", "The portions here are small, but boy are they flavorful!!! Go for the Garlic Prawns! It's a must. I love how I was able to eat the shell.", "The worst Thai Restaurant in Las Vegas. Doesn't know how to talk to customer. Everyone is very rude. Food quality is way below the average and quantity is very small...do no to this restaurant.", "There are a lot of great recommendations here. I highly recommend trying the sea bass section. Its a bit pricey but there is no price limit for good food. I had the sea bass with papaya, it came with sliced grapes, tomatoes, and roasted peanuts. All i can say is wow - that is some great stuff.  It's  got a nice amount of fish sauce that isn't smelly old like many Thai restaurants and the combination of the salty fish with tomatoes and grapes makes a flavorful-lively color on my palette. Suggest for first timers or anyone already familiar with Thai to skip the basics like curry because if you traveling from out of town I would push that you try something else. There are many wonderful dishes you can see at the entrance the wall of pictures that we're mentioned in the local news to get an idea\n\nIts now become my favorite stop every time I'm in town", "There are many car washes in Las Vegas. Some are good and many are just terrible. Alamo Hand Car Wash on Rainbow is just about the best in the entire city.\nThe work is done by hand so the car finish is protected and everyone seems to genuinely care about your car.\nMost important, is the warm and friendly welcome you receive when you pull in for service. There is a man named Felipe who greets you like a long lost friend. His warm, caring attitude is the reason I keep coming back. Sometimes twice a week to keep my cars looking new. He may not know your name but he will get to know you and your car. If he suggests a coat of wax, you probably need it. I know, when he's suggested an added service it is because he genuinely takes interest in how my cars look and, the funny thing is, he's always been right.\n\nWhen you pull in, say \"hi\" to Felipe. His warm attitude will start your experience at Alamo in such a pleasant manner that the time they take to care for your car will all be worth it.\nWithout this kind gentleman, Alamo might just be another good car wash. With him there to greet me, I feel like I am coming to a friend to personally take care of my prized possession. \nBy the way, their complimentary coffee is quite good, as well.", "There is a reason Lotus of Siam is on everybody's list as best places in Las Vegas.  I've been there at least 10 times and it has been excellent every time.  The menu is extensive, so the last few times I've asked the server to make suggestions and ordered based on those suggestions.  They haven't steered me wrong.", "There is no way I could write enough to describe this place. I've ate at several tai food restaurants and nothing compares to this little hidden gem. On the out side it does not look as inviting but the inside is AWESOME. It is truly a hidden gem in Vegas. People that know about this place eat here offer. There is usually a 45 min to an hour wait but I can not stress enough that it is well worth it. They now added an inside bar and text your phone when your table is ready.", "This has been on my list of to do's for years.  It was almost mythical at this point and to finally be in Vegas and make it over well... Had to happen.  I grabbed my bestie, we hailed a cab and off we went.  \n\nWho knew a run down looking Strip mall would hold one of the best Thai places in the country?  \n\nHuge menu is the only downfall as there was only 2 of us.  We Ordered what the waiter told us to and it was perfect,  the duck parang curry is perfect.  Perfectly crispy, flavors are balanced and you can taste the love put in this.  \n\nThis place needs to happen if you are in Vegas.", "This is a 5 hands down. The Garlic Prawns, the Pad Thai and Khoa Soi were all incredible.  The service was perfect, and the wine list is overwhelming. \n\nWe showed up at 9:00 on a Sunday and still waited 30 minutes.  Well worth the wait. Better than anything you find on the strip.", "This is a restaurant with strip like qualities, which is to say, plenty of hype and short on substance.  I was suckered into going here after watching a recent Munchies video on top Las Vegas food joints.  As with most things in life, you're expectations of quality are based on how much you pay for something.   When you're the most expensive Thai place in town, well, you expect the best.  \n\nWe ordered tempura (bad choice being this is a Thai spot) that tasted like something you would buy out of your supermarket frozen food section.  We followed it with their \"specialty\" plate, crispy chicken with panang sauce.  For $27 you get duck that tastes like Kentucky fried chicken strips dipped in a watery curry sauce.  The other plate, I believe no. 55, was strips of rubbery beef in a acidic and vile sauce.  Terrible to say the least.  \n\nIm hardly ever motivated to write reviews on food spots and hate being negative about things but maybe I can save a few souls from spending their hard earned money on sub par Thai food.", "This is absolutely, without a doubt, the BEST Thai restaurant I have ever been to.  It is an absolute treasure and NEVER disappoints.  Throughout my years traveling to Vegas, I've Never had a less than perfect meal at Lotus.  \nMUST TRY!!", "This is an upscale Thai place with an extensive wine menu. Make sure you try the northern specialty dishes!", "This is my #1 go to Thai joint in town! \n\nI have been to lotus too many times to count. I feel like a seasoned vet in there and have tried just about every item on the menu. \n\nI believe it's one of the only places in town you can get Khao Soi and it's the best I've had anywhere in the world. You can find Khao Sou along a cornucopia of other Thai delicacies on the \"Northern Menu\". \n\nTwo thumbs up Wayne!", "This is one of the best Thai restaurants I've had, even though it's quite expensive. I really enjoyed the duck curry and the garlic prawns. Make sure you make a reservation-- the lines can get crazy long. We made a reservation for 9 or so on a Saturday night and still had to wait at least 30 minutes after. It's okay, though-- the food made up for the wait!", "This is the best Thai restaurant in the valley. I cannot believe that I have yet to review them. I have eaten here on several occasions over the past 4 1/2 years and I have several favorite dishes. The crispy duck with Panang curry is my favorite. The service is always impeccable but be careful and make a reservation if you are in a time budget. They do get very busy. The wine and beer selections are incredible as well as the atmosphere. Celebrity pictures all over the walls posing with the owner of this fine establishment. I recommend Lotus of Siam to everyone I meet in Las Vegas, telling them that it is the best restaurant in the valley. And they never disappoint. Try them out and see for yourself!", "This is the best place for Thai, Northern Thai specifically, outside of Thailand. I straight up sang love songs to my food it was so damn good. Go there. Now.", "This is the first meal we had off-strip this visit and it was crazy good. Confession, I've somehow never had Thai food. I have no good excuse, I've just been a little intimidated and it hasn't happened. That changed today. Everything we had was over the top delicious and perfectly prepared. Try the Pad Thai and the first item on the Northern menu. Order them both, and more, and go family style. You cannot go wrong here, just call ahead, the word is obviously out.", "This place definitely lives up to the hype!\n\nFirst appearance is not what I expected. It looked like some janky hole-in-the-wall spot from the outside. But inside was a pleasant surprise. It's huge. And had a bar area for you to grab a few drinks before dinner.\n\nWe arrived at 5:20 pm,10 minutes before they opened and there was already a line of 40 people waiting on be seated. Luckily they had enough tables for us to be seated.\n\nFood was amazing. For a party of 2, we ordered the garlic prawns and the crispy duck in panang curry. I highly recommend both. \n\nService was attentive and friendly.\n\nOverall, a great place to enjoy great thai food. Will definitely be coming back.", "This place is an upscale, clean, and well managed place tucked away in the commercial center.  It's definitely worth checking out.  They pack the tables in and the decor looks like a classic chinese restaurant with big rooms full of tables with multi-purpose room lighting, but still a great spot to go, especially if you're just visiting or want to sample a very popular spot.", "This place is great. The food is served in a timely manner. It has a great taste and presentation. Their wine selection is excellent. I suggest pairing your food with a wine of your choice. Great place for a family dinner or date night. The front on the restaurant can be deceiving, but just walk in to see what a gem this place is.", "This place is the biz ! Dishes here that you will not see anywhere else. The spicy here is hotter than most Thai restaurants here in town. I prefer to order from the northwest Thai menu. All adventurous options and each are unique .", "This place is the gold standard for Thai cuisine in Las Vegas.  They have a very impressive wine and beer list, but I don't drink.  Everything that we have ever eaten here is top notch and delightful, especially the Crispy Garlic Prawns.  The wait is aggravating, and there is not much space for patrons to wait.  But with an advance reservation, the experience here is awesome.  Would be nice if they could update their decor a little.  While all the Thai decorations are beautiful, the carpeting is way past its prime, and it takes away from the experience a little.  We always come here when we have Thai relatives in town knowing that they will be very happy and impressed.", "This place was more than I expected. The food, while small portions, was so fresh and delicious. The menu is extensive, especially if you aren't familiar with traditional Thai food (I wasn't). Orders come out one at a time, so don't plan on all starting your meal together. I'm not big on spicy, so I ordered my Drunken Noodles at a \"2\"; when it came out it was about an \"8\"!! They apologized and remade it, but my companions were almost done before I ever started. Small portions leave room for their delicious sticky rice with mango dessert. It's pricey but fresh and tasty.", "This review is for Pristine Cleaning.  Excellent job done by Rosio and Jocelyn. They really did a Pristine job. I am totally impressed. They arrived right on time and were done in the timeframe they told me they would.  They were very pleasant and hard workers. I am definitely going to rebook to have a time every 3 weeks to have them clean my house.  You won't be disappointed with this company.  5 Star service Definately.", "This was some of the best Thai food I've ever had! The garlic prawns and crispy Penang duck is out of this world! Def a must if you're in Vegas :)", "Truly one of the best Thai restaurants I have ever been too.  This place is top notch.  When I'm out in Las Vegas for business I away dine at this place.", "Uhmazing food! So many options from regions all over Thailand. Everything was bursting with flavor. It was a great contrast to the strip, both in style and quality as well as being much more affordable.", "Union Pluming  scheduled for service between 12 and 4. It's now 430. No update,no show. I called twice,and was put on hold for over 15 minutes. Fly by Night.", "Usually my girl and I hit the Lotus up for lunch, always cranking plus I love the buffet, oh I do put a whoopin on it. On this evening we went for dinner. As there were 4 of us some damage was done. My woman does her usual thing with the larb and chicken coconut soup but then there was chicken fried dumplings, mee crob if I am spelling that right and it was just the beginning. Poached salmon, Fried shrimp, chicken curry, and a whole catfish on the table,  a whole one. We love coming here, and it be showing. For the wine lovers you will be quite impressed.", "Very good food, like excellent.\n\nFew ground rules:\n1. Make reservations, earlier is better\n2. parking lot is scary, see #1\n3. I'd think that the wait without reservations would be hours.\n\nThere are so many excellent sounding things on the menu that I simply have to return.", "Very good thai food at very reasonable price.  We ordered the crispy garlc prawns.  The shrimp was deshell but still attached at the butt and deep friend and seasoned very well.  The beef salad was also very good with chunky piece of meat. The pad thai was good a int of sweet and lime. The crispy duck in panang curry was cook very well not too dry and the curry did not over power the duck.", "Very tough to find because it's in a dumpy strip mall. But it was very busy and amazing food. We Had ton tom yum kai soup appetizer which was fantastic. The pad Thai noodle dish was great.  The drunken noodles  were fantastic with large whole shrimp in then.  The seafood fried rice was fantastic with vegetables and large shrimp. This is a amazing spot. Larp was fantastic.", "Visited in August during the week.  The place is in a strip mall so we took a cab from the strip.  It's clean and inviting.  The food though was just a-ok.  It was good but coming from Chicago where there is great Thai restaurants, this was comparable to a mediocre restaurant at home.  Price were reasonable and the wine list is pretty impressive.", "Want some good Thai Food??? You need to go to Lotus of Siam!!  Great selection of North and South Thai food.  All good, good service.", "Wanted to try this place when I saw it on the food network's best thing I ever ate. Went on a Wednesday afternoon when it opened. We were on luck no line. Promptly seated and poured over the extensive menu. Being from LA there are a lot of good Thai restaurants  to compare this place to. So we ordered the papaya salad, which was spot on with the balance of sweet, salty, sour, and spicy. My only complaint was the portion was a little small especially for the price. The red chili dip we ordered was ok. Nothing memorable. It was definitely missing a little heat. The vegetable fried rice was ok, and the drunken noodle I could have passed on. Nothing really wowed me. I could get better in Thai town in hollywood. We ate all the food, but the reason for that was the portions were so small we left feeling starved.", "Way over advertised, had a much better Thai food. Would not go back.", "We came here a couple of times. Our first meal was beyond amazing. It was so good we went back the next day for lunch. We obviously wanted to try something different and it was a complete miss. The noodles were cold and stuck together. I eat Thai food all the time and those noodles were probably the worst of had compared to over 20 restaurant s that I've tried. It's definitely worth a trip but just only order what the waiter recommends.", "We had lunch at Lotus of Siam from a trusted recommendation, and it was 100% spot on! We were warned that we should get a reservation, but luckily lunch was not as busy and we were seated right away (we also learned dinner reservations were COMPLETELY booked).\n\nDon''t let the parking lot and outside fool you. This place is a real gem!\n\nGarlic prawns - AMAZING. Large and juicy, and somehow the skin is removed except at the tail, which forms kind of like a potato chip. This was our favorite dish.\n\nCrispy duck with chili leafs - also excellent. Duck was very meaty and flavorful. \n\nThe two dishes above were a bit pricey at $24-27ish each, but it was definitely well worth it!", "We heard lots about this Thai restaurant so decided to give it a shot since we were visiting Vegas for the weekend back in Aug 2015.  Based upon what we had it is a solid 3.5 for now. Until we return to try more items then I'll review again & hopefully I'll bump it up to 4 stars!\n\n:: TO-GO ORDER EXPERIENCE ::\n\nWe were pressed for time and had decided to do To-Go pick up on a Sunday. Restaurant doesn't open until 5:30 PM but we called ahead anyways at 5:15 PM to give it a shot. Even though we were able to place our order they do tell you kitchen does not open until 5:30 PM. \nWhen we got to the restaurant (located in a pretty run down/sketchy looking strip mall) there were already a line out the door!  \n\nEntrance to the restaurant was so TINY -- to get in you pretty much have to go in a single file line (where there is alot of people). You also have to wait in the same line even for To-Go orders! Due to the mad line we didn't pick up our To-Go order until 5:50 PM. But the gal at the front counter was very nice.  Regardless, IMO they should have a separate To-Go line or something :P\n\n:: RESTAURANT INTERIOR ::\n\nThe interior was pretty big! I couldn't even tell from the outside. Upon entrance into the establishment there is a wine cellar display and to the very right of the venue is a bar where patrons can wait for their table to be called. The atmosphere was nice and d\u00e9cor was decent. A say a bit to much celebrity photos covering the walls left & right. It's a very casual dining establishment & away from the glitz & glam of the Vegas strip. \n\n:: FOOD ::\n\nPrices here are seriously a bit steep for Thai food.  But due to the hype we tried it out anyways. For AMAZING damn good food I'll pay for it -- of course when my wallet allows it :P\n\nCRISPY DUCK W/ PANANG  $24    (4.5/5)\n-- Portion kind of small for the price. Hence the minus 0.5 star. Duck was definitely crispy & there were no bones! The panang curry was delicious! But i wished they gave more tho :P \n\nSUA RONG HAI   $18   (3.5/5)\n-- Aka the \"Crying Tiger.\" Generous charbroiled beef portion but something about the charbroiled taste of the beef was a little off/different or maybe this is the true taste of a Crying Tiger? The home-made spicy sauce was not so bad but not much tang to it. \n\nCRAB FRIED RICE   $14   (2.5/5)\n-- There really were HARDLY any crab pieces in this fried rice. Tasted like regular fried rice. Definitely not worth the price. You're probs better off with the regular Thai fried rice for cheaper.\n\nTHAI ICED COFFEE   $2.50   (3/5)\n-- My taste bud didn't quite love it but found it not bad... something was lacking. Maybe it's just me?!", "We make a point to dine here when we are in Vegas.  Great food and service.  garlic prawns, yellow curry, spicy chicken wings, som thum, and nua nam took are excellent.  They open at 5:30 for dinner so if you do not have a reservation, get here by 5:00 so you can get seated when they open.  Otherwise, the wait can be up to a hour starting at 6:00 pm", "We ordered a take out. 2 garlic prawns and 1 soft shell crab papaya salad, and the total was over $80. Ouch!!!\nToo pricey. The food was good, but I think the price is ridiculous.", "We try to eat at lotus every time we are in Vegas. We are originally from Los Angeles, and will plan to leave from la at 6am to make sure we get there in time for lunch because it's just that good. Real good. That good, good. The garlic prawns. The crispy duck curry. Gooooooood. So good, that we will forego Vegas strip restaurants and go back on Saturday night, and wait an hour for a table so we can experience those prawns and crispy duck curry all over again. You can't go wrong with anything on the Northern Specialties section of the menu. We are making our way down the menu one trip to Vegas at a time. Absolutely one of the best thai places, hands down.", "We were a bit disappointed by the taste of the food. The crispy duck panang is very good with a nice panang coconut curry. But the Thai papaya salad and the en tuan soup was a downer. The salad is crowded with blend stiff papaya without much other ingredients nor too much flavor. The soup on the other extreme has too much spice such that it tastes excessive of star anise. \n\nThe coconut ice cream with sweet rice was good, although at time there was clumps in the rice and chunks of ice in the coconut ice cream that broke the texture of this dessert.", "We were getting a bit desperate finding a place in their area that was open for lunch - at least beyond the soulless fast food options in the area. Finally lucked out here. Great food and the service was spot on, even though they were just about to close their lunch service. I'll definitely come here again.", "We were super excited to try this restaurant but it was OK....rather disappointed!", "We were told the wait for our table for 2 would be a 45-65 minute wait on a Saturday, about 8pm. We were seated in under 30. \nWe started with the Spicy Wings, the Tom Yum Koon soup and the Thai Salad.\nThe wings were fabulous- we could have eaten plate after plate all night. \nThe shrimp were wonderfully delicate in the Tom Yum Soup. \nWe agreed we could have just drunk the peanut dressing for the Thai salad on its own.\nAnd the Crispy Duck Panang style. Perfection. The duck was melt in your mouth tender, with that crispy skin as a beautiful balance. We ordered it as a 3 for spice, and it was a perfect build for me, though my hub said he would have it as a 4 or 5 next time for the kick. \nMy hub's Thai Coffee had a nice, rich flavor that was not drowned in cream. My Thai Iced Tea was the same.\nThis will be one of our go to places for Vegas. \nExcellent all around.", "Went for lunch and the Buffet is GONE! Miss it! Lunch item prices should be lower, smaller portions, but it's one menu for all. Not wise. Food is always excellent. Service okay. Don't know when I'll go back. Just for dinner.", "What a little gem in the strip mall rough! After being price gouged at our hotel for a day, it was so refreshing to be charged as much for a bottle of wine as a glass would have cost back at the ranch. And the food was thai-rrific! As an aside, I never tire of bad thai puns. No frills ambience, and that's just fine with me.", "What a surprise when I came here! I was apprehensive to this place just from sight. But once in and seated I was floored! The service is great and the food it amazing!!", "What happens in Vegas stays in Vegas....unless you're talking about the absolute best Thai food you'll find this side of the Pacific Ocean. Then go ahead and tell everyone!\n\nWhat to order:\n- Khao Soi - A curry noodle dish from the Northern menu. You don't find Northern Thai food too often in restaurants, but based on this dish, we should see it more. You've had Pad Thai a million times, get this superior noodle dish instead.\n- Garlic Prawns - Not overly greasy, not quite tempura, not quite salt baked, utterly perfect. The prawns are huge, well seasoned, and the shells (also fried) are equally delicious!\n- Crispy Duck in Penang - I've basically only had duck cooked the Chinese way (roasted, Peking-style, or braised) or the western way (confit or medium rare breast). This is a whole new world of preparation, and it's incredible. The texture is great without sacrificing flavor. And baby, I could bathe in that panang. \n\nTips:\n- If you're going for dinner, you'll want to make a reservation. Lunch doesn't take reservations, so just get there as early as possible.\n- Dishes are pricier than other Thai restaurants, and they are also typically smaller (trust me, it's well worth it!). Order accordingly. \n- The spice scale (from 1-10) is calibrated toward an American palate. So if you're like me and have a real need for heat, order EVERYTHING at level 10. You can request for it even higher if you really want to punish your GI tract.\n- Driving is preferable as the cabs can be unreliable. I'd keep your valuables out of sight though.\n\nIf you're only having one meal it Vegas, eat here.\nIf you're staying for several days, eat here at least twice.", "When visiting Vegas, I always stop and eat here at Lotus of Siam. It's the best Thai food.  Don't let the strip mall worry you, the restaurant is nice once you get inside. The garlic prawns are so good and I always order them.  The coconut lemongrass soup is real tasty.  The duck is super tasty too. You just can't go wrong here. Make sure to get reservations or get there when they open and they'll accommodate your party.  My Vegas trips are enhanced after visiting Lotus of Siam.", "Who doesn't love this place? Making reservations well in advance is key here. Don't be like those people standing outside for hours because they thought it wouldn't be that busy.", "Who would've thought such a delicious, clean place would be located in what looks like a vacant strip mall.  Good food is really best enjoyed when coupled with excellent service...& the Lotus of Siam has an abundance of both.  The food was savory and a great value.  Good for a couples dinner or large party.  We had a party of 16 which they did a great job accommodating.  We will definitely be returning on our next trip out.  Kudos to Tony our server...thanks for a great experience!", "Woohoo! As good as it gets!", "Worth the trip to this strange strip mall. \n\nWe headed there for lunch on a Friday and were quickly seated.\n\nThe place is so much bigger than I expected! And they have a pretty amazing wine selection, though we didn't have any on this visit.\n\nThe duck curry was the best. We also ordered fried tofu and a pork dry curry which was far spicier than I had wanted but also too good to resist.", "Yelp said they were open weekends so we sprung for the $25 cab ride. They were closed at noon. The driver took us to china town where we had a 5 star lunch at Krung Thai and a massage at Wei Wei. Go to china town!!!", "Yum!  Love it!  We've been there many times. Don't be frightened by the location, once you are inside, it's all good.  The food is amazing and the wine selection is spectacular.  They even take special care in polishing the wine glasses... Classy!  It's always busy, better to make a reservation.", "\u0130stanbul da yasayan biri olarak thai food lar\u0131nda cokca deneyimliyim.. Dolay\u0131s\u0131yla cok enteresan gelmedi ama inan\u0131lmaz lezzetli.. vegas a gelirsen mutlaka ugranmas\u0131 gerekenler listene eklemelisin...", "damn this place is awesome, food is perfect and full of taste, i had to comeback and never regret", "delicious!  happy enviornment, quality dishes, knowledgable servers.  great experience!", "don't believe the hype. not all that.", "great Thai food.  need a reservation cause it's always packed.  komol a few doors down is a great alternative if you don't want to wait", "heard lots of hype about this place so i checked it out. the food is ok. but i expected more from a $300+ bill for 4 people.  lobster, shrimp, sticky rice, soups. average thai food. for the same money, there are better restaurant choices in the area.", "i love this place, i love everything about it...\nthe food is amazing\nthe servers are nice\nthe seating is comfy\nthe wine cooler is cool ;)\nbut, the prices!!!!! why do they keep going up? this is not cool.", "i need to go back, it's that good", "lots better Thai restaurants than this place. cant believe its a national rated place. took me a while to figure out why the deep fried veggies were light pink, Palm oil", "never expected this place to be so good, all the good reviews about this place are not lying !", "nom nomz. heard about this place through a friend who wanted to go try it. checked it out on Yelp and it is probably the highest rated Thai restaurant in all of Vegas. my group figured we HAD to go before we left Vegas. plus, i love Thai food anyways. \n\nBe prepared for an early dinner or plan when you're going and make reservations (you need to make them at least 7 days in advance). the restaurant opens at 5:30PM and the line is no joke. my friends and I had a large party so we got there at about 5PM and started waiting in line. I thought it was ridiculous that we went so early since we were the only ones waiting in line. lo and behold, 10 minutes later, the line was down the block. doors opened at 5:30PM and the reservations line gets seated first. then my party was first in line to get a table since we got there so early. i looked around as we ordered and the restaurant filled up quickly. \n\nthe restaurant is known for it's northern Thai food so leave the traditional Pad Thai at home. my party decided to order a bunch of food and just share it family style. we had 2 orders of their garlic prawns, the chicken khao soi (chicken served on a bed of egg noodles in a curry base sauce, garnished with sliced red onions, lime and pickled vegetables), nam kao tod (Crispy rice mixed with sour cubed pork sausages, cilantro, green onions, grounded dry chilis, ginger, peanuts and lime juice), drunken noodle soft shell crab, panang curry with crispy duck, and a beef dish... I believe it was the Pad Prik Sod (Choice of meat saut\u00e9ed with bell peppers, fresh chili pepper, & onions). we all also ordered the Thai Iced Tea which is delicious and highly recommended. I love that you can really taste the tea flavor yet it was still sweet and creamy. \n\nwhen the food came, we were all ready to chow down. they also gave us a basket of rice and said that if we needed more, we could just ask. the dishes seemed small but for some reason, we had a party of 8 and were still not able to finish all the food. everything was amazing and tasted super fresh. I would definitely recommend the garlic prawns and any dish with the crispy duck. \n\nof course we all wanted to get a dessert before we left so we ordered one mango sticky rice to share amongst us. the mango was so ripe and sweet. the coconut sticky rice was perfectly cooked and had just the right amount of sweet coconutty aroma to balance out the mango. i normally dont like sticky rice desserts but I can definitely come back for this one! \n\noverall, amazing food, great service, nice atmosphere. the restaurant looks deserted in the middle of an empty plaza if you arrive early, but don't judge a book by it's cover! I can see why it's the most highly rated Thai restaurant in Vegas. you have to give it a try if you're in this area! Truly unique restaurant that you would never imagine to find in all the glitz and glamour of Vegas.", "orange appliance llc is awesome", "place is good. and the customer service is good aswell", "the best thai food in las vegas!   you would never guess that the best thai food in vegas is in some nondescript crappy strip mall a few miles off the strip but it is.  be prepared to wait...I dont know that they do reservations but its worth it.  the food is excellent and is quite reasonable especially when you compare it to comparable quality restaurants in the major casinos!", "this place was amazing"]
[2015, "season1"]	[",,]beccause other thai rest. in usa i taste,all lousy,only this one ok,all other food ok for me,but pad thai noodle was very lousy,taste like sweet sour noodle  and crab fryrice  only one  piece small tiny crab like quarter/do not go lunch ,they charge same price anyway,my  my commen  /dinner 4 star lunch sorry only 2 star/", "1.5 hours of waiting if you don't RSVP. This was on a Monday night too. Luckily the fiance RSVP'd and we scurried past everyone.\n\nThe area its located in seems sketchy. It's like the scene of a drug deal in a movie outside a billiards bar. With everything looking closed, I wasn't even sure the restaurant was open if it wasn't for a few anonymous black jacketed patrons hanging outside of their door. As soon as I parked and got out of the car, I got hit up by a random stranger on a bicycle if he can clean my car for money. I said no thanks and rushed my family to the restaurant.\n\nIt gets better inside after seeing warmth and kind faces. At first glance the restaurant looks rather confined, like a San Francisco or New York restaurant that struggles with optimizing its square footage. Little did I know, there's a backroom and getting there felt like the infamous Goodfellas scene, walking through corridors and into a whole other adventure.\n\nFood wise I ordered the house special fried rice, the tom kha gai, chop suey, and the garlic prawns based on other yelpers' thoughts.\n\nAll money. For sure the Garlic Prawns is a must. For me I loved the house special friend rice a lot because they did tomato fried rice with justice. It's surprisingly on the oily side so not everyone in my family enjoyed it like I did. Chop suey was also done right and if it wasn't for the price, I would order it over any other restaurant's. \n\nOther yelpers noted the dirty dishes. My experience was no exception as I had to ask for a new clean plate.\n\nDamage was around $60. Good for a date and food for the family every now and then but too rich for my blood.", "1:40 waiting. No food at bar. Great wine selection. Great prices. Food ok. Not worth the wait though. You can find tastier thai food without all the fuzz. I could return anyway. All the waiters seems to be from Thailand. Food arrived cold at the table. Only the soup was hot.", "5 stars for food, 2 stars for the incredibly long painful wait for a table.\n\nThis is one of the best Thai restaurants in the USA. Authentic and delicious. The place was buzzing and overly busy during Project trade show. \n\nStarted with Sigha beer then Chang beer waiting for 1.5 hours for a table. Worth the wait yes.\n\nThe Northern Thai dishes are incredible. (This is their speciality).\n\nStarted with Tod Mun Plar - fried fish cakes and they are yummy. Also spicy chicken wings which are some of the spiciest I have had in a while and delicious too!\n\nThen comes the Tom Yum Koong soup - hot and sour shrimp soup with lime and lemongrass also amazing.\n\nFor entree I had issan style grilled pork sausage with chili and peanuts, one of my go to dishes when it's on the menu in any Thai place. Nua yum Katiem was outstanding, this dish is sliced beef served with cabbage tangy sauce and smothered with fresh garlic, drool worthy!\n\nThis place is off the beaten path, not on the strip but 100% worth a cab ride to eat in this hidden gem.", "Absolutely the best meal ive ever had. The garlic shrimp is to die for. Weird location. But food is delicious. Cant wait to go back to Vegas!!!!", "Actually, service is a 3.5  but food is a 2. Took 3 friends to dinner on 1/14/15. The restaurant was busy from the get go. Being a Thai who is also proficient with Chinese, Japanese, French, and Italian cuisine, I fail to see why this restaurant receives such rave reviews. We order 3 starters and 6 main dishes. Only the following met my expections: Isaan sausage, roast duck curry, and the starter Crispy noodle. The taste was authentic. Everything else was for people who do not know real Thai food. for example, you cannot cook a catfish with Thai holly basil without the holly basil. It is truly a shame. The Pork sate has no resemblance to what the real pork sate is in all over Thailand.\nThe Isaan soup without any of the Isaan herbs can never be accepted. The Northen pork curry did not taste like anything I had in Northen Thailand. Very unfortunate. On the plus side, the service from the wine stewardess and the food servers were very efficient. We bought a good bottle of red, ordered a bottle of German white and they waived the $25 corkage fee, which is very nice. Not sure what to recommend on Thai restaurants in Vegas. Based on my personal experience, there are extremely few Real Thai restaurants in the country. Look for a place with the majority of clientele being Asians/Thai. Although, most Thais don't eat out in Thai restaurants simply because of the reason I mention mention above.\nGood eating.", "After hearing about Lotus of Siam from Anthony Bourdain and seeing the glowing reviews here on Yelp, I knew that a meal here must be a part of my visit to Las Vegas. \n\nLocated in a nondescript lot that would make one easily forget the glitz and glamor that are synonymous with Las Vegas. It was rather sketchy, not just by its looks but in actuality, if one were to go with Lotus of Siam and the Las Vegas police's notice to their patrons that asks them not to leave valuables in cars. We came twenty minutes after they opened for Saturday lunch, and there was already a fifteen-minute wait. The waiting area is rather intimate and I was truly thankful that we were able to sit in there instead of having to wait outside and experience the dry desert heat (already in the mid-80's at around 11 AM). However, we took advantage of this little wait to look up their menu and see what looks particularly appetizing.\n\nThe staff was incredibly friendly and were evidently used to handling their many visitors. We hardly had to wait for anything during our visit: the water glasses were refilled promptly, the food arrived in about ten minutes, and the check was given to us within five minutes of finishing our meal. Really, if I was a little nervous about grumpy service due to their popularity, my nervousness was misplaced.\n\nNow to the food. For our appetizer, we tried the tod mun plar, which is a popular Thai street food. It was delicious. We were able to taste the fish without getting that unpleasant fishy flavor lingering in our palate after consumption. Even the daughter, who is not a fan of fish that does not come in fish and chips form, enjoyed the tod mun plar. It was a great omen for the rest of our meal.\n\nFor entr\u00e9e, we had the northern larb, kang care, and crispy duck with panang sauce to eat with their combination fried rice. Everything was perfectly spiced and absolutely delicious. The northern larb is on the spicy side, so if you are not into spicy, maybe skip it. But if you like spicy food that offer complexity of flavors that go beyond the piquant, the northern larb will not disappoint. The kang care also delivered  and may be one of the best curries I have ever had.\n\nThe crispy duck with panang sauce from the chef's selection was undeniably the star of our meal. It was pricey, but it worked hard for every single cent of our hard-earned money. The duck was seasoned well and cooked perfectly that it did not get soggy even if it sat in the sauce it came with. But that sauce was unforgettable. It was very flavorful and just fantastic. My cousin and I had a \"friendly\" argument, which I lost, as to who can take the sauce home to eat with just plain steamed rice. Seriously, it was so delicious, I would be happy to eat that with nothing else but steamed rice for days on end and call myself a lucky girl. That good.\n\nThe fried rice was good, but I would suggest settling for steamed rice instead because it is rather heavy. I would prefer eating more of their delicious entr\u00e9e rather than fried rice. While it did not disappoint, I was rather resentful of our choice to order it because I should have known better, what with my limited stomach space and all.\n\nThe food is on the pricey side and the servings are on the small side, but if you are in Las Vegas and want to go beyond the buffets they are justifiably famous for and want to go where locals go, do go to Lotus of Siam.", "After watching the episode of Anthony Bourdain's visit to Lotus of Siam, I was completely psyched about finally experiencing the restaurant for myself first hand. We were lucky enough to walk into the restaurant at 6:00pm on a Friday night as a group of three with no reservations and get seated immediately.\n\nAfter perusing through over a 150 choices, I ultimately decided to start off with the Bangkok style tom kha kai and a Thai iced tea. I typically order this soup at every Thai restaurant that I attend, not only because it is a guilty pleasure of mine, but also because it serves as an excellent baseline comparison. With that being said, I was certainly disappointed with this dish. Obviously lime is a crucial element of tom kha kai, but this level of lime was excruciatingly overpowering, so much so that the lime was entirely the focus of the dish. The decision to use button mushrooms in the soup, instead of straw mushrooms also bothered me since button mushrooms are almost as substandard as shiitakes. \n\nAnyways, after finishing the tom kha kai I ignored the formation of any previous negative judgements, and ordered the chef's choice: the crispy duck with panang. The duck was placed atop the curry in a strategic effort to maintain the crispness of the skin, and it did just that. The duck was decadent, however, the panang was actually the highlight of the dish: spicy, creamy, well-balanced and delicious with both the rice and duck.\n\nUltimately, I highly recommend skipping the tom kha kai as I am sure that there are much better starters on the menu. As others have stated, please don't even bother to order the pad thai, there is seriously no excuse. Although I've notice some complaints from other Yelpers, the crispy duck with panang was worth the high price point. The dish fortunately provided a much needed redemption from the letdown of the tom kha kai. I'll certainly visit again to order more Northern dishes.", "Amazing amazing amazing, its the best Thai I've ever had. The crispy duck is a must have. So sad I'm leaving Vegas tmrw.\n\n\nStrongly recommend to come early (like before 6 pm)\nThe waiting time can be as long as 2 hours!", "Amazing thai food. The location is a little suspect but once inside the restaurant is nice. I recommend the prawns and crispy rice. I can't wait to go back to try more dishes.", "Amazing. You have no clue from the outside. Blacked out windows and a little \"open\" sign. You walk into a restaurant that is spacious and pumps out amazing food in copious quantities to maybe a hundred diners. Food is as good as it gets from a 12 page menu cooked by a Thai master. If you are in Vegas you have to try. Not inexpensive but worth every penny.", "An overdue review to add to the thousands of reviews.\n\nThey give you a 1-10 spice ratio. 7 is very very spicy. Get a 5 if you like spice but still want flavor.\n\nWe got the Tom Yum Soup, Glass Noodles, Khao Soi, and Red Curry. Everything was excellent except the Glass Noodles were only average. The Khao Soi is soooo good though.\n\nPortions are small, so yes we had to order 4 dishes for 2 people.", "BEST THAI FOOD IN LAS VEGAS, hands down!\n\nI first heard about this place on yelp, because I was curious on what Thai restaurant in Vegas had the highest reviews, and it was this one!\n\nLocation: hidden in an unpopular plaza, and the sign saying \"lotus of Siam\" is quite outdated. From the outside it looks very small, but don't be fool, the restaurant is way bigger than it looks!\n\nInterior: signs and many awards of the glorious food. And many celebrity photos hung around the walls. Also, they have carpet that is kept super clean! I didn't see one big stain at all! Once you enter you'll see a huge glass window, which they store their wines. Pretty cool I might say. \n\nFood: For the entrees, I got the chicken pad Thai ($10.95) and chicken panang ($12.95) which comes with one bowl of rice. \n\nChicken Pad Thai ($10.95): seriously the best I've ever ate! They don't disappoint. Everything tasted so fresh and they had a good ratio between the noodles, meat, and veggies. Other Thai restaurants they put too much green sprouts in the noodle and/or they put too much eggs or cook the egg weird. They made sure everything tasted perfectly. \n\nChicken panang ($12.95): I was super excited to try this. I got a 3/10 for spice level since I don't like too spicy. I tasted this curry, and it's by far the best curry I ever had. The curry wasn't too thick and it was at an accurate, mild spice. I definitely would get this every time I go there! It's a must have!\n\nFried bananas ($8.50): i was nervous that the fried part of the banana would be overbearing and make me sick but it totally didn't. The fried bananas aren't oily at all. It came out crispy and they added shredded coconut in the fried bananas also. They lightly put powdered sugar and caramel sauce on it. Definitely a great way to end my meal! \n\nThai tea ($2.50): Thai tea at other places are way too sweet but this place didn't make me feel like I was gonna have diabetes. The Thai tea tasted heavenly. The creamer that they put in their Thai tea definitely makes their drink stand out from other restaurants. \n\nService: I made reservations at 7:30pm on a Monday night. We got sat down right when we came inside and once we ordered our food, we received it within 10-15mins! Not a long wait at all! I like how they were smiling and always refilling our waters without us asking them. This restaurant was busy, but they were running things very smoothly. I ended up giving a few more dollars in tips because of their service :]\n\nCons: Entrees are pretty pricey for small portions and I didn't like how they gave us the check right when we got our desserts. I felt very rushed and agitated since there were several people waiting for a table. \n\nOverall, GREAT FOOD AND SERVICE! I love lotus of Siam!", "BEST THAI FOOD IN LAS VEGAS, hands down. \n\nI first heard about this place on yelp, because I was curious on what Thai restaurant in Vegas had the highest reviews, and it was this one!\n\nLocation: hidden in an unpopular plaza, and the sign saying \"lotus of Siam\" is quite outdated. From the outside it looks very small, but don't be fool, the restaurant is way bigger than it looks!\n\nInterior: signs and many awards of the glorious food. And many celebrity photos hung around the walls. Also, they have carpet that is kept super clean! I didn't see one big stain at all! Once you enter you'll see a huge glass window, which they store their wines. Pretty cool I might say. \n\nFood: For the entrees, I got the chicken pad Thai ($10.95) and chicken panang ($12.95) which comes with one bowl of rice. \n\nChicken Pad Thai ($10.95): seriously the best I've ever ate! They don't disappoint. Everything tasted so fresh and they had a good ratio between the noodles, meat, and veggies. Other Thai restaurants they put too much green sprouts in the noodle and/or they put too much eggs or cook the egg weird. They made sure everything tasted perfectly. \n\nChicken panang ($12.95): I was super excited to try this. I got a 3/10 for spice level since I don't like too spicy. I tasted this curry, and it's by far the best curry I ever had. The curry wasn't too thick and it was at an accurate, mild spice. I definitely would get this every time I go there! It's a must have!\n\nFried bananas ($8.50): i was nervous that the fried part of the banana would be overbearing and make me sick but it totally didn't. The fried bananas aren't oily at all. It came out crispy and they added shredded coconut in the fried bananas also. They lightly put powdered sugar and caramel sauce on it. Definitely a great way to end my meal! \n\nThai tea ($2.50): Thai tea at other places are way too sweet but this place didn't make me feel like I was gonna have diabetes. The Thai tea tasted heavenly. The creamer that they put in their Thai tea definitely makes their drink stand out from other restaurants. \n\nService: I made reservations at 7:30pm on a Monday night. We got sat down right when we came inside and once we ordered our food, we received it within 10-15mins! Not a long wait at all! I like how they were smiling and always refilling our waters without us asking them. This restaurant was busy, but they were running things very smoothly. I ended up giving a few more dollars in tips because of their service :]\n\nCons: Entrees are pretty pricey for small portions and I didn't like how they gave us the check right when we got our desserts. I felt very rushed and agitated since there were several people waiting for a table. \n\nOverall, GREAT FOOD AND SERVICE! I love lotus of Siam!!", "Been trying to go here for years. If I don't have a reservation on the weekend the wait is at least an hour. \n\nWent the take out route. Food is really good. It's in a seedy part of Vegas but is world renowned. When u walk in there are celebs and food critics pics all over the walls. Glad I was able to experience it.", "Best Thai West of the Rockies!", "Best Thai food I've ever had in my life. I would drive to Vegas from San Diego just to eat here.", "Best Thai food in Las Vegas Hands down. May be a wait but there is a reason why and its worth it everytime.", "Best Thai food in Las Vegas......everything is delicious, my only BUTS are service and location.....restaurant is not very cozy or nice, and parking lot is very ghetto but I do really love the food......the dishes that have charbroiled steak are outstanding!", "Best Thai place in the country no question! Some must try dishes are the beef tendon soup, crispy garlic prawn, and crispy duck over drunken noodles", "Best Thai restaurant I've ever been to. Might be the only one I've ever given a 5 star review to. The fact that it was a full house on a Tuesday ought to give you an idea of how good the food is. Yelpers didn't let me down with the Garlic Prawn and Crispy Duck Panang recommendations. Will definitely return next time I visit Vegas.", "Best Thai restaurant hands down. Where do I even begin!? We arrived during dinner rush, but honestly they're probably busy at any hour since it's been featured on Food Network, among other places. It is handy that they had iPads set up to where they can text you when they're ready to seat your party. There is also a bar area and a waiting room so you don't have to wait outside. Before dinner, we grabbed beers and Thai tea to drink in the waiting room while being able to sit and relax inside. They have photos of celebrities from movie stars to Food Network shows all over their walls, and the owner of the restaurant which was also the chef, popularly walked around to tables with which seemed to be many regulars praising him and greeting him. Our table was ready and we ordered the prawns which seemed to be most popular on all of the tables, and a duck noodle. Mind you, I'm not a fan of duck but it was crisp and fried to perfection in the most perfect sauce. The prawns were huge and flavorful. We also had a steak dish that came with a small sauce that is to die for. What had me was that they offer the Laos papaya salad that not many other places do. We ordered a spice level of 10 and we were dying but it was literally perfection. Everything was extremely good. I was disappointed to find out that they were out of mango sticky rice, so we settled for a fried banana and ice cream, which tasted similar to Filipino banana lumpia, but they were cut up into small pieces for an easier family style and small portioning. Guaranteed I will visit this place every time I go to Vegas. You won't be let down!", "Best Thai restaurant iv ate in my life ....", "By far my favorite restaurant ever!!! It's authentic, fresh, and of superb quality. It's a hole in the wall, but remarkable food! Staff is attending and very friendly and knowledgable of the menu. Only complain is the long wait times....but it's worth the wait. The long wait times says a lot, think about it ;)", "Came here at 530, right when they open and there wasn't a wait. The restaurant is pretty large inside, with lots of seating. I came with 4 other people, so we did family style. \n\nWe ordered the pad thai, pork stew curry, khao soi, crispy rice, and crispy duck with drunken noodles. My favorite dish was the crispy duck with drunken noodles. Extra crispy and the drunken noodles were delicious!! I've had khao soi before and its one of my favorite dishes. What's not to like about noodles in a curry soup? The pork stew was very tender, but the dish was tiny. It came in a little soup bowl or sauce bowl. The pad thai was a little different, the noodles were thinner than what I'm used to and not as sweet. The crispy rice was a good appetizer, but nothing too special. \n\nI was kind of disappointed in this place. After reading all the rave reviews, I was expecting the best thai food, but it was just okay.", "Deeply satisfying, rich, bright flavors, contrasted by that unforgettable, pallet-stimulating, fermented tinge of northern style chili dips... should you wish to indulge that is...\n\nIf you're in the mood for flavors not typical of a normal Thai restaurant experience I recommend one of the chili dips with a side of sticky rice to order alongside your typical Thai curry fare ; pungent, deep flavors reminiscent of korean pork marinated with fermented chili paste mix.\n\n...very interesting that it's served with a side of sticky rice, somewhat less consumed in Southeast Asia but coincidently, a staple in east Asia: almost as if the pallet demands it to accompany it's instinctive, fermented counterpart...\n\nTo explore these things of course skip right to the back of the menu to the highly touted \"northern\" segment, or the chef's recommendations on the following page.  I personally recommend the crispy duck served with curry on atop a bed of noodles - heaven on a plate my friends.\n\nThis place is all substance, some hype yes.  But that actually make it even more impressive...a place living up to it's expectation, now that's a rarety. \n\n5 bright stars.", "Delicious and amazing. Tourists and locals should plan to eat here at least one time. The food is authentic and the atmosphere is appropriate for any occasion. You will not be disappointed.\n\nI would highly recommend the Khoa Soi.", "Delicious food and great service! This is another of our \"must eats\" when in Vegas. The Crispy Duck on Drunken Noodles is the best I've ever tasted! Make reservations early for this place. It fills up fast especially on the weekends.", "Delicious, delicious Thai restaurant just off the Strip. Highly recommended by celebrity chefs. Came here hungry on a Friday night. We had no reservation. No problem. Seated immediately.\n\nWe ordered beef khao soi, seafood drunken noodles, moo yang, and tub wharn. Khao soi is one of my favorite dishes to eat and they do it great here. Nice and creamy coconut milk sauce with a little bit of heat. Not too thick. Not too runny. Plenty of crispy egg noodles that stayed crispy even when drenched in sauce. The tender beef and egg noodles soaked up all kinds of flavor. Perfect. Best khao soi.\n\nThe moo yang was very, very tender. Loved it. Our meal at Lotus of Siam was convenient, affordable, comfortable, and had bold flavors. Worthy of full marks.", "Don't let the outside of the building or the surrounding ghost town of a strip mall fool you...go through the door and find possibly the best Thai in Vegas. \n\nOk so I generally keep things very simple when trying new Thai places and these guys blew away my expectations. A buddy told me about this place a year ago and unfortunately we didn't get a chance to try it so last week I made it a point to stop in, and so glad I did. \n\nIn keeping it simple I went for spicy vegetable soup and Pad Thai. Both of these dishes were fantastic, with a big peppery bite in the Thai hot Spicy Vegetable Soup, and the Pad Thai was so flavorful, best I've had in Vegas hands down. \n\nThe place looks like a dive but swing in it's well worth it, lunch on weekdays things were quite so that might be your chance to beat the dinner rush that others have mentioned...worked out perfect for me.", "Every time I come to Vegas I have to come here now. We came at 9pm on a Saturday and we waited about 10-15 minutes for a party of 2. It's a little off the strip, but well worth it! The service was great, our server helped us a lot in judging how much food we should order. We ended up ordering 4 dishes to share: spicy chicken wings, tom yum koong (shrimp), thai basil beef, and beef pad see ew. The chicken wings were amazing!! They weren't too spicy, more like a sweet chili, and they were served hot and crispy! The tom yum was by far the best tom yum I've ever had. It was spicy and tangy - perfection! The thai basil beef was very light and a solid dish as well. It went well with steamed white rice. The beef pad see ew was also great, just wish there were more greens added in! \n\nThis place operates very efficiently, our food came out no more than 10 minutes after we ordered it and every dish was hot and fresh! The spicy chicken wings are something you HAVE to order!", "Every time I'm in Vegas I come here at least once or twice. Let's just say this is the best thai place I ever ate at! The service was great and the food was so good you don't want to stop eating! Gotta try everything on the menu because I can't tell you what dish is better! Everything was good! One thing you need to know is that you need to make reservation ahead of time because there is always a long wait!", "Excellent Thai food. We had the drunken noodles with shrimp, green curry with tofu, and the crispy rice appetizer. The service was excellent and very friendly.", "Fabulous service and food!\n\nThe garlic prawns alone deserve a five star rating! Absolutely the best I've ever had. Crispy with the perfect balance of flavors and spices. I also loved the pad see ewe and papaya salad. So good!\n\nTheir service is awesome. We ordered a spice level of 4 for all the dishes. I could not handle it after the first dish. We talked to the waiter and he was able to tone it down for our last few dishes. In the mean time, he gave me a free thai ice tea to help relieve all the spice. How nice was that. \n\nWe went on a Wednesday night and it was crowded. We had to wait 30+ minutes. When we talked to the waiter that night, he told us that it was one of the slowest nights they had ever had. Go figure. He said that some of the workers didn't know what to do with themselves. haha \n\nThe food is authentic and amazing. Plus the prices are good. I can see why this restaurant is so famous. I dream about returning again one day to order another plate of prawns.", "Finally tried this place where limos and many more Caucasian people mingle with eastern Asian cuisine. The truth is there are many authentic and good restaurants out there for much cheaper, but this one speaks English well to cater to the masses and is just crazy popular because of it. I'm sure their business and price tag keeps everything fresh and good too. \n\nI would love to return and eat there often, but the high prices make that a less reasonable endeavor than other alternatives.", "First Thai place I've ever seen with a line out the door!\n\nThis place is a well oiled machine, first of all. We were in at 530, out at 620pm for our party of 6.\n\nService was good and friendly.\n\nNow the food.\nDrunken noodle with soft she'll crab - decent, but not mind blowing\nGarlic shrimp - ditto, and in fact, a bit overdone\nCrispy duck with red panang curry - very tasty, but could have used a little more curry\nPad sew - pretty standard \nSpicy beef salad - dressing was thicker than I've seen in Thai town (LA) and was heavy on tamarind.  It was tasty but, again, didn't wow me.\n\nAll in all, food was tasty and authentic, service was fast and friendly, but the portions were small for what you pay (compared to standard size thai servings ).\n\nA good experience but still more hype than anything else.  I'll stick to what I know in LA's Thai food scene.  \n\nSolid 3.5 at best!", "For a place that is a tourist destination I was skeptical but the execution and service is very high.  All the usual Thai fodder is on the menu but with many notable additions,  too many to go into, just head along and try it.  The wine list is mega extensive but at the end of the day you just need a simple cheap glass of reisling to pair this delicious food. Four for dinner with a glass of vino each $150.", "GREAT FOOD, very attentive and accommodating waiters service. the location is questionable but who care, as long as the food and customer service is great, i'll go into the hood!", "Getting a reservation here for dinner on a Saturday night is like pulling teeth!  I ended up getting a reservation on Sunday evening.  The restaurant is a decent size but it was pretty busy even for a Sunday.  Restaurant is in a sketchy area! \n\nGarlic Prawns- large and tasty succulent prawns.  It was good but I feel like you can get this dish somewhere else and probably for half the price.  It's really just deep fried prawns with a lot of garlic and black pepper.\n\nCrispy Duck in Panang Curry- my favorite dish of the two.  The curry is creamy, spicy, and was delicious with rice.  The crispy duck is good but only comes with about five pieces.  If they had just the panang curry without the ridiculous priced duck, I would get that instead.\n\nTasty food but I've had just as good thai food in LA for less hassle and better prices.", "Getting a reservation was hard...for some reason always got a busy signal or continued ringtone....when they finally answered it was like hitting the jackpot.\nOnce we got there we ordered the garlic prawns, crispy rice, braised shortribs in panang, and crispy duck with drunken noodles.....it was fantastic overall.\nThe crispy rice is more of a acquired taste...I like it but not for everyone as it is sour and salty but a good starter to encourage the appetite. The crispy prawns were amazing...my favorite part of this dish were the shells that had so much flavor. The crispy duck was the perfect level of spicy for me (I ordered 7 out of 10 and like things spicy) and the crispy part was super crispy and the moist parts were succulent all coated with a basil sauce that was to die for. Finally the short ribs in panang sauce was delicious. The sauce was flavorful and the meat tender.\nDefinitely worth the trip even out to the complex in the middle of nowhere.", "Great NORTHERN Thai food.\n\nIf you go there....I recommend only ordereing from the NORTHERN THAI section as that is their specialty.\n\nOrder your pad thai at Panda Express and come to this place for HIGH QUALITY Northern Thai cuisine!", "Great food but small portion and charged 18% tip if your group over  5 and more including all ages babies. My 2 years and 5weeks babies were charged for 18% tip. This restaurant is the best Thai restaurant in Vegas but their service is not the best for customers. Enjoy their great small portion foods but do not expect any service.", "Great food... I had the pleasure of having the seafood fried rice... the entree had just enough seafood and flavor...  I recommended everyone in Vegas hit this joint up if you want authentic Thai food!!! The best ever!!", "Great, great and more great. Started with green papaya salad. I asked for medium heat and it was plenty spicy. Tom yum shrimp soup was the best. Then I had pad Thai. Again ask for little spicy. It was perfect. I will go back every time I'm in Vegas.", "HAD to try this place after Anthony Bourdain's recommendation on Parts Unknown, and I FELL IN LOVE!!! if you watched that episode of Parts Unknown, the guy that Anthony Bourdain eats with at this restaurant says to try something from the \"northern\" part of the menu, and he's right!! DON'T try anything typical - pad thai, pad see ew, etc. BRANCH OUT!!\n\nUnder the \"northern\" section, we chose the Khoa Soi with beef, which is a noodle dish with a sauce that is similar to panang, but lighter. Under the \"chef's special\", we ordered the Crispy Duck Panang because it was so popular on Yelp. OH. MY. GOSH. Both of those dishes were delicious. But the Crispy Duck Panang was on another level. The duck was so well prepared. You can taste the crispiness of the skin. I expected the duck to be soggy because it's in the panang sauce, but no. It was fresh, it was crispy, it was delicious. There is definitely a lot of spice in the dish, but it was still amazing.\n\nPortions wise, each dish was on the small side. I typically only finish half of my entree from most restaurants, but I was able to finish my crispy duck panang and my boyfriend was able to finish his dish as well. The price point is also pretty high - over $20 for each of the dishes, but they were definitely worth it. I've never tried thai food like this before.\n\nWait time: we came on a monday night, about 20 minutes after they open and it was already pretty packed in the restaurant. One hour after it opened, there was a huge gathering of people waiting for tables. If you can, get a reservation or come when it opens because you definitely need to try it.", "Have been here multiple times in the past years. I guess when the restaurant has already built their reputation they don't watch the quality of their food. \n\nOrdered for two: Garlic Prawns and Braised Short Ribs in Padang curry. \n\nGarlic Prawns excellent as always! \n\nBraised Short Ribs in Padang curry such a disappointment. Yes beef is tender but for sure it wasn't short ribs. I am a great home cook and I know my ingredients. I also had order this dish many times before, but this time really disappointed with the quality of the beef.", "Highly overrated and overpriced. Not a bad place, but I honestly think people say it's good just because other people say it's good. The prices were a dollar more expensive than people claim in Yelp, so they appear to keep hiking up the prices. People continue to line up and pay it, so I don't blame the restaurant for meeting market demand - I just don't understand it.\n\n1) Garlic prawns.\nEveryone says to get it, and the pictures look great. I ordered this, and the wrong thing came out. Turns out, there are two kinds and you need to clearly specify which one. The one in all the Yelp photos is the deep-fried version. Otherwise they give you the BBQ/grilled version. The grilled version is not bad, but wish I knew. $26 is a lot for the wrong dish.\n\n2) Khao Soi.\nIt's okay. I like how the noodles are fairly soft, but nothing special. \n\n3) Drunken seafood noodles.\nThis one was terrible. Normally I love wide, pan-fried rice noodle dishes, but this one came as a giant messy wet mush of dough as the noodles got soggy and fused together. I picked at the seafood and veggies and left all the noodles, which should've been slightly crispy on the pan-fried side and normally the best part of the dish.\n\nI want to note that the staff seemed friendly. I just don't get the customer ratings; the same food or better is readily available at every other Thai restaurant for about $6.95 a dish.", "Hmmm... \nI had a lot of high expectations for this place. It's so well-known and was voted one of the best Thai Restaurants in America. Yes, in America! Now, I do not know if it is because I live near Thai Town near Hollywood and have tried some bomb Thai food in the past, or even because west LA itself has good Thai food, but this place didn't blow my mind. It didn't necessarily disappoint either, as the food was all really good. I just think that I expected something different? \n\nWe tried all the standard thai dishes here but I think my favorite was the garlic shrimp dish.  Dinner reservations are highly recommended. My friends and I made reservations here weeks in advance before our usual Vegas trip :) \nThe place is popping and it is located in a random strip mall. The restaurant itself is actually very big.  Staff is friendly and the menu is very extensive. You also have the ability to customize when you order, the level of spicy for most if not all dishes they serve.", "Huge huge huge wine list. Something for every taste. Its the best Thai food I have ever had. Excellent Curry and the Pad Thai was perfect. First strip mall Thai place I have ever eaten at that had James Beard Awards on the wall. Its a short cab ride from the Las Vegas strip, they don't take reservations and the line was out the door. We only waited 30 miutes on a Tuesday night for a table. You should try this place if your a Thai foody", "I always come to Lotus of Siam when in Vegas. It's simply delicious! I've had the drunken noodles (very good), duck (yum), but my favorite is the Khao Soi with shrimp. It's magnificent!! It's a difficult dish to find in other Thai restaurants. The service is fast. I always make a reservation as soon as I book my hotel.", "I am not sure how I have managed to live in Vegas my whole life with the exception of my college years and have never eaten at Lotus until late 2014. My first time coming the line was out of the door and there was an hour and half wait. I waited cause I figured it had to be good to have all of these people waiting and taxi after taxi dropping people off. The walls are covered with numerous pictures and accolades which is always a good sign as well. The location is definitely in a shady area but well worth the trip. My favorites are the crab fried rice garlic shrimp prawns black pepper chicken shrimp chow mein and bacon wrapped prawns. The service is good as well I've only had bad service one time at this restaurant. But it is definitely the best Thai restaurant in Vegas!!!!", "I ate the crispy duck in Panang sauce and briefly went to a utopian heaven where everything is always right, and delicious, and beautiful. I can't get over it, I think about it all the time.\n \nFind your way to this oasis of exquisite food in the middle of the desert that is Las Vegas. The duck is perfectly fried, and the flavors in the sauce are perfectly balanced. I got it at a 6/10 on the spicy scale, and it can be taken up a notch but do not overdo it to be able to appreciate the other subtle flavors.\n \nWe were told that the wait for 2, without a reservation would be 45 mins. Grabbed a glass of wine from their extensive list and sat in the backroom. We got a table within 20-25 mins, worth the wait. Don't be disheartened when you see a line of people outside. Also, there are plenty of cabs there to go back to your hotel on the strip.", "I chose this spot for my employee Christmas dinner  this year. We had about 20 people and I made a reservation a couple weeks in advance as I heard that this place is really popular. It was great! The atmosphere was fun and lively and all of my friends had a great time. The wine list was absolutely amazing! They had something like 500 varieties of wine! The best of all was the food! It was delicious! We ordered Tom Kai soup, pad thai noodles, basil chicken, fried rice and a bunch of appetizers. I can honestly say this is the best Thai food I've had in Vegas. If you want to eat here make sure you make a reservation because there is typically a line out the door before they even open for dinner!", "I guess maybe my expectations were too high? Perhaps I was too hyped on all the hype. The only things I found to be impressive were the service and the wine. We ordered a bottle of burgundy style Pinot noir that was heavenly. We arrived on time for out reservation and were seated and greeted promptly. *Be on time or they will give your table away if you're later than five min*. \n\nThe wine list... Insane. Pages and pages of wine... Unbelievable. I definitely would recommend ordering a bottle, considering the price per glass. Once you taste the food, you will definitely understand why. \n\nThe service was wonderful. We never ran out of water and there was someone constantly checking on us. I love that. \n\nThe ambiance... Way way way too bright. I felt like I was in a hospital. The lights... Just too much. No table decor. No candles. Paper placemats. The decor was really dated. And considering their extensive wine list, I was expecting more umph. But it was okay. \n\nThe food... Left so much to be desired. We had a jack fruit vegetable curry. It was more like overly spiced watery vegetable soup. We usually order a 7 or 8 in spice. We love heat. The 7 was almost un edible. Beware. The curry wasn't sweet at all... Just really really watery and hot. I'm not use to this style of Thai and obviously not a fan. The rice... It was good, but they gave one small bowl for the four of us. We order three meals. (Our friends were not impressed either). The price of the food is fitting for the ambiance. Will I return? Maybe for a birthday, but never on my own. We will stick to komol (same shopping center). They have the style of Thai I prefer apparently... And their food is just... It's so good. \n\nGive this place a shot and form\nYour own judgments though. Happy yelping.", "I had somewhat of mixed expectations of this restaurant as several friends/colleagues have raved about their dishes, namely the garlic prawns (fried version) and the duck panang; and others have not enjoyed it.\n\nMy SO made reservations here for 7:30 PM, which I'm glad we did, because we were seated immediately. There were groups of folks waiting by the door, and I overheard the host tell a party that the wait would be at least an hour and 30. yikes.\n\nAt the servers recommendation, we ordered the Tom Kha soup (he asked how spicy we wanted it on a scale from 1-10). The soup was okay- we ended up mostly pouring it over the white rice.\n\nWe also ordered the fried garlic prawns-- right below this dish on the menu, there is a fried garlic prawns with drunken noodles- and that is not the same thing. The server said they use different seasoning for the prawns. I was disappointed by this dish, as I felt it salty and underwhelming. We ended up eating only a couple pieces.\n\nI was deciding between the poached salmon and sea bass- server highly recommended the sea bass so I ordered it with the ginger sauce. The steamed sea bass was very buttery and so good! I would definitely re-order this dish if I come back.\n\nAlthough I did not enjoy their most popular dish, I would come back to order other dishes and the sea bass. The entrees came out rather quickly (less than 10 minutes) and the service was great.", "I hadn't been here in years, other than getting the occasional buffet lunch.  Four of us set out to try some of their signature dishes, and we are now HOOKED!  We started with a glass of wine at the bar - by the way they are a Wine Spectator Restaurant Award winner.\n\nMy sister and I decided we would make it a tradition to try the chicken wings at any restaurant that offered them, and what a wonderful tradition it is!  The Spicy Chicken Wings were wonderful, with a slightly sweet yet complex flavor of chili with hints of basil.  We also chose Nam Kao Tod as an appetizer - we'll definitely do this one again!  The crispy rice was a wonderful texture with the meat and ginger sauce.\n\nWe were feeling adventurous and decided to try the who deep fried catfish.  There are 3 kinds, and we tried the Plar Dook O-Cha.  I swear this was the best catfish I've ever had.  Hands down.  It was cooked perfectly, juicy and tender.  The slaw-like vegetables on top had a hint of sweetness, and they paired perfectly with the fish and the Reisling we had with dinner.\n\nThe guys picked out a Northern Thai dish that I can't remember - all I know is that it was very, very good.\n\nThis is definitely on our go-to list to try again and again!", "I have been eating at Lotus of Siam since 2006 and the food is awesome, but they have become a victim of their own success. They expanded their seating capacity but not their kitchen and it shows. I'm writing this after waiting over 40 minutes for my food and watching people walk out the door, giving up after waiting too long for their food...very sad. I also noticed the food portions are smaller than before. Breaks my heart as this one of my favorites in Las Vegas. If you decide to eat here, ask for Tony, he is the best.", "I haven't eaten here in a few years but I can see from the reviews that it is still the best place to eat in Las Vegas. We are here for lunch during the week the first time and you never know who you will be eating with because it is a locals favorite.", "I know I've reviewed this place before, but it was so long ago that another review had to be merited. Besides, soft shell crab pad kee mao is good, but in terms of actual exoticness it's not really all that exotic.\n\nThe big problem is two-fold because I'm almost never here on a weekday. They only do lunch on weekdays, and I'm not dealing with that line for dinner time (and let's be honest, no one actually plans dinner in Vegas if you're gonna go out). EXCEPT LAST TIME I WAS HERE ON FRIDAY AT NOON. Sorry Tacos El Gordo, I love you much but my lunch choice that day was not a hard decision to make.\n\nThe reason you go to lunch is simple...you walk in with zero wait. At least that's what's happened the only two times I've been here! And the thing about Lotus is this...it is unquestionably the best Thai restaurant in the city of Las Vegas and arguably the best in the entire country. So you don't go in there with the intention of getting the basic options. Unless for some reason you are a basic person, in which case I hope the gods have mercy on your soul.\n\nMy \"get all the options you can't get anywhere else\" principle truly applies here. My friends were just like...dude, have at it, we trust you. Well, here's the list:\n\n1. Crispy duck with penang curry: OMG IT'S THE BEST!\n2. Soft shell crab pad kee mao (again): I know it's a tad basic, but hey it was really good last time. Besides, you don't really see soft shell crab on pad kee mao anywhere else...so don't judge me! Next time though...sea bass pad kee mao. Because of this next item.\n3. Sea bass with chili sauce: Anyone that knows me knows I'm the biggest sea bass homer there is. This was so freaking good!\n4. Chicken pad thai: Ok fine we got the most basic thing you can possible get. But that's because my friend says it's his favorite dish to cook and he wants to see how every restaurant cooks it since it's always different depending on the cook. He approves!\n\nYeah, everyone was satisfied. I think I know a thing or two about decent Thai food options here lol. And the great thing is that because the menu is so ridiculously deep, I could come here 5 times and never order the same combination of items. \n\nOnly problem is actually finding time to come here again. I ain't trying to mess with that weekend line bruh.", "I love Lotus of Siam!  We usually order off of the special list at the back of the menu, but there's only so much stomach room and we usually order the same thing over and over.\n\n1.  Any red curry dish on the specials page (short rib, duck, etc.)\n2.  Tom Yum Goong soup\n3.  Mango Sticky Rice (dessert)\n4.  Pad Thai (random, but its a little different here)\n\nMUST MAKE RESERVATIONS ahead of time.  The only way around this (if you don't want to wait forever) is to go right before they open, so you'll get seated right away. \n\nOh yeah, and they aren't shy about the spicy level, so if you ask for a 10, you better be prepared!  We like spicy and usually just go a little higher than what the dish is normally. \n\nGood luck and happy ordering!", "I love this place ! Do not let the plaza fool you, this place is a hidden gem. \n\nHere is what I ordered for a party of four: \n1. Crispy garlic Pawn: OMG, I don't need to say much. You just have to order it !\n2. Soft shell crab drunken noodles: they definitely know to flavor well.\n3. Crispy duck penang- The highlight of our lunch. We can see why everyone rave about this dish. \n4. Coconut soup #23 on the menu: it's good but I wouldn't order it again. I couldn't finish my bowl, maybe I don't like coconut milk in my soup. \n\n I love their thai tea as well. Wish there is a location near home.", "I love this restaurant - the food is amazing - the best in Las Vegas.\n It is in a bad neighborhood and the outside is no frills - but I think that adds to its charm -the food is absolutely incredible.\n Make reservations and arrive early - they will give away your table if you are 5-minutes late because of demand.  They are always crowded.\nit is about $25 cab ride off the strip - $50 round-trip, so good thing the food is reasonably priced.", "I think everyhing I have to say has aleady been said. In a nutshell:\nmake a reservation and arrive 15 minutes early; be careful in the creepy, ghetto parking lot (I was approached by two old people on bikes asking for money); order the prawns and duck Panang and be make sure you ask about their spice levels! \n\nI've only had water here but their wine list is very extensive.\n\nMy only regret is that I ate most of my curry and was pnly able to have two prawns. I took them back to my hotel and had another 2 in the morning. They were still good then, but it hurt to have to leave the rest behind.", "I was a bit skeptical leaving The Strip and coming to a deserted parking lot at about 9:00 pm.  I was blown away by the groups of people waiting by the entrance door of the restaurant.  We made out way past the people and found even more inside the waiting area.  We managed to put our names down on the wait list, and the hostess said it would be a thirty minute wait.  We decided we would leave, explore outside, and then come back later.  \n\nDon't judge us for what we decided to do next.  Just a few steps away was a massage parlor.  The GF and I decided to treat ourselves with a thirty minute foot massage.  I wonder if the massage place gives the restaurant a cut of the profits, since I can imagine a lot of the customers also eat there.  The massage was not that great, but that is another review for a different day.  \n\nWe came back to the restaurant seven minutes after they had called, informing us that our table was ready.  We were seated fairly close to the entrance, next to a secluded room.  The interior of the dining establishment looked quite remarkable.  Everything looked new, and well maintained.  The exterior was very  misleading.  You would never expect to see such grand chandeliers, a vast wine selection, and well kept furniture.  \n\nWe decided to order the fried wontons to start, thai fried rice and khao soi for our main course, and for dessert, we had the fried bananas with coconut ice cream.  The fried wontons were just okay tasting.  I enjoyed their homemade sweet and sour sauce.  As for the wonton , they were a tad overcooked, causing them to dry out. The skin to meat ratio was disproportionate. This was the only item that I felt was not worth the price.  \n\nWe ordered the thai fried rice without tomatoes, and with a fried egg on top.  Our server even repeated all the items we ordered back to us.  Somewhere along the way, this was not communicated to the kitchen.  Not surprisingly, there were tomatoes everywhere!  So, we sent it back, and hopefully there was no spit in the new one we received.  I am almost positive they used the same egg from our old one because it was only room temperature.  Overall, the thai fried rice was delicious and the egg was cooked perfectly.  With the slide of the knife, the yolk oozed everywhere.  \n\nThe khao soi was definitely the star of our meal.  Be warned that a 6 is super spicy.  You get to choose the spiciness level from 1-10.  It was so good though.  The curry broth had so much explosive flavor.  The noodles were cooked perfectly, and all the ingredients inside the bowl complimented each other perfectly.  My favorite part of the dish was the coconut curry, hands down.  \n\nFor dessert, there are three options.  They are ice cream, fried bananas, and mango sticky rice.  We decided to get the ice cream AND fried bananas, which are two desserts.  I have to admit, I have not ever seen fried bananas served without ice cream.  It was surprising that people order it by itself.  When it finally arrived, we were already so full.  I wish there was more ice cream to go with the bananas.  We finished the ice cream with about four more banana pieces left.  \n\nOverall, a very good dining experience.  It was quite nice to get away from The Strip.  Out of the less than ten times I have been to Vegas, this was my first time eating outside  casinos and away from the gambling addicts.  It was a pleasant experience, and I can see why this place is doing so well.", "I was in Vegas for a business trip and my co-worker had been here before and I love Thai, so we made a reservation and went. It was absolutely delicious (and FREE on the company!). We got Prawns in a Blanket-- absolute must-try!, Beef in Tamarind sauce (also great), green curry, and a rice dish (I forgot which one, unfortunately). Service was great, atmosphere was chatty, but not too loud where we were seated, and I was surprised at how affordable it all was, although it's worth splurging a little in order to try lots of different things. If I visit LV again, I will definitely come here again! Definitely need reservations, though.", "I went here after a long day.  Now, the outside of the place, parking lot and surrounding areas are less than desirable.  However, the inside was a stark contrast.  It was very nice, bright and very clean.  I would definitely make a reservation.  The food was really good and tasty.  We had the Pad thai, Garlic Prawns, combination fried rice and beef pad prig king.  The beef was awesome.  Very good flavor and just the right amount of heat.  The worst dish was the fried rice but most Thai places don't make fried rice that well so it was not a deal breaker...the wait staff was very good and efficient...overall a very good meal was had", "I went with a reservation of 17 people. They were very accommodating, seeing how they are always booked to capacity. The food was great. The only issue we had with this place is that we didn't get our fish dishes. We ended up canceling it because it took too long, everything else had came out and we were already full. According to the waitstaff it was ok to cancel because they didn't start cooking it yet. What's up with that? Yes, I don't except everything to be perfect when you have a party of 17 but at least the fish should have started to be prepped or something. \nAll and all good experience, food was great, service was great, will be back when in town.", "I would give this a five if they narrowed the menu down to their best selection. The wait is killer, but worth it. Service is always great. The garlic shrimp is something you might not want to share. It's really good. Crispy fried, garlicky salt sweetness actually makes the shell into a chip like snack almost. Everything else pales in comparison. I recommend sticking with the classic salads, pad thai and tom yum soup. I once or twice I veered off course and was a little disappointed. The curry without coconut milk tasted like a tom yum soup. I probably wouldn't be disappointed if they called it a soup rather than a curry. Their beef soup is more or less flavored for the white man's taste buds. Considering two people can only eat so much, I wish I tried something else. It was like a very sweet pho. Overall, my experience was great and I wish I could trust Yelp reviews on what to order, but everyone has different preferences.", "I'm a foodie that loves Thai food. I've eaten at many Thai restaurants. This is without a doubt, the BEST Thai food I've ever eaten! And prices were very reasonable. This place is a hidden gem and I will be coming back every time I visit Vegas.", "I'm kinda teetering on what to rate this restaurant.  I've read a lot that this is the 'best Thai resto in the USA' and I'm really not sure.  I can't say I know everything about Thai food, but it's one of my favourite cuisines and I've been to Thailand in the last few months to know really good Thai food. \n\nWe went with a group of five so we were able to order a bunch of dishes and share family style.  We started off with a hot pot of tom kah kai soup ($15) which was nice.  It was lemongrass-y with mushrooms and chicken in it.  Nice start to lunch.  Aside from the soup we ordered pad thai ($11), papaya salad ($9), crispy duck penang ($23), and garlic prawns ($24), and thai iced tea for me ($2.50).\n\nThe superstar of the afternoon was definitely the crispy duck penang!  I will order it again and again every time in the future.  The portion was not huge for a $23 dish but definitely worth it in flavours.  I could eat the sauce it comes with, with anything.  Second superstar were the garlic prawns.  A big platter of butterfly'd prawns that were extra crispy with lots of super goodness to it!!\n\nI know pad thai is pad thai - everyone orders it at a Thai resto and probably shouldn't be ordered in an 'authentic' place like this.  We should have listened.  I didn't like the pad thai and thought it was too tomato-y for me.  The papaya salad was nothing special either - was pretty basic.  It was also made a little too spicy for our mild request.  The thai iced tea was spot on though!!  Tasted just like the ones I ordered off the streets in Bangkok!\n\nI would give this place 3/5 because I literally just had some amazing food in Thailand a couple months ago so my standard is pretty high, and half of the stuff I wouldn't order again.  But service was pretty good, there was no line-up when we went for lunch on a Friday afternoon, and I really loooove a good thai iced tea.  I'll be back.", "I've been dying to visit and finally made it last weekend.  We were lucky to get the last seating of the night.  So you primarily come for the food and to see what all the Bourdain hype is about.  We shared a bunch of different things everything was delicious - pad thai, crispy duck in curry, fried shrimp, crab fried rice, and maybe 1 other meat dish which was good.  \n\nPrices are reasonable, and service is good.", "I've been meaning to sign up for Yelp for a while, but my experience at Lotus of Siam made it happen. I lived in Thailand for about 7 months including Chiang Mai (where I found out the owner is from) for 3. I've never tasted Thai food in America that comes close to the street food out there, until I tried Lotus of Siam. \n\nWe got the Khao Soi, Tom Yum Gai, Pad Thai, and Panang Curry. Everything was perfect. It's as authentic as it gets, which I can see turning off some people who are used to Americanized Thai food, but everyone in our group loved it. The soup was the perfect balance of sour and spicy. Khao Soi is one of my favorite foods and I don't remember the last time I saw it on a menu - Lotus of Siam did it perfectly. The Pad Thai and Curry were great too.\n\nPrices were reasonable for the quality and they had a surprisingly good beer selection (at a great price for craft beers). Our waitress and the rest of the staff were very friendly. It was one of the best restaurant experiences I've had in a while. If I lived in Vegas I'd eat here multiple times per week. Only downside is you need a car or a long taxi ride to get there, and while the place was beautifully decorated, the boxes of wine stored behind the glass didn't look great in an otherwise impressive display. That is a very minor issue that I probably only notice because I work in the industry. There seem to be a lot of Thai places in Vegas but this should definitely be the one to try.", "I've eaten at all of the major restaurants in town and this is still the only one that is a \"must have\" for me if I only have 1 meal in Vegas. It's a true gem and no one I've ever taken here has ever been disappointed which I can't say for the likes of Guy Savoy. The two standouts are the Tom Kom Gai soup and the mango and sticky rice dessert!", "If I am in Vegas I have to stop by here. The best Thai food, hands down. Not only is it so good, the service is great and food comes out fast.\n\nHe must haves are the garlic prawns, tom yum kai soup, and crispy duck panang curry.\n\nMake a reservation to avoid the lines.", "If you are looking for authentic Thai cuisine here in Vegas, this is the place to go. And they have an crazy wine list!", "If you're going to venture off the strip for a single meal, make it this place. It's located in a seedy strip mall a mile or so from Fremont Street, but food-wise, competes with the best restaurants in Vegas. While everything we ate was delicious, the Tom Kah Kai soup, the Nam-Prik-Ong dish (spicy goodness with pork rinds) were the most memorable, and the Singha's washed down the Thai perfectly.", "It has become a tradition of my fiance and I, to comeand eat here every single time we are in Vegas. The service and food is phenomenal. It's not a \"cheap\" thai restaurant. It's actually a bit expensive but worth every penny. The ingredients and quality of food is superb. \n\nYou can even see all the celebrities and well known figures coming to the restaurant and their picture with the owner is on the wall. Even top chefs from all over the world come here to eat! It's seriously THAT good! We always get the prawns and sausage.suer tasty! I am a bit boting and I also get the pad see ew and thai tea but its so yummy, I just can't help myself. But they are more known for Northern Thai cuisine so I highly recommend you select their specialties instead.", "It was a sketchy place as many have stated but great once you get in. The food was overall great. We were given  a recommendation for crispy rice and it was not good but the curry and the pad Thai was awesome. Made finitely recommend the restaurant!!", "Just love this place. \nCrispy Duck with Panang is arguably one of the best dishes I've had. Just so satisfying. The textures and flavor are amazing. For typical diners, stick with mild spicy. Don't kill your taste buds :)", "Like others, I came here expecting the best thai food in the country after seeing it on bourdain. I even ordered only northern Thai dishes, supposedly their specialty. The homemade sausage was okay, but everything else was very disappointing. This place is all hype. Will not be coming back.", "Lotus is by far my favorite Thai restaurant.  When I was living in Las Vegas, I wouldn't want to go anywhere else for Thai, and when I did, I was disappointed.   This has been my preferred Thai restaurant for the last seven years.  Their best  dishes, in my opinion, are expressed through the Northern Thai selection on the menu.   It is their specialty.   My go to selection consist of the fried garlic prawns, steamed sea bass served over a bed of apples and grapes, in a peanut and fish sauce,  the seared scallops in a garlic sauce, and Tom Yum shrimp.  You really can't go wrong with anything on the menu, just be sure to specify the level of spiciness desired, or you'll tango with a mouth of fire! \n\nThe restaurant itself is old and located in a less than desirable area.  I say it adds to the charm lol.  Make reservations!  Monday through Saturday this place is BUSY!  If you don't make the prior arrangements prepare to wait in line.  The staff is wonderful and very knowledgeable of the menu.  My favorite dishes have come from waitstaff suggestions.   I suggest going between 530 and 630 p.m or anytime after 830 p.m.  This is the less busiest time to dine in Lotus.   Consistency in flavor, texture, and presentation is slightly neglected when the restaurant gets slammed.", "Lotus of Siam is considered by many to be the best and most authentic Thai food in America, and is a favorite of renowned chef Scott Conant. \n\nIt's located on the north end of the Strip, and about a mile east. This makes for an easy cab ride. We made it there just before the lunch hours ended. That actually worked out well because it meant we had no wait time whatsoever. We decided to order several menu items and share, although it takes 10-15 minutes just to flip through the extensive menu. Everything sounded amazing, but we settled on the Issan Sausage, Kraphao Moo Krob, and Drunken Noodle Soft Shell Crab.\n\nThe Issan Sausage is their housemade grilled sour pork sausage (complete with a secret blend of ingredients), served with fresh chili, ginger, and peanuts. Delicious doesn't even begin to describe this dish. There were hints of sweetness and acidity throughout, and each bite was packed with flavor.\n\nI also loved the Kraphao Moo Krob, which is stir-fried crispy pork belly with Thai basils, bell peppers, and minced dry and fresh chilis. The pork belly was spectacular, and the thai basil added a great dimension to the dish. I only wish there had been more of it.\n\nThe Drunken Noodle Soft Shell Crab is a deep-fried soft shell crab with homemade fresh chilis and Thai basil, served atop pan-fried flat rice noodles. We ordered the medium heat level, and that was just hot enough. It was very tasty, and I enjoyed the crispy crab coupled with the juicy noodles.\n\nIf you're looking for a fantastic lunch spot that won't break the bank, definitely try out Lotus of Siam.", "Lotus of Siam is simply good but nothing special, particularly since it is so expensive for Thai food.\n\nLissa G and I wanted to try out Lotus for quite some time and we finally got a chance to stop by. We went for lunch and arrived shortly after they opened.  The inside is much larger than it looks from the outside. Be sure to get there early or expect a wait. After being seated we ordered some of the recommended dishes.\n\nWe asked for all of our dishes to be 7 out of 10 spice level. BTW...not high enough if you like it spicy.\n\nNam Prik Noom (Green Chili Dip)\nThe dip was an excellent start and made us excited for the next dishes.  It was the spiciest dish we had and it could be explained as a chucky Thai salsa. The crunchy pork skins and vegies to dip were perfect for the dish, especially if you are trying to stay away from carbs.\n\nNam Kao Tod (Crispy Rice)\nOk this dish was pretty addicting. Basically crunchy rice with all the typical great Thai flavors. A must get.\n\nVery excited at this point...\nbut unfortunately down hill from here.\n\nGarlic Prawns\nVery disappointing especially for $24. The ingredient's quality and portion size was well worth the price but the flavor and preparation was lacking. You could tell the oil the prawns were cooked in was not hot enough since they just weren't crispy enough to eat the shells, and we LOVE eating shrimp shells and all. The prawn were also lacking any flavor besides fried prawn.\n\nPanang Beef\nBasic dish which was mediocre even compared to our local hole in the wall Thai restaurant we go to locally.  Also, not spicy at all at level 7. Again disappointment.\n\nSometimes it depends which dishes you get a restaurant and that may me the case for us. You will not have a bad meal here but temper your expectations if you had good Thai elsewhere like in LA or SF.", "Love this place. My friends and I waited 45 min before opening just to get a head start since there were no more reservations available. Group of 12, got right in. Well worth the wait!!!", "Love this thai food!! Whenever I eat thai food everywhere Me & my husband alway order the same food..Pad see ew & curry ( red,yellow,penang).. The first time I ate at Lotus siam 2012..I really like their food & always go there whenever we want eat thai food.4 months ago we went to Nothern thailand & try their traditional food 'Kao soi kai' & we love it. So when we came back to vegas & eat at my favorite thai place 'Lotus siam', I saw they have 'Kao soi kai'.. It's really good & authentic, the flavor is really balance.. So GOOD!! Long short story..all the food I try there really GOOD!! (Kao soi kai,beef pad see ew,beef pad thai, shrimp drunken noodle,red curry,yellow curry,beef penang) you should try it so you know what is the real authentic food!!", "Loved the veggie pad thai and garlic shrimp. Next time tofu/veggie pad thai and bbq shrimp instead.", "Luv this place! Thai food here was excellent. Very authentic. Only 10 mins away from the strip. When we got there they said 1 hr wait but we ended up waiting only 35 mins for our large party of 7. Their coconut ice cream wasn't so good...wanted to eat their mango sweet rice dessert but there wasn't any since it's out of season. Had their spicy shrimp salad and that was very good. All the dishes were great. We always order papaya salad, angel wings, garlic wings, spicy seafood soup, pad Thai noodle, fried pompano fish with spicy sauce.", "My boyfriend and I intended to make reservations for dinner and called the restaurant 10+ times over two days before they answered. Come to find out they are booked out about 3 weeks for dinner reservations. Definitely go for lunch! They open at 11:30am and if you get there before noon you probably won't have to wait. We took a cab from the middle of the strip to the restaurant before flying out (cab ride was about $20) for lunch. We were in and out of the restaurant in a half hour! Service was incredibly efficient and nice; after ordering, the food came out in about 5 minutes. As many other people said, the portions are a bit smaller than other Thai/Chinese restaurants but the quality is incredible. We had chicken pad thai and chicken panang (curry) and both were incredible. Hands down both dishes were the best we had ever had. I ordered the curry as a '6' on a scale of 1-10 of spiciness and it was delicious!", "Not a big fan of duck but tried the crispy duck on yelp recommendations and found that and the drunken noodles were the best I've eaten anywhere. I'm always disappointed now trying the Noodles elsewhere. Not even the plain strip mall type location can detract from this being a 5 star experience. Kids loved it and I expected the bill to be much higher for the experience we had. Make reservations!", "OMG. this was absolutely incredible dining. A must if you are anywhere near Vegas. The food is authentic and fantastic. We had som thum, nam Kao tod, crab fried rice and crispy duck panang curry. Every dish exceeded our expectations! I would strongly advise recommendations as the wait in this restaurant can be very lengthy without.", "Oh heavens finally a THAI restaurant that I truly adore!! \nIf my #MCM Anthony Bourdain dined here before and it was featured on Travel Channel's \"No Reservations\", then you know this place is a hit.\nIt hasn't even been a week yet and I'm back.\n\nWe came for the KHAO SOI! (Egg noodle with curry soup and chicken, northern Thai) best for your hangover! My favorite Thai dish ever.\n\nEverything here is authentic and pure.\n\nNot in the best location, but hey the best places are usually \"hole in the wall places\".", "Oh. My. God.\n\nYou cannot come to Vegas without visiting Lotus of Siam. You would be missing out on the best meal of your life! \n\nMy Dad and I decided to stop by after a friend recommended it to us, and it was honestly the BEST Thai food either of us had ever had. And we've had A LOT of Thai food in our lives. It was so good that we ended up coming back two days later for more!\n\nWe tried the fried prawns, fresh spring rolls (not on the menu, but definitely worth ordering!), fried chicken wings, shrimp pad thai, crispy duck with drunken noodles, and soft shell crab with drunken noodles, and everything was EXCEPTIONAL. I'm practically drooling right now just thinking about it. I can't wait to go back! \n\nThis restaurant is an absolutely CAN'T MISS stop if you're visiting Vegas. I couldn't recommend it more highly.", "Only had take out from this place a few times and by far it's the best Thai food I've ever had. Drunken anything on the menu is a must try. \n\nIf you love Thai, there's more Thai than you can handle and I'm not talking about Thai girls or any ladyboys.", "Over 2,000 people have already said the food is AMAZING, and I agree! The Thai tea didn't taste like it was from powder, but instead had a flavor that stayed on your tongue even after you drank it. The Pad Thai had just the right amount of sweetness to flavor combo to make it addicting to eat. The duck curry had pieces of duck that had more meat than fat, but just enough fat to give it that great taste. Everything we ate was great!\n\nSo, I'll review things I don't really notice. I was hesitant because the plaza where Lotus of Siam is located is pretty ghetto. I thought it would be dirty or run down. Wow was I wrong. Upon entry, you see all the awards that place received, including the James Beard award. Host was welcoming. Drink orders were placed right away (get the Thai tea). And most importantly, THE PLACE WAS SO CLEAN! Our table didn't feel sticky or wet. I saw a server wipe down our table but then dried it off too, which many restaurants don't do and just leave it wet (I hate that). The utensils were shiny clean, not even any dry water marks on them. Same with plates. Floors weren't sticky or stained. Walls were clean. Bathroom was exceptionally clean. All this just added to how great the food tasted. \n\nDEFINITELY eat at Lotus of Siam. Don't be fooled by outside appearances, as beauty is found within. And yes, food beauty is definitely found in Lotus of Siam.", "Over Rated & Over Priced!!!  Being Thai and having ate at numerous Thai Restaurants, the food quality was poor 2/10.  The service was good though 8/10.  Hope this review will save you time & money!", "Overhyped. While definitely serving up good food, it definitely didn't blow me away. The curry was good, the pad kee mao (drunken noodle) was good and the chili dip was good but the prices for the chef's specials are rape! $25 bucks is not worth it. The portions are meager.\n\nIt's a great place for those who don't know what great Thai food tastes like, and for those who should know and still rave about this place, I want what you're smoking.\n\nTLDR: Overpriced dishes, small portions. \"Must try\" dishes are $25 bucks. Not worth it.", "Part of the fun of Lotus of Siam is the bizarre, strip mall, risky neighborhood location. You can't help but be surprised when you enter and are greeted by walls covered in raving reviews and crowds of people. \n\nMaybe you read about Lotus of Siam in Gourmet magazine (that's how we found it), or you saw Anthony Bourdain enjoying the Garlic Prawns on CNN, or maybe you just kept hearing how amazing it is and that you simply must dine here if you're in Vegas!\n\nNow that we've been here a few times, we have our favorites, and our favorite strategies. First, if you're going to dine in, be sure to call for reservations. We, however, love the take-out strategy and their take-out is fast! Just be sure to check your order before you leave, because they might have forgotten something, like your ... \n\nGarlic. Prawns. We almost left ours there because they didn't get included in our take-out order, and I think we would have shed tears if we had arrived back at home without them. They are crispy, flavorful, and quite unlike anything else I've tried. \n\nOur other favorites include the Kao Soi, which they make for us with just vegetables, and we enjoy most of the other items from the \"Northern\" menu, like the Tom Kha Gai. Be sure to specify how spicy you like your food -- on a scale of 1-10, a \"4\" here is pretty hot, and we like spicy. \n\nWe visit Vegas at least once a year and stop here every time. It's an adventure that's worth a little drive!", "Please don't forget to make a reservation. We didn't and decided to get our food to-go for 30 minutes instead of the 1.5 hrs wait for a table.. Don't worry, in case you forget, there's a bar in the back complete with lime drink (get this!), Thai tea and coffee, and a very very extensive list of wines! Impressive.\n\nBrought our food back to the hotel, and it was still good as ever. \n- Pad thai noodles were al dente. Thank god. I've had some pretty good pad thais in my life so this one didn't stand out too much, but it was really good.\n- Fried prawns - yes! I loved that I was able to devour the whole thing - skin and all. It was a little too hard/crunchy though and felt like there was too much breading on the prawns. \n- Penang curry was just the right consistency. Not as memorable though, but it was delicious.\n- Crispy rice - omg!!!! If nothing seemed memorable from above, it's because THIS is the thing to get. We got 2 portions of this and I'm SO glad we did! The flavors were out of this world - the lemongrass really shone through. Good on top of the raw cabbage.\n\nWould go back, but maybe I would prefer to dine-in instead. But still good!", "Really wished I could have gone back for the 3rd time! This place really is a \"not so hidden\" gem. The duck panang is my absolute favorite. Some of the appetizers and soup were too sour for me ( yes I know it's hot and sour soup but they were really generous on the sour side). If you don't like too much spice I would stick to scale of 2-5. I was ambitious and tried 8 on my second visit and could NOT handle the heat. The green curry and garlic prawn are delicious. We broke the rule and tried the pad Thai as well (I know so basic) but it was decent. This place does not disappoint as the food is warm and fresh. Make sure to call ahead and make reservations! Can you please open this restaurant in DC?! Pretty please? I don't wanna wait until my next visit to Vegas to have me some duck panang!", "Regularly ranked as one of the best restaurants in Las Vegas and one of the best Thai places in the country for a reason. The menu is epic. It is pages long and full of hundreds of dishes. You could eat here every day for a year and never repeat a meal. The curries are my favorite dishes but the garlic prawns are also phenomenal. They're fried with the shells still on and end up with a potato chip quality crunch and texture. They're also swimming in garlic. It's stupendous. I highly recommend this place.", "Rumored to be the \"best Thai restaurant in America,\" I can say the hype isn't too far off.\n\nYou can tell LoS was born from a small mom and pop restaurant that has been expanded to meet demand, and blossomed through word of mouth alone. This is not a calculated restaurant, and reputation was built on the merit of the food. Pulling into the dilapidated strip mall parking lot, I had a small tinge of \"where the hell are we?\"\n\nThe garlic prawns feature Jurassic-sized shrimp, the shells peeled so they dangle by the same tail -- battered and deep-fried for a garlicky crunch. \n\nThe Khao Soi curry was a bright curry with egg noodles, light on coconut milk, cut with lime juice. Highly recommend getting it with the roasted duck -- where the fat has been carefully rendered down so that each piece is crunchy and moist without excess fat. Tastes like they cut up duck confit to add to their curry.\n\nThe Tom Yum and Tom Kai soups were very complex, but very concentrated. Sharply sour, incredibly spicy (despite a \"medium\" level of spiciness.. they are NOT messing around). \n\nAdmittedly, the papaya salad -- while good in its own right -- was a little under developed compared to the other dishes. The papaya wasn't thoroughly beaten to soften it, and thus was unable to really take up the flavor of the dressing. Can't win them all!\n\nLotus of Siam will be a place I will insist on stopping by every trip to Vegas from now on.", "Show off your foodie prowess by bringing your friends to this gem off the strip, worth the cab fair. Having had the Anthony Bourdain stamp of approval this spot does not disappoint. \n\nMain tip, after ordering your typical go-to Thai dishes turn to the back of the menu to a page titled Chef's Choice. Here you will find items that your typical Thai restaurant may not have. \n\nWe tasted the Crispy Duck Panang, Drunken Noodle Soft Shell Crab, Sea Bass Som Thum amongst other delicious entrees. The flavors are robust. If you are not on your paleo diet, this is your spot. Mix all the spicy sauces in with your rice and leave happy. \n\nBonus: they have a decent bar for you to get some beers while you wait for your table.", "So I came here because my friend had seen it I'm top chef or whatever... I thought whatever...we decide to take the transit there and walk because we were drunk and it's smart that way. It was a cold dark Vegas night and we're asking asking some scandalous back Vegas road... Come up behind the place and we're like is it open...And how do you get in.. Well we wonder around the front of the strip mall and hell yes it was open open and jam packed. We put in our names and go to the over packed bar...40 minutes later we get seated.. no biggy. We order typical Thai food and it was amazing. My curry was hot... And I kept eat the \"bell\" peppers... Until I found out that they were Thai chilies... I start sweating profusely. The email waiter brings me a nice Thai milk drink to soothe the fire. I got the green curry.. next time I need to try the recommended regional Thai food", "Solid food but a bit pricey.\n\nA Thai restaurant which is pretty close to Stratosphere.  The inside is very large. There are pictures hanging on the wall w/ celebrities such as Nicholas Cage, etc.  The bathrooms and inside are pretty clean.\n\nThe food is pretty solid.  Most dishes run at about $12-$15 each plate so it's much more expensive compared to LA prices.  I also prefer some of the Thai restaurants in LA but the food is still pretty good here.\n\nStuff that's really good - 4/5\n-Pad Thai - Pad Thai is solid.  It's not over the top sweet (I don't like super sweet Pad Thai).  Probably the second best Pad Thai I've had.\n-Spicy Catfish Fillet (No bone) - I usually prefer the catfish w/ bone-in, but this was a fillet.  It was surprisingly really good.  Nice crunchy texture and sauce was good.\n\nSlightly above average - 3.5/5\n-Pad See Ew - Enjoyable.  It wasn't out of this world awesome but it's good.\n-Panang Curry - Solid.  Beware, it's got a lot of coconut milk so in it, so I wouldn't recommend eating this before something sexy/romantic like clubbing - lol.\n-Tom Yum Seafood soup - Enjoyable.\n\nAverage - 3/5 - All of this stuff was decent, but you can opt to pass on it if you fancy.\n-Rad Na - Decent, but nothing special.\n-Spicy Beef Noodle soup - In general, this is one of my favorite dishes to order at a Thai restaurant.  Unfortunately  this wasn't anything special (I didn't see any liver in it and I felt the soup base was a bit bland) \n-Skewers - Decent, but nothing special.  The peanut sauce was really good though.\n-Spicy Sausage - Decent, but nothing special.\n\nBad - 2/5 - \n-Crispy fried rice appetizer.  It's like I was eating Mexican fried rice due to the red onions and overloaded green onions/cilantro.  I'm used to eating crispy fried rice but this tasted odd.\n\nTIPS:\n-Reservation necessary", "Some of the best, most authentic Thai food I've ever eaten. Be careful with the spice scale! It goes from 1 to 10, with 3 roughly Tobasco, and 7 \"Thai spicy.\"", "Still a 10!\n\nShort Rib Panang - $22.95 - Short rib was tender and cooked perfectly. Not much seasoning on the meat itself but the panang curry just elevates it. The portion size was decent. but on the small size. \n\nSoftshell Crab Drunken Noodle - $22.95 - Crab was fried perfectly. I do not know how the keep it so crispy when it is covered in sauce. The noodles are nothing special though, just filler for the yummy crab.\n\nSeabass Drunken Noodle - $29.95 - Fish was flaky and cooked well. Again the noodles are nothing special though, just filler.\n\nAlso got the crispy duck panang and garlic prawns again and they were still wonderful.\n\nThey charge $2 for rice if you want more.\n\nThey messed up our orders, I told them they put level 10 on the wrong dish because I could see all the chili oil and they did not believe me. When my friends ate it, it was level 10 and mine was level 7. Sometimes the customer is right!", "Super Busy!!! Obviously, this is where all the locals of Las Vegas go to get Thai food. It's located way off the strip past Sahara. When my husband and I parked we were a little anxious because the location is in a not so nice looking plaza strip with lots of-careful cuz you might get robbed-signage!! \nHowever, there's a reason locals come to a joint and that is the food is actually really good! Quite authentic. I didn't care for the Tom Ka soup, but the pad Thai noodles, and fish dish (can't remember the name) were excellent! \nI suggest coming earlier in the day so you don't feel so intimidated by the location and enjoy some nicely prepared Thai food.", "Super delicious foods with the prices to match. The deep fried garlic prawns ($25) were crispy on the outside with the right touch of sweetness and garlic.  I literally devoured the whole prawns with shells, heads, gills and everything. They are that good.\n\nWe also ordered a 4-lb deep fried catfish ($40).  It was perfectly cooked, crispy on the outside and moist, flaky on the inside. It came with shredded salads topped with peanuts and prepared in a perfectly harmonious light fish sauce balanced with sweetness, acidity, heat, and saltiness. The sauce is so, so tasty I could literally eat white rice with just the sauce for a meal.\n\nThe pad thai was good.  We also ordered a soup (forgot what it was) but found it lacking in flavors and spices.  \n\nThe service was fast, friendly, attentive, and efficient.  The visit to LOS was a highlight of our trip to Vegas.", "The Tom Yum Koong, Drunken Noodle Soft Shell Crab, Khao, Soi, Prick Thai Onn taste is excellent.  However, today must have been the worst service ever.  After getting the soup, it took 30 min of waiting for the rest of the food.  Other tables that came later than us received their food first.", "The absolute best Thai restaurant in America. At least that I have experienced so far. Yes, it is in a busted up strip mall in a sketchy part of town, but once you step through those doors (prepare for a wait unless you get there and line up PRIOR TO OPENING TIME), you realize you have just entered a real institution where food, and pride of food, is King. \n\nAs you make your way to the table, just take in the energy of this place as servers hurry along, pushing out cart after cart teeming with crispy golden garlic prawns and lobster. It is truly a sight to behold.  \n\nWhile the curries and other standards at Lotus are wonderful, I am sure, this is a special Thai restaurant that offers so much more, so do venture outside the usuals. Definitely an emphasis on fresh seafood here... And their Northern dishes really stand out as well. \n\nStand outs that we've ordered: \nKoong Sarong (prawn in blanket)\nGarlic Prawns, yes, they are just fantastic as all the reviews have stated. \nCharbroiled Prawns\nSuki Scallops (or Seared Scallops with garlic pepper or chilli basil)\nSliced catfish\nFried/Steamed fish and lobster dishes, while I have not yet tried them, seem wonderful as well. \n\nThey have an incredibly impressive, noteworthy, actually, wine selection/wine room -- particularly whites -- that pair so well with their dishes. \n\nIf you are visiting Vegas or live in Vegas and truly want to be wowed, treat yourself at this absolute gem.", "The best Korean food I have ever had.  Go for the house specialties.  Softshell crab was fantastic.  Make your reservation well in advance.  This is the best restaurant in Las Vegas in my opinion.  Next time I am in Vegas I may go here twice.", "The best Thai food that I have ever eaten hands down. It's in an older strip mall off of Sahara, but don't let that fool you. The food here is amazing. Our group devoured the following items from the menu: Tom Kah Kai Soup, Beef and Chicken Patay, Crispy Duck Panang, Thai Fried Rice, Shrimp Pad Thai, Chicken Pad Thai, and another dish with chicken and green beans.  We dined here for an early lunch (on a Tuesday). That was a smart move to avoid the crowds. The service was impeccable, the food had lots of flavor and we enjoyed the pictures of celebs on the wall. You know the food is good when there are no leftovers! Great first impression Lotus of Siam! Can't wait to return.", "The best Thai in town! Not the most desirable location but it's totally worth it! There's a sweet lady that's a server there and she is the best! Cow (sp?) is her name. We tell her what we like and don't like and let her choose what she thinks is best. Delish every time!", "The food is great here but I don't think it's worth the hype. I've had better Thai food. I think it's overpriced for what you get. The flavors are well balanced and everything was cooked perfectly. But the portions were smaller than I expected. \n\nThey have a decent wine selection - better than I expected from a Thai restaurant. There is a bar inside the restaurant, so you can get a drink while you're waiting for your table. \n\nI'd want to go back to try different dishes. I'm just not sure it's worth the wait or the prices.", "The food was absolutely delicious; I can't stop thinking about the crispy fried rice. Service was good also. My only gripe was that they serve beer & wine only :) I got past it quickly once I tasted the food!", "The good here is amazing. It's a must that you order from the back of the menu hope you enjoy and happy eating!", "The parking lot is empty, there are signs up reporting break-ins, and they have two signs indicating status of operation: open and closed (at the same time). Arriving at the door on the strip mall, one does not expect to walk into a beautiful little restaurant with glass chandeliers, a large exhibited wine collection, and a well lit, well furnished, clean restaurant interior. The service was on excellent with our water (which was delicious, and perhaps the best part of the meal considering we had been out drinking the night before) always being refilled. In addition, the food was served timely and tasted delicious. The specific dishes we tried are listed below:\n\nPad thai - 5/5\nPerfectly seasoned, not over-cooked. No sauces were overwhelming, and the dish was not at all greasy\n\nDrunken Noodles with Beef - 3/5\nThe noodles were fine, and the beef was seasoned okay. The downside of this dish was that the noodles did not hold any flavor and the sauce washed away the seasoning from the beef to make it taste extremely bland relative to the other dishes order; thereby making it not as enjoyable.\n\nGarlic prawns - 5/5\nCrunchy, well-seasoned, large serving size, and not greasy at all. This was my favorite dish\n\nPanang curry with chicken - 5/5\nThe curry tasted amazing, and the amount of chicken included was very reasonable relative to the size of the dish and amount of curry sauce. Goes well with the steamed rice, which is free by the way.", "The single greatest Thai restaurant outside of Thailand..\nthis place is mecca for thai food - you must come here if you like Thai food.. it's that good.\n\nNote: it's in a strip mall, and on a busy vegas weekend, it can be a wait to get a taxi out of here. best to have a car rental to visit here.\n\nCrispy duck, the panang curry, the Fried Cod, dear god.. it's truly magnificent.\n\nBefore Bank, the wine manager left to open his own place (Chada), the wine program was also world class/legendary.. it's now a shell of what it was before (it used to be the best Riesling collection just about anywhere).\n\nAll in all.. you just have to come here.. it's that good.", "The yellow curry dish was amazing! The portion was perfect. The dish wasn't as hot as I'd like but he brought me a spice rack. I love wine and the wine selection is very long. They is a wine case that's clear and is seen when you walk through. I  recommend this restaurant for those who like Thai.", "This is by FARRRRRR the best Thai restaurant you will ever eat at definitely in Las Vegas but probably in the United States. All I have to say is you have to get something from the Northern Specialties. I got the beef stew with the sticky rice and it was absolutely phenomenal! They have one of the most amazing selections of wine and they even have a few amazing beers like Firestone Union Jack. You have to get a reservation way in advance but trust me, it's worth it.", "This is by far the best Thai food I've ever had! \n\nWe arrived at 5:30pm at the time of opening and there was already a line forming. Do not take that as an exaggeration. If you want your taste of Lotus of Siam, get there early and throw elbows because this is a must-try! \n\nAmong the two of us ladies, we ordered the garlic prawns, crispy duck with drunken noodles, and thum ka noon. This is excessive eating for two but we were on a mission to try as much as we can until our next Vegas trip. The garlic prawns were huge with the shells loosely hanging on its meat. The flavors were blatant and the meat texture was done with the right crisp. For $25, there were eight pieces to share. The crispy duck was deboned and casually sitting on top of a pile of juicy and sticky bed of drunken noodles. There is an assortment of green and red peppers in the pile hence making it a very exotic dish. The thum ka noon is ground pork with shredded Jackfruit. It was a very flavorful dish that would be a good complement with rice but we ran out of room for the carbs. \n\nService and food delivis exceptionally good and quick. We sat down at 5:35pm and were on our way in exactly an hour.", "This is on my list for one of my favorite Thai restaurants I've ever had. The other one is in my hometown, Fort Worth, TX. Everything seemed very authentic! The flat noodles with duck was so good! I've never had that type of dish before at a Thai resturant. The breaded fried prawns are to die for. I've haven't been to s Thai restaurant that serves prawns that way. I do not think we had a bad dish here at all.\n\nThe service here was ok. There were many times we had to wait for the waiter for quite awhile. They are possible short staff. Who knows! \n\nThe tom kha was really tasty, too and came in an authentic Thai hotpot. This is a very unique and different Thai restaurant.", "This is some of the best Thai food you'll ever find in Vegas.  A lot of nice restaurants in Vegas are overhyped and overpriced.  While the quality of food at this restaurant may not compare to the new fads of cuisine, it certainly lives up the the standards of Americans and Thais alike.  It tastes great and it's affordable.\n\nSkip the casino food and come here instead.", "This is the BEST thai restaurant in the US, in my opinion.  I cannot come to Vegas and not take a detour to eat here.\n\nFirst, MAKE a reservation and make sure you can get there slightly before your reservation as they will only hold your table for 5 minutes.  There is still always a wait.  Anticipate about a $16-$18 cab ride from the strip and about 15-20 minutes to get there depending on traffic.  Try to not go on a Friday or Saturday as it is always overly packed. \n\nSecond, its not on the strip, it's in a mini mall in the middle of nowhere.  At first, you look at the outside and it looks like a place you are not sure you want to trust eating at, but trust me...you will thank me. \n\nThey have a pretty high tech checkin system with an iPad and they actually have things organized when you get in.\n\nNow for the food, when you get the menu go straight to the chef's specialties or the Northern selection.  It's what they specialize in so take advantage. \n\nThey will ask you a scale of 1-10 for spiciness..the food is SPICY.  A 10 is only for those who have replaced their stomach with Iron.  A jalapeno is more at a level 2, a habernero is at a level 5...Scotch bonnets are level 8...I don't even know what they use.  Mind you the spice is there but so is the taste..its not like you burned your mouth and then nothing.\n\nThe wine list is also pretty impressive for a strip mall thai restaurant.  And well priced.  For $150, you can easily feed 4 people with a reasonably good bottle of wine too. \n\nFood Recommendation: Short Ribs in Penang Sauce", "This is the best Thai food in Las Vegas, and maybe the best Thai food in America. Anthony Bourdain visited here in one of his tv shows and specifically praised their Northern Thai menu selections. \n\nEverything I've ever ordered from here has been fantastic. This place is incredible, and was very reasonably priced ($10 - $15 per person, approximately)", "This place had a lot to live up to, as many reviews and articles claimed that this is the best Thai restaurant in the U.S.  I'm sure there are others that are just as good, but I have to say that this place didn't disappoint.  The garlic prawns were amazing, and the service was great!  We came just in time, 8 minutes before it opened, so we didn't have to wait long.  They came to take our order as soon as we were ready, and the food came in a flash.  Will definitely be back next time we're in Vegas!", "This place is amazing.\n\nI have been here 5 times so far and neither I nor my date have ever gotten anything we didn't like. The last time we were here I got green curry and he got panang curry (not the one with crispy duck, although we have gotten that before and it was excellent). We both liked the panang curry better but the green curry was delicious as well.\n\nUsually we also get the pork jerky or the beef jerky as an appetizer. The pork jerky is extremely juicy, the beef jerky is full of flavor, and both come with a fantastic sauce. My favorite thing on the menu is Tom Kah Kai soup, it is just the best thing on this planet. We haven't been brave enough to try the stranger things on the menu, but the menu is so extensive that it doesn't matter. If you don't know what to try, the staff are extremely helpful!\n\nWe usually order our food at a 2 or 3 which is spicy enough to make my eyes water a bit but not so spicy that I can't taste the subtler flavors. \n\nIn another review someone complained about only getting one bowl of rice. They do only give one bowl initially--that is so everyone at the table can take some and it's not just sitting there forever getting cold. If you ask for more rice they will give you as much as you want at no extra charge and it will be out about a minute after you request more (edit: apparently they charged for extra for the other reviewer--I don't know if they forget to charge me, don't charge because we are there often, or what).\n\n I have also seen a few people say that the portions are small. While I personally have always left Lotus full (and sometimes even with leftovers), it is true that the portions are smaller than at your average ten-pound-plate American restaurant. The intended way to eat (at least for the curry and saucy dishes) is that you use the rice to soak up the sauce--and since the sauce is delicious and the rice is unlimited, that is how you fill up if you are still hungry.\n\nThe pricing is extremely reasonable. Usually our bill runs about 50$ total--that is INCLUDING tax, tip, appetizer, two entrees, and drinks, and it's easy to keep it under 35$ for two people if you want. I would say this is the most underpriced restaurant in Vegas.", "This place is over rated. If you are from cities with good foods, this place will disappoint you for sure.  We tried Garlic Shrimp, Fried rice, Pad thai, and they tasted all just an average.  The price is expensive too for what you get.  The other Thai restaurant in the commercial center has cheaper and better taste foods.  TOTALLY NOT WORTH THE WAIT. THIS PLACE IS OVERRATED. DONT EXPECT TO BE AMAZED.", "This place is the Mecca for all Thai food ! I have been here twice and both times, my experience lived up to all the hype. Their Khao Soi has amazing complex flavors and is the perfect comfort food. Living in Nashville, it's impossible to find khao soi so my husband has very closely replicated this recipe but it's not the original. The staff is so helpful and friendly and their menu is expansive and full of amazing options. I can't say enough good things about Lotus of Siam. It's amazing in every way!", "This place really does have great Thai food as well as an extensive wine list. I just wish the portions were a tad larger for the price.", "This place rivals some the best joints in LA's Thai Town, but it's a bit overpriced. For the cliffs notes on what to order please see below, and I promise you'll leave  with a full belly and a smile on your face. Also it's ok if you unbutton your pants midway through your meal bro.\n\nThe Garlic Prawns \nThe Khao Soi Short Ribs \nThe Nam Kao Tod (crispy rice) \nThe Nam Prik Ong (red chili dip)\n\nAPPROVED!!!", "This restaurant is off the strip but definitely a must when you're hungry in Vegas. If you're going to eat here, skip to the back of the menu where the \"Northern Thai\" dishes and chef selections are because that's what they specialize in. Don't come here for that pad thai or pad see ew stuff. I can go on and on about the spicy garlic prawns - sooo amazing. And the crispy duck curry? Wooow. This place is obviously a local and tourist favorite because the wait time gets pretty long and while we were waiting for a table, others who were waiting with us kept saying this was the only restaurant they eat regularly at.", "Thought the food was good but just a little too pricey for my taste. Lunch ran about 12 dollars for me versus 8 at Komol right up the street. Still though, a very good meal. Service was also pleasant.", "Three of us met for dinner last night so we could share different dishes and try more.  We ordered seven items and asked the server to space them out.  \n\nFirst was the tom yum kai soup at medium spiciness.  The soup was good, had a fair amount of chicken, but was missing in straw mushrooms.  Before we had much time to enjoy the soup, two more dishes were brought out.  So much for spacing.\n\nThe first was nam kao tod which the menu describes as crispy rice mixed with sour cubed pork sausages, cilantro, green onions, grounded dry chilis, ginger, peanuts and lime juice.  The crispy rice were very present but cubed pork was almost flavorless.  The dish was really lacking.  Along with this, we were served the nam prik ong, spicy red chili dip served with vegetables and some fried pork rind.  The chili was flavorful and I found putting it on the rinds was the best way to eat it.  Crunchy texture and heat.\n\nWe were then brought the khao soi with beef and the thum ka noon with chicken.  Both dishes were OK.  The winning dish was the khao soi.  Very flavorful with outstanding noodles.  This was one of two dishes that were very good.  I thought the thum ka noon was watery and didn't have a lot of flavor.  \n\nThe one dish which was the other star of our meal was forgotten.  We had to have our server come back to the table and remind him that we had ordered the garlic prawns.  We were brought our order.  The prawns were good and the crispy outer shells very delightful.\n\nI had a diet Coke which was refilled several times without asking.  Service was good but I wish they had spaced the dishes out more so we had a little more time with each dish.  \n\nThis was my second time at Lotus of Siam.  I think I'd be back only if I wanted to try something different in Thai food.  It was disappointing.", "Totally overrated. Tried the lobster and was over cooked therefore very dry. The squid salad was very fishy and the consistency chewy. The Tom yum soup was decent as was the crispy duck curry. Will not return.", "Tucked away from the strip in a little mall- this is a hidden gem!\n\nThe food is all amazing! Delicious! And spice levels to your taste.\n\nThey specialize in Northern Thai- but anything on the menu if good.", "Was craving for Thai food and we went due to the Yelp reviews!  I usually order just my normal Thai dishes Beef Panang, Papaya Salad, Tom Kha, and Pad Thai. As I was eating I noticed the tables all around me ordered the Fried Garlic Shrimp and thought to myself do I wanna really spend $25.00 for a dish with 6-8 shrimps?????  Whoa was I wrong thee best $25.00 I spent on a shrimp fish and hands down the best Fried Shrimp I have had!!!  I will be back and just order two orders of the Shrimp and Pad Thai and I will be one happy camper!!!!", "Was driving through Las Vegas and have been wanting to go here for years and had to make the small detour. It did not disappoint. \n\nI kept it simple with the soft shell crab over drunken noodles and it was pretty fantastic. The crab was cooked perfectly and the flavor on the noodles and accompanying vegetables was great with a perfect spice level to my liking. Can't remember exactly what my wife got but I do recall constantly reaching over to take more.\n\nReally the only reason I want to drive to California again is to stop here. Also the food came out incredibly fast.", "We experienced a hugely overrated large Thai Restaurant with a simple and airy atmosphere. The food I ordered was cooked \"Thai Street Food\" style. I know this, actually having lived almost a year in Bangkok, Thailand. Not only did our waiter lie to us about the our order, but charged us a dollar more than the menu price without warning. It was not even a holiday. My glass was dirty, almost an hour to be seated, and a long wait time for an order of (obviously  cooked pre-order) \"Thai BBQ Chicken\". The off-flavor Papaya Salad was a (time and labor saving) stick cut (julienne) instead of Shredding the Papaya! ...and it was the tiniest papaya Salad that I ever saw. The soup, Yen-ta-fo, was missing essential items, including meat and fish balls. A big bowl of noodles with two shrimp and a few small bits of meat and a cheaper vegetable replacement. A real rip-off.", "We had been looking forward to going here after all the talk, press and reviews and it did not disappoint. My parents (who have never eaten Thai and are quite picky) even loved it and said it was their best meal in Vegas. All of our dishes were great, Thai spaghetti, pad see ew, papaya salad, sweet and sour chicken, and one more I forget, were all great! Service is also impeccable! Try to get off the strip and make it to this awesome hole in the wall if you are visiting (I almost don't want to share that because I don't want the wait to become crazy.)", "We have lived in vegas for 6 years and always heard great things about this place. We finally tried it tonight and it was AMAZING!!!! The only reason why I gave it 4 out of 5 stars is bc of the location. It's a little sketchy but don't let that fool u. Inside is beautiful! There is almost always a wait but def worth waiting for. They have a cute little bar you can have a drink at while waiting. I def recommend trying the shrimp pad Thai and the crispy duck! YUM :)", "Went for lunch. Had the Khao Soi. It was excellent. Service was fast and friendly. I would definitely go back. Don't judge this place by the exterior. The inside is very nice and comfortable.", "What a find!!\nOn vacation in Vegas & we always try a thai place everywhere we go. Always met with disappointment. EXCEPT HERE! IT WAS SO GOOD!!\nFirst time we have found a restaurant that tastes VERY close to our favorite place at home.\nSoups & spring rolls were wonderful, shrimp pad thai was yummy & my veggie drunken noodles were on point! \nI wish they delivered to our hotel lol", "What. The. Heck?? Why is this place so popular? I had to find out. My in-laws made a reservation here for the six of us to try Lotus of Siam's most popular dishes. We ordered what all yelpers suggest- Northern Thai food:\n\n1. Khao Soi- best dish of the night. The curry base was delicious- not overpowering. very creamy. I've had better khao soi in LA. \n\n2. Northern larb (I didn't try it but it was well received by the others in our group).\n\n3. Kang Ka Noon (spicy jack fruit curry with chicken)- Just ok. They warned us this dish is more of a soup, and it is. It is difficult to finish this dish without a spoon. The dish isn't spicy as advertised- maybe they tone it down intentionally? Either way, this dish, to me, was like a thin tomato soup with jack fruit. Not worth the $$.\n\n4. Nam Prik Ong (red chili dip)- is described as being the least spicy, and it's true. No spice as all. It is, however, a nice dip for the veggies, but it is way too much ($10.95) for what is basically a side dish. \n\n5. Drunken Noodle Prawns- the famous deep fried prawns with drunken noodles. Yes, they are good, but not amazingly good. Definitely crunchy, juicy and flavorful, but I've had much better fried prawns at other restaurants, and definitely cheaper. There were probably three prawns in the dish and about 6 pieces of just the shell. And $25.95 for essentially three prawns is a rip off. Also-- there was probably two drunken noodles on the plate. \n\n6. Drunken Noodle Soft Shell Crab- More drunken noodles than crab. However, if you like your noodles very slippery and gummy, get the drunken noodles. This was the spiciest of our dishes and to me the tastiest. They cooked the crabs well, but no claw meat- mostly the smaller legs. I've had soft shell crab at other restaurants in LA that was much more generous with their crab. \n\nOverall, the food was OK, but I can't justify waiting for hours to eat here. The portion sizes are small. No, I'm not talking small compared to American sized portions-- they are small compared to what I had in Northern Thailand. You can get much better food at other restaurants with less of a wait and for less $$. Don't buy into the hype!", "When I read this had been voted as the best Thai restaurant in the country, this place deserved a visitation. Another off the strip place that had me question if our cab driver was abducting us... The restaurant itself is very unassuming from the outside in a strip mall however all that pleasantly changes once you enter.\n\nThe decor is a marriage between the classic Italian restaurants in Chicago that adorn their wall with all the celebrities who have been there and a Classic Thai restaurant you would expect to find. A massive wine cellar in the dinning area adds a unique dimension. \n\nThe service here is impeccable. Our server Somchai was extremely gracious, relaxed and accommodating body language. We accidentally ordered the wrong appetizer which he gladly took back and got us the Nam Prik Ong, ground pork with a red tomato sauce curry served with vegetables and pork rinds to dip, very unique. For entrees we went with the drunk noodles with Seabass and the crispy mint duck. When I say they're both made to perfection, I mean it is perfection. We chose spice level of 5 out of 10 which worked out nicely to blend with the flavor without being too overpowering.\n\nThis is a must for folks traveling to Vegas.", "When a restaurant - that is in Las Vegas - NOT on the strip and is NOT flashy at all - have over 2000 reviews .. it say a lot about the place!!! ... And yes I was NOT disappointed ..\n\nOne of the BEST Thai food I have had in the US ... excellent service and very affordable. The chef and owner used to be a chef for the King of Thailand - a fact that becomes more evident when you taste the food!\n\nTheir menu has more variety of Thai food than the number of beers listed in NYC's celebrated Beer bars! - some stand out items - NAM KAO TOD (crispy rice), Deep fried whole red snapper topped with homemade fresh chili and Thai basil, satay, Prawn Garlic Thai style .. etc.. \n\nSo the bottom-line is - If you are in Vegas - skip the madness of the strip and try food here ... its worth the trip!\n\nIMPORANT: DO MAKE SURE THAT YOU HAVE A TABLE RESERVED WELLLLL IN ADVANCE !!", "When my husband and I go to Vegas, it is a GUARANTEE that we will stop here for lunch before we check into our hotel. We seriously love this place. The food and service is just awesome. It's tricky to find as it's in a large strip mall, kind of in the back... it's hard to explain. We have trouble finding it every time we go, but it is still worth it. The vegetarian menu is amazing. You have to try this place!", "Worth the 90 minute wait. Food was delicious, authentic and amazing.  Wish my stomach could have held more!", "Worth the drive to the middle of nowhere in Vegas, and despite the location, the food is so good there is still a 45 min wait for a table. \n\nClose your eyes and order and enjoy.", "Worth the wait if you want great Thai food! Curry crispy duck is soooo good! One of the great fines in Vegas. Dont let the outside deceive you.", "Wow! What they said. All they said and more\n\nGet here. Fly, walk, ride a camel. Just get here.\n\nYou will be back.", "Wow!!!! This is the best \"Northern Thai\" cuisine in Las Vegas!!!!\nI put emphasis on the term Northern Thai because that's their specialty,\nAlthough, you can order great Southern Thai food here like Pad Thai or Kung Pao but it doesn't meet the high expectation.\n\nHaving watched the Andrew Zimmern and Anthony Bourdain videos, I had to check this place out.\nIt's recommended to make reservations in advance otherwise you better call ahead and be there by 5:00pm sharp to avoid long wait times. \n\nI asked the waitress whats the most popular and she gave me these suggestions.\nShe didn't disappoint me and the food was out of this world. \n\nNam Prik Noom (Green Chili Dip) - Fantastic! \nCrispy Duck Panang - (Best Panang I've ever had!)\nGarlic Prawns - (Mountain of spices with texture like a potato chip!)", "Yes it has a bazillion awards, yes Anthony Bordain, Max Jacobson, and tons of other food critics have said this is the place to go. Yes it really took me this long to try it. And yes, you can kick me for it! (as long as you bring some wings when you do). \nOk, first, let me tell you the story of many years ago. My mom took me here for the lunch buffet. I stuck my nose up like, what the heck is my mom trying to get me to eat here. Well let's just say I made a recent call to my mom saying, \"I am so sorry I didn't like Thai food at a younger age, you were right\". I am sure she enjoyed that. \nI have yet to come here for dinner, and I have yet to try any of these specials that are frequently talked about. However, in the past two weeks, I have come here 3 times for lunch. I get my usual that I normally get when eating Thai food. Garlic & black pepper chicken, green beans and beef, basil fried rice, drunken noodles, or yellow curry. Just a few classic personal favs. I have plans on venturing into the Northern Thai portion of their menu. I recently had their wings as an appetizer. I brought back the three leftover wings to co-workers. Three out of three of them asked where those amazing sweet chili wings came from. I will win them over bringing leftovers from this place. \nNow, let's talk about spice! If you have read any of my reviews, you know I like SPICY!! It grinds my gears when I go to eat any place, they claim something is spicy, and it doesn't make me sweat. Don't tease me! I usually get anywhere from a level 6 to 8. In the past, Pan Asian has been the only place I have had to step back, wipe off the sweat, and shake the hand of the chef to thank them. Well, on my first experience here at LOS, I knew, I had found a place on my level. \nI ordered my pepper chicken at a level 7, and let's just say my Thai ice tea did not last over half my meal. From now on, I will stick with a level 5 or 6 here. Well done Lotus of Siam. There is a competitor in the parking lot, and their level 8 did not even make me turn red. (CUE WAMP WAMP MUSIC)\nI will keep you updated as I try more authentic stuff on the menu. However, if your a white girl (or guy), who can handle spice, and loves Thai- GET HERE ASAP! Thank me later!", "fab as advertised", "lotus of siam has the best thai food in las vegas! been going there since it opened, and SAIPAN CHUTIMA and her family rocks the boat!!she has  been the top thai chef in las  vegas for years, and never fails to amaze with her delicious dishes. the wine list, especially the whites is superb.everything on the menu is top quality, and authentic tasting!!! thanks siapan and girls for a wonderful dining experience!!!!"]
[2015, "season2"]	["100% amazing in every way. The staff was a team and I have never EVER received such efficient service. The food was amazing, and very reasonably priced. No wonder there was a line at the door. Just make sure to order a little less spicy than you think. My girlfriend likes spicy and ordered a 7, I like a little and ordered a 3. Both were too much for us. But so soooo good.", "1st time there.  It is a little challenging to find, but turn into the plaza and keep turning to your right.\n\nI was there with a large group, so I did not get to choose what I had.  The Garlic fried shrimp were incredible as were the beef and chicken potstickers.  The pad thai was very good as well.\n\nWill have to go back with to see how it is for just a few people", "A group of us shared some dishes and we all enjoyed everything.  The crispy duck dish seemed to be favored.  The short ribs were great.   The yellow and red curries were delicious.  Except I got a very spicy pepper when eating the red.  So be careful.   It was packed on Friday night, so try to call for a reservation.", "After extensive research, I retained Zach Parry to resolve a securities fraud case filed with the largest securities dispute resolution forum in the United States.  The case was first initiated on my own and I took it as far as I could go without legal help given that the opposing party had at attorney who was an expert in securities arbitration. \n \nZach came to the rescue; he had a terrific educational background with a BS from Brigham Young University and a law degree from the University of Illinois.  He also had broad legal skills including handling cases in fraud litigation and arbitration.  I was very pleased how quickly he got up to speed on my case.  His case filings were excellent in representing my case and the respondents realized the best strategy was to settle the case.  Through direct negotiations he again legally supported my side on many issues and through his strong negotiating, Mr. Parry received the highest settlement I could have expected to receive.  During the process he was easy to work with always seeking my input and educating me on my options.  I highly recommend Zach Parry; he is a multi-skilled attorney as he so well demonstrated on my case.", "All other thai food is inferior to this restaurant. \n\nSizzling Duck Panang Curry. Just order it!\n\nIt's in the most unimpressive location. Small doors open to a palace of Thai deliciousness. \n\nWell worth the wait. I just need to bribe the hostess to always leave me a reserved table.\n\nService A\nFood     A", "All that I can say is wow the reviews are spot on can't tell from the outside that this is one of the best restaurants in the city every thing was prepared to perfection and the service was perfect will be back.", "Amazing food and period. Not heavy seasoning yet flavor really comes out all the way(not salty, not sweet). One of the wonders of this place is vegi. I dont know how they make Vegi taste so freshly even if they are cooked! I know for sure this place is one of the best Thai restaurant in the state and there is no doubt about it. Yet service wansnt 5 stars that is why I am leaving 4 stars here. Waiting water for 5 minutes and ask some sauce at the beginning  yet didn't get served until the last bite. Even if restaurant wasn't too busy because  it was lunch time. One more thing, since Thai is known as country of beautiful smile, I wish I could get food with service of little bit of smile seasoned with.", "Anthony Bourdain recently featured Lotus of Siam on his TV show: thank you Mr. Bourdain! This place is great. Stellar food. Best pad thai I ever had. I had the pork khao soi, and adored it. It had very delicate egg noodles that I have to assume were created that same day, in a savory curry-ish broth. Our kids, usually picky eaters, loved the fried rice and satay. The location is a nightmare: this restaurant is found in a super sketchy strip mall off the Strip. I was really glad we went for an early meal and were able to leave before the sun set. The service was pleasant and efficient: they keep things moving. It was quite busy. We showed up without a reservation on a Tuesday night around 6 p.m. and were told it would be a 30 minute wait: instead, I opted to make a reservation for the next day, and there were very few open time slots. Great price tag at the end. I have spent way, way more in Vegas for way, way less. Do not pass up on this gem.", "As far as Thai fair goes, this place definitely does the job. The food was in no way exceptional, but it was very satisfying in a way that one would expect from any decent Thai joint.\nThe Panang Curry was very tasty and cleared my sinuses nicely.\nWhat stood out to me most was the setting; situated in a derelict strip mall near DTLV, it seems like everyone who is occupying the very crowded dining room is in on a little local secret. \nOh yeah, and the price is right. $50 for an appetizer, two entrees and two beers.", "As good as advertised. Started with the egg rolls, and they were on point. Next we had the spicy vegetable soup. Got 6/10 spicy, but tasted 9/10 due to the amount of chili oil. Still, good flavor with lots of fresh veggies. For entrees, had both the fried tofu and crispy duck panang curries. The duck was exceptionally tasty. A must have. We also had the Thai tea (coconut milk based) and was also exceptional. Not too sweet and it balanced the spice in the curries. Atmosphere was comfortable, good prices, very hospitable service, and quick and efficient service. Highly recommended.", "As someone who lived in Thailand for a year this place taste like my second home it's amazing and the best thai food I have had in the USA!  :)", "Attended this restaurant following a work conference. It was highly recommend and for good reason. We shared multiple dished between five of us. Every bite was delicious. Along with everyone else I highly recommend the Garlic Prawns. Spicy sea bass was also fantastic. Large wine selection. Bar was very knowledgeable and assisted with a good recommendation. This will become a favorite spot while I am in town for future visits.", "Awful service... They did not seat us at the terrace, although we arrived earlier. Instead sat some \"important guests\" that arrived after us. My kids did not enjoy the show. The wait was absurd... They don't care about the clients. We felt TERRIBLE!!!! not recommended at all!!!", "Best Northern Thai cuisine I've ever had. With a wine list that reads more like a laundry list of must-haves rather a simple selection of accompanying beverages and a menu that could be a manuscript of all things delicious; Lotus is a must-have both the local resident and the discerning out-of-towner.", "Best Thai food I ever had. Will go back again for sure. I read some reviews that people wait for 4 hour for a table, so we went to around 9pm last night, it only took 15 min-20min waiting time", "Best Thai food I have ever had. Be sure to make reservations other wise you will be waiting for hours. Can't go wrong with any dish, the popular choice is garlic prawns.", "Best Thai food I've ever had in my life! Really lives up to the hype. It's also one of the only Thai restaurants I've been to that offers Northern Thai dishes. Garlic prawns are a must. \n\nArrive early or be prepared to wait for a longgg time!", "Best Thai food i have ever had. If you are craving Thai food you really need not go any place else in Vegas. I sampled their pad Thai and what I had was properly treated ingredients with a flawless execution. Minus half one star for the ambiance. Looks a bit dated.", "Best Thai food in Vegas. Best pad thai I have ever had in my life. Flawless. Love this place!!!!!", "Best Thai restaurant in the U.S. Come early because the longer you wait, the longer the line is. Please only order the northern thia dishes, they are located in the back of the menu. Northern Thai food is what there known for.", "Brought a visiting friend here for a relaxed dinner before putting her on the RedEye.  Place was packed early on a Monday, and for good reason.  Absolutely divine.  As other reviewers have mentioned the Crispy Duck Panang is perfection, though, I ordered a level \"6\" spice and I could have gone up a couple of notches.  Prices are totally reasonable- 2 soup, 2 entree, 4 beers came out to under $70 including tip (and we had leftovers).  Service was prompt but not rushed and very friendly.  Ambiance is somewhat lacking, but food, service and value totally make up the difference.", "Burp!  Great food!  We were supposed to be there only for dessert but after seeing the menu, decided to try some dishes.  We were not disappointed.  Fave was the soft shell crab drunken noodle.  Service was fast.  Only complain is the tables are so near each other so it's a bit tight.", "By far the best Thai food I've ever had, but it is really pricey. I had the delicious crispy duck panang and garlic prawns, which were finger-licking good!", "Delicious food and worth the wait. They open at 5:30pm Sundays - we walked in at 6:00pm and it was a 35 minute wait. But it was delicious and totall worth it! THE standout dish, however, was a cp of the En Tuan Soup (#22) on the menu: \"Spicy and sour soup with beef tendon, bean sprouts and beef slices.\" Don't let the word \"tendon\" scare you away. Eat around that part if you like and savor the wonderful broth. It's worth coming here just to have this!", "Delish!  Everything we were expecting and more!  The food was out of this world!  Highly recommend!", "Don't let the area/exterior fool you.\n\nOne of our relatives rant and raved about Lotus of Siam so we put it on our bucket list. It is hard to find because the restaurant is not facing the highway. During the day the shopping center almost looks deserted. There is a warning inside the restaurant about vehicle break-ins and not leaving luggage and valuables in plain sight. The first thing you notice when you enter the restaurant is all the articles about the Lotus of Siam. We were seated and waited on quickly. The wine list is amazing, they have one large glass enclosed area with racks of wine. There is another room that also is full of wine. Nine Wine Spectator awards are on the wall. \n\nMy sister's Koong Teen, grilled shrimp with spicy sauce on top of sliced cabbage was tasty. The shrimp were tender and the sauce gave it a kick. I was leery of the raw cabbage but it had sort of a fish sauce that actually turned out to be like an Asian coleslaw. I ordered the Pad Thai and was asked if I wanted it spicy and I said yes. It turned out just right, it made you sweat a little. The garlic prawn and the crispy rice was very flavorful (according to my sister's boyfriend) and had been accompanied .by a very tasty Cucumber Salad. The Panang did have some thing I never had in a curry, grape tomatoes and red grapes. This restaurant is worth a visit if you like Thai food.\n\nPrices are extremely reasonable, a great bargain and a great find in a town with no shortage of over-priced, over-hyped food and drink. When you consider all of the overpriced and overhyped restaurants in the casinos on the strip, this was one experience that we were glad we did not miss. I can't recommend it highly enough.", "Driving up to this place was interesting.  It really is a divey type place.  Cabs everywhere, and all different nationalities were coming into this place, i'm assuming because it is sought out with its reviews.\n\nThe Pad Thai was pretty good.  They have a huge extensive menu, it may take you a while to figure out what you want.  \n\nThe Won Ton and Vegetable soup (Hot n sour it claimed) were nothing to write about, very bland, and they pretty much tasted the same, only difference was the won tons, but if you look at the menu they look like two different things.\n\nNo kids menus of any sort.\n\nThis is just your basic thai place, not really sure what all the hype was about.\n\nI would give it 3 1/2 stars, I almost would bump it to four because I love there check-in technology, you can take a ride around the strip mall or walk around if you so please and get notified via text message.  You can also see where you are on there list from your phone.\n\nThe Thai Iced Tea isn't that great, it is definitely different then most, my hubby didn't drink all his, and he normally does.\n\nI wouldn't come out of my way to come here again, it definitely didn't wow me.", "Every plate eaten here was delish! Braised rib anything, the duck, the panang curry anything and match it with one of their amazing wines. Holy smokes. The service was superb as well!", "Excellent food!! Great atmosphere!! Loved it all!! Would definitely come back and eat here again.", "First and foremost, I had very high expectations going into this restaurant. Apparently it's one of the highest ranked restaurants in Las Vegas and it definitely exceeded my expectations!\n\nThe restaurant itself is a complete dive. It's one of the only thriving businesses in the strip mall where it's located and everything else is pretty deserted. There is a constant stream of cabs and line of people going in and out of the restaurant. I would definitely recommend making a reservation! Otherwise the wait can be over an hour!\n\nThe food was amazing. I love Thai food and definitely have my favorites that I typically ordered. On this occasion however, we chose to order outside of our normal dishes. Our server recommended the garlic prawns, duck panang, short ribs and sea bass with drunken noodles. It was all fabulous! I'm not usually a fan of the drunken noodles but these were delicious. Warning - if you do not like garlic do not get the prawns. I love garlic so these were perfect for me. They were so yummy!\n\nService was great. We had two guys helping us out and they were awesome. One guy consistently kept our water glasses full and the other guy was great with food recommendations. \n\nI will definitely be back but only if we have reservations. The wait would be miserable!", "First off, this place can be easily missed if you've never been in the area. You can not see it from the street front. \n\nI've heard lots of good things about this place & the restaurant quickly filled up after we got there. We ordered way too much food as always LOL. But I must say this isn't the best Thai food I've had. It was decent.. I thought I was gonna be in shock from how good it was gonna be.", "Food and service was just outstanding. Thank you fellow yelpers for recommending this place. The Garlic Prawns and Crispy duck was amazing. I found the food and service to be well worth the price. I also found it kind of strange that such a high end restaurant would be located in such a seedy place. I saw broken glass in the parking lot and a sign on the restaurant door warning patrons about break ins. I found myself trying to hurry up to get out before it got dark. I really hope the owners consider relocating to a new location or hire someone for $10 an hour to look out for the safety of their patrons.", "Food was excellent here - and attentive personal service! Garlic prawns, crispy duck - and must have the coconut ice cream with sticky rice. Super wine list.", "Food was quite good here but not exceltional.  Rated as the top place in Las Vegas for Thai food.  Definitely make a reservation.  Place gets filled up pretty fast.  The menu is huge and the food came super fast. Customer Service lacks a bit", "Food was very good but service was just as awesome... Thank you Tony for recommending the sea bass drunken noodles.  Your subtle approach was appreciated and you always kept our glasses full,  allowing us to really enjoy our meal. (2 thumbs up)", "Fresh from Bangkok where street food is King (Soi n. 38 & Yaowarat Road/ Thanon Charoen Krung were my haunts), i was starving for Thai intricately layered flavors.\nLotus of Siam has been on my to go list for ions : lunchtime it is : no wait, not loud, easy parking in this aging shopping center.\nLotus of Siam is a Pearl.\nChose the gloriously celebrated Garlic Shrimps : huge size, each tail holding the crisp shell and the tender meat separately : exquisitely flavored, fantastic combination of textures.\nSteak tartare issan style: being of french origin, steak tartare holds a strong attraction when listed in a reputable table menu.\nSmall super lean  prime beef(no fat whatsoever) chopped delicately in amazingly equal 1/4 inch dice with red onion, green onion, cilantro, mint, and lime thai dressing with heat to your taste... Scrumptiously refreshing heat! Not a morsel left.\n\nPhotos of famous intlly known chefs chefs adorn the walls, a rather impressive cellar is glassed in for all diners of all ethnicities to see. Bonus: they have 3 types of Nigori Sake ;)\n\nSticky Rice and Mango yo close my culinary flash back\n\nFood arrived hot and very timely.\nEfficient friendly wait staff\n\nIt's all good, and now i can share my taste and invite friends and family  not to miss out once back in Las Vegas.", "Funny story, Lotus of Siam when you drive by from Sahara looks like a hole in the wall broken down place that you would never want to eat at. On 2 different occassions I planned on going there and both times when I drove by we decided to go somewhere else. About a year ago we bit the bullet and decided to try it. Surprisingly enough the front of the restaraunt is in the back and we were basically looking at the back of the place when driving by. It can be deceiving. I've been there 1/2 dozen times since. Last night we went and there was a 1 hour - 1.5 hour wait to get seated. The foods so good we waited over an hour.\n\nI've read reviews from more than one food critic calling is the best Thai Food in all of North America. I've been to Thailand for a month to train and the food is actually better at Lotus of Siam! The owner apparently started cooking in Thailand at age 5 with her mother/grandmother and brough that experience to Vegas. Just yesterday I saw on Yahoo that Lotus of Siam was #89 on the list of the best 101 restaraunts in the USA.\n\nAs for the food, some things I recommened for an appetizer are the Prawns in a blanket, spicy chilli chicken wings and also the Tom Kah Kai Soup. For dessert the Mango Sticky Rice is the bomb. \n\nI went with 3 people total and for our main courses to split we got Crispy garlic prawns, Panang Curry and Sea bass over drunken noodles. I've had numerous dishes here and they are all good. All the curries are great, the pad thai, the crispy duck. Great flavors and taste you wont find many other places. I see myself going back very soon!", "GET THE SHRIMP!!!\n\nSecond time here. Just as fantastic as the first time. \n\nSoft shell crab drunken noodle is bombbb too\n\nJust come and eat here already!!", "Get the crispy duck with panang sauce or ask them to do it with prawns. Sea bass drunken noodles was good and the pork stew was also amazing.  So good we went for dinner and went back for lunch 2 days later.", "Get there early, and enjoy! There was a line at 5:30 pm. but worth the wait! We all had seafood meals and appetizers full of flavor! We all were super satisfied and  the service was awesome! We were just visiting Las Vegas and had remembered the restaurant from an Anthony Bourdain show ! Really glad we checked it out! We ended our dessert with the fried wonton bananas and coconut ice cream a wonderful companion pair!", "Great food and great service.  Make sure to arrive on time and make reservations days in advance.", "Great food but a little on the crowded side for me. Ambiance 2 stars becuase of the lack of personal space and small seating. Although the food is great it is hard to enjoy when stuffed in a room. So food 4 or 5 stars.", "Great food.  hard to get someone to answer the phone to make a reservation", "Great variety, huge menu, very authentic. Cheap prices for great quality food. And the service was wonderful!", "HI folks, Its Richard Emanuele , I cant tell you enough, if your looking for some incredible Thai food . Lotus of Siam is the best in town. If your a local or visiting Vegas and craving some excellent Thai food its a must!!!! Please don't judge the restaurant by its decor, the food speaks for itself. I recommend you make reservations or there can be a long wait.", "Had dinner here with a large group and service was excellent!  I would highly recommend this restaurant for the food alone.  Our orders were taken in a sequential fashion and we were able to split the checks by table.  We had a birthday celebrant and they even served the cake after the meal which was nice. Drinks were kept filled.   Some of the items that I sampled were the larb, garlic shrimp, crispy duck panang, fried rice, and pad see ew.  Everything tasted perfectly prepared with just the right spice and flavor.   Loved the food so much will definitely be back to try other dishes!", "Hands down the best Thai food in all of Las Vegas.", "Have eaten here around 6 times so far.  Seen good reviews and noticed it was ranked #2 in Thai food restaurants in the country on one of the food sites, so I had to try it.  Simply put this place has the best Thai food I have ever had.  It is worth a try.  You will not be disappointed.  This is a hidden gem!\n\nEvery time I am in Vegas, I will make time to eat here.  You should make a reservation several days in advance, or you might be out of luck.  Not just a walk in place.  It is somewhat hard to find if you don't know where it is.  Some shopping strip center off of Sahara.\n\nTheir Pad Thai and Drunken Noodles is a great selection.  Try the crispy duck, this is to die for.  They will spice on a scale of 1-10.  If you like it real spicy, go to around an 8, if you still want to taste your food.  If you want all heat kick it up to a 10.  Medium is around 5-6. \n\nPrices are very much in line for the quality of food you get here.  Most dishes start out around $10, so come with several people and order a few dishes to share to get the best overview of their great food here.  \n\nService is real good.  Suggest to get an appetizer to hold you over, since you may wait for you food sometimes depending on how full they are.  Their soups are good to go with for an appetizer.\n  \nIf you enjoy wine, they have quite the selection.  You can see a big wine closet when you come into this place.", "Heard about this place from the Food Channel and finally tried the place.  This restaurant is located in a poverished neighborhood with high crime rate based upon the sign on the door warning guests not to leave anything inside their vehicles. I was expecting food portions to be larger. Instead they were smalled to control portion size. \n\nThe catfish was in portions cut up on the plate.  We ordered the drunken noodle not impressed with the lack of seafood i.e 2 mussels, no shimp and inexpesive frozen calamari. I have high expectations as eating at many Thai restaurants this would not be a place I would recommend to anyone unless you are not familiar with Thai food and don't have anything to compare to.", "Hidden gem of Vegas- probably the best food there minus the wicked spoon buffet. Super authentic thai food- hole in the wall place. It's in this ghetto looking parking lot which made me think I was going to some take out chinese restaurant but once you walk in- it's pretty nice!\n\nWe got the garlic prawn, roasted duck curry, and chicken pad thai. I have eaten alot of thai food in my life but the flavor here- my god- just so GOOD. I LOVE the chicken pad thai- super flavorful and I just enjoyed every single bite. The roasted duck curry was on point as well. I don't think you can go wrong ordering here- tbh. The garlic prawn was pretty good- fried crispy!\n\nIt's about 10 min driving off the strip but WORTH IT!!!!!!!! MUST COME HERE EVERY VEGAS TRIP!", "Highly recommend getting there before they open at 5:30pm. We got there at 5:15pm and sat in the car, then slowly a line of people started to form. We literally got a table when they open at 5:30pm. Service was amazingly quick and attentive. The food arrived within 5 to 10minutes. The price is on the higher end for Thai food- average about $15 to $30 for entree, but it's well worth it. The menu is very extensive and it's sorted by the region of Thailand.  \n\nThe garlic prawn comes with 8 generous pieces and flash fried with garlic seasoning. It was delicious and the shrimp was crispy. The prawn was deshelled therefore consumption is very convenient. \n\nThe crispy duck with the noodle was one of my favorite. The duck was tasty with a crispy skin. The flat rice noodle was slightly pan fried and complimented the duck really well. Pretty much, it's  similar to the Chinese chow fun (pan fried rice noodle) atop with crispy duck. \n\nThe Thum ka noon was minced pork with jackfruit. We randomly ordered this and it was interesting. It would be really good if it's eaten with rice. Overall, the food was very well seasoned and I cant stop burping after the dinner. I will definitely come back and try different entree. I'm curious how good a simple pad thai or pad see ew would taste in here?", "Hole in the wall, but SUPER WELL KNOWN! I have lived in Vegas for over a year, and a friend from home told me about it. It is off Sahara hidden in a shopping center. It looks tiny, but once you get inside - it's huge!\n\nFood - You can't go wrong with anything you order. The best things that I have tried are the Garlic Prawn, the Pad Thai, and the Short Rib Panang. The prawns are deep fried, but they are delicious! You will see the person at the table to next you have them and NEED them! I always order Pad Thai, and I found my new go-to place to get it from. The short rib Panang is sweet, and the short rib is juicy. It absorbs the flavor and melts in your mouth. \n\nAmbiance - Always busy, but definitely worth the wait. You may want to call in at least a few days in advance to make a reservation to ensure you get a table, and don't have to wait.", "Hypebeast. L.O.S. was ok, but its not head and shoulders above other Thai I've had. We had the pad thai, stuffed chicken wings, drunken noodles, and garlic prawns. The garlic prawns were good and perfectly cooked, but the flavor was a bit lacking, I thought. The stuffed chicken wings were good, and the drunken noodles were actually amazing. Everything else was not really note worthy. Not worth the hype.", "I FINALLY got to try the famous Lotus of Siam. Overall, it was pretty awesome.\n\nLocation/venue: It's located in a seriouly shady part of town in a mall I would never go to alone. The venue like...an old tired Chinese restaurant. \n\nFood: I was actually slightly disappointed that not everything was out of this world delicous...here's the breakdown\n-Crispy duck with panang curry: This was hands down the star of our meal. It's one of their signature dishes and expectations were high...and they totally delivered. Duck was perfectly crispy and juicy and the curry! OH EM GEE SOOOOOO DELICIOUS. Perfectly balanced, creamy without being heavy. Good to the very last drop. We might as well have just licked the plate.\n-Garlic prawns: Another signature dish that was very good, though not as amazing as the duck with panang curry. the shrimp meat and shell are fried separately, which surprisingly makes everything yummy crunchy and edible. The shells were possibly even better than the meat of the prawns. \n-Soft shell crab with drunken noodle: this was disapointing, especially after the first two dishes. The soft shell crab was a bit soggy and the noodles were super soggy. In fact the noodles were all stuck together in sticky soggy bricks. I feel like I must have gotten an anomaly.\n-Sai Oua (norther style sausage): don't get this. it's just...a sausage. It wasn't special. I mean, if you know what it is and you like it, sure. But otherwise, it was super disappointing and just not very good.\n-Fried banana with coconut ice cream: So crispy, so yummy, the banana and the coconut ice cream were perfect complements!\n-Mango with sticky rice: Mango was beautifully deliciously silky ripe. sticky rice was  perfectly chewy and yummy. Both of the desserts were delicious. I was way beyond capacity full by dessert and I still finished every last bite of dessert!\n\nIf you come for the duck/curry, prawns, and dessert, it's PERFECT. 5 starts. However, I am disappointed that aside from the two signature dishes the rest of the entrees were any good. Their menu is actually quite extensive...wonder if how much of the menu is actually at the level of their 2 signature dishes?", "I agree with the fact that the portions don't justify the prices, but the food is also REALLY really tasty.\n\nFOOD\n  Garlic Prawns - THE BEST!! Sooo glad we ordered this dish based on the reviews. I would've ordered another one if we weren't already so full! The prawns are huge and fried to PERFECTION. Super crispy and seasoned just right. I will definitely come back and order this every time. GO GET YOU SOME!!\n  Sea Bass w/Drunken Noodle - Lightly crispy on the outside and super flaky on the inside. Paired very well with the noodles and the flavors were well balanced. Worth trying, but definitely small for the price ($30 I think?). I'll be trying something else next time.\n  Crispy Duck w/Panang - Very yummy! You get to choose your spiciness level from 1-10 so I got 8. The spiciness wasn't spaced out very evenly, as the first couple of scoops of sauce/duck were very spicy and the last few bits weren't spicy at all. The sauce was delicious with rice, but I think I'll try the dish with mint and chili instead. I feel like the sauce made the duck less crispy. \n\nAMBIANCE\nLooks very unassuming from the outside. You would never know that such a great restaurant was located inside an old plaza like this. The restaurant itself is pretty large as they bought out the space next door and expanded. They even have a wine cabinet/wall displayed with TONS of wine to choose from. Everything from the decor to the music is pretty Asian/traditional.\n\nSERVICE\nMonday lunch service was super quick and our food came out within 5 minutes of ordering! The servers are also very knowledgeable and gave us some good recommendations.\n\nOVERALL\nDefinitely coming here again! I'm so glad we were able to stop by, especially at a good time and with no wait! Even if you've never tried or don't care for Thai food, I still recommend trying this place. The quality of food is something I've never seen at any Asian-owned restaurant.", "I almost hesitate in recommending this place because I know it just makes it harder to get a table there.  However, it is no secret.  This restaurant has won national acclaim for its authentic Thai cuisine.  What the restaurant lacks in ambience and location it more than makes up for in food quality and menu.  Extensive selection of Northern/Southern Thai dishes and an impressive wine cellar.  Garlic prawns are amazing, as are whole fish dishes of various preparations.  Spice levels go from 1 (mild) to 10 (hot) and Thai spicy (beyond hot).  Go with a large group and enjoy many different dishes to share.  Reservations are difficult.  If you can't get one, go at 5:00 and wait outside the restaurant.  Most likely you can get a table right when the restaurant opens at 5:30 for dinner.", "I came back again and got the crispy duck- OMG SO GOOD!!!!!! The duck is cooked perfectly - MUST GET THIS DISH. I think it's the best one.\n\n\nIn Summary\n- Note the store hours, they are closed in between lunch and dinner\n-Cab ride from airport is about 44 and it is also impossible to get a cab back- have to call\n-Order CRISPY DUCK, CHICKEN PAD THAI, CURRY ROAST DUCK  \nBonus: garlic prawns are pretty good too\n- Warning: You will have dreams about this place and coming back....I miss it :(", "I can't believe I have lived In vegas for over 8 years and just got around to trying this place. By far the best Thai restaurant I have ever been to. The food is so flavorful and stimulating to the palate. We ordered many different things and all were great. I'm sure there is something on the menu for everyone. Next time I will be trying the whole fried catfish with garlic and red chilies. The people next to us ordered it and it looked so yummy with a beautiful presentation. Now this place is in the ghetto ghost town part of vegas, the place looks worn down and outdated inside and out BUT who cares as long as the food is as tasty as it is. I also happened to love the owner of this restaurant. An older women who is involved in every aspect of her restaurant. I loved the way she would step out of the kitchen to check to see if everyone was enjoying the food and atmosphere. I even saw her washing drinking glasses, now that is one humble lady. I'm also assuming she has not opened another location due to the fact that she can't be at two places at the same time! Asian business lady, I salute you! You have accomplished so much to where it's said to be rated the best Thai restaurant in the USA.", "I do not know what you people are talking about when rating this restaurant higher than a two star. My wife and I had lunch several weeks ago at Lotus and wife ordered the Prawns that everyone raves about...yuc! She could not tell the prawn from the tail it was so stuck together. I ordered the duck since so many people were raving about it. Thought I was going to be sick! Worse meal we had on our three week trip. Do not go!!!", "I feel like every Thai restaurant I've been to, the food was always decent to good. I would never say \" out of this world' until I came here. It was a Friday night and we were seated right away when we got there ( no wait time, how cool is that?!) but maybe we were lucky. The ambiance isn't all that great but the delicious food makes up for the lack of decor. Anyone that thinks they've tried the best Thai food has to come here. My boyfriend and I shared the fried chicken with garlic appetizer. It came with about 7 pieces and they were all super crunchy and juicy on the inside with just the right amount of flavor from the garlic spices. For our main dish, I ordered the short rib curry noodles for my boyfriend and the pad-see-ew for myself. My favorite was the short rib curry noodles. I thought it would've tasted weird adding curry to noodles but the noodles were flat and light that it went well with the thick soupy sauce. The short rib was just so tender and it fell off my fork because the meat was so soft. I would definitely come here again the next time I come to Vegas. It's not on the strip ( probably about 3 miles off ) but so many people go there that there are taxis going back and forth from the restaurant to the strip. If you're planning on drinking, taking a taxi would be a smart idea.", "I found Lotus of Siam in Zagat's list of top rated restaurants in Las Vegas. A quick lookup on Yelp showed that it had a pretty good rating with 2000+ reviews so I decided to try it when I was in Vegas a couple of days ago. We tried calling them at around 7 pm to make a reservation but could not get through as their phone was constantly busy. We decided to take a chance and landed up at around 8:30 pm. To my surprise I found that Lotus of Siam was located next door to the now defunct Namaste Indian Cuisine a place that I had been too many times when it was open. Anyway even on a Monday evening they were completely packed and had a wait time of 45 minutes which stretched to almost an hour before we were seated. The restaurant is not very big but is a decent sized place that does not feel too cramped.\n\nAs there was only 30 minutes to closing we ordered a bunch of standard Thai dishes all at once like Crispy Fried Garlic prawns ($26.95), Pad se-ew ($9.95), Red Curry with shrimp ($13.95), Penang Curry with chicken (12.95), Combo fried rice ($11.95), Crab fried rice ($13.95) and Khoa Soi (10.95). Food was out in another 10 minutes so apart from the long wait to get a table service is pretty fast. I approached the food with a lot of skepticism as I've been burned too many times by these super hyped up places but after the first couple of bites it was clear that Lotus of Siam was legit and completely deserving of its high rating. The crispy fried garlic prawns were amazing, lightly battered, perfectly fried with a balanced taste that did not overpower the delicate crustacean. The pad se-ew was perfectly cooked noodles with just a mild sweet tang. Literally one of the best that I've had. The crab fried rice was another gem. Perfect taste without even a hint of the smell of crab. The Penang curry was also great. The noodles in the Khoa Soi were a little overcooked and hence were clumped together while the curry base was a little too watery so I thought that the dish did not come together very well. Taste-wise I thought that it had a good balance of sweet and spice, but most people in our group felt that it was too spicy for them. The red curry was not bad, just that it tasted very similar to the Penang curry. \n\nI felt that prices at Lotus of Siam were less than what you would pay at other similar Thai places but when compared with the inflated prices on the strip they seemed out-rightly cheap. Considering the overall package of service, cost and quality the only drawback that I can think about is the long wait to get a table. I'm almost tempted to deduct a star for just that, as it could seriously keep me from returning, but I'm going to overlook it and give them the rating that they deserve.", "I have been here 7 times and each time has been an amazing experience. \n\nToday however was not so great. \n\nI brought 3 co workers in for dinner after work and was so excited to have them experience the awesomeness that is Lotus of Siam. \n\nThe bar tender had me try a drink that she said was similar to sparkling blueberry sake. It wasnt. It was like lemoncello. It was good so I offered to buy my co workers each a glass of it. The bar tender told me to buy the bottle and said its a good deal. It was $70.00. She didnt even tell me ahead of time. This wasnt a huge deal because I did like the taste a lot.\n\nThen I ordered Nan Mao Tod and asked for it to not be Spivey. It came out with 4 Thai chili's in what equaled about 2 cups of rice. Crazy spicey. When I mentioned it to the waiter he didnt react at all other than to walk away.   This wasnt right as my mouth was on fire. I order this dish everytime by the way and its the main reason I come here. Couldn't even eat it.\n\nI also order the rad Nah. It was good but very few noodles and mostly gravy. \n\nThe pad see we was delicious though. Highly recommend it. \n\nOnce we finished our food. We were finishing our drinks and our waiter asked us to hurry up and leave so he could have our table. It was between 5 and 10 minutes. I dont find this to be an excessive amount of time.", "I have been there many times. Despite the long wait times, now they even automatically add 18% gratuity for part of 4... And the service is bad, rushing you to finish your food...", "I have been wanting to try this place for a long time and finally got the chance to! I'm so happy I did. All the food is super fresh and has a very rich authentic Thai taste. I've tried a lot of Thai restaurants but the taste of food here tastes a bit different, in a really delicious way! Try their Tom Kah Kai soup, it's sooooo mmmmm good!!", "I love it. The charbroiled prawns were amazing, even with mouth on fire from the chilis (we got the spicy ones). Definitely order some of the northern Thai dishes the place is known for.  The only thing we got that was just average was the Drunken Noodles - I've had better elsewhere.  But even they were devoured by the end of the meal.  I will make this a must-eat on Vegas trips!", "I love their soups and curries!", "I love this place. Delicious food and such great flavors. I went for dinner since there were some negative reviews for their lunch buffet and I am not disappointed. We ordered the garlic prawns, a south Thai beef noodle dish and Chilean sea bass flat noodles. Even though we weren't hungry from our other food destinations, we demolished everything. I wished I had ordered the garlic prawns just for myself because it was unsightly of me to stab others in the hand with my fork as we fought for the last piece. The shrimp is fried so well and smart. By that I mean that they actually separate the meat from the shell so that the shell comes out like shrimp chips. One of the reasons I will be coming back to Vegas is so that I can come back to eat here again.", "I really wanted to love this place because Lawd knows I love love love Thai food!  This was dubbed as The Best Thai Restaurant in America (even the concierge at The Palazzo raved about this place) by Food Network, but alas! FN has failed me again. \n\nFirst, it's in a seedy area in Vegas.  Second, for a very 'famous' place, the waiting area barely fit 6 people.  It's hot in Vegas! Waiting outside feels like waiting in an oven.  Third, everything is wayyyy overpriced.  $25 for 4 pieces of mid-sized prawns.  Those prawns tasted superb but geez! 4 pieces?  Fourth, the service is mediocre.  They took forever to acknowledge us after we sat down and for drink refills.  \n\nOther than the crispy fried prawns, the rest of our meal were just ok.  We ordered Pad Thai with shrimp& chicken (this is how we test new Thai restos we try, if you can't do this impressively then you fail as a Thai resto), Thai fried rice, and two other dishes I don't even remember (one was fish and the other was saut\u00e9ed seafood with vegetables).  Our bill totaled way over $150.  $150 for 'just ok' is unacceptable.  \n\nCompared to our fave Thai resto in San Francisco, this place is no match.  Like I said, I really wanted to like this place but as much as the chefs in FN and the concierge raved about it, it's just not that impressive.   \n\nThe two stars is just for the crispy garlic prawns!", "I was back in Vegas for a one-night business trip.  Couldn't help stopping by Lotus of Siam for the amazing garlic prawns (now up to $26).  I also had the Thai beef salad, which was terrific.  Based on two visits while in Vegas, I'd say their top dishes are tops, but some of their other dishes are no better than and simply on par with other great Thai restaurants.  Their style feels a little heavier than some places I've been to in Los Angeles Thai Town, but their great dishes are very tasty indeed!\n\nThey are a busy restaurant, and service is good, not great.  It takes a while for the waiters to come take your order.", "I was ecstatic to try this place after seeing Anthony Bourdain dined here.\n\nThe hype is real. I love Thai food, but the options here are more unique and the menu is extensive!\n\nThe Drunken Noodles Topped with Duck and the Pepper Fried Prawns were amazingly delicious. Everything was piping hot, fresh, and super flavorful.. not just slabbed in sauce or deep fried in batter.\n\nOverall, I would say this place is optimal for larger parties, ideally 4-6 people. We had 10+ people and it was great ordering dozens of dishes and sharing family style. But, I would imagine for a pair - it would be more challenging to try all the variety of dishes!\n\nInexpensive and absolutely worth it!", "I went here after watching Bourdain's episode on Vegas and I wasn't disappointed. The golden fried garlic prawns in particular were incredible. We went here at 1pm on a Thursday and the place was packed with locals. We had the nam prik ong, the crispy rice rice salad, the jackfruit vegetable curry, golden fried prawns and the house special fried rice and another item that Bourdain ate (don't remember it now)  Everythign was great. I'd recommend to not get the crispy rice salad to go, because...well.. it doesnt stay crispy.", "I would definitely come back to this place when I'll go in LV again. Everything was delicious but the garlic prawns at the end (we took them as a desert lol) were outstanding! Note that the place opens about 5:30pm and make sure you are there 20min/half hour in advance to get to the first seating. Yes it is crowded!", "I'm a Vegas native, and why it took me so long to eat here - I don't know. It is wonderful! \n\nMy cousin came into town and requested we go here. She had heard nothing but great things and boy was she right!\n\nThe service was great. The hostess was super friendly. Our server was so on top of things. He provided great recommendations since some of us are vegetarians and others at our table were not. The eggplant was delicious!\n\nI will for sure go back and definitely would recommend.", "I'm so happy I got a chance to eat here. The restaurant is tucked away in a strip mall off of the strip and isn't much to look at. When you get inside at first it looks like your typical Thai place. Then you take a moment and realize the walls are covered with celebrity chef pictures who have been to this place. You then notice the very impressive wine collection. The place is also consistantly packed. Now to the food it was literally a party in our mouths. The food was so incredibly flavorful and bright. It was hands down the best Thai food I have ever had and will make a point to come back every time I'm in Vegas.  I highly recommend this place to anyone. The service was also very quick and attentive.", "I've been coming to this place for years. It has a wonderful ambiance. The food is delicious and the service is wonderful.", "I've been here twice before, and was there again recently. It gets pretty packed, but for good reason. The food is absolutely delicious. There is an extensive menu ranging from vegetarian dishes to wild dishes such as trout, deer and even frog. Service is always great, but no 5 star since wait time to get seated is sometimes beyond long. Last time i waited over 2 hours to get seated....", "I've eaten at this local gem a million times & it is great each visit. The restaurant is pretty & service is always great. The location is a little sketchy in a strip mall but the food speaks for itself. Must visit if you love good thai food.\nThe soups are all good as well. The service has always been good, and attentive. Overall, Lotus Of Siam is among the better restaurants in Vegas, for quality of taste.. And, it's probably the best thai in the city as well. But, I must be honest. I've had better Thai in other places. So, to call this the best thai in the country is a bit of a stretch IMHO. But, many would argue, so I suggest to stop in and try it for yourself.", "I've wanted to try this place for many years! I love Thai food. I also used to be able to handle the spice, but that still doesn't stop me from enjoying it. I finally got a chance to try this place with one of my favorite people Dyanna. Since it was her lunch break we went at 1pm because at lunch time there can be a line out the door. \n\nThe outside building is run down, but the inside of Lotus is huge and very chic. I was surprised to find table linens and cloth napkins instead of paper. They have a huge wine cellar that greets you as you are being seated. The waiters and waitresses were also dressed up. Really made me feel fancy. \n\nLotus of Siam's menu is huge! They have anything and everything you could ever want when it comes to Thai food. I love that they separate the menu by regions of Thailand. In the end I decided on one of my favorite Thai dishes Pad See Ew with shrimp. (I used to be able to handle spicy food, but since my sleeve surgery three months ago my stomach can't handle it.) So I ordered a spice level 1. Dyanna ordered the Baby Corn and I think she got a level 6 or 7. \n\nOur food came out super fast. I have to say they made the best Pad See Ew that I've ever had! Talk about flavor! Wow! It exploded in my mouth. The noodles where all perfectly coated in sauce and were cooked al dente. Plus, they had it loaded with tender sweet shrimp. Dyanna let me try her Baby Corn dish and it was really tasty too. (I'm a total sucker for baby corn.) \n\nOur waiters were so attentive. When we were done they took both our dishes and boxed them up for us. They also brought our check quickly. Which is always nice when your on a time crunch. \n\nWhat a great lunch! Wonderful company and some bomb Thai food. I seriously can not wait to go back. I've been telling Joel I have to take him there. He had my left over Pad See Ew cold, hours later and he loved it. If you are a fan of Thai food like I am this is a can't miss spot. I'm looking forward to trying all their other tasty items.", "If it weren't for yelp, we would've never found this place.  It's a really sketchy and deserted area of Vegas.  The food is terrific.  Came here with 5 others and ordered stuffed chicken wings, soft shell crab with drunken noodles, crispy duck with drunken noodles, pad thai, short rib, and garlic prawns.  Everything was delicious.  Definitely the best thai food I've ever had.  However, it's also the most expensive I've had and the portions were small.  My group friends all left their still feeling hungry, but we all thought the food was really good.", "In my opinion one of the best Thai food restaurants in vegas. You can see that by how busy they are no matter what day or time you go in. The wait is usually not too bad as they get food out fast. The crispy duck is simply delicious. Most of the other dishes I have had here before were very good too. Prices are very good too unless you are getting seasonal fish. Overall highly recommended.", "It is far from where I normally habitate. It has been featured on Anthony Bourdain's show, which I think surely contributed to the hype. \nIt's good food, definitely worth for you to come in and try. I hear a lot of government officials come in here, must be because of it's proximity to downtown I guess.. \nI must take a star away for the decor and ambiance,  in all honesty it is not a five star restaurant. \nI didn't think it was pricey at all.", "It's been a while since I went to Lotus of Siam.  I returned and noticed that they had expanded since the last time I was here.  They were on a wait due to a holiday and they took our name.  They told us we would receive a text when our table was ready and that it would be held for 15 minutes.  Great!  We don't have to wait around, we can go do stuff.  So we did.  And headed back.  As we pulled in, (15 minutes before the quoted time), we got the text.  Our table was ready.\n\nThe place was bustling and was busy.  The servers worked together as a team.  I tried the garlic prawns after reading several reviews.  They were good and I ate the fried shells as instructed by the reviews.  Not bad.  But there were a lot of shells that didn't  have meat in them.  That was slightly disappointing.  \n\nWe were happy with the service, although had to request water refills several times.  Definitely a place to take Thai food lovers.  Not a place to take my mom.  Her idea of exotic eating is Panda Express.  (Ok, maybe not really).  But then again, she doesn't like cilantro.", "Just an unbelievable Panang Curry with Crispy Duck... Can't say enough about how great this place is. Ditch the strip; head here.", "Just had lunch and was very disappointed. Wife had the garlic prawns. Did not have a lot of flavor and very expensive. I had the crispy duck. Not impressed. Way overpriced.", "Just had the best meal. Sea Bass and drunken noodles. Garlic prawns and crab fried rice are all simply amazing. The flavors were all commentary and yet different. The perfect place to go with a small group because everything sounds and looks so delicious. You will want to order more. This place lives up to all the hype and awards.", "LOVE this place. I've come here twice now and enjoyed everything I ate both times. I would definitely try to make a reservation or come during off hours because during those busy dinner hours (haven't tried going during lunch yet) this place gets PACKED and you'll have to wait a while. \n\nBasically, you should go ahead and try everything on the menu. I've had a lot of different dishes and they were all delicious. I would trust this place to make everything taste good, it's THAT good. \n\nOne thing to beware, however, is if you can't eat spicy foods or you don't like pungent foods. Thai food generally has strong flavors because they use lots of herbs and spices and fish sauce pretty liberally. This place takes that to the next level. The flavors are very strong. Also, if you can't eat spicy foods, be careful here. I love spicy foods and prefer my food to be very very spicy (basically, the more it burns/hurts the better it tastes lol) and when we came here, even though we didn't ever specify spicy level, most of the foods came out pretty spicy. Their papaya salad was surprisingly very spicy. So just be careful. If you can't eat spicy, make sure to tell them that.", "LoS is unbelievable. Location is 100% sketchy but inside is one of the best restaurants I have ever dined.  Incredible food, reasonably priced and the absolute best wine program I have ever seen (rarely do I see a list fairly priced with such amazing small productions and great finds).\n\nHad crispy duck in curry sauce. absolutely divine.\n\nAbsolutely blown away.", "Located in a nondescript, strip mall, this restaurant has to be the best place for Thai food in all of Las Vegas, if not the country. And if you are looking for an incredible wine selection, look no further. Wow. From the rare, hard to find Bordeaux to your favorite California Zin - this place will have it! Family owned and run with a casual, homey ambiance, this restaurant allows you to focus on the food and wine - just as it should be!", "Lotus of Siam lives up to the hype! It's busy and is quite a wait, but well worth it. I ordered the prawns for an appetizer and the roasted duck curry for my entree. Sooooo goood! Definitely my go to place in Vegas for Thai food. I can't wait to go back and try more!", "Lotus of Siam never fails. Located in a nondescript shopping center a mile or so from the strip, LoS has become a staple for every Vegas visit. Personally, I love their spring rolls and their Panang curry- perhaps the best Thai I've had in the U.S.! Prepare to wait if arriving during peak hours- also be advised that their spice scale (1-10) climbs very quickly!", "Love this place!!!  Great curry!  We thought it would be a 45 minute wait for dinner and were seated within 15 minutes.  Really good service and fantastic food.  Have been here a number of times and every experience there has been consistent and enjoyable in every aspect.", "Make a reservation now. Duck, pork, beef, chicken you can't go wrong! Amazing wine selection, prompt and friendly service. Don't be thrown off by the location.", "Make a reservation, you will be so happy you did.  This very special Las Vegas treasure is the best.  Only sorry we could not try everything.  Thai beef salad, short ribs served with egg noodle and curry sauce, soft crab drunken noodle and steak tartar. Ask your friendly wait staff for their favorites you will not be disappointed.  Our very special find was a raw shrimp with a small slice of garlic, tamarind paste, a lime oil spice sauce and all wrapped in a mint leaf.", "Man I am going to die dreaming about the crispy duck with coconut curry sauce. If only I could rest on a bed of duck in a sea of coconut curry...\n\nOrdered:\n-Crispy duck with coconut curry\n-Garlic Prawns \n-Coconut Ice cream\n-Fried Rice\n-Pad Thai\n-Green Curry\n\nThe crispy duck is a huge filet of duck floured and deep fried then cut into slices and drenched in a creamy and spicy coconut curry sauce. The skin is still incredibly crispy and the fattiness cuts out the spiciness of the curry very well.  MUST GET.\n\nThe garlic prawns: basically tiger prawns half de-shelled so that their bodies are chilling outside of the shell but still wearing them like a cape. Then they are deep fried and tossed in garlic and white pepper. The shell was the best part! So crispy, salty, slightly spicy, and not the least bit oily. It was just endless crunchfuls of deliciousness. MUST GET. These fried shells are better than chips. Better than fried pork skins. Better than any crunchy savory combo item you can ever dream of. GET THESE. They are expensive.\n\nThe coconut ice cream was very interesting. Order it. Creamy yet refreshing, it had a flavor almost similar to taro.\n\nOther stuff were whatever. The portions here are small. Be prepared to spend more here than at your regular Thai restaurant.\n\nAlso, we tried to get a thai ice tea to go and the waiter told us they were out of to-go cups... while standing in front of a huge unopened bag of plastic cups......", "May be my favorite restaurant, period. Their shrimp dishes (especially garlic shrimp, grilled shrimp) are like nothing else you've ever tried. The best thing to do is ask the waiters what they suggest. No lie, every single dish here is amazing.", "My fiance and I went there on 6/18 for breakfast.  We had 2 omelettes with 3 pancakes.  I must say everything was awesome. The server and people working there were very nice and efficient. It only took a few minutes to get our food and it was very good.  Unlike most mainstream IHOP or Denny's type restaurants, the food had lots of flavor and the servings were very large.  The pancakes were as large as the plate and tasted terrific. You can tell that the restaurant is old and in need of some updates...but who cares.  Great food and prices.  Our large omelettes with potatoes and toast were $8.99 a piece and our cakes were $2.99  I believe.", "My first time at this place.\nWhen my group was driving up, my cousin noticed this area, not the prettiest area.\nIn this shopping complex, half the spaces are abandoned.  There was one complex with no store name and two guards standing outside.\nAnyhow, here's my review on the food.\nWe were seated after a half hour wait on a Saturday night.  \nThe food is definitely overpriced!  The garlic prawns are $25!  The plate didn't have that many prawns on them!\nOne of my cousin's ordered a chicken dish, around $22.  The amount of chicken barely equaled one chicken breast.\nThe food is definitely overpriced for the portion amount.  I feel like it's all because of the hype.  However, the food tasted DELICIOUS!\nI'm not sure if I'll stop by here again, maybe if I win big in Vegas...", "My friend and I picked up a to go order a couple of days ago.. I give this place two stars because the spicy wings were good... Other than that, I don't get what the fuzz is about. I expected really really good food but everything else we ordered was pretty mediocre. We ordered a spicy soup that wasn't spicy (we were asked how spicy on a scale of 1-10 and said 8), chicken chow mein that hardly had any bean sprouts, spicy beef with a sauce that was just watery, and they forgot our cucumber salad orders. The saddest thing is that the portions are really small. If that's the standard, then that's ok, but don't charge an arm and a leg for mediocre food. Disappointed.", "Not worth the fuss! Food was good but VERY VERY small portions. I ordered take out and spent $80.00 for 5 portions. I was expecting $80.00 worth of food. When I opened my take out I was so shocked.. I called the restaurant, I explained to the manager how my food was so rationed that Im sure there was a mistake. I sent the photos of the entrees. They commented back and the manager said, \"yes thats how we serve very small portions.\" It was less than half for each take out box. I felt so ripped off. It is worth the posting to inform you of a cheap place that can't give you full portions. You're not that good..\n\nLe Thai is the new place to eat. East Fremont Great food and excellent portions. 702-778-0888\nKing and I   Great food . Friendly staff.  affordable  Next to UNLV and Tropicana 702-256-1568\nKung Fu Awesome place for take out Based in China Town. Affordable. 702-2474120", "Obsessed with the Drunken Noodle. No wonder why so many people go here. Excellent!", "Oh my.  This Thai food lover is still in awe of last nights dinner.  Wonton soup was wonderfully light and full of rich flavorrs.  Hot sour vegetable soup was a fantastic contrast of flavor.  The garlic grilled prawns with chile and lime were delicious.   Chicken red curry had a grrat flavor.   The garlid fried prawns had their shell on - a great comination of texture and garlicky goodness.  Ordered off menu for sauteed vegetables in a spicy chile garlic sauce - off the hook flavor.  Service was great as always.", "One of the best I have ever had.  Must go must have.", "One of the best Thai spots. The crunchy rice is amazing. They have a surprisingly large wine list and the variety is impressive! It's no wonder this spot is one of the top restaurants in America. Each time I've been here the service is on point and so is the food! It's in a sketchy part of town and the strip mall it's in is hysterically ghetto. I think one of the shops is a Vietnamese wig store. And I think just a little bit over is a transsexual bar. Go for the sights and be happy you did because the food is oh my god good!", "One of the best places in Las Vegas -- make sure you get a reservation because it fills up quickly. Second time we have been here and our group loved it once again. It had been 4 years since we had gone initially and it was exactly what we remembered.\n\nWhen ordering for spice, I would say shade about 1-2 degrees lower then what you think you can handle, because their degrees are higher then what we usually see here in DC.", "Panang curry is amazing- So many flavors!! Lots of veggie options. Thai coffee is also very good. Service is kinda mixed - 5 mins to get our food; 15 mins to get our to go order and check.", "Penang curry with crispy duck, garlic shrimp, and pad Thai was delicious! I normally get pad see ew but these other dishes definitely outshined my go to dish. The Thai iced coffee and mango and sticky rice was average but enjoyable! Good serving sizes too!", "Pretty amazing Thai food- you get the vibe as you walk in, full and vibrant place, long lines, well off the strip in a somewhat seedy area in the Commercial Center.  I have made it a point of hitting this place for some of the best food in town.  Like it spicy- they are serious but you can opt out.  \nBe prepared for a long wait but its worth it.  Or you can get stuff to go and spice it up at home.", "Quite possibly the best Thai I had in a very long time.   I had the Crispy Duck with Drunken Noodles... Absolutely amazing!  The dish was made with fresh basil, green peppers, garlic and onions.  I ordered with a medium heat of \"5\".  Service was wonderful.  We walked to the location from the SLS Las Vegas, I would recommend driving.  The place doesn't look like much from the out side but its a nice casual atomsphere inside.", "Simply the best Thai restaurant in the entire universe! You will not believe that a world-class restaurant could exist in this shopping center but it does. Huge menu, nice wine selections, great service and AMAZING food. There will probably be a huge wait and the best way to spend it is a couple doors down getting a foot massage.", "Simply the very best Thai any where.  Thanks for the service!!  Thanks for best soup you will ever taste.", "So glad I had the chance to dine here while in Vegas.  It was or maybe is still voted the top Thai restaurant in America. It's located in a somewhat ghetto area but don't mind the location! A reservation is a must if you want to dine here. It's always crowded inside! The restaurant is actually quite big. All of the staff are Thai. This is some authentic Thai food!\n\nThe portions of the food are all small and meant for sharing. I honestly do not remember much of what I ordered (but it was tons of food) but here's what stuck out to me:\n\nGarlic Prawns- this dish is simply perfection. It's deep fried prawns!! It was so good and it was actually the last thing that came out to my table. Easily my favorite dish from the restaurant.\n\nCrispy Duck Panang Curry: I normally don't like to eat duck but this dish was pretty good. The duck was perfectly fried and the Panang curry was perfectly seasoned. \n\nWe got free dessert as well! It was fried bananas!! And a lot of them! It was soooo so soo good. Literally the best fried bananas I've ever had. \n\nI really hope to come back one day!", "So we ordered the drunken noodle soft shell crab, crispy duck panang and the gralic prawns. Prawns 3 stars, crab 2 stars and panang 4 stars.  Not sure what the hype with this place is about. Had 1 night in Vegas for a nice dinner and although the food wasn't bad, I do regret my decision. btw, this place is definitely not the best Thai food around.", "Solid food at decent prices.  The stuffed chicken wings were my favorite!", "Solid thai.  Not sure that it's all that it's cracked up to be, but it is good.  Pad thai is not recommended, but I consider myself a pad thai snob.", "THe best.  Period!  No comparison.  Everything on the entire menu is amazing.  Make sure you call ahead for a reservation or you may end up waiting 2 hours.  The wait is worth it though.", "Terrible service. Bad attitute .. Wait so long. We came at 4 pm to wait 5:30 pm. The owner ia cold  face. Bring all her friends coming. Never come again..", "The Thai food here is excellent. Went with a few locals and they reccomend the Northern Thai dishes that are on the menu. My favorite of them all was the curries, great balance of flavor and depth within the sauce. Great beer/wine selection. The food was worth the wait! Reservations reccomended, went on a Tuesday night and it took us an hour to get a table.", "The Thai food here really authentic. I ordered the chicken larb salad medium spicy. It was great and spot on. I can taste the spices and herbs ingredients incorporated in this dish. The spiciness level was perfect. I give this place a 4 star because I walked in 45 mins before closing time during lunch. As soon as I walked in I didn't get greeted immediately or was acknowledge, didn't felt welcoming at all and the two staff there notice me standing by the register for a good minute to two minutes before seating me. Probably because it was close to closing time... Overall, I enjoy the food experience.", "The best Thai food in Las Vegas and perhaps the country. Very deep wine cellar specializing in German wines (Rieslings) which pair perfectly with the spicy Thai food. The staff is very competent, efficient and helpful. Go for the Northern Thai specialties in the back of the menu like crispy duck Penang and soft shell crab drunken noodles. Be sure to make reservations if you want to eat here. It is a very popular restaurant located off the strip.", "The best Thai in Vegas!", "The best Thai on the planet Earth.  This place is off the strip in a strip mall.  The lady has been cooking here for over 30 years!.  Make reservations for dinner at least 2 weeks in advance.  Lunch is easy if you show up when they open.  Crispy Rice, Duck with drunken noodles are the stars of this show. Try the Larb from the northern menu if you want something new.", "The famous Lotus of Siam! I've gotten take out before but have never eaten at this mecca for all things Thai food. First of all I must say the service is excellent! You can tell the servers make money here and they are all professionals. Secondly the food is amazing, we already know this. We didn't come not knowing the depth of amazingness, we came to sit back and let Lotus of Siam feed us till we couldn't eat anymore. \n\nWe started with the ubiquitous chicken satay, which was by far the most authentic and best chicken satay I've ever had. The chicken almost seemed charcoal grilled and the peanut sauce was fresh and spot on. \n\nSecondly we had the Som Tum papaya salad which was excellent! Hotter than napalm but excellent nonetheless. I should of ordered sticky rice with it, my bad. \n\nNote: I ordered everything level 5 spicy out of 10 because my wife likes hot but not super hot. I must say the 5 here is an easy 7 or 8 at an American Thai restaurant. The papaya salad was easily an 8, I loved it but it was too hot for the wifey.\n\nNext we had the Nam Tok (like a larb but instead of ground meet its with grilled beef). The Nam Tok's flavor was spot on. That lime juice, roasted rice powder, mint, cilantro, onion, shallot, and chili flavor I love. The only downside was the meat was very fatty which i didn't love.\n\nLastly we had the Chicken fried rice with Spicy Basil sauce. Best fried rice I've ever had. Hot as heck but excellent flavor and quality cuts of chicken. \n\nLotus of Siam, some would say the best Thai food in America, is classy, yummy, spicy, and not cheap. But what really high quality food these days is really cheap anymore? I can't wait to come back!", "The food here was delicious.  I have eaten at many Thai places in my life and I have to say this place is one of the best.  There papaya was spicy and just right.  There pad Thai was cooked and tasted amazing.  It had the sweet and spicy texture just like how I like it!", "The food was excellent. I tried the garlic Shrimp and the duck panang. Both dishes were fried to perfection and had wonderful balance in flavor. The portion sizes were a tad smaller than I expected but if you're looking for a Thai place in Vegas this is it!", "The place was great but only bad thing was the tables are too closed together and one of the waiters got our order mixed and my was wrong. It was a bit noisy in there so you can't really hear the conversation you are having with your friends unless you are yelling or have a loud voice. \n\nAt least the food was still great. My bf calls it a cafeteria. I would still go back even if it is a little far from me.", "The real reason I go to Las Vegas! Pay attention to the Northern Thai dishes - here is where they really excel. Oh, and make a reservation :-)", "The restaurant looks nothing from the outside but once inside it's nice. The 45 min wait time for a Wednesday night was intriguing, this usually means it's gonna be good right? The wait staff were very pleasant and the service was quick. I ordered 3 staples - Chicken Satay, Fish cakes and Panang Chicken. I'd give them a 7 out of 10 for food. I've definitely had better even in my little local in Scottsdale. Not being familiar with their Northern dishes I didn't want to be too adventurous so went with what I knew. I'd come here again to try some more adventurous dishes but for now not wowed which is disappointing as I'd waited so long to try it.", "The tom kha gai coconut milk soup was spectacular. The panang curry was not, totally too thin and lacking flavor. Not sure I would go back to this place, as it was not all it was hyped up to be and the lines are long and the service is rushed.", "They have a big menu that includes fish and duck dishes some other Thai restaurants don't have.\n\nTheir portion size is also not the typical Thai restaurant portion, I would say half of what you get at other places. Our soup (Tom Kha kai) came in a pot with flame in the middle which was cool, but it wasn't the best I've had. Their duck dishes are pretty good. Curry came in a very shallow, and wide bowl which made it go cold after a couple of minutes with their A/C.", "They were super busy and we didn't want to wait too long for dinner so we decided to order take out.  The gal at the counter was super nice and was accommodating when we made some changes to our order.  Considering we were stuck in traffic for a while, got back to our hotel and it still tasted great.  Will definitely go back to try the dine in experience.", "This establishment would have received five stars if it were based soley on the food. The prices are very overpriced. It may be because it is known as one the best Thai places around. The garlic prawns are a must. You can eat the whole thing including the shell. They are crispy and delicious. The panang curry has just the right amount of spices and heat. It is great with the crispy duck. The papaya salad is sweet and goes well with any of the other dishes, especially the spicy ones.", "This is a legend in town, so I had high hopes when we went. The food was good, but I feel as though everything we had was fried. It wasn't far and beyond some of the other Thai restaurants in town, but it was good. I will probably go back.", "This is an exceptional Thai restaurant.  The food was fantastic, and there is a HUGE menu to choose from.  You have the perennial favorites like Pad Thai on up to the more rare things like crispy fried pork bellies.  We were impressed and wish it was closer to us.\n\nService was quick.  Even during lunch rush we had our food surprisingly fast.", "This is one of my best meals in Vegas! I have never experienced real Thai food until now. Normally I would have settled for the usual pad thai and pad see ew. However, I wanted to be adventurous this time. I tried the nam kao tod as an appetizer, and it was AMAZING - the crispy rice with the pork sausages, lime juice, chili, and green onions make my mouth water. Hands down, the best Thai dish ever!!! I even looked up recipes online to try to replicate this dish at home. \n\nWe also tried the garlic prawns that were deep fried; the dish was deliciously crunchy. Our third dish was the crispy duck in Khao Soi (thai egg noodles in a curry sauce). The crispy duck was yummy, but got a little soggy in the Khao Soi. It would have been slightly better if the crispy duck was separated from the Khao Soi, and combined the two later to maintain the crispness in the duck. \n\nThe menu is quite extensive. My boyfriend and I were quite overwhelmed. We could only fit in three dishes between the two of us. I would highly recommend this place. You'd be really missing out if you don't give it a shot! \n\nService was friendly and fast. \n\nThere is plenty of parking in the plaza.", "This is probably one of the best Thai food I've tasted here in Las Vegas. We had some chicken skewers, tom yum kai, panang curry with chicken, chicken with cashew, and crispy duck with drunken noodles. Everything was delicious!!!", "This is the best Thai restaurant that I've experienced. Because of this it is a famous \"must visit\" dining destination for Las Vegas visitors. When I have business in Vegas, I always plan an outing to Lotus of Siam. \nDon't come here and order typical Thai dishes like Pad Thai, Panang and Drunken Noodles unless you jazz it up with something like crispy duck. Order from the Northern Specialties since that is the most special part of their menu and arguably what they are best at.\nKhao Soi, another comfort food dish with noodles and meat in a panang curry like soup with pickled vegetables and raw red onions is delicious and a go-to dish for me.\nNam Kao Tod (a puffed crispy rice salad with preserved sour pork sausage) has volumes of flavor (spicy, sour, minty) if you're looking for something different.\nTry Nam Prik (a composed room temperature chili based salad),  Jackfruit salad, Hung Lay (pork curry braised down with garlic and ginger), Northern Larb (their version of comfort food).\n\nThe garlic prawns are a crowd pleaser and a safe choice for non-adventurous diners. The Drunken Noodles with crispy duck is another crowd pleaser.", "This place is a solid 4 stars! Their pricing is high for the amount of food they give. Pad Thai is delish and legit! Cashew chicken was very small and wasn't filling. Each chicken or beef order portion wise is comparable to a single side item from Panda Express. Their Tom yum chicken soup was very good. I will be back here every time I revisit LV.", "This place is amazing!!!!!!  The first time I came here was about two years ago and right after enjoying the Nutcracker at the Smith Center. \n\nI had read about this place before and looked at its list of reviewers.  One after the other giving it praise.  \n\nI convinced my family to try it out and once we parked I could tell no one was thrilled about the way it looked from the outside or the sketchy area it seemed to be in.  Once we walked inside, I could tell it was huge, way bigger than it gives off from the outside and it was jammed packed ( always a good sign when trying someplace new).  The host told us it would be a 2 hour minimum wait.  At those words my BF began to walk back towards the door, he hates waiting, let alone two hours ( which, when youre hungry is an eternity). I was so excited to try it but two hours is kinda long, we could always come back! \n\nAs I begin to make my way to the door a man standing in line, leans over and tells me its worth the wait.  Dammit, now I want to wait.  \n\nI round everyone back up and tell them its going to be amazing.  We can wait!  Plus we can enjoy each others company and spend some quality time chatting with each other.  \n\nIf youve ever been there before, youll know that there isnt really anywhere to wait. Sure, you could go outside, but in December its a bit chilly.  Inside, theres a little waiting room that holds about four people max.  Its pretty tight and those chairs should be saved for someone that perhaps cant stand as long.  \n\nWe end up against the glass wall to the wine room.  In the direct path of all the waiters pushing carts loaded with hot plates of amazingness, back and forth from the kitchen to the large dining room near the bar.  Talk about torture.  \n\nOur wait ended up being about 1:45 minutes and after viewing and smelling the amazing dishes going back and forth we had a good idea of what we wanted.  And you know what?  Completly worth it!!!\n\nWe ordered a few different plates and shared them all.  Nothing was left, everything was enjoyed and devoured!! \n\nI know that I used the word amazing way too many times but that's how I feel about this place!  Simply AMAZING!!!!", "This place is classic, old school Vegas with all of the memorabilia and movie star photos on the walls. It was also featured in Anthony Bourdain's Vegas feature. The food is really good but I wouldn't say phenomenal. I think the draw is the history more than the food.", "This place makes me happy!\n\nRun down strip mall with an adult day care facility right next door hard to believe the lotus of siam is one of the best seemingly great Thai restaurants in Vegas.\n\nDon't take my word for it go there and look at all the celebrities that have eaten there like New York cities Momofuku's Dave Chang with Lotus's owner and chef Saipien Chutma just hanging on the bottom row as you enter to the left. \n\nI have eaten there several times and if you can ignore the outside the ambience inside since they remodel is clean, quaint, and slightly upward sit-down nice. \n\nFood is definitely above par. They have all Thai classics at a standard Thai restaurant price and trust me  you don't JUST come here for the pad Thai and Tom yum. \n\nChef special are excellent! Crispy duck in curry woo and the must have---garlic prawns\n\n(Skip this if you don't want to hear about prawns sooooo good) Garlic pawns pricey but worth a drive to Vegas. They shell giant prawns but leave the shells attached. Coat the shelled fish in batter of garlicky goodness (not too much garlic) Deep fried both shells and prawns in extreme intensity so it looks like you have double the shrimp. If you don't like fried yummy shells you may feel a tiny bit jiped but they throw cilantro and green onions to make up for it (jk) the whole thing is delicious and stays crispy for hours. Really. I checked. So delicious.\n\nOverall it's what you expect from a Thai restaurant with a whole LOT you didn't expect. Like a very streamed lined staff. Food took a little time but the servers brought us appetizers, were always accessible, and were knowledgable to point out the water was filtered NOT tap. In a place that is always busy and with an award winning chef it is a culinary experience that is very worth it.", "This place was amazing!!\nEvery food item we ordered came out perfect!!\nMake sure to order crispy duck Panang!!! We had two orders lol\nI can't wait to go back to Vegas and eat more!!!!", "This place was fantastic.  Honestly so delicious.", "This restaurant is in a unpopulated shopping plaza away from the main strip of vegas. However it is easy to find and there is plenty of parking. The place stays very busy so I'd call ahead and make a reservation. The food we tried was very good, although portion size wasn't that great. The price was a little on the high side considering the dishes that we ordered, but everything was good.", "This restaurant wasn't located in the glitzy part of town. But, don't be fooled by the humble facade. I'd recommend calling beforehand and making reservations as the waiting time was a bit long -- 40 minutes for 3 people -- even on a Monday night.\n\nThe inside of the restaurant isn't glitzy either. Except for the glass storage room where they store their wines, the inside definitely needs some modernizing. But, it's clean and roomy.\n\nMy friends ordered the Yellow Curry and Pad Thai, while I ordered Sweet and Sour Chicken. The food were served simply: no fancy garnishes or pretentiousness. It was like being served a home-cooked meal. My food was flavorful and tangy. I loved the abundance of vegetables, and the fresh cucumbers were an interesting contrast to the sweet pineapple chunks. My friends devoured their food, and vowed to come more often, especially since they actually live in Vegas.\n\nThe service was great. Our server was attentive and friendly. He refilled our rice bowls and drinks when needed. He even boxed up my leftovers for me, and gave me some extra rice to go with it. Overall, I really liked this restaurant, and I understand why it was rated so highly. If I'm ever in Vegas again, I'll definitely be eating here.", "This was absolutely delicious! I ordered the crispy duck with chili flakes and mint. WOW is all I can say about that. They have other seasonings for the crispy duck as well, and I really want to try them all. My mouth is watering just thinking about it. My only two complaints are that there was a very long wait just to get in to the restaurant and the portion size was soooo small compared to how expensive it was.  I couldn't help but feel a bit disappointed about that.  But it was WORTH the wait, and I also really loved the atmosphere.", "This was the birthday present that I was wishing for. After hearing about this place from multiple people that have been when in the area, we decided to go. First off, this place is a little bit off of the beaten path by Vegas standards, so make sure that you plan for the ride home. It is in a weird shopping center with a gay bar at the end of it. We made a reservation and got in right on time, luckily because there were a boatload of people waiting to get in. \nService is very good, super fast as they are trained to turn tables. We had wine, which had an impressive selection for what we were expecting, and a squid salad. That was great and literally came out in under 10 min. The rest of the food was amazing. The drunken fish plate was one of the best things that I have ever put in my mouth. The whole meal was spent talking about how great it was. It really is worth the trip/drive out here. I would just make sure that you can get a ride out, as is it is in a weird part of town.", "This where I bring all my out of town guests as well where I come to splurge on Lobster and Duck dishes\n\nThis place is missing a VALET and that's all, everything is else is on point.", "Thus is probably the best Thai restaurant I have been to in the USA, and there have been overt a hundred.  A gem in Las Vegas. Don't be fooled by all the others. I will be back.", "Tried drunken noodle, spicy chicken wing & crispy duck...great food...i have been here before but forgot to write review and this time this seem to be even better, i think the 108 degree temperature has some effect to this craving for good tasting dinner...i took my time and enjoyed every bite...love the quiet and relaxed ambiance...when you come, take your time and bring lots of company...", "Very good Thai food in a shopping center way off the Vegas strip that appears to be a favorite with locals. Amazing garlic crispy prawns, pad see you with beef, pad thai, chicken larb, and BBQ game hen. Service was quick and food was hot and fresh. Very enjoyable meal and reasonably priced.", "Very good food.  A little more expensive than I was expecting, but very good food.", "Very tasty but a bit busy. The waiter was pretty attentive even with how busy it was.", "Very, very good Thai food, but not the best I've had (that honor remains with the much mourned Planet Thailand in Brooklyn). The take-home message: the food is great and there's nothing to complain about, but there's room for improvement here and there in the dishes.\n\nI went with a group, and we shared several dishes. The Pad Thai was very good--fresh, complex, and a good mixture of flavors, though I thought it could have had more depth of flavor--more contrast between sweet and salty, tart and spicy. Our Tom Kah Kai was fabulous--piping hot, spicy, rich and complex. The green papaya salad was fresh and tart, though not quite as flavorful as I would have liked. My Panang curry with chicken was delicious, but extremely spicy even when ordered medium. The service was very good, the beer was cold, and it wasn't too hard finding cabs to take us back to our hotel. Best of all: Lotus of Siam isn't on the Strip!\n\nI'll definitely go back if fate ever forces me to return to Las Vegas.\n\nA note about how I rate: It seems to me that people mean very different things by the stars they give in a review. Here's what I mean: 5 stars means that a place is exceptional in some way, special even among very good peers; 4 stars means that the place is very good in every relevant category but not outstanding or exceptional; 3 stars means adequate--a place I would go to again but not great; 2 stars means unacceptable--a place I would not go again because it is seriously deficient in some way; 1 star is horrible, that the place  was not only unacceptable in some way but that it was exceptionally, unforgivably bad. In every case my rating is comparing the place reviewed to similar places-- thus an outstanding diner gets a 5 even though on an absolute scale its food might not be as good as that at a gourmet restaurant.", "WOW! Decided to try this place after all the raving reviews here on Yelp and Tripadvisor. \n\nIt deserves 5 star. Thinking about the thousands of places to eat in Las Vegas, from bottom to high class, Lotus of Siam is just spot on when you're craving for original Thai food. I've been a couple of times to Thailand, and this food was without a doubt perfectly made compared to Thailand. \n\nNext time I'll be in Vegas, this will be my first place to eat! Yummy!", "We did have high expectation's due to the Yelp reviews but it didn't meet our expectations at all. We will keep our business at Ping Kao.", "We loved this place! We did the garlic prawns and the crispy duck curry dish and it was all so yummy! Went at lunch and it was crowded but no wait!", "Well what can I say !? Just Absolutely Fantastic. What to eat? order what you know or try something new, you simply can not go wrong.", "Went there for the first time, tonight, with a friend. In a word, awesome! Had the number 55, which was beef and I think Cilantro and some other stuff I can't remember, but it was amazing. Had the yellow curry with chicken as well, both dishes done to a number 2 out of 10 heat level. I'd been told they really crank up the heat and so we went for a low number. Turns out I could have gone up several notches with that, but even at level 2 there was definitely some spice and flavor. \n\nAnyway, great food, friendly and prompt service, and I will absolutely be going there again.", "What's not to like about this place!! The food is fantastic, great menu items. We usually come for a special occasion because it's a tad bit far for us. We recommend all of our friends when coming from out of town to try it.", "When we arrived at 5:28 there were about 50 people already in line.  The line moves pretty quickly and we were told that our wait would be around 45 min.  However, after 20 min they texted that a table was available.  The reviews for the crispy duck panang curry were spot on.  The duck was nice and crispy and we got spicy level 4 out of 10 for the panang which was perfect.  The panang had a creamy consistency and a great balance of sweetness and spice.  We even put the panang on our sea bass that came with our drunken noodles.  It was fried with mild seasoning but tender as well.  The noodles were more saucy than I've had at other Thai restaurants but still wonderful.  The garlic scallops were delicious as well.  You could really taste the garlic and cilantro. The scallops were seared perfectly.  Great crust and super tender inside.  The star of the meal was the garlic prawns- OMG.  So amazing!!   Crispy and perfectly seasoned!!!  It was fun to see Saipin walking around and all her pictures with celebrities on the wall.  She has one with Elvis!!", "Wow - this place is definitely worth the hype!  A group of 10 of us ate here last week and enjoyed so many different things on the menu.  The standouts for me were the chicken potstickers, satay, rad na, pad see ew, yellow curry and the crab and pineapple fried rice.  The menu is extensive, so my friends who have eaten here before selected our food for us and they didn't lead us astray.  The lemon sake we had with our meal was downright incredible too.  This is certainly a place to check out in Vegas!", "Wow, where to even begin? We saw Lotus of Siam when searching Thai food in Las Vegas on Google. I thought it was this place I went to last year, but as it turns out, this one was different. I'm glad I didn't try to nail down the other place and we just ate here. The wontons and egg rolls were deliciously crisp and fresh. The sweet and sour sauce was to die for.\n\nThen we moved on to dinner. The Beef Pad Thai was superb and the spicy fried rice with chicken was excellent. The presentation of everything was elegant and the taste was fantastic. The service was outstanding and efficient. They tend to get very busy here - there was a line running out the door the entire time we were here. We got here at 5:30p opening and there was already a line. Overall, it was a very pleasing experience and we would return.", "You won't regret coming here. Perfect for casual dining and business engagements. A huge selection of food, and it looks like they do it all right.", "You'd never expect such a small place to be so great! It truly is \"a hidden gem\". Hubby and I decided to take some take out on our way home and ended up waiting 40 minutes for an order of Chicken Satay and Chicken Panang Curry. They were so busy, and even had taxis dropping off customers on site! The only downfall to this restaurant was the entrance and first impression of it. You walk into a cramped entrance and get greeted by three ladies who weren't very professional or good at speaking English. It would've been nice to have been explained certain other menu options. Although I'd have to say the food we got was definitely worth the wait.\nHopefully next time we could try something new !", "You've got to stray from the strip for this one, but it is definitely worth it. On Sundays they open at 5:30. Our group of 12 arrived at 5pm to see many people already lining up! There is one line for reservations, which they will let in first, and 1 line for people without. Don't let the shabby strip mall fool you, this Northern Thai restaurant is worth heading out to. You can tell that it is where the locals go.\n\nThe food came out hot and fast. We ordered A LOT. For many dishes you can choose your numbered spice level, so we often ordered a few of the same dishes at different levels. My favorite dish was the Garlic Prawns. These were full of garlic flavor, large and crunchy from being fried. Many in the group enjoyed the Crispy Duck in Panang Curry. The duck is served on top, and you mix it all into the curry. Crying Tiger Beef was another favorite of mine. While it was one of the more simple dishes, the thin beef was perfectly cooked to medium rare, and the jus on the side completed the dish. \n\nFor dessert, I loved the Coconut Ice Cream. They make it with real coconut. It was so light and icy, almost a sorbet texture, while being full of coconut flavor. A great find and a great meal overall.", "awesome and authentic- You want to try this!  We went without reservations and it was worth the wait-- looks like the out-of-towners of found this place and are turning it into a Mecca for Thai", "best thai food on the face of the earth, without question - that is all.", "great place - order off the back of the menu!", "i must say it is between a 3.5-4, not a 5 stars, because they are pricier than some of the other thai places I eat , there food is not that much better.. Service was prompt. the neighborhood is a little shady, the sign posted at the front door says there has been car breakins, make sure you don't leave any valuables in car..I don't recall any real lunch special, but lots of item to select from off the main menu, pretty much a la carte.. Plenty of parking", "looked ghetto from the outside but when we ate here Thursday afternoon not even weekends and late night it was already packed! reservations is a must but they will only hold the table for 5 mins which makes sense! so here we go, food! we ordered Thai iced tea, pretty good but not free refill.. ordrered pad Thai, garlic crispy prawns, beef fried rice... the pad Thai is good but the serving is so little it's good for one person only! garlic crispy shrimp is the best. I can eat this all day... it's so good that even the shell of the shrimp, u can eat it. the beef fried rice is ok. little bit oily! the dining area is ok. old fashioned typical Asian resto. their walls are filled with pictures of celebrities like Anthony Bourdain and Nicolas cage to name a few! they have a wine cellar inside.. it looks clean. kitchen is busy! fast service.. eat and go kinda of thing. the servers doesn't really say anything unless u order something. I felt rushed when we came coz we're waiting for some more people to come, they look like they are worried that ur gonna stay there for an hour! overall, good food but very pricey! for 5 dishes including 1 dessert and 3 Thai iced tea, our bill is a whopping 150$... I'm not even full.. but tasty! so 4 stars!!!", "this is such a piece of jewel in the desert island. We came here after watching parts unknown, and the restaurant does live up to the reputation. Food is extremely out of the league, the portion is moderate while fulfilling, and we got to see the chef as well. Highly recommended. \nFor visitors:\n- dinner starts at 5:30 on weekend, but it's always lined up with customers 15min prior to 5:30.\n- they take reservation 2-3 weeks ahead of time.\n- it's like 20 USD by cab from strip.", "too expensive and the lunch buffet helped offset the costs but now that is gone."]
[2015, "season4"]	["5 stars here for the Crispy Garlic Shrimp & for making my cousin/family believers in their first Thai food experience. I've never had shell on shrimp like this & would recommend it to anyone. Also, the Khao Soi with Duck was as good as Anthony Bourdain's reaction to it lead me to believe. Staff was very quick & friendly, which was saying something for how busy they were on a Monday night. When in Vegas, get off the strip & check this spot out", "A far travel to go eat for Thai food. The interior looked really nice and had authentic decorations. At first the place seems small but has a lot of space. We were seated quickly as well.\n\nSERVICE\nFriendly and prompt. Waiters and waitresses checked on us regularly.\n\nFOOD\nI enjoyed the fish cake, but it was a little on the saltier side for me. The chili sauce it comes with paired well. The garlic prawns were good and crispy (nice texture), I think they're known for their shrimps mostly. The papaya salad (my favorite Thai dish) was disappointing. The flavor was not what I was used to and there was so much sauce which made it liquidly. The coconut tom yum with chicken was good. You can really taste the coconut milk but the soup was too sour (probably from the lime).\n\nCONCLUSION\nGood ambience, but I will come again to give this place another shot for their food.", "A must for lovers of Thai cuisine. Lotus is the real deal, authentic through and through. The flavors may even surprise you, if you have not had true Thai food before. The menu is large but perhaps the most noteworthy dishes are the distinctive Northern Thai options. I never miss the Tom Kha soup, Nam Kao Tod, Garlic Prawns, Khao Soi. Enjoy a Thai Tea or a very refreshigng Tsing Ha to drink, not to mention the excellent wine list.\nThere is often a wait but that speaks for itself. When locals to wait to eat somewhere, there's a reason. Much has been written about this humble location and it's award winning chef, Saipin Chutima, and the hype is real. Service has generally been quite good, sometimes slow, and yes without reservations you can wait awhile for a table. However, they also offer take out so you can happily place an order and simply pick up your food which I do often.", "ABSOLUTELY incredible food. Interesting sort of cafe environment in a not so great area in Las Vegas, but the authentic cuisine brings people from all over to this dumpy area of town. That must mean they think the food is very good. I obviously agree.", "AMAZING! Best Thai Food EVER!! Excellent service and reasonable prices. Well worth the trip off the strip to eat at this gem!", "Absolutely AMAZING.  Best Thai food I've ever had in the states.  Reasonably priced too and remarkable service.", "Absolutely the best thai food I have ever had in Las Vegas. Fresh, clean and good service.", "After Lotus of Siam blew up from Bourdain's visit, it just doesn't seem to cut it like it used to, and I've been here before the hype and after, like when it was difficult to get a cab to pick you up after that glorious meal. \n\nWhile they still kill it with their northern menu dishes, I feel like the prices have spiked and the servings have shrunk the last 1-2 years. This is a shame because the flavor is still there. \n\nI wish they wouldn't skimp out on the servings like the crispy duck dishes or would add more noodles to the noodle dishes. I feel like they are just mass producing since they are turning tables constantly throughout the night. \n\nOverall I would come again but only if making a reservation is easy. Not worth it to do a walk-in, which will cost you 60-75 minutes of time waiting.", "After seeing so much good reviews on yelp & on the media I decided to check this place out. The location is very concealed away from the strip. I had a bit of a hard time looking for it but after a few rounds in the shopping center I've seen the green light!! I came around dinner time 8ish to be exact. There was a wait and a bunch of people already waiting in the waiting, I was not surprised. I waited less than the 30min they said it would take to be seated. I was very amused at how fast I was able to be seated. The inside of the restaurant is nice and big. I didn't realize it could seat a lot of people AND I MEAN A LOT!! It was packed for a Monday night. \n\nAs soon as we got seated I quickly glanced over the menu and ordered right away. I was very hungry. I ordered the papaya salad, charbroiled pork, red curry, and Tom yum. Let's start with the papaya salad. My server asked what spice level I would like my Papaya salad to have ranging from a 1-10, I said a 3. When I took my first bite of the salad I was expecting a mild taste, but no it felt like a burning 10!!! The spice was too overpowering and I could hardly taste the real flavor of the salad. I had a Thai iced tea on the side & I literally gulped more than half just so my mouth could cool down. I was very upset :( I love papaya salad and just having this to be too spicy really just killed my appetite. I ordered the red curry with beef. I was scared that it was going to be really spicy like the papaya salad but it wasn't at all! It had a small hint of spicy. It was so creamy and delicious. Just thinking about it is making my mouth salivate. The charbroiled pork was amazing as well! But I could compare it to other charbroiled pork I've had at other Thai/Vietnamese restaurants. The only thing that stood out about it was the dipping sauce. I'm not quite sure what type of sauce it was but it had green onions and was a cross between salty, sour, and sweet. The Tom yum was ok. Like other yelpers have mention it's nothing that's great. \n\nThe customer service was spectacular. We always had our waters and rice refilled & asked how we were doing. \n\nWill definitely come back here again & try the northern menu like others have suggested.", "All I want to say is... NO!!\nWhat a MASSIVE disappointment! Best Thai food in LV??? In the US??? NOT! \nThe place is nestled in a scary abandoned looking strip mall. Real seedy joint. We almost didn't go in based on that. We should've kept our 1st mind. I know there are loads of positive reviews here... Trust them at your own risk.\n\nWe came for early dinner on Friday. No waiting. Great! The sever... Well it took us till the end of dinner to determine who our server really was... He was the worst part of our experience. We ordered Pad Thai, Panang curry, and Seafood Thai Fried Rice. The Pad Thai smelled awful. We didn't eat it. Wanted to send it back, but we were told by the server \"It's not my fault, you ordered, someone has to pay for it.\" Excuse me?!? Nuff said. We'll NEVER BE BACK. Asked for the manager, and we were treated like criminals.\n\nThe portions here are small for the prices. Truly nothing to swoon over as far as taste. I've learned that Food Network is not always right. Restaurants probably pay to be on TV. \nI'm sure they weren't treated the way we were for not liking an entree'.\n\nSomeone suggested Archie's to us. We'll try them next time we're in Vegas. Stay away from this place!!", "Amazing Thai food!  Had so many great dishes.  Really enjoyed the Crispy Rice, Coconut Soup, Fresh Spring Rolls, Yellow Curry, Sea Bass Drunken Noodle and Pad Thai.  What really impressed me was what happened when I was leaving.  Because we were a group of 6, gratuity was added to my bill.  I didn't notice and added and additional 20% gratuity.  As I was walking out the door, the server ran up to me and showed me gratuity was included.  Wow!  How is that for integrity!  I will most definitely return to this amazing hidden gem!", "Amazing food and service. Get there early, or call to make reservation. Green curry was cook to perfection. We also ordered the crispy duck with the drunken noodle WOW! Simply wow!", "Amazing food. Pineapple fried rice was really good. Worth the wait.", "Amazing northern tai food. Cab ride from the strip but worth it. Be careful on the spicy level. I did 4 and It was too hot to eat. Service was great and our dishes were delicious. Had the red chili dip (not spicy) , curry, garlic prawns and coconut soup.", "Amazing. Just go. Yes the area surrounding it is a little sketchy, but I mean, you are in Vegas, and what trip to Vegas isn't filled with a little adventure and outside of the norm experiences?\n\nAnyways, get there early as the place is packed. Don't let the wait scare you, put your name in and they will call/text you. We decided to use the wait time to go get our marriage license. You don't have to follow in our footsteps, but then again, you are in Vegas. ;)\n\nFood wise I had the Kang Ka Noon, veggie style. My not-yet-wife at the time had the Khoa Soi.\nBoth were great but I can easily see that the meat free dishes take a distant backseat to all the other amazing choices.", "Another great night with the fam and a meal with garlic prawns, chilean sea bass, pad thai, fried chicken wings. Would recommend to get a different sauce for the wings and the sea bass.", "As usual the best rated restaurants don't live up to it's rank. It was ok, nothing to die for. The garlic shrimp with shell on was certainly very shelly. Was wondering if someone might choke on it and die. \n\nThe coconut soup had chicken so over cooked and dry, where is the art of cooking?\n\nWas expecting exceptional, turns out to be slightly above average. The portions are smaller and the prices are over double the average. This is for a restaurant located in a dumpy old mall.", "Awesome thai food at a reasonable price. This restaurant is always packed, thus making the (already bleak) atmosphere a little less than desirable. Be sure to call a day or two ahead of time to secure a reservation! \n\nMinutes from the Strip but in a shady area, so be sure to not leave anything in your vehicle.", "Been here many times, it is an absolute mist every time I go to vegas, the food is always delicious but i felt that this time the portions were smaller, my drunken noodle soft shell crab was great but little  amount of noodles compared to other times, had the prawns , papaya salad and also felt less were served. Anyway it was still all very good, will come back of course. Ordered some sake and beers to accompany the meal", "Been here so many times. I can never get enough. You can't get in without a reservation. The mango and sticky rice is THE BEST. Omgosh even thinking about it makes my mouth water lol. I haven't had one thing here that wasn't yummy. Highly recommend to anyone!", "Best Thai Food Ever! Best Seafood Soup! Must try Pad Se Ew with beef it's the best. Fried Prawns are delicious! I love this place it's definitely one of my favorite restaurants for lunch and dinner.", "Best Thai Food I have EVER had. No place like this. The DUCK is awesome. If you go there, you will not regret it. The wall made of the wine rack is my favourite . Try the khao soi ( phonetically that how its spelled actual i don't know), duck in Panang curry, Nam Kao and to finish it off, have the mango sticky rice !! Loooooove it. I would suggest making a reservation before hand, because they are always full for dinner and lunch on weekends too.", "Best Thai food I've ever had. The absolutely best thing was the duck Penang. Never had crispy duck in a Thai restaurant before, and the meat wasn't too fatty/boney! Service was impeccable, they sure know how to handle the Vegas tourists. The crab fried rice and the papaya salad were also among my favorites. The only thing I wasn't a fan of was the sausage. Nam Kao was amazing as well!", "Best Thai food we ever had. The Pad se ew, Seafood soup, Thai tea are great. My husband loves the Crispy Duck. Go to place for all Thai food. Nowhere else compares!", "Best Thai in the Las Vegas valley. Great service, great flavored, great menu selection. Started with hot and sour vegetable soup. Large chunks of veggies that were not too soggy and crisp not mushy. Great broth at a medium spicy/heat level. I had the squid garlic and hubby ordered the spicy seafood spaghetti. Both were delicious. Highly recommend. Prices were good value, not cheap, but well priced for the quality and quantity.", "Best Thai in town.  A must for brining visitors.", "Best place for Thai in the entire valley!  Be sure to make reservations... and lock your car doors when you go in- not the greatest area, but once you walk through their door you forget where you are.", "Best restaurant in Las Vegas overall. Eaten here over 50 times over the last 4 years living in LV. Lotus has had a few slight ups and downs in that time, mostly in regards to speed of service. In spring of this year they apparently hired a ton of new wait/server staff, and they are a young professional crew who do a fantastic job. The half dozen or so times  I've been there this summer the service level has been exemplary. Their cuisine is the most consistently delicious of any restaurant I've ever dined in, including dozens of michelin starred and james beard nominated. The best kept secret of Lotus' menu is the deep fried Lobster. It's always at least 5 lbs and runs $145 per, must call ahead to order or inquire as to the availability of Lobster. It's deep fried in the shell, then cut in sections and pan fried with corn starch sauce and veggies. The result is moist, flavorful lobster meat that comes out of the shell in perfect huge chunks! It wan't until about a year ago that my wife and I first had the lobster, we asked on a flyer on a monday night and they sold us one that was leftover from a party they night before. I guess they pre-ordered 10 and only ate 9, so we ordered it for just the two of us. There was a big party of about 20 ppl in the adjacent room and they came over in shifts to take pictures of our lobster, it's really that much of a spectacle! Other must try dishes include but not limited to: Short Rib in Panang, Drunken Noodle Prawn, Roasted Duck Curry, Crispy Catfish Salad, and I enjoy the snapper with thai chili and basil preparation. If you are visiting alone or with a group of 30 this is the place to go! Local tip: If you show up when they open (5:30) for dinner without a reservation, expect a 5-15 minute wait. 6-8:30pm expect a wait of 1hr+, after 8:30 10-20 minutes depending on the day. Make a reservation ahead of time, and don't be more than 5 minutes late or they'll cancel it.", "Best thai food! Penang curry is a must! Shady looking place from\nOutside but pleasently surprized once inside. There will be a wait...worth the great food!", "Came here during a business trip. Delicious food, great service, good environment", "Came here off of a recommendation. Food was great. I will be back soon.", "Come here expecting to get an average Thai meal with above average service and atmosphere and you will not be disappointed", "Could go on and on .... And on. Treat yourself and put yourself and in the trust hands of your service - follow their recommendations and get ready for a spectacular dining experience.  I can't even remember the names of our dishes but all were: wow!", "Could go on and on .... And on. Treat yourself and put yourself and trust let your server pick your meal - follow their recommendations and get ready for a spectacular dining experience.  I can't even remember the names of our dishes but all were: wow!", "Despite the price, the food is wonderful! I recommend the soft shell crab with cabbage under I believe. This place is to die for. I would go here every time I visit Vegas. Op.", "Don't plan on staying and enjoying any conversation with friends. You order, eat and are rushed out so someone else can have your table. Food may be good but that made he whole experience unpleasant.", "Don't worry about curb appeal, just get inside this place.  It is fantastic  Some of the best Thai food I have ever had and I may go as far to say it was the BEST Thai food I have ever had...\n\nWe waited to get in but they have a great system that you can check from your phone to see how long you have waited and where you are in line!  Everything we ordered was delicious. Dumplings.  Delicious.  Panang.  Delicious.  \n\nDon't get caught up with the strip.  Take a taxi, drive, walk, just get there.", "Driving up to the place, I've already had my biases.. it's located in a run down strip mall. Homeless people hanging out in the parking lot. I've already made up my mind that this can't be any good... and then the 40 minute wait. It has too be good, right? Packed on a Friday night. It must be good. Still questioning our dinner choice, we decided to wait.\n\nLooking at the menu, dishes were on the pricey side. Then I saw too many westerners to think this would be any good. While we waited, we watched dishes coming out and the portions looked tiny. The garlic prawns were $29! And the plate didn't even look that full. \n\nI would pass on the garlic prawns and the drunken noodles.\nBut the pad thai..... Possibly the best pad thai I've ever tasted!\n\nWas it worth the wait? Between 3 dishes, only one was a hit.", "Eating Thai food from Thailand in Las Vegas, NV... its really that simple.\n\nLets start with where its located... A ways off the north end of the strip in a shopping mall plaza that you wouldn't stumble across even after the most crazy night in Vegas if you weren't looking for it.  \nNow that we have that over with, when you walk in you realize why this place has garnered its reputation.\nThe food is simply phenomenal. I mean, I've been to Thailand, gone to a Thai cooking class, and eaten every kind of street food there and Lotus of Siam was essentially the same thing minus the plane flight. The dishes were incredible, from the traditional Northern Thai (pork-based) dishes they are known for, to the duck, to the pineapple rice and stuffed chicken wings.\n\nWithout question order food family-style, don't eat the whole day before you go, and stuff your face when you are there.\n\nWe felt so amazed by the experience, that we demanded to personally thank the chef, which we were able to do (and of course snapped a photo of the occasion).\n\nA must for anyone looking for some of the most authentic thai food in the US.", "Everything here taste really good! Definitely will recommend to others and we surely will come back", "Excellent food!\nI visit this place every time that I am in Vegas, wonderful food, I never had a bad dish. The downside, the wait, this time we waited for a table almost two hours, they recommend you to make a reservation but, nobody ever answers the phones, so just be patience and have a drink at the bar while you wait. After you are seated the food comes very fast. Worth the wait.", "Fantastic, well priced, fast service and absolutely the best Thai food in Vegas.  Just get there early and never try to order take away!!!  This business is busy for a reason!", "Finally got to experience the magic.  Great and can't wait to go back again.", "Finally made it out to this foodie destination and I walked away a happy camper. It's so hard to choose just a few dishes because everything sounds great, so either come with a large group of people or get ready to come back. We had the crispy duck curry (the one with the alcohol, lol) and it was delicious. Super creamy but the crispiness is still there. We also tried the pad thai, which was good but I'd stick with a more unique dish next time. Will be back!", "First time and it will be my last !! We order the  fried fish cod, calamari, and okra. We pick up our order and when we got home my wife calamari ended up being onion rings and i paid for calamari not onions rings. I called them and they told me to bring everything back. they took the onions rings out and gave me the fried calamari . But the cod and okra instead of frying them , they just told me ok  so now i am eating cold cod and soggy okra. Not to mention they had no spices  on the okra and cod ,  THIS STORE IS NOT WORTH THE TIME OR PRICE !!!", "First time we ordered, we got an assortment of little original Thai Dishes. Each was delicious, albeit small. \n\nSecond time we went there we ordered from the Northern Thailand menu, and it was, well... OK. Not sure great, still small servings, but not great. \n\nSo we're tentatively fans, but may need to downgrade later when we go again.\n\nThe wait here can be horrendously long. Come on weeknights right before the open to get seats quickly.", "Five stars for food, no question. I've eaten here a bunch of times and have never been disappointed... I'm only knocking off a star because I've not always received great customer service. Before you go, you should know, this place gets BUSY... There's a good chance you'll wait an hour or more, even on a Tuesday.", "Food Network said this place is some of the best Thai Food you can find anywhere in the country. I have to agree with them. We\ncame during lunch. The shopping center where the restaurant is located is suspect. However, once we went inside we were greeted by a nice staff and our food flew out of the kitchen. The highlight of our lunch was the deep fried pampano with sweet and sour sauce. The pad thai is fresh and tasty. The stuffed chicken wings were a pleasant surprise. Think a pork egg roll stuffed into\na chicken wing. If you are in Vegas, get off the strip and visit this place!!!", "Food very good and inexpensive, large menu selection, only negative is location, not a safe neighborhood. Hard to get reservations, always busy", "Food was 4 stars..\nwaiters were enthusiastic but poorly trained.\nArea is scary at night. \nRestaurant was very tired.\nWould probably not go back, there is such a big competition out there in Vegas.", "Food was really good! Portion sizes are good, food is full of flavor. Took a party of 10 in for lunch. Service was on point. Will be going back again.", "For some reason everyone wants to go here.  Been there a number of times.  In my humble opinion.... It's average.  Very bad location especially at night.\n\nLa Thai is far better!", "Friday, October 30th, 2015 we popped in for a late lunch around 330pm.  We were seated on the outdoor patio as request and the waiter assistant poured water as soon as we were seated.  Mitch, our server finally came by 12 minutes later to take our drink order.  My partner ordered the Watermelon Fresca which was awful!  Next we placed our order for the Chicken & Waffles and ShortRib Bologne.  Nothing special here. Just so so!  The Chicken was over cooked dry and chewy.  The pickles severed on top of the chicken were excellent.  The ShortRib Bologne was fair, once again nothing special.  But the real issue here is the pour service or lack there of!  If you have a choose, go elsewhere.", "Garlic prawns were amazing, whole family loved - crunchy, tender, tasty, great portion. The crispy rice with sausage was a foodie experience, 5 stars - unique, ton of flavor, loved the mint and red onion. \n\nHubby had crispy duck, high on the spice meter, tender and very hot - and he likes spicy. He described is as a different type of heat that he wasn't used too, great experience with Thai chillies. \n\nI wasn't impressed with the Khao Soi with beef - beef was hard and chewy, I had to politely spit it into my paper napkin, found two more hunks of that. Didn't want to fill up on the noodles, enjoyed the broth, and the crunchy noodles on top got soggy quick. \n\nDidn't have a reservation, but was seated in 30 min., reasonable for a Saturday night at 6:00, considering its popularity. A great experience for us, beginners at Thai cuisine.", "Good was not as great as I expected it to be.", "Got here on a Tuesday and had a 20 minute wait. The service was quick and efficient. The food was very flavorful but a little on the salty side. I would give a higher rating if the prices were lower or the portions were bigger.", "Great food, huge menu, parking's a bit far from the door.", "Great food, service, and quality. You can not go wrong here!", "Great food. went there after drinking with friends and what they ordered for me was delicious", "Hannah, you are absolutely amazing!  You always pay such attention to detail.  I am ALWAYS getting compliments on my nails (which is why I always have your business cards with me).  Your place is inviting, exciting and classy, just as you are.\n\nKathy V", "Heard a couple in the hotel elevator talking about their plans to go here for dinner (5 years ago?) and since then, no trip to Vegas is complete without a meal at Lotus! \n\nDinner starts at 5:30 so we always try to come here a little earlier to beat the crowd and even then there's a line. Tonight got here at 5:30 and the wait was an hour. \n\nTIPS:\n- Come at 5 to get in line so when they open at 530 you're first\n- Or call for a reservation but their phone is always busy so try calling 1-2 days in advance. Also if you're not here within 5 mins of your reservation, you lose your spot\n\nWHAT WE ORDERED TONIGHT: \n1. Crispy duck panang - THIS IS A MUST TRY. Every time we're here. We usually get this spicy since I think it enhances the flavor. This time we got medium and while still good, spicy would've tasted better. The sauce is AMAZINGG I don't waste a drop of it so once the duck is all gone I put some rice in the dish and mix it with the sauce and yummmm *___*\n2. Tom yum soup- was not so yum. Not sure why but the last two times I've been here (tonight included) I wasn't very impressed with the soup. It tasted pretty bland and lacking in flavor. I've had better. This is why 4 stars \n3. Sea bass with drunken noodles - first time trying this and will definitely order this again the next time! \n4. Lamb (the waiter suggested this as it was the special) I personally am not a big fan of lamb so can't really give my opinion on whether or not it was good\nAnd then the defaults:\n5. Pad Thai - 4/5 \n6. Pad See Ew - my nephew hogged it all before I could get a taste but I didn't hear any complaints and he's very picky with his pad see ew!\n\nThe portions are not as big as other Thai restaurants I usually go to so if you're planning to share at the table, keep that in mind! We usually order as many dishes as there are people in our party and keep a menu on the side in case we're still hungry.\n\nService is great and the waiters are very nice!", "High Quality Thai Food in a little dirty part of town but once you are through the doors a great restaurant.", "Highly recommend this place above all the Thai restaurants in Las Vegas. Amazing Service and great Duck Curry", "I am no expert in Thai cuisine. However, I believe that good food is universally good. I have travelled the world and eaten cuisine from many different countries, and It is hard for me to even fathom how this place can have an avg of 2 hours wait for dinner. \n\nI ordered the following:\n\n1. Garlic prawns: 0/5. I ordered based on the rave reviews. At $28, I expected more than prawn shells that were fried to oblivion. Half the shells didn't even have any meat inside. It was severely lacking in garlic flavor.\n\n2. Tom yum Kai: 3/5 tasty but lukewarm. I expected it to be steaming hot, but it felt like the bowl had been sitting out for a while before it was served.\n\n3. Crispy pork belly (#87): 0/5 can be a true delicacy if done right. Lotus, however, did not get it right. It was cold and the portion was abysmal for the price. I could have taken a slab of bacon and fried it with better flavor\n\n4. Drunken noodles with seafood: 0/5 again, portion was small for the price. To add insult to injury, they used fake imitation crab!!! That's disgusting. \n\nOverall, not worth the wait or the $80 bill. I have heard that the famous lady chef who made this restaurant into fame has retired, and I believe it because based on my experience, it is no better than the average Thai restaurant in middle of nowhere Wyoming. DO NOT EAT HERE!", "I came here in September, right before my flight back home. \n\nWe ordered a ton of food, prawns, pad thai, fried rice...pretty much everything on the menu. My boyfriend's brother couldn't stop raving about this place, so I had pretty high expectations. I was expected to be blown away...but it's really just okay. Like I wouldn't go out of my way to come here, but if I was craving Thai in the Vegas area, and didn't want to eat on the strip I would eat here. \n\nLocation is kind of strange. Next to a senior center. Once you go inside you can't tell though.", "I don't understand why people love this place so much. Food was alright for the high price--nothing really special. Got the pork curry, garlic wings, and another dish with green beans and chicken. All were okay. Servers moved quickly, though food took about 15 min to reach the table. We were seated quickly as a party of 2 at 11:40am. Other than that, that's all I have.", "I have to give this place 4 stars instead of 5 because after having Arawan Thai, no place else deserves 5 stars. I think the dishes at Lotus of Siam are great, but sometimes can be tendon or Fatty like. The flavors are awesome though and we always receive our food quickly. A must try is the crispy rice on the appetizers!  The menu is so huge I don't know where to start, but I love a big selection,  so I'm not complaining!", "I kept hearing from multiple sources how great Lotus of Siam was, so I immediately bookmarked it, but after many failed attempts while in Vegas I was beginning to feel that I would never get to check it out. As I was beginning to forget about LoS, I was reminded and managed to wake up in time to come an hour before closing. There was no wait that all my friends complained about. Sweet!\n\nLotus of Siam is located in a sketchy-looking strip mall off strip. Don't let the area scare you away, because you'll have a enjoyable meal. Nothing like a little bit of anxiety to stir up an appetite. Based on the looks of it, you wouldn't have guessed that it won a bunch of recognitions and popped up on shows and magazines.\n\nFood:\n1) Pad See Ew is always a safe and solid option. I always have to order it when I eat Thai.\n2) Green Curry - I haven't had a bad experience with Thai curry, *Knock on wood* It was savory and creamy.\n3) Crispy Rice - I didn't expect the crispy rice to be limy. I personally like the limy flavor, so I personally enjoyed it.\n4) Tom Yum Soup was good. It didn't particularly stand out from all the other ones I've tried. Other than the price tag.\n\nService: Decent. Nothing special.\n\nOverall: Good food. The taste was on the better side, but the portions were lower while the price was higher than all the Thai restaurants I've been to.", "I lived and worked in Thailand for 16 years. Needless to say, I ate in many a Thai restaurant during my stay and I know what Thai food should taste like. When I arrived here in Vegas I heard about Lotus of Siam. Tried it for the first time today for lunch. My Thai wife and I ordered 3 dishes, glass noodle salad, fried fish cakes and beef noodle soup. Don't get me wrong now, I'm not saying the food was not edible. What I am saying is, they were not authentic. When you order a Thai dish in a restaurant that you have ordered many times before and get something that is not what you expect, it is disappointing.  Might go back for a second try. Maybe for dinner this time. Different chef may make a difference.", "I love Thai food and the food here is simply amazing!!! I can't get enough of this place but it is always packed and I hate the wait but it's totally worth it.  They have a very nice bar so that's where I make my time go by...the longer the wait the more I drink...lol...I guess that's what they want since everyone spends more on drinks than on the meal itself.  Very authentic.  I like pad se ew and tom yum koong and my husband loves the coconut shrimp and curry.  Whatever we like they have....i'm in heaven every time I come here to eat.  Definitely the best thai place in Vegas!!!", "I loved this place. There was a 45 minute wait, but well worth it. I ate the pork stew off the northern menu. It was delicious. The place was busy, clean and the staff were very attentive. No surprise some of my favorite food network chefs had their pictures on the wall. I'll definitely be back next time I'm in Vegas", "I only take people who are really special to the Lotus of Siam for lunch.  After all, if too many people hear about it, how am I going to get a table and get back to work on time?  Many court officials, including judges and bailiffs can be seen enjoying lunch at this hidden gem.", "I really like this restaurant.  My co-workers and I go here during lunch.  Each time, I am always satisfied.  Their chicken panang and chicken larb are very tasty.", "I remember when this place was smaller and less of a must-do for tourists. But thankfully, while the wait time for a table has gone up, the quality and service have remained the same. This is some seriously tasty Thai food! It is easily some of the best I've ever had. Ok, probably, THE best I've ever had. It's a lengthy menu with lots of options. And you can order everything to your personal spiciness level. I've never had anything other than great here. And it's fun to be adventurous and try new things here. If you have to wait for a table, there is a small bar where you can try to grab a seat (or stand around) and get a drink or too. The wait times have never been all that bad, and it's usually much quicker than the estimate they give you. The ambiance and decor are nice. It can feel a bit crowded, but it's not uncomfortable or bad. And it surprisingly not all that loud. All in all, an excellent place to eat.", "I truly enjoyed our experience here.  The wait was about an hour but the food came out really quickly and the customer service was on point.  We got the most talked about Crispy Duck with Panang Curry and the Garlic Prawns, with some Pad See Ew with beef.  I cannot describe how amazing the flavors were and how crispy the duck and prawns were! Yummy!  5 star experience!\n\nFor the price of the Chef Choice dishes (Crispy Duck with Panang and Garlic Prawns), which was over $25 each, it seemed too pricey.  The Pad See Ew was more reasonable at $11.95 and includes a choice of meat.  It is also located in a pretty sketchy neighborhood.  I would probably come here once every few years haha.", "I visited Harry and David at the Las Vegas Premium Outlets on 12/10/15 to purchase cookies to mail to my boyfriends grandmother and I just wanted to say that I had a very pleasant experience. The displays of the products are all over the store and there are so many items to choose from which are decorated beautifully for Christmas. I sampled tea, yogurt covered pretzels and the raspberry-filled tree-cutout shortbread cookies which were to die for.\n\nI would also like to mention that I received wonderful service from Shanique. She was a great help in assisting me with picking out cookies for my boyfriends grandmother. She was extremely kind, patient and very informative about the products. She made the process very easy and enjoyable. She is a true asset to this company and I will always make sure she is working before I go to the store.", "I was hoping to be blown away as LOS is touted as one the best Thai places in the US but walked away thinking yeah this is good but not 5 star good.  \n\nWe started off with a few apps and the stand out for me was the Nam Kao Tod.  The crispy rice along the spices and pork was a great combo.  Probably the best thing I had all night.\n\nI also had the Sea Bass Drunken Noodles which was okay.  The sea bass itself was great but the Noodles were about average and didn't have a lot of spice going on despite ordering it at a 6.  Tangent ... the spice scale is never consistent so it's tough to gage if a 6 is going to burn your face off or not have any spice at all.  This time it was not spicy at all, lesson learned.\n\nNext time I stop in I'll level set my expectations and order spicer than a 6.  \n\nAnother tangent ... the reservation process is kind of a hassle but I get why they do it.  There was a bar that served food so that might be a better option than trying to get in weeks in advance.", "I was kinda disappointed with this joint after all the hype...\n\nThe service was awesome, the ambiance was fine. But the food? I wouldn't go out of my way to return. I ordered the chicken soup -Tom Kah Kai , the flavors were a delight. However I think it had been sitting on the warmer half the evening ergo the chicken was rubbery and over cooked. The garlic shrimps I had were far too greasy. It was completely unappetizing.\nMy other half had the nam prik ong. It was alright, but he was unsure as to why it was the best dish Ming Tsai ever had. Mr. Man was completely underwhelmed... We've had Pok Pok (in Portland, OR) sticky rice, sticky rice at home, and many other restaurants. But here? It wasn't very good. Just sticky and cold. Only good for a bonding agent. \nI would not recommend a return visit. It seems like they're just trading on their reputation.", "I was really excited to try this restaurant I've heard a lot of good things about it! Supposedly the best Thai food in Las Vegas. I was quickly disappointed by lousy service and underwhelming food considering the price but what really ruined my night was finding a log hair embedded in my food. To my surprise I still had to pay in full my meal about $100 for 2 people and I got miss changed for the vine as well. They didn't try to keep me as a customer at all!!", "I won't say anything new that someone hasn't already said about this place...it's a jewel. Ok, nevermind, I'll say something...one word...Crispy Duck.", "I would fly to Las Vegas for the sole purpose of dining at Lotus of Siam.", "I'm a Thai food junkie. Not to sound hyperbolic, but I could literally eat Thai everyday. This restaurant has been highly recommended by many people and I'm so glad I finally had the opportunity to try out. It's a cab ride off the strip in a dismal little strip mall, but don't be deterred, it's worth the trip. The wait was long, even though there were several open tables which was a bit confusing. The staff was very friendly and helpful. I started with the chicken larb appetizer which was the best I'd ever had. Three of us dined \"family style\" so we were able to try a lot of different meals. I ordered the green curry which was very good...they are not shy with their spices, so buyer beware. (They can always cut the spice down if you get too ambitious.) Also had the Tom Kum Kai Bangkok soup which had me sweating and my sinuses cleared. We also passed around some Koong Tenn, a roasted shrimp plate that was by far the best meal ordered that night. The shrimp were huge and prepared perfectly. Definitely worth trying out, and I will be back next time I'm in town.", "I'm not sure what I can say about this place and hasn't already been said. The food in the service were exceptional, without a doubt the best Thai food I've ever eaten in my life. Truly an experience not to be missed if you're a foodie, or  if you just love Thai food and you find yourself in Las Vegas.", "I'm only giving Lotus of Siam 5 stars because I can't give it 6 stars. Best Thai food I have ever had! \n\nMost Thai restaurants have really similar menu's but Lotus of Siam has unique, elevated dishes that put it above all the competition. We got there at 5:10pm (opens at 5:30pm) and there was already a line of people waiting outside. But we had no problem being seated because the restaurant's pretty large inside and we got in with the first wave. \n\nDishes that WOW'ed us:\nDrunken noodles with soft shell crab \nCrispy duck with panang curry\nGarlic prawns\nPad Thai w/ chicken and shrimp\n\nService is excellent. Bookmark for your next Vegas getaway NOW!", "I'm only giving Lotus of Siam 5 stars because I can't give it 6 stars. Best Thai food I have ever had! \n\nMost Thai restaurants have really similar menu's but Lotus of Siam has unique, elevated dishes that put it above all the competition. \nDishes that were best:\n\nDrunken noodles with soft shell crab \nCrispy duck with panang curry\n\n\nHighly recommended!!!!!", "I've been a local in Vegas for 8 years now and LOVE taking my friends to Lotus of Siam! Their menu is amazing and the Chef is incredible so definitely try more than just the Pad Thai!", "I've had a lot of Thai food in my 20 something years and I must say this place set the bar. Everything else from here on out is going to be mediocre. Granted it was on the freaking pricey side but at least it was tasty. \n\nSea bass w drunken noodles: bomb sea bass. It was perfectly fried. It wasn't too breaded. The fish really held on its own. The noodles were spicy but not too spicy. \n\nGarlic prawns: they hooked it up. I mean I guess they should for the price. It was so crispy and tasty. I ate the heads whole. If you're not eating the head then you're missing out. Waste not, want not. \n\nTom yum soup: they use fresh mushrooms. Other places will use canned mushrooms. It was good. My boyfriend was hungover and it got his stamp of approval. \n\nNam Prik Ong: it was okay. I thought it was going to be better because it was on the food network. It reminded me of tomato sauce with pork. I was hoping it would be spicy, it wasn't. The chicharron was the best part.", "I've heard so much about this place and the hype from all these food tv shows! Finally got a chance to go off strip and eat here for lunch! Don't get me wrong the food is pretty good but overpriced due to the popularity and hype. We ordered drunken noodles with fried fish, and the was tasty but the noodles were a bit too soggy for me. The Northern style curry was more like a soup. But I did enjoy the crispy duck panang curry! The prices on some of the dishes are a bit overpriced and small in portion size.", "I've only experienced takeout from this place and I've never been more disappointed. My friends and I decided to grab takeout due to the long wait and we ordered the crispy duck curry and the drunken noodles.\n\nFirst off, we had originally ordered the regular duck curry, but the lady told us that we should get the crispy duck because it was what the restaurant was known for. Given that the price of the crispy duck was more than double the price of the regular, she assured us that the portion of crispy duck was much larger and enough for 3. Thus, we decided to pay $28. She told us the wait would be 25 min.\n\nWe ended up waiting much more than an hour for takeout. Upon finally getting our food and opening the boxes, we found in the large takeout box, only 11 thin pieces of crispy duck, a carton of curry, and a small box of rice. For $28, it was simply a RIP-OFF. Don't get me wrong, the food was decent, but completely not worth the price. And we felt cheated.\n\nThe drunken noodles were decent but I've had better at many other places.", "If you love and can stand fried food, go for the garlic prawns and stuffed chicken wings. Crispy duck is so-so, more on the fatty side and not as crispy.", "In planning our trip to Vegas we knew that, since we are not big clubbers, we were looking to do shows and other fun things in the evenings. We booked two shows and went looking on the internet to find something \"different\". When we came upon the Lip Smacking Foodie Tour we knew that it was for us. My wife and I both like to cook and we have visited most of the upper-tier restaurants in and around Chicago. We signed up for the evening strip tour with drinks. We hesitated when we saw the price but we said, what the heck, it seems overpriced but let's do it anyway.\n\nWe met our guides Abra and Donald, and the four other tour participants in front of the Aria at 6PM. For the next four hours we were treated to gracious hosts, reserved seating, luscious food and delicious drinks. An easy cop-out for the tour would to be to go the well known chef driven restaurants, the Guy Fieri's, the Wolfgang Puck's, etc... What we did instead was to go to the lesser know chef driven restaurants where the food is really delivered with commitment and passion. At each stop we were given three, and sometimes four, of the chefs signature dishes. I could not tell you which stop was my favorite as they were all great. We were always very heartily welcomed at the restaurants. The staff, and sometimes the chef him/her self, would come out to explain the dishes and to thank us for coming. Be ready for somewhat adventurous eating. If meatloaf and mashed potatoes is your idea of a great meal out then this is probably not for you. And the drinks, they were always plentiful and delicious. They were also sure to complimented the food being served. Surprisingly, one was very elaborate, involving fire and alcohol vapor sipped from a beaker. Not only did the tour provide us with great food and drink, along the route we were treated to a behind the scenes tour and tasting of how chocolate was made and a very interesting stop at a unique shop that we had walked by several time without really noticing. Very cool! Don and Abra also pointed out several art installations that we had missed before. Nothing like a little culture with your movable feast.\n\nThe following day, when we showed the concierge at our hotel the prior evening's itinerary she was very impressed. She said that these were some of here favorite restaurants and that they were definitely \"under the radar\" for most tourists.  She said that she plans now to take the tour herself.\n\nSo, all in all it was a great experience. The food and drink was fantastic. The hosts did a great job and the walking part of the tour was interesting and enlightening. As far as the cost of the tour in concerned, we now feel that it is a drop dead bargain. If the experience sounds good to you, do not let the price deter you. I think that you will find that it is well worth the price of admission.", "Just a dinner here. Service is great - bunch of people run by our table. Food was good. Portions are not as big as in the Thai St Cafe. $11 a meal. Would've put 4 stars but it fascinates me how this place grew from a whole in the wall to such a big place. Is it all because of celebrities?", "Just ask them to bring you dinner. Fantastic food!", "Last night is my second times with Lotus of Siam.  All delicious really.  The owner is wonderful lady, she is very polite and nice to everyone.  I intend to visit every times when I will hve times to visit Las Vegas and introduce to all my friend who want to visit Las Vegas.", "Long wait. The food is quite good. We ordered curry, salad and crispy shrimp. The crispy shrimps was good but overpriced.", "Lotus has to be the best Thai food I have ever had! You will not be disappointed with any of the items on the menu. Reasonable prices. You can have anything according to your spice level. Deeleesh.", "Love it all. The wine selection is outta this world.", "Love the food! The menu is huge and the wine selection is even bigger!", "Love this place. The atmosphere of the restaurant is great. It was hard to find, but all the best places are hidden gems am I right? Food was so good, I can't wait to come back! And our server was very friendly!", "Me and my wife moved to Las Vegas a few years ago and we saw the anthony bourdain special on CNN referring to Lotus of Siam.  We made a note to try it out but couldn't find the time with the new baby on the way.   This past few months we were able to go for dinner and bring our 18 month old with us.    Whenever I eat Thai, I always order the same thing \"Spicy Basil with Rice\" with number 4 heat index.   I probably have sampled this dish at atleast 20 different restaurants around the country.   Lotus of Siam is by far the best.  I don't know what they are doing exactly but it tastes amazing.   We ordered some chicken satays for our little one and cut them up in small peaces.   They were not too spicy and he ate all 3 of them.", "Mom and I decided to give this place a try when multiple people we know recommended it as being their favorite Thai place...ever.  My true rating is about 3.5.\n\nSo we went for a leisurely lunch at around 11:40am Friday.  Business was just starting to ramp up.  We were seated at a tiny two-top...BOO...which I always hate especially when I see other parties of two sitting at 4-tops.  Not conducive to us ordering so many dishes...\n\nWe started with the papaya salad and pork larb (my must-have at any Thai place).  The dressing for the papaya salad was a little too sweet for my taste, and my fork got all sticky.  The larb was an excellent version.  Both portions were very skimpy.\n\nFor entrees, we ordered what most people on Yelp recommended - the crispy duck panang and garlic prawns.  We also got the Thai fried rice w/ beef.  The garlic prawns, I have to say, were amazing.  I expected them to be like the Chinese version, deep fried with scallions and peppers on top.  However, these were a step above...with the shell still attached and well-deep fried so you can munch on it separately from the shrimp itself.  Great flavor.\n\nI have to say that while the crispy duck panang was delicious, the dish was kind of a let-down.  When I saw crispy duck, I thought maybe it was the roasted version with crispy skin...mmm.  However, this version turned out to be breaded and deep fried.  The breading was a little thick, especially when some of the pieces were smaller and you were eating mostly breading.  Not sure if this was worth the $28 price tag.  The garlic prawn definitely was.\n\nThai fried rice was tasty but I can't say if it was better than any other version I've had.\n\nService was actually pretty good except when the servers, even when faced with the Tetris challenge of finding space on our tiny table for all our food, opted to place the dishes in awkward spots like at our elbows rather than move us to a bigger table (of which many were available).  Waters were refilled and people were generally smiley.\n\nTasty lunch with a little bit of leftovers which were delicious cold that afternoon in our hotel room!  Good version of Thai, would be a great option if you had a hankering.", "My boyfriend took me to this place 3 years ago for the first time.\nIt was good, but doesn't make me crave to go back.\nThe best dish was the duck probably, even though I don't really like duck.", "My friend recommended coming to this place, and I'm so glad I did! Probably the best Thai food I have ever had. This place is huge, and I can see why! The place immediately became packed as soon as it opened. We had Thai tea, the catfish Po Tek (?) soup, Shrimp Pad Thai, and the famous Garlic Chili Prawns. The Prawns were like $30? But soooo worth it. They were huge and full of flavor! Too bad I'm from Houston; I miss this place already.", "My man brought me here as a surprise. Id never heard of it. He told me he made the reservation three weeks ahead. When we arrived, the wait for non-reservations was two hours. They had our table ready immediately.  The staff were kind, attentive and prompt.  The food was absolutely to die for. This place will be a frequent stop for us.", "My second time here. We ordered the basil and chili with sliced beef, spicy number 7, pad Thai with chicken, spicy level number 7, and musaman curry with chicken, spicy level 5. It is worth noting that the basil and chilli with sliced beef is exceptional. Reminds me of this wonderful restaurant called Tara Thai in Manhattan Beach, CA, when it was still owned and by Penn, who also was the cook. \n\nWe arrived for lunch on a Friday at 1:30. Many of the tables were occupied, and because it is the number 1 rated restaurant in Las Vegas according to Yelp and Trip Advisor, I was happy to get a table right away. The server took the order after about 10 minutes which was fine since we were talking anyway. The portions are downright dainty. The pad Thai was burnt, and when we requested another plate that wasn't burnt, it was almost the same. \n\nBottom line is that the pad Thai was downright awful, and the musaman curry was nothing exceptional. I felt incredibly full after sharing these 3 small entrees with someone. Shortly after leaving I felt incredibly bloated, achy, and like I took laughing gas. Called the restaurant to ask if they used MSG and they said they put it in every dish! 2 hours later my muscles ache, I feel sick and this top rated restaurant pretty much msg poisoned me. \n\nBottom line, you can get better Thai food at Krung Thai on Flamingo and Decatur, which doesn't use msg and is about half the price. Don't believe the hype.", "My son suggested we try this Thai restaurant in Las Vegas because he had read it was the best Thai restaurant in the United States.   I've never been a big fan of Thai cooking but I went along for the ride.  Since I've had limited experience, I'm in no place to judge how it ranks in the whole country but it now has my vote, for sure.\n\nEverything we had was wonderful.  Service was superb.  We couldn't believe how fast the food was served after we ordered.  We started with the fried jerky with a spicy sauce which I understood was a Northern Thai dish.  It was an interesting, unusual and tasty appetizer unlike anything we had ever eaten before.\n\nMy son had the crispy duck panang in a spicy cream sauce.  The waiter asked for his spicy preference on a scale of 1 to 10.  My son said 6, I said mild which the waiter translated as 2 and we both said our dishes were perfect.  I've never been a fan of duck but I tried a bite and it was very good.   The steamed vegetables he ordered as a side were picture perfect.\n\nI was tempted to try the whole smoked catfish but decided to start with something a little less ambitious.  I ordered the pan fried smoked catfish prepared with vegetables and a curry sauce.   Where I come from we eat a lot of catfish and this was one of the most delicious and unusual catfish dishes I have ever eaten.   This is a restaurant where you should step out of your comfort zone and you may be very pleasantly surprised.", "My wife LOVES this place.  We are only downgrading the restaurant because of it's location. It's in a \"sketchy\" neighborhood and is a little hard to find.  But, if you can make it out to the Lotus, you will enjoy it. We've been to the restaurant 3 times now, and have enjoyed every meal.  Well worth the trip.", "No joke. Now I know what all the hype is about. Excellent Thai cuisine. Enjoyed every kernel, sip, bite, smell, sight of the few dishes I sampled. Looking forward to return trip.", "Not impressed by the food or the staff.", "OMG. I knew I loved Thai food before dining here. But after... I have a truly newfound LOVE of Thai cuisine when it tastes like this!  I'm talking pure ecstasy in your mouf!  The flavors and textures of each dish were to die for.  \n\nThe garlic prawns are a MUST!  I seriously ate these with my eyes closed as fireworks exploded in my line of vision with each bite.  \n\nOrder some kind of curry - Khao Soi with duck, panang, red, green, or yellow... They're all packed with flavor and amazingly delicious.\n\nMost importantly, make sure to have a reservation. Even with a reservation you'll still have to wait, but luckily there's a bar to make the waiting time fly by.\n\nI will definitely need to stop by here with every visit to Vegas.  I'm a total fan!", "Okay so we pull up to the shady abandoned strip mall that this place is located in- with an adult daycare next door, homeless people outside, and trash galore... BUT WHEN WE WALKED IN.... Stunning! The rooms are beautiful and clean- the staff is friendly but very foreign (don't ask them to explain the menu, they just smile and nod) - I ordered the duck soup- DELICIOUS! Best I've ever had! Completely authentic and delectable! I cannot write enough compliments on the food! It gets busy so plan ahead! Best kept secret in town!", "Order anything!", "Perhaps Chef Saipin Chutima who is also a James Beard Award winner was MIA the day we went.\n\nThe food is over-rated based mainly on the ridiculous prices.  \n\nThe garlic shrimp was OK but slightly overcooked.\n\nThe roasted duck curry was skimpy on the duck - considering the price?  Highway robbery!\n\nIf I lived nearby would I return?  Never!\n\n3 entrees and tip?  100 bucks!  This is not a \"family\" place - it's a triple D/best thing I ever ate  over-rated tourist trap IMO.", "Pork Larb, Pad See Ew, Garlic Prawns, Soft Shell Crab Drunken Noodles, Kang Ka Noon and Khao Soi. Thank you. You're welcome. \n\nBecause of these dishes only, it is some damn good Thai in Vegas and thus my rating. &&& OK because I haven't had the chance to try anything else on the menu yet. Don't judge me if you want to try something traditional and it comes out Vegas-y. I really don't care that it's Thai food with glitter. This place is good when you don't buy into the hype but do buy at the steep prices, or if you're a placebo affected person then this place will surely be some of the \"best\" if you've already bought into the hype. Why? Because some Vegas folk will tell that it's the best Thai around. Me Personally? Ah, alright, if you say so. To each their own. Honestly you're asking me if it is THE BEST like so many and the Food Network say? Like in America. That would be a comical NO. Not a harsh No. Just a snickering one. Still worthy of your time nonetheless if you just have to try the talked about restaurants like I have to. \n\nDo yourself a favor and look towards the Northern Thai food menu. Especially if you're a foodie. Otherwise, Holy Mother Mary of Jesus, the Soft Shell Crab over Drunken Noodles. Yes. Please. Marry me. Let me count the ways I love you. Mind you some of my favorite things in this world are soft shell crab and drunken noodles, so this blows my ego way up. \n\nIf you're into the hype, GO. Yum. If you're smarter and cautious, all you need to know is that the prices are dumb, even for Thai food, and I'd suggest to this crowd that you wait until someone forces you to go. Still so yum. It will be more than worth it if you choose the right dish for you. Do your research. There's TONS of Yelp reviews to shift through. That's it from me, my thumbs are still up. Oh, and Crispy Duck Panang, I'm coming back for you.", "Pretty Surprising.  Neat spot that is in an old shopping center, in a not perfect part of town.\n\nOnce you get over the lack of ambience outside, you go in and the restaurant is awesome.  Packed with people, clean, busy - and food is pretty ridiculous.\n\nEverything I had ordered was recommended by the server and it made me happy I wasn't on the Strip, paying an arm and a leg for food this good.\n\nFresh ingredients and vibrant colored and tasting dishes - enough talking - get yourself over there.  :)", "Pretty good, I took my wife there last weekend and she loved it. I didn't.", "Really?   Best Thai in Las Vegas?  That's not saying much.   This place wasn't bad, but it wasn't exceptional in any way.   If you love Thai food and need a fix, this place will do, but don't expect to be wowed.", "SO AUTHENTIC WILL GO AGAIN. Get northern thai food because that's her specialty!", "Simply Amazing...and worth waiting 90 minutes if you don't have a reservation.", "So, there's been a major hype about this place for a LOOOOOOONG time. I stopped by here back in 2008, and got a ton of food as a take-out and wasn't impressed at the time. \n\nMy second visit was back in 2011, and I thought the food was good at that time, but wasn't blown away. \n\nMy recent visit, I went with a group and ordered several different items to try.\n\nGarlic prawns- 5 stars. This is a must order. I would come back and get this without a question. \n\nCrispy duck panning curry - 2 stars. The panang curry was a bit lacking for me, and the duck was the best part. \n\nStuffed chicken wings- 5 stars. This dish is SOOOO Good. It is stuffed with the insides of vietnamese egg roll type ingredients. I LOVED it. \n\nDrunken noodles- 2 stars.  I did a double take on this dish, as it was supposed to be an entree, but looked like an appetizer. I felt soooo jipped, and the dish wasn't even that great either. The chicken pieces were dry, and the noodles did not have good flavor. \n\nCrispy rice dish appetizer- 2 stars.  This dish has basically the flavors of larb on crispy rice. I LOVE larb, and prefer to have it incorporated into ground meats, so I thought this was meh. \n\nI hear this is one of the best thai places. I've given three tries to finally write this review, and I gotta say, maybe there's too much hype?", "Sorry to buck the trend here, and I know how wildly popular this restaurant is with Yelp L.A. , but I felt underwhelmed.  The location is dodgy, not convenient, and complete with a selection of panhandlers. The food was of average quality and selection even for Las Vegas. I totally get it: Yelpers love Lotus of Siam. They should be proud of attracting the Yelp crowd. I won't be returning. My experience was just average especially for a business lunch. Bargain hunters looking for a good meal on the fly before heading back to L.A. would definitely enjoy this place!", "Spring rolls were delish! The dishes are simple but pack powerful flavor and portions are just right.", "Still a 5 star, although it is so much busier since the last time we were here. The food is superb. They have this restaurant down to a science. I would be surprised if any table stayed more than an hour at the rate that they are churning people out. I am surprised at the people outside waiting as the only way to go is to make a reservation, otherwise the wait will be 2 hours. Super great wine selection, although I wish they had a cocktail menu as well. Anything that you order will be great, don't listen to these Yelp reviews where it seems that they clearly didn't make a reservation and were sore. Crispy duck anything is my pick, I have had them all. The squid or papaya salad is a nice start. Tom Kha soup is avoidable; it doesn't taste any different than anywhere else. I would stick with the Northern Thai specialties or ask your server what they like. You can't go wrong.", "Tastefully done but in a terrible location.", "The Best!! Perfect, on point in so many ways!!", "The best Thai ever! Love this place. A true hidden jem. Best Tom Ka Khi I've ever had.", "The best Thai food I ever had anywhere in the states.  found it on yelp. the outside looks sketchy in an old shopping mall, but the inside was a nice surprise. you cannot judge a book by its cover. we ordered four dishes and shared, drunken beef noodle, pad Thai, chicken panang curry, and beef stir fry with green beans. For dessert, try the fried banana with coconut ice cream, it is divine. I don't think you can go wrong. we tried coming back the next day, but it was a 45 minute wait on a Saturday night, so went across the street to Arawan Bistro.", "The best thai food EVER. \n\nA friend introduced us this place last time we visited Las Vegas. We came back here again because the food was just on point!\n\nThis time, I got the famous garlic shrimp, pineapple fried rice, shrimp panang curry and papaya salad. \nGarlic shrimp was crispy, well seasoned and super tasty! I could kill the whole plate myself! \n\nYou do have to make a reservation or go early when they open. They open for dinner at 5:30pm and we got to the restaurant around 5:15pm. There was already a long line ahead of us. \n\nDefinitely a place to visit when you are tired of that crazy strip scene!", "The food options, taste and service was outstanding. We went with a group and the atmosphere was bright and open. The wine selection was impressive. We want to go back.", "The food was delicious we ordered 7 dishes which included a typical Burmese influenced dish is served with egg noodles in a curry base with a touch of coconut cream, with your choice of meat; garnished with sliced red onions, lime and pickled vegetables.\nSo delicious.  \nThe other dishes were more of he como dishes papaya salad, Panang curry and BBQ pork. The BBQ pork was a bit dry and the fat needed to be rendered a bit more. \nThe service was exceptional.  Right on top of it I was happy that they still seated us we got there at 9:45 which is normally when they close the kitchen but they seated us still yey!", "The food was great. We ordered a thai Tom yum Khuong but I wish they would use straw mushrooms rather than the button mushroom because that would be more authentic.", "The hype didn't meet my expectations. I mean the food was good, but honestly it tasted like any other Thai restaurant. We ordered from their \"northern\" section of the menu but I wasn't blown away with the food.\n\nThe saving grace was the dessert there... If you ever go, you HAVE to try their coconut ice cream with their banana eggroll thing. It's like the best thing I've ever had in life. It says a lot coming from a guy who isn't into desserts.", "Their appetizer prawns were the only thing memorable about this place.  It's been know to be the \"Best Thai Restaurant\" in Las Vegas.  I think that saying made their head too big and thought they were still king of the Thai cuisine.  \n\nThe service was very slow.  We were seated right away and someone brought water right away.  After 5min we had to wave someone down to order some drinks, then 10mins we had to waive again to order our food, from the hostess.  They weren't busy, just a few guys standing around, maybe bussers, but who knows.  Their appetizer prawns, that they're known for are great.  We ordered the usual safe stuff to compare, curry from their popular list and some noodle dish and they were both just ok.  \n\nThe 5 stars on his site are quite questionable.  I'm thinking, they've never ever had Thai food before.  They definitely need to work on their urgency of serving their customers, because their food, is just ok, not earth shattering. If you're new to the Thai cuisine, it's just fine.", "They got rid of the all you can eat- but still a great place to go for food!", "They say that it's the best Thai in town. I agree!  The wait is long, but it is worth it.  The food and service are outstanding.  I wish I lived closer!", "This Thai food different than other Thai food! Always busy Eventhough the price of food expensive! The staff is friendly and helpful. I love the interior inside very classic surrounded by many wine bottles! Highly recommend for visitors !", "This dish converted me to not only loving Thai food, but to love curry...  \n\nCRISPY DUCK with PANANG\nCrispy duck topped with Thai style red cream curry sauce with cognac.\n\nUFB!!!", "This has become my favorite restaurant in Vegas. I've eaten here many times since my last review. Everything on the menu is great, even if it is pricy. The quality is sublime.", "This is a James Beard award winner. Not too far from the strip. Large parking lot. Outside doesn't give much too look at but inside is visual appealing. Don't let the lot deceive you.  \n\nCame in about an hour after opened for dinner  Wait time was close to an hour. Not bad. They will call or text you. Staff was friendly. We waited and ordered some drinks at bar. One drink was thai iced tea. Good amount of citrus to tea. \n\n\nWhen we got seated for dinner, beverage and food order was taken  and delivered at a reasonable time. Our Order included but not limited to Tom kha kai soup, pad thai, khao soi with short rib, duck paanang curry, and pork belly. Each dish stood out on it's own. \n\nThe tom kha soup was creamy, coconut, mushroom, protein, and citrus. A nice mix match of sweetness, savory, and spices. Unexpectedly overwhelming delicious soup. \n\nPad Thai with chicken was one of the best I have tried. Nice balance of noodles, eggs, sprouts, chicken in sauce. \n\nPork belly with peppers and Chinese. greens. Not fatty pork belly mixed with the others in a light style sauce crisp Chinese greens. Good dish. Not my personal like for pork belly but not as fatty as I like. \n\nKhao Soi -Short Rib was one of two khao dishes. The one we ordered was one of the specialty dishes. The tender seasoned short rib was nestled within crispy noodles, green, and some of the best curry sauce. Not overly hot. The sauce I could just drink. It was that delicious. \n\nDuck paanang Curry. Oh my. Oh my. It's a flavor explosion. Freaking awesome curry sauce. Spices. Lean tender duck. Lots of duck. This curry was also one of the best.\n\nGood. Anything curry. Any of the dishes. Personal favorite the short rib and paanang but really all the dishes, service, and experience. \nBad. You can encounter wait times but worth it.\n\nI'll be back someday.", "This is my fave restaurant in Vegas.   I love the appetizer Nom Kao Tod.  It has crispy rice, pork, cllantro, lemon grass, red onion, lime or lime juice.   I wish they would make it as an entree.  I sometimes order 2 orders and make it my entr\u00e9e.   The Tom yum Khai soup is great and pad thai also is great.   The waiter asks what # of spicy/hot you want each dish. I do not think I've ever ordered over a 6 because your mouth becomes on fire at that point.  The restaurant atmosphere is nothing fancy but the whole thing just \"works\".  I have a 40 min drive to this place but gladly do it when my Thai cravings activate.", "This is the best Thai food hands down! I loved the different flavors of every dish. It transported me to Thailand. The restaurant is in a dingy run down shopping mall 15 minutes cab ride from the main strip.  Well worth the trip! Once inside much more impressive. Service was impeccable. I will revisit when I am in Vegas.", "This place is BOMB!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!\n\nI've been here twice and basically ordered almost the exact same thing! Now let me tell you, you HAVE to get the:\n\nSTUFFED CHICKEN WINGS!! Self explanatory.. and to die for!! MMM I am totally salivating right now haha\n\nGARLIC PRAWNS are also one of most favorites!! They are made so you can even eat the shell!\n\nI love noodles, so we ordered the CHICKEN PAD THAI, which is a dish i always order at thai restaurants and there's was DELCIOUS!!  I have never had a pad thai this good!! There other noodle dishes were soo yummy too! Like their fun! haha \n\nYou could also never go wrong with CHICKEN SA-TAY in the appetizer section, but if you haaad to choose definitely go with the STUFFED CHICKEN WINGS! If you haven't got it already, i'm basically saying this place is DELICIOUS and a must try :) \n\nThis place gets busy. We arrived like a minute before they opened and there was a line outside waiting to get eat some yummy thai restaurant. So get your butt over here, QUICK!!", "This place is a must try! Yes, they have all your standard favorite items, but do yourself a favor and try the back of the menu! This place specializes in northern Thai food. Branch out and try some of these items. You will not be disappointed!", "This place is amazing!  the service is amazing the food is delightful and flavorful you can taste the love in every bite.  You can't beat the prices as well you get a great value for your money spent.  This place is in a questionable part of town but come on for some bomb food and service come here.", "This place is apparently always booked, which is a good sign. People of all walks of life in here, enjoying good food. My GF and I walked in on a Tuesday night around 7 with no reservation and waited for our table to be ready while at the bar. They have a decent beer selection and a plethora of wines in their cellar. I didn't see any liquor other than sake (if you count that). We got sat within 30 minutes and our servers were quite attentive and informative. We had the Thai hot wings which were sweet and spicy, good. Tom Fun Kai soup next; limey and a spiciness at the end, interesting and good aswell. We ended with the famous garlic prawns, which did live up to the hype. Crispy and juicy tails with a crunchy kettle cooked chip-like shell. Will be back for those.", "This place is over rated..so is their crispy garlic shrimp for which they charge $27 with about 8 prawns and shells attached together..deep fried. Very greasy and not flavorful! The fried rice we ordered was very small in portion and about $15. Either they need to increase the portions or decrease the price. Also, they add a gratuity 18% regardless of the number in your party. Overall mediocre.", "This place is overrated. All hype. Definitely not worth a 2 hour wait. \nWhat we ordered;\nGarlic wings - good\nGarlic prawns - very good\nTum yum Kai (hot sour soup) - good\nGarlic squid - average\nDrunken noodles duck - not so great. The noodles was hard and stuck together as though it wasn't cooked properly and wasn't seasoned well. The duck used was very fatty.\n\nI may be spoiled living in California and having access to great food all the time. Perhaps that's why I wasn't impressed. Overall this spot serves average Thai food. I would not go back again especially for a 2 hour wait.", "This place is really good BUT not the best Thai food in Vegas. The chili dip on the Northern menu is amazing, but there is another Thai place in the same plaza who's flavor profiles are a lot better... starts with a K ends with an L", "This was by far the WORST chicken pad thai I've ever had. The noodles were dry. The three pieces of chicken that were in it were dry. It was not spicy. It was simply not good. I thought that with all the amazing reviews that people posted it would at least be edible, but alas, the reviewers have disappointed me again. This is not what pad thai is supposed to taste like. If I never return to this subpar Thai restaurant again, it will be too soon. I wish I could get a refund for this, because I couldn't even eat half of it. I'm sorely disappointed. And thanks to Yelp reviewers, I won't be trusting their opinions again. Thanks for nothing!", "This was our first time eating at Lotus. From the outside, it appeared to be a tiny hole in the wall. The huge number of cars should have been a clue, because we walked in to a large restaurant. We tried calling ahead, and were shocked when they told us they had no remaining reservations...for a Monday evening...at a place off the strip. We decided to go the wait route and had a beer at their large bar while we waited. We started with bacon wrapped shrimp. For our entrees we decided on the classic Pad Thai and the Drunken Noodles Crispy Duck. Everything was  good- we were between 3 and 4 stars. Our deciding factor is always, \"would we return on our next trip?\" We both said no.", "This was the most phenomenal experience ever! Their Thai food was perfectly on point, and the service was fast and super friendly. I don't think I've ever had better Tom Yum Kai or Pad Thai. My girlfriend got Masuman curry, and it was absolutely delicious. I am completely blown away by the experience.", "Took a party of 6 for lunch. Had heard such rave reviews about this place. We were seated immediately. However, the service was horrible. The waitress had a real attitude and did't seem to want to be bothered with us. We are not overly familliar with Thai food and had many questions. The waitress didn't really seem to want to be botered. The foods we ordered were marginal at best. Just not a real pleasant experience. Will go elsewhere next time. No return trip to this restaurant.", "Tried it because of all the good reviews, and I wasn't disappointed. I got there 15 minutes before they opened and there was already a line of about 8 people (3 groups). The outside is beat up, but the interior is nice. It's a high class restaurant in the middle of a strip mall. I don't remember anything after the garlic prawns. I blacked out they were so good. A bit more expensive than I expected but it was very good quality..", "Unbelievably, Incredibly Good\n\nI'll spare you a lengthy read.  I came up with the crazy idea to take my wife to one of her favorite restaurants for her birthday.  We flew from San Francisco to Las Vegas to have lunch here.  AND IT WAS TOTALLY WORTH IT!!  We will do it again.\n\nIt was our second meal there - every bit as good as the first.  The location is not great, but the food is utterly amazing.  EAT HERE.", "Very Good food, lots of flavor and service was fairly quick.  This place is busy for a reason.", "Very cool old school vegas place! Food and service were both good. Restaurant is very bright is my only criticism. Would probly give it 4.5 stars if possible. Waiter gave recommendations and we took some. All the food was tasty from the satay to the pad Thai to the Panang. Great Thai food and we will definitely be back!", "Very rude service. Gave my name for the waiting list and ladies at front were making fun of my name. Before you make fun of someone's name, make sure that person does not know Thai. It shows your ignorance. Food was not that great and very expensive. There are other Thai restaurants with better food and less expensive.  Not coming back again.", "We always go here every time we're in Las Vegas. It's a tradition and never disappoints", "We came here again on 12/15/15. This time the service was friendly and appropriate. We ordered the Golden Tofu which was ok but not outstanding in the flavor department - crispy on the outside and creamy on the inside but needed a different and stronger sauce. Next came the Tom Kah Kai soup which was enjoyable but again, lukewarm like on our last visit. The we also had the Koong Char Num Plar - raw prawns with lime juice, marinate and a chili and tamarind paste (delicious) - nice combination of flavors. \n\nWe have visited many Thai restaurants across many States but we really fail to understand why Lotus of Siam is so highly celebrated - they are good but we are not blown away.", "We came here on the last day of our Vegas stay and are looking forward to return some time in the near future.  I do not know how long the wait time is usually, as we went right when they opened shop.  By the time we were done however, there was a line at the door.  We ordered many dishes and they all were flavorful and delicious.  One of my buddies was asking why we hadn't came here earlier.  Anyways, if you are looking for good Thai food in the Vegas area, Lotus of Siam is a no-brainer.", "We got there around 6 and we only had a 30 minute wait which was very lucky for us because the wait time usually is about an hour. The place is huge when you go in! Loved it here! Everything we ordered had a spice at a 7 or 8 and it was perfect. I love how it's spicy enough to burn your mouth but not too spicy where you can't taste the whole dish itself. It was the perfect balance and we all enjoyed several dishes to share. The fried duck in red curry was amazing and I usually don't like the coconut taste in curry but this was perfectly made with just a hint of coconut. We had seafood drunken noodles which wasn't too bad. The noodles kinda got stuck together in a big blob on the bottom of the dish. The spicy fried rice is amazing and the beef was great! Definitely going to come back.", "We had a pretty good size spread:\n1. Garlic prawns - Not sure what all the hype is, but not going to order again, they were just okay. Eat the shells and they'll get stuck in your teeth.\n2. Combination fried rice - Good, worth buying again. This was probably the only thing that wasn't deep fried.\n3. Crispy duck panang - Worth 5 stars. It stole the show. Now this baby was definitely worth buying again and again. I should have placed an order of this to go. I didn't see it on the menu, but luckily I was able to pull up another review photo. It was delicious! \n4. Drunken noodles - If I can't remember the meat in it, does that tell you anything? This is why I went in the 1st place. Noodles were stuck together, may order one more time to see if it was just the cook.\n5. Chicken pad Thai - Flavor was good, but noodles were smaller than most Thai places I have visited.\n6. Stuffed chicken wings - OMG!! I could have eaten 4 of these as a meal. My jaw dropped when I saw bill and realize we paid $11.95 for 2. But I think I will actually order this baby again!\n7. Fried Bananas and ice cream - Actually it didn't come together, they charged us separately for it.... Come on now!! \n\nAll in all, we spent $160 total, with 2 beers and 1 wine. Glad we went sampling, but now I know what I will and will not order next time.\n\nSuggest making reservations, we had about 10 people ahead of us, standing in line before it opened, they have some funky hours. Lady said it would be an hour wait, but it was less than 30. mins. Glad we waited.", "We had very high expectations of this restaurant based on the various reviews we read. We love Thai food and eat it every chance we get. However, this wasn't a great experience. First, the restaurant is located in one of the nastiest parts of Las Vegas. One typically doesn't expect to enter the ghetto to go to a 5-star restaurant. We were very uncomfortable driving through this area and even walking from the parking lot to the restaurant. Second, we had a mixed food experience. I tried a traditional Thai dish that was quite good...4 1/2 stars for that dish. My wife decided to try one of the Northern Thai specialties, which turned out to be very poor and gets a 1 star. Finally, the service was okay but not great. Overall, we might try it again based on the tasty dish I had, but we certainly aren't rushing back.", "We're back for some crispy duck panang!!! They raised the price since the last time. One small portion of the dish now cost 27.95. We called in our order for pick up knowing how long the wait is and how crowded it gets. The staff on the phone was nice enough to inform me about the price and portion. (Thank you!) I was told to come in 40mins. \n\nWe also ordered their pineapple fried rice ($11.95). Rice was soft and fluffy with delicate sweetness and it was really tasty. One of the best I've had. We wanted to order another dish so I went full on review reading mode on Yelp and settled for their chicken khoa soi ($10.95). It's thin yellow noodle and you doused them in this spicy, sweet, and out of this world semi-thick sauce/gravy. They serve it with lime, raw onion, and crispy strips of fried tortilla?!!! I dunno but it's sooooo good! They will also ask you for the level of spice. I ordered spicy and it's SPICAAAAAAAAY!!! \n\nTook a mediocre photo with bad lighting in our hotel room BUT the food was anything but.", "Went there 11/10/15 with big group. Hidden secrete!! Best food ever! 2 enthusiastic  would recommend to everyone to try! Off strip but well worth it plus don't be scared by dumpy outside look, inside its classy and welcoming! Service is fantastic & helpful. Will alway dine there when in the area. Thank you Jeff Howell for the suggestion. You always get it right!", "Went there based on Yelp reviews\nAmbiance is ok h\nLocation is a strip mall\nPrices are high\nWe had\nVeg egg rolls - solid 3.5/5\nGarlic pepper sauce with shrimp -2.5.  \nDrunken noodles with Sea Bass - 3/5\nNoodles were very sticky almost glued together\nPapaya salad - 4/5\nFor the price not worth it\nNoodle wave in Dallas and Sala Thai in Fremont CA are way better and cheaper\nNot worth a visit in my view", "Went there for lunch with my mother - her first time at an Indian restaurant - service and food was really good.  Will definitely be back.", "Went there w/high expectations coz Anthony Bourdain recommended it. So disappointed! The Khao Soi & garlic prawns were strictly ok. My awe & respect for Tony went down a notch :( if you want to have the best Khao Soi, go to PaaDee in PDX. Even PokPok does better Khao Soi!", "What a joke! All hype no substance! Ordered drunken noodles, garlic and pepper chicken wings, nom prik ohm, and a style of hot and sour soup. We ordered to go and live about 4 miles away we went straight home and started serving. Everything was either mostly cold or luke warm. Absolutely no flavor in anything especially the dish that put this place on the map! How is it possible that chili paste has no flavor? I've eaten Thai food all over town and this is by far the worst of the bunch. I'll usually order a combination of American Thai as well as \" authentic.\" I just happened to be in area to eat at Cornish pasty co, they were closed and thought next best option would be to try the famous a Lotus of Siam. Big mistake! I've had more flavorful food from 24 hr Thai delivery. The portions are small, and overpriced. TRUST ME! Do not waste your time or money, you can probably pick any other Thai restaurant in town and have better food. By the way as I'm writing this my heart is pounding and I'm getting more and more thirsty. Can only mean copious amounts of MSG!", "What a nice place , amazing food ! Im giving you guys 5 star for everything\nI dont know what was salad name , but it was so great", "What can I say, this place is hyped up.  Yes, it's busy, make reservations. Yes, service was good and fast. Yes, the food was good but pricey with small portions.  Le Thai on Freemont Street, with it's small menu, is by far better that Lotus of Siam.", "What more can I add to all the reviews on Lotus? Well, it's not in the best neighborhood and there is a good chance someone will hit you up for change or to watch your car in the parking lot.  Somehow that all adds to the odd charm that is Lotus. \n\nFor first timers you might think what am I doing here and what is all the fuss about?  Well, the food is unique and there are so many tasty options.  \n\nAll I can say if your staying on the strip take an Uber or Lyft over and back, it's worth the trip.", "When we visit Vegas, we make a point to eat here.  I must say our recent dining experience was very disappointing.   We started with papaya salad which was a little too sweet.  The garlic prawns was very greasy, Pad Thai and yellow curry were meh.  Also, the portions are very small compared to our previous visits.  We will be taking a break from coming here.", "With over 2,000 reviews, I am not sure that there is much that I can add.  But I do want to make one suggestion to Yelpers:  Please, please, PLEASE look at the Northern Thai section of the menu.  While the rest of the menu is very, very good (especially loved the Garlic Prawns and Sea Bass on Drunken noodles), the Northern Thai section offers dishes that you won't find at most Thai restaurants.  We had two standouts, both based on recommendations of our very attentive waiter.\n\nThe first was Kang Ka Noon, which is jackfruit in a spicy curry sauce.  An article on NPR says that these are the largest tree fruit in the world, reaching up to 100 lbs each, and high in protein, potassium, and vitamin B2 (and yes, they are quite an interesting looking fruit).  However, when it is cut up and put into a dish, the jackfruit has the consistency of an artichoke heart.  Smooth, creamy and delicious.  And the curry sauce adds the perfect spice to balance the simple sweetness of the fruit.\n\nThe second dish was Khao Soi, a curried, egg noodle dish (with Burmese flavor influences) that we had with chicken.  Much like Pho has its salad accompaniment, so does Khao Soi:  onions, mustard greens, and lime.  Oh my goodness was this dish fantastic.  It was clearly the hit of the night.\n\nSo if you are an adventurous foodie (and you likely are if you are reading reviews in Yelp), step away from the traditional and go right for the Northern part of the menu.  You will not be sorry.", "Yes, this place is in the ghetto. While on the parking lot I had a homeless man on a bicycle knock on my car window to ask me for money, but...who cares! This is simply the best food you will have. Once inside, the restaurant is nice enough, good wine selection to pair with the most delicious dishes. Every time I have been there, there's famous people eating dinner.\n\nPros: The best thai food second to none , cheap prices.\n\nCons: make a reservation in advance, hopefully days in advance because the place is small and it is always packed. You may get mugged on the parking lot, what a shame that such a spectacular place has such poor location.", "a good thai restaurant. but definitely not more than an hour wait long kind of good. plenty of empty tables but would seat us or anyone for over an hour. what is the real hype?", "been Eating here For years Very good Pizza. If Your looking for Cheap Not fresh ingredients. go to Pappa Johns or one of those places .... NYC pizza", "great food, location is not great", "this place is hit or miss.  when it hits, it's the best Thai food in the country.  when it misses, you just waited 2 hours for something you could have gotten in any town in the country.  still good, but not the transcendent Zagat darling.  i got the larb a few months ago and it was one of the best things i ever ate.  i got it again a couple months later, totally different dish and only good.  the Reislings by the glass are a perfect pairing for the spicy, sality goodness it offers.  if you've never been here, then do so, be brave MAKE A RESERVATION, but have a realistic expectation.  it might completely blow your mind, but it might also be so so.  never bad, but worth the gamble because it's reasonably priced."]
[2016, "seaons3"]	["A solid 3.5 stars for the food and 4/5 for service. \n\nFrom the Outside this place looks super ghetto, sketchy and dead. But inside is a nice casual ambience with two sides of a dining room. \n\nI definitely think this place is overhyped, although It is better than other Thai places in Vegas. We ordered a grip load of food between the 4 of us. \n\nRaw shrimp- 5/5. Best raw shrimp compared to my area in Orange County . The chili sauce and house made satay chili oil together was a mouth orgasm. Yum. \n\nSeafood Tom Yum- 3.5/5 I think I like my soup more with a spicier and tangy kick to it. This soup was just okay to me. \n\nGarlic Prawn Shrimp- 3.5/5 it's good, don't get me wrong. It's got a good taste and nice crisp to it. But it's nothing mind blowing because I've had something similar to it before. \n\nSpicy Spaghetti- 3.0/5 not what I imagined .. I thought it was going to have tomato/marinara sauce but it was some spicy chili sauce. \n\nKao Soi- 4.5-5 crispy duck curry with egg noodle was great. The curry was too much coconut for my taste but that's only because I'm sensitive to coconut, otherwise this is a great noodle dish! \n\nBeef jerky- 4.5/5 such a random pick my friend ordered but it's a solid appetizer just to pick at. It's surprisingly good and addicting!\n\nWe had other items but not worth mentioning. Overall... I probably wouldn't make a visit if I was in Vegas again.", "All the food here is good. But do I think its the best thai food I have ever eaten? No. Overrated.", "Amazing Thai food, recognized by a lot of famous people. \nLotus of Siam made the best pad thai I've had my entire life. The flavors were incredible, and the noodles were perfect. I can't go back to another Thai restaurant and expect the same from them anymore. \nThe only thing is, they do get very busy (because they're well known), but trust me. IT IS SO WORTH THE WAIT!!\nYou know I'll be coming back. It's a shame how far I live from them!", "Amazing amazing amazing. Huge wine selection. Just pick anything and you won't be disappointed. :-)", "Amazing food! Best Thai teas in the area!  Worth the wait.  Line out the door when they open for dinner.  Service is good as well.", "Been here many times, great food, line is long, plan to come here from LA to celebrate my wife BD with 14 friends, called last week to make reservation for Saturday,  they will not accept reservation for Saturday night. We agreed for Sunday night instead, they required minimum,we agreed, they said will send us an email to fill out information require to deposit, been waiting and calling, as of today get no email from them.\nWe called another Thai Restaurant on the same street, beautifully set it up for us for Saturday and they also have a pastries chef to do a beautiful cake for my wife and this venue is so clean and beautiful.\nIf you happen to have the same situation look around and you will find this restaurant and try out ,you will love the place, the pastries, the food and the most important thing is their services.\nAdios Lotus of Siam.", "Every one said that this is the best Thai food in Vegas. Even a guy sitting next to me when We were eating pho at somewhere else. Indeed, this is the best Thai food as for as I know, not only in Vegas. Recommend crispy duck, squid salad and pineapple fire rice.", "Food was really good. Location is a bit sketchy but well worth it. Reservations are recommended.", "Great spices, good staff", "I have a painful experience I would like to share but first, let me get my order out of the way. I had ordered the red curry and the nam prik ong. It was quite well actually. For my birthday, I'd thought to treat my family to a place I've heard extensive publicity about. All of the reviews and pictures seemed to give it proper accolades so it was a must to eat there. We only waited 15 minutes, they sat us down, and we looked through the menu. We ordered our dinner, talked amongst each other about what we did during the day, and we waited. Once the food was out, the aroma made us happy and we began to eat. I thought the nam prik ong was supposed to arrive first like how I asked but I can eat it after my red curry. We ate slowly and still talked amongst each other. It was going well until we seen the servers standing by us, asking if we were done with our meals. Obviously if you stop eating to chat, the assumption of you being done seems questionable. But these welcoming men turned into vultures, constantly asking if we were finished. Their smiling demeanor turned into angst that made everyone uncomfortable. I took my time to finish my meal while they where practically begging us to ask for the check. I finished my red curry but I was still waiting for my nam prik ong. The server who took my order asked if he could clean the table while I surfed the web for places to go after. He asked politely if I can scoot over so they could rearrange the tables too. My family is waiting outside and I'm waiting for my other half that I ordered. I finally ask the man about it and he seemed hazed as if I was the one who decided to order at that very last minute. He even insisted on pulling out my chair so I could leave but I told him directly again about my order. I can see the sweat on his forehead as he wrote it down again. While I waited again, I can see everyone else was having a different experience. I saw the beautiful menu throughout the restaurant from what people had ordered. And I saw the money hungry people who run the place. I never want to feel like there's a price on my head again. I never ever want the servers to make it obvious that they're \"losing money\" because of our warmth as a family to chat amongst each other. I ate the red chili dip and left. My question is, how much did they pay you Anthony Bourdain and Action Bronson? How much did they pay you to say those kind words? That this is one of the greatest places to eat in Las Vegas. I hate this place. I will never eat there again.", "I'm not a fan of the area, first of all but I had heard really good things about this place so I tried it. It was good. Busy with average service. I found most of the food pretty good (4 stars) but the higher price and smaller portions make this only 3 stars for me. One of my favorite dishes when I eat Thai food is the Beef Salad. Although theirs was very good, it was nothing like I expected, and not what I wanted.", "I've been completely been spoiled when it comes to Thai food thanks to home cooking and spectacular places in NYC and LA. Lotus though, isn't too bad.\n\nGetting here may terrify some of you, especially at night. Like almost everything off the strip, Lotus resides in a strip mall. This one is particularly sparse and shady and is populated by folks who will solicit you for money.\n\nOnce you walk in through the doors, wow! Shiny! Especially that liquor and wine room! The walls are lined with photos of mama chef with various celebs. But, I'm here for the food, so let's have it.\n\nChicken larb, moo yang, rice and singha. I thought these would be a good indicator of the food here. The larb was good (although not spicy for a \"Medium Thai\" request). The moo yang was also good, with all the right aromas, flavors, and sauces. Did it blow me away? No. If I were in Vegas, would I come back? Yes.\n\nUntil the next.", "I've been to Vegas countless times and I can't believe I haven't eaten here! It was so bomb. \n\nI can't remember all the dishes we got, but we tried to go for the non-traditional Thai dishes. We had the soft shell crab noodle dish and a curry one and crispy shrimp. We also ordered a bamboo rice which was a bit sticky but necessary to order. \n\nThe wait can be crazy, especially on a weekend night, but we called ahead and asked if we could put our name down. She told us she wouldn't be able to take our name down over the phone but she did direct us to the website where we could join the wait list. That was the best idea ever. We stayed at our hotel for a few minutes, made our way down and by the time we got to the restaurant 20 minutes later, we were seated within a minute. Another family that had walked in right after us were quoted one hour. So that's the secret. Put yourself on the waitlist online. You'll thank me!", "If you are ever in Las Vegas, you have to try this place. We came here with 12 people and everyone enjoyed every appetizer and main course we got. The drinks were great and desserts were even better! And the best part of this was it was really cheap! When you pull into the driveway, it looks like a strip mall. But when you come inside, it's nicer than your best 5 star restaurants! Don't come to Vegas and not try this place! Make sure you ask for Adam! He made our night complete and fun!", "If you are visiting Vegas, you absolutely must experience this historic staple in our Valley. The food is fantastic and seemingly authentic. I think they can upgrade fixtures, cutlery, decor but the food more than compensates for the outdated look ;)", "Lotus of Siam is a hidden gem in LV! The plaza seems pretty empty and run down; however, the restaurant gets pretty packed. We stopped by at lunch time on a Monday, and the restaurant quickly filled up. We ordered the crispy garlic prawns, crispy duck panang curry, and drunken noodle with soft shelled crab. If you can handle spicy food, definitely tell your server a number greater than 5 for the level of spiciness. I would recommend that you come with a large party so that you can order multiple dishes and dine \"family-style.\"", "Lotus of Siam was one of the best (and affordable!) meals I had in Vegas. It was so good that it put me in a four hour food coma that left me missing all the activities on my last night in Sin City -- no regrets.\n\nI highly recommend reservations since the line was hopping before it was even open. We were lucky enough to snag a last minute reservation and got to skip the long line of hot and hungry patrons outside. The decor here is warm and homey -- like every family owned Thai restaurant you would fine in your favorite suburban strip mall in Anywhere, America. Lotus of Siam specializes in Isan food which is pretty similar to the Laotian/Cambodian food I've had in the past meaning it was extra, extra delicious!\n\nMy best friend and I shared:\n+ Garlic Prawns: The prawns are cut to look like the shell has molted off the flesh and then deep fried. Disgusting yes, but also very yummy and crunchy! As the menu said -- it's like potato chips! This hearty portion was on almost every table in the joint and for good reason too.\n+ Panang Crispy Duck: Lotus of Siam does the deep fried game very well and this duck did not disappoint. I'm usually wary of duck curries because they can be very gamey but that was not the case at all -- this was recommended to us by our server since the bbq hen was not available and ended up being one of our favorite things on the menu!\n+ Khao Soi - Burmese Egg Noodles in curry sauce. A unique dish that I have not seen on any other Thai menu near my house so we had to get this! It's super runny but totally worth the mess.\n+ Nam Kao Tod: Crispy Rice Salad very similar to a Laotian dish I'm obsessed with. It was spicy and crunchy and full of different herbs and flavors! I recommend asking for extra lettuce to scoop this up since the cabbage they gave us was quite small and do not do the job right.\n\nI would skip eggrolls or dumplings -- they are bland and not worth the space in your tummy.\n\nI'll definitely be hitting this place up the next time I'm in Vegas. Thanks Chrissy Teigen (and everybody else in the world) for the recommendation!", "My dearly departed friend Mark Maher recommended this place!  It's truly the most authentic Thai outside of Thailand I've ever had.  I will make sure to visit every time we are in Vegas.\nTry the back portion of the menu!", "Our favorite Las Vegas restaurant!  World-class Thai food. Try the Nua Sao Renu (charbroiled beef with tamarind sauce).  This is the best Thai food we've had, ever.", "Place blows me away every time..\nI love to see a cidre from Brittany amazing pairing w spicy...\nIronically, I put a review on chada street yelp saying he should get a cidre. THat was before I knew lotus had a cidre. \n\nStay northern and order things you never would otherwise and you will eat amazing food.. Expect terrible and rude service that's how u know you are in a good Thai spot. Love it!!!", "Pretty much the best Thai food in the US. Definitely go for their Northern dishes, including stuff from both the Mae Hong and Isaan regions. I never leave here dissatisfied, and the only problem is that it's so tasty that you have to book well in advance, so be forewarned!", "Quality is really good. Khoa Soi is something I would eat again for sure. Crispy Duck with drunken noodles wasn't a favorite. Want to try the garlic prawns and curry next time. \nI wish this place was more intimate but the food is really good.", "So beyond flavorful!! Ordered pad Thai, some sort of beef with lime, cilantro, and who knows what else in it but it was flavorful! Chicken satay for appetizer. Thai tea. I wish I would have taken pictures! Service was great!!", "The Nam Kao Tod completely blew us away. Absolutely worth the Uber trip to this spooky strip mall. (Hint: if you have to wait for a table, go to the Cornish Pasty Co. very nearby for some great beers.)\n\nEverything else was fantastic, especially the Crispy Garlic Prawns. The chef's specials and the northern Thai parts of the menus are the places to go for entrees.\n\nSo how amazing was the their famous Nam Kao Tod? So insanely good that we couldn't get it out of our heads, and went back three days later and each got an order of our own as an appetizer. Unforgettable.", "The food was delicious only when it was served hot. I ordered the drunken noodle with crispy duck but it was not served hot. the noodle was soggy and it looked like it was a left over from yesterday.... when complained, our server took it and brought us back a warmer food, which was much better. overall food was ok, not great enough  to rate 5 stars.", "The food was excellent. Highly recommend the drunken noodles and the garlic shrimp was superb! The wait time is around 30 minutes for party of four but we got lucky and got in 10 minutes. \nThe seafood noodle soup was okay.  I would not get it again. \nPang curry was alright but I would try the northern curries next time.", "The food was no better than something one would cook at home.  I would say average.  The wait time was not great either given the quality of the food.  It felt like a fast food Thai cantine.  The bar only offered bottled options,  there were no cocktails or anything that would require effort to pepare.", "This is a must stop for me whenever I am in Las Vegas.  The food is out of this world delicious.  The wine selection is fantastic as well. \n\nMy favorite is the panang curry with shrimp served over white rice.  The pad Thai is the best I've had in the United States or Europe.  The coconut curry soup is also fantastic and a great way to start dinner.  We tried the Thai spaghetti this time around and it was very tasty and delicious.  \n\nAside from having won a ridiculous amount of awards,  the restaurant has also picked up a few James Beards which says a great deal about this place.  I will continue to come back to this place and recommend it to anyone that is in Vegas! :)", "This is a very very good Thai restaurant even my husband who says he doesn't like Thai food  said the food was delicious I go to Vegas once a month and have been wanting to try this place for years and finally got everybody in the car and just took them without asking where you guys want to go it was really good everything we ordered and the wonton soup was delicious. The food critics were right for once this is a great place prices are decent and fair very good food the only complaint I have is it is in an ugly part of town in a weird mall with a giant parking lot in the middle. The neighborhood is bad the cops were driving through the parking lot when we arrived and also when we exited an hour later they just must tour it every hour on the hour so if the cops are always there maybe it's not that unsafe for tourists anyways", "This is the best Thai food I've ever had. Highly highly recommend their soft shell crab drunken noodles and crispy duck panang. Came to Vegas for the weekend from California, and I'm so so grateful my boyfriend was adamant about trying this place.", "Thoroughly enjoyed my meal here, in fact I was here twice in a 24 hour period. All the dishes were fantastic-and to think that Thai food couldn't get any better!Customer service can be a bit more accommodating but the food well makes up for it. The interior really didn't match with the exterior and that was a surprise (you'll know what I mean). My recommendations: Pad Thai, Garlic Fried Shrimp, and the Crispy duck in Panang curry! Everything was so incredibly flavorful and mouthwatering. Expect to spend at least $50 for a party of two! I'd prefer this over a typical Vegas buffet ANYDAY!", "WOW WOW WOW All I can say is wow. I've had authentic Thai food before in Thailand but to be honest, this kicks it right of the the waters. If you read a lot of reviews you know about their Garlic Prawns. ORDER TWO PLATES! Especially if you are sharing with others because this will go out fast! Another favorite is the Peking Duck curry. More of Duck in curry sauce than curry but this dish gave me heart eyes. Skip out on the basic dishes such as pad see ew because you can get that anywhere. Also the walls of celebrities made me feel like this was a definite good choice.", "We went on a Friday night around 8:30 PM local time. Yes, it was packed due to the rave and popularity of this place. They need to give a big thanks to Anthony Bourdain for it!! Any ways, we got there and with no reservations they told us at least an hour and half wait. You give them your phone number and they text you when you table is ready. We decided to go out and stop by the convenience store to pick up items we needed and with a surprise we got texted within about 30 minutes. I am giving this place a 5 because food was very good and I have been Bangkok before and food is comparable to it. Just as good or even better than some places in Thailand. Service was also wonderful, you don't expect much service at Asian restaurants but this was an exception. Probably first Asian restaurant I have been too where they had a host/hostess, bus boy, and waiter/waitress. I would love to come back again just to try other items.\n\nFood - 5/5   Very delicious and comparable to Thai food in Thailand. We had the crispy duck with Panang. Duck was extra crispy and that curry sauce was to die for!!! Also, had the Drunken noodle with Sea Bass. This was exceptional as well but I thought kind of pricey. Didn't get as much of the fish I was expecting. I wanted to the try the Garlic shrimp that everybody raves about here but since we only had two people we didn't order it. Maybe next time.\n\nService - 5/5   Best service I had in an Asian restaurant.  \n\nTip - Make sure you make a reservation if you go on a weekend or else you will be waiting for a long time especially if you have more than two people.", "Worth the hour wait. You will not be disappointed. Everything tasted phenomenal! The one tiny draw back is that it doesn't have a full bar.", "his place is amazing! I was introduced to Lotus of Siam while viewing the Anthony Bourdain show \"Parts Unknown.\" Coincidentally my wife and I were traveling to Las Vegas just a few weeks after viewing the episode. Anthony's recommendations are alway on point, so we decided to eat at the restaurant during our visit. We were not disappointed, the food is excellent! They have a extensive menu and wine list. My wife went with the tradition Thai meal, and ordered from the Northern Thai menu. Either way you can't go wrong. The servers work diligently and are extremely knowledgeable when it pertains to the entree recommendations based on the customer's preferences. The restaurant is modest in size, and possesses a really nice ambience. Make your reservations the day before you plan on dining, the don't do same day RSVPs."]
[2016, "season1"]	["-Food was as good as any other Thai Restaurant I have been to. \n-The service was terrible! \n-The location isn't ideal - make sure to park close to the restaurant. Saw some pretty interesting people looking into car windows. \n\nIn conclusion, I personally don't think it's worth the time and money.", "= Overall Food Quality: 3.0/5.0 =-\n\nI stopped by here on the way back to Los Angeles with my SO. We ordered the Garlic Prawns and a Beef Panang.\n\nGarlic Prawns: This dish was very expensive and though tasty it was not worth it by any means, essentially it's just prawns unshelled seasoned with some salt and garlic and deep fried.\n\nBeef Panang: I thought the panang curry was alright, but the beef was extremely tough and difficult to chew.\n\n-= Atmosphere: 3.0/5.0 =-\n\nNot that special, it's a pretty simple restaurant within a strip mall. Lotus of Siam does seem to have a very extensive wine and alcohol collection though if you like alcohol with your thai food.\n\n-= Service: 4.5/5.0 =-\n\nService was very good, I never needed to ask to refill my water and the server was very nice about me asking him questions about the food.\n\n-= Price: 4.0/5.0 =-\n\nThe overall price of the food was decent but some dishes such as the Garlic Prawns we ordered was overpriced.\n\n-= Overall: 3.5/5.0 =-\n\nOverall, nothing really that special, definitely not deserving of four stars and 2000+ reviews on yelp. \n\nIf you are ever in Los Angeles, CA, go to Pasadena and try President Thai, they have very similar food to Lotus of Siam, but the food is way better and cheaper too.\n\nHeck I can probably name Thai 5 restaurants in Los Angeles that is better than this.", "A friend suggested this place when I was out here in Vegas. OF course when I first heard of it I was excited but skeptical due to the wait time and hoping it is not just a hype place. I arrived around 545pm on a Sunday night and people were already seated enjoying their food. The hostess told me the wait time was 2 hours. oh boy, theres always tat decision to whether find something else or to wait. We decided to put our name down and the hostess told us there is a waiting room in the back. They also have the app where we enter our phone numbers and they would let us know when the table is ready. We also were able to see the wait time on the website thats linked to their app. GENUIS ! The waiting room definitely made waiting more bearable. About 3 hours later we finally got our table. We already decided on which dishes we were going to order. \n\nGarlic Pawns: of course were a must ! This came in about 6/8 pieces and the whole shrimp including the shrimp was edible, just make sure you chew slowly. \n\nCrispy Duck ( Khao Soi): I have never had this before at a thai restaurant but it was so good! Definitely need to eat this with rice. The dish was full of flavors and it all complimented well with one another. \n\nTom Kah Kai:(hot pot for the bigger portion) I love Thai soup! this had coconut base to it and it was so delicious. the cream of the coconut balanced the sourness of the soup. highly recommend ordering this soup dish. \n\nThai fried rice: this one was okay,  I wish I chose a more exciting fried rice. \n\nThai Spagettii: We had a party of 6 so we each had to get a little bit to try. The noodles were cooked to al dente and the flavors of the sauce was gentle and not overly powered by it. \n\nFried stuff chicken: this was an interesting dish. It was stuffed with mushrooms/ chicken/ and veggies. The sauce it came with was what topped off the dish. \n\nNam Kao Tod: This is the duck curry.. let me tell ya ...I wish they had a bucket of the curry ! The dish came with some noodles but of course wishing they added more. The curry sauce was so good over rice. This dish was not overpowered by the curry and the duck was good perfectly so where it was soft. The curry flavor was infused in to the duck pieces. \n\nHad a little room for dessert so we opted for the Fried Banana with coconut ice cream. The banana was fried in what seem like the skin of an egg roll and topped with some cold creamy coconut ice cream! The temperature of the banana was perfect to add the ice cream on top. perfect crunch/ sweetness / and goodness. \n\nHighly recommend if you can make reservations to this place! \nBE patient during wait time because I can tell you it is WORTH IT if you love thai food.", "Always great food.  Wait was long, especially on a Thursday night, but the food was great.", "Amazing food, period.\nWe ordered nine dishes for four of us. Got amazing services with relatively cheap price.", "An absolutely great restaurant. I have eaten here for years and it has always been a Vegas classic! The service and food are always excellent, and I would highly recommend it to anyone in search of fine Asian dining!", "An amazing selection of great food.   Come hungry with a decent size group (4 minimum) so you can partake of a large variety of shared dishes.", "Average food; poor service. \n\nOur experience fell very short of our expectations. We kept hearing people talk about this place, they must not know what a great Thai food is! \n\nWe met our friends at the bar upon arriving. The restaurant was packed in the waiting area which was very very small. Our friends were waiting at the bar so we joined them. The bartender lady handed the menu and the entire time we were there (a good 20minutes) never turned around and asked for our drink orders. Poor first impression!\n\nWe ordered a bunch of food to share on the table. I am a big seafood person and prior to going in, I checked Yelp for the \"must order\" items. I ordered the garlic prawns that everyone is raving about. It was average, nothing amazing. Honestly, I still prefer and love Pho Kim Long's salt and pepper shrimp! More flavorful and half the price!  \n\nWe paid our bill and was finishing our drinks. The server kept coming back and asking if we needed anything else and we said no. Not long after, the lady bartender who ignored us at the bar came to our table and asked us if it's ok if we leave cause people are waiting for our table. Really??? We work in the service industry here in Vegas for a long time. Never ever have I experienced being asked to leave! This place is over rated, will never come back again! There are a lot of other Thai restaurant that are  way better in taste and service!", "Awesome food - small portions.  I had to buy 2 of everything in order to feed my family of 4.", "Awesome place, loads of great food must try.", "BEST THAI FOOD IN LAS VEGAS! This place is seriously amazing. It's off the beaten path in a pretty suspicious plaza. This place is always busy, we got there ten minutes before they opened on a Sunday for dinner and there was at least twenty people in line. It's totally worth any wait though.\nThey have an impressive wine selection (a lot of rieslings) and everything on their menu is great. I always go with the Pineapple fried rice, spice level 8. It's so flavorful and the pineapple adds the appropriate amount of sweetness to offset the spiciness. A great appetizer is the crispy rice or the garlic wings. Seriously, you need to get the wings. The fried garlic is mouthwatering and the wings are so crispy.\nIt's totally worth the trek over, if you're in Las Vegas and don't eat here you're making a mistake.", "BEWARE  of CC FRAUD !!! My bill was $85 I tipped 16 on top of that. I was looking at my credit card bill I was charged $121. There is no way I left a 36 dollar tip. I still of a copy of my receipt from the restaurant.  So now I have to deal with calling the credit card companies to deal with this and waste my time. This place is so busy so please watch your statement because they will take your money away.  I emailed the restaurant I still have not gotten a response, it's been over a week.", "Baja Transmission is the most professional, Timely and Honest for your Automotive Transmission Needs.. Thanks george, Cars Stars & Guitars", "Been coming here for more than a decade and have always been pleased.  This isn't like all the corner cafe pad thai joints you see everywhere.  They have a much wider range of Thai dishes than you see in most places so you get to try something a little out of the ordinary.  Good variety of wines, the service has always been on point when I've come and the food never disappoints.  The quality is much better than most Asian places on the Strip and is a much better value than anything comparable would be inside a hotel.  \n\nPeople are serious about needing to get there early because it fills up quickly.  Not uncommon to have a few dozen people waiting outside before the doors open.", "Best Thai I've had outside of Thailand.  Highlights of the evening include Garlic Prawns & Crispy Duck in Red Curry (spicy alert).", "Best Thai food I've had in Vegas, went with my work family, part of which are Thai (made it a lot easier to order!) I loved everything. Not to mentions the WINE ROOM is beautiful!", "Best Thai food I've had in a long time. Get the crispy duck!!!", "Best Thai food in the Western Hemisphere. It is smaller than you might imagine and in a shady looking strip mall but the food makes up for it.\n\nHere's my tip-\nThe chef is from Northern Thailand and special items from that area are indicated on the menu. Select some of those dishes. I prefer the Northern Larb for example over the standard larb.\n\nBe adventurous and stay away from chicken satay, pad thai and penang beef. You can get that anywhere.\n\nOh, reservations are recommended but if it's a weeknight and early, head over and get on the list. They have a wine bar in the back that where you can wait. Wine selection is quite nice too! Lots of German varieties.", "Best Thai in the world !!! #14 Nam Kao Tod don't ask just order it quite possibly the best most flavorful unique dish in LV. The Garlic Prawns are beyond amazing and the simple cashew nut chicken was spot on . The Papaya salad is off the chain but Holy Heatwave Batman the spice is white hot (which I like but buyer beware) If you normally get a #7 or 8 spice get the 3 or 4 and you will be golden . I am a wine gal and I must say without a doubt the best wine list in all of Las Vegas including the strip. And the pricing is way way low . I would say more but I have a nail appointment !! TTFN ... Love ya Lotus .", "Best Thai is LV! Authentic dishes, highly recommend anything on the menu.", "Bomb Thai food! No mango sticky rice (my cousin wanted). \nLuckily they made a reservation! Line out the door! \nFood was delicious!", "Come before they open they said. If you don't, you'll have to wait for two hours they said. My curiosity was peaked. What can make this place so good that people are willing to wait?\n\nThe restaurant has a small entry way where you check in and I was dreading being cramped in such a tight space for TWO hours. Luckily, they do have a large banquet style waiting room behind the bar area. Phew. We were quoted two hours but we waited closer to 3 hours. I was doing my best to control the hangry monster within. \n\nTWO MUST HAVES: Crispy Duck Khao Soi ($26.95) and Garlic Prawns ($27.95). Oh my lordy. The recommendations were on point. I favored the garlic prawns slightly more. Fried to perfection. You could eat the entire prawn -- even the tail! I came close to tossing them, but so glad my friend caught me before I did. Close call. Trust me, you'll want to savor every bite. And the duck... It's packed with flavor. My boyfriend's favorite dish. You must get them both. \n\nRECOMMENDATIONS...\n\nNam Kao Tod ($8.95): This was a crispy rice dish appetizer. It sounds plain, but don't be fooled. Every bite you'll get the taste of lime, chili, cilantro, seasoning, and the texture of rice that's crispy yet chewy. How they do it I do not know. Fry masters are working in the kitchen.\n\nThai Spaghetti ($11.95): It's the sauce and noodles that will win you over. It had that slightly sweet flavor, similar to pad thai. The noodles were served al dente, which was perfect. It had that chew texture that I absolutely love for noodles. \n\nBanana Roll ($8.50): Highly recommended with coconut ice cream (additional $4). I'm not the biggest coconut fan, but loved their ice cream. I need to know where they get it! The banana roll portion was generous even for a party of 6 like ours. Banana lovers will not be disappointed. \n\nWe got a few other dishes, including their Thai Fried Rice with Chicken ($10.95), Tom Kah Kai Hot Pot Soup ($14.95), and Stuffed Chicken Wings ($11.95). They were all good, but the dishes I mentioned above were noteworthy! \n\nStopping at Lotus of Siam will truly be a treat for your tastebuds. Food is AMAZING. It has officially made it to my #1 spot for Thai food. Service was fast and efficient from the moment you're sat. Prices are steep, but they really know how to cook up amazing food. Best way to go about it is family style so you can sample a little of everything. \n\nReservations are taken but should be made AT LEAST a week in advance. A couple in front of us had reservations and got seated immediately. Note taken. The wait was worth it, but I can't see myself doing it again. BE SMART AND MAKE A RESERVATION!!", "Crispy duck Khao Soi and the garlic prawns. AMAZING! Don't forget dessert!! Coconut ice cream served over warm sticky rice. You won't want to share. Do yourself a favor and come here. \n\nYou will need to make reservations a couple days in advance if you can't stand to wait 30 mins to 2 hours depending on the night. My boyfriend and I waited. It was worth it.\n\nI'm giving 4 stars based on my boyfriends dish. He got the beef panang. It was good but not 5 stars good. I like to save my 5 star reviews for places that leave me dreaming about the next time I will get to eat there.", "Crispy duck panang is my favorite dish. The braised short rib is a close second. Anthony Bourdain got it right when he mentioned this place in not just 1 but 2 episodes. Just have to make sure to avoid the rush... this place is well known and very popular.", "Delicious food.  A friend said it is the best Thai he has ever eaten in the USA, and it is definitely up there.  The only thing I disagree with is the $$ rating.  It may be that we ordered expensive dishes, but it was $150 for four of us for lunch.  But if you are a foodie, you'll love it.", "Delicious!!! Wait wasn't too long. Looks like they try to turn tables over pretty quickly without rushing people. Had the som tom and haven't had any that good since I was in Thailand!! It was great and actually spicy:) definitely will come back next time I'm in Vegas.", "Doesnt have an authentic Thai flavor to it. Seems like they dont take a lot of time making a \"Great\" Thai dish. More of a bottom of the barrel 2 star just serve them quickly type of thai restaurant.", "During a business trip in Vegas one of our friends highly recommended this place. It was a 15 minutes cab ride from the strip. Looks nothing from the outside and humble inside. We waited for almost an hour on a Thur evening. 7 of us ordered at least 10 items. Each dish was pure perfection. Outstanding food.", "Easily the best Thai food I've had since I went to Thailand. It will be I my \"must@ list every time I come to Vegas from now on.", "Excellent local jewel close to the heart of Las Vegas. The size of the line outside the doors before opening time is an indicator to the quality of the food inside. By far the best massaman  curry I've had in the states and I highly recommend it. The Panang curry is wonderful as well but watch the spice level as the heat intensity is high on that dish. Again, an excellent choice for authentic Thai cuisine.", "Fantastic food.  Neighborhood iffy then you walk into the restaurant and its beautiful and big and busy.", "Food is good but service and ambience were subpar. I  guess they are operating on star power. I came because I saw them on TV as one of the best Thai restaurants in Vegas. I  wasn't disappointed in the food though.", "Food was absolutely delicious! My friends and I ordered different dishes from curry to pad Thai to the absolutely amazing garlic prawns which were most definitely my favorite! We also ordered some appetizers, the stuffed chicken wings were awesome, they were perfectly cooked and the chicken was so juicy and full of flavor! We also had Nam Kao Tod which was mouth watering and SO amazing my second favorite dish aside from the garlic prawns! We definitely cleaned our plates that night! Sorry I couldn't add the stuffed chicken wings or the Nam Kao Tod they were so good I forgot I take a picture! But If you're in Vegas you have to stop in and try Lotus of Siam out! You will not regret it! I can't wait to plan my next visit to Vegas and this will always be one of my stops when I'm in town!", "From the outside this place looks like a hole in the wall, but this is the best Thai food in Vegas hands down. Try the wonton soup.", "Get lucky and wait 40+ min. or befriend a Local with the right connections if you want to be fed. \n\nFor a non-local, I've had the luxury of being a semi-frequent patron of Lotus of Siam. I mean, there's a reason why the wait is notoriously long - I've heard that it's nearly impossible to score a reservation in advance. All of the food I've sampled has been pretty much on point. \n\nThe Nam Kao Tod is my absolute favorite appetizer. Now either I've been under a rock for most of my life or that my Thai food palate is extremely minuscule, the latter may be a bit of a stretch considering I am Thai by blood (not a surprise though), but this is the first time I've encountered that dish. To me, it's the perfect marriage of unique flavors that Thai cuisine is notorious for. I MUST know how they fry the rice to get it to be so crunchy. It's amazing! Don't even get me started on the pork which has a similar taste to the Vietnamese appetizer called Nem Nuong. The perfect amount of lime is added to this dish which helps make it unforgettable. This is a must-try...unless you don't eat pork then I suggest asking for the pork to be served on the side. Get it - you're welcome.\n\nI'd say that the only dish that I have ever been disappointed with was their pineapple fried rice. Go figure right? I mean, how can you mess up fried rice? Well, I shouldn't say mess up... I guess you can say that I was taken aback by the strong, Indian curry flavor which masked the entire dish. Like I said earlier, I've had my fair share of pineapple fried rice due to my previous experience with working at a Thai restaurant and being Thai so I have a pretty good sense of what to expect. It may be dependent upon individual tastes, but I personally think that the strong curry flavor really throws off the flavoring of the dish. I mean, it was so strong that I couldn't even finish my dish and I didn't even bother eating my leftovers (and I'm the leftovers Queen). Would I order this dish again? No, there are many other dishes to choose from, and if you are going to order this, be prepared for its' strong taste of curry.", "Great curries, short rib was tender, duck was great, fantastic coconut ice cream afterwards", "Great food and staff.  And great prices.  A definite stop if you ever get to Vegas.", "Great food- service ok- overall enjoyed!", "Great garlic prawns and fried duck in curry sauce. A bit pricey with a automatic 18 percent service charge.", "Great menu! There is so much variety here! Came in before 12 noon on a Thursday and had no problem sitting down with a party of 6. Wonderful dining experience.", "Great place for Thai food!\n\n4 stars - Panang curry with fried tofu. This dish also had slices of red bell pepper and onion. Panang curry flavor with some coconut milk for the richness. I wish there was more curry in it though, it would have given the dish more depth. \n\n4 stars - Drunken noodles with seafood. The noodles and the sauce were very tasty. They seafood included shrimp, squid, mussels, and imitation crab. \n\n5 stars - Thai tea really hit the spot! It was authentic tasting, had a nice sweetness, and was classically given to me in a glass where the tea was separated from the milk at the top of the glass. Mix it with a straw and have a sip! I wish there was crushed ice instead of cubed, that's just how I was raised on Thai tea, but small detail, so still a five in my book. \n\nGreat Thai food at this restaurant, that tastes home cooked. Who could turn that down?", "Great place! We ordered the Tom Yum soup with shrimp, pad thai with shrimp, basil chicken and it was all very good! Dessert was fried banana, coconut ice cream. Everything was great including the service.", "Great place, great food. It is world famous people came here, television networks came here, I gave it a 4 only because, with a group they split the check in 2 per check, no individual, the lunch portions are too small. I'm 130 pounds and can eat 2 plates. People are telling me come back for dinner. Everything else is great", "Hands down the best Thai Food I ever eat !!!! The Garlic Shrimp is fried to perfection . You can eat the whole shrimp . Yummm ! Probably my favorite dish . The curry duck was so delicious ! Nam Kao Tod was interesting at first because I never tried anything like it. After couple bites , it was addicting . Chinese Broccoli was good and flavorful.  Thai Tea was good . Overall , the food and service was excellent. Can't wait to try more of their dishes !!!!", "Holy moly. Everything here is amazing. We had a dry German Riesling that was to do for. The Larb was fantastic. I need the recipe to get my own ground beef to taste that flavorful and amazing. The pork fried rice, drunken sea bass, green curry with chicken, garlic prawns... AMAZING. Definitely recommend coming here.", "How can I put this frankly --- it's only the best Thai food I ever tasted in U.S..  Believe me, I had plenty of Thai food in NorCal, SoCal and NY.  \n\nUpon checking out all the Yelp reviews, we decided that we need to get the best three dishes.  Between the two of us, we could only stuff ourselves so much.  LOL.   The three winners were (and they truly were!) the garlic shrimp, crispy duck kang soi and soft shell crab drunken noodles.\n\nDid we make the best choice!  The magnificently jumbo prawns were delicious.  I couldn't decide if I like the shrimp itself more or the fried shrimp shell!   Yes, you can and should and need to eat the shell entirely which is fried separately from the shrimp meat.  That was my fave of the three incredible dishes.\n\nThe drunken noodles with the soft shell crab were delightfully cooked.  The crab is fresh and lightly battered.  The noodles are moist but not oily.  We can eat pretty darn spicy but decided to go with only 6/10 and it was perfect.  It was a bit spicy in the mouth without taking out the true flavor of the dish.\n\nThe last but certainly not the least dish was the duck kang soi.  The noodles below the crispy duck were soaked with the fat of the duck and the creamy yet light broth.  There were fried noodles on the side.  The combo of the three (duck, broth and noodles) gave it a nice complexity.\n\nThe prices are a bit steep and the total came out to be about $86.  But when you think about it, it is a very fair price to pay for the best Thai food I had in U.S.!", "I ate here with six other people, and we all split our plates with each other. We had a couple of curry dishes (wonderful) the crispy garlic shrimp (amazing), and the drunken shrimp (I think, it was right next to the garlic shrimp on the menu). We all loved the food and had a great meal. I'd recommend going with a big group so that you can try a lot of things on the menu.", "I came here with my family and the dishes are quite good for an Asian restaurant in the States.  They have good interior design - it's much better inside than the outside so don't get discouraged when you stand outside the restaurant!", "I came here with my team on the last night of our conference. Those who have been here were raving about the place so I was pretty excited to finally eat here. It really did not disappoint. Every single dish we ordered was good. \nWe had a party of 9 so we were able to sample a number of dishes. We ordered Nam Kao Tod - spicy crispy rice dish - definitely recommend this!\nTom Kah Khai - Chicken soup with coconut milk - I usually don't like this dish but I like the way they make it. \nChicken larb - ground chicken dish\nPad Kee Mao - stir fried \"drunken\" noodles\nChili fried rice\nGarlic prawn - shell-on deep fried shrimp\nCrispy duck with Penang curry\nBeef with string beans - can't remember the exact name of the dish\nI liked every single item we ordered and will definitely try to make a trip there again when I go to Vegas. The only thing was - I feel like their portion is considerably smaller than other Thai restaurants. But the taste and quality definitely makes up for it. Reservations recommended for big groups. If you are travelling to Vegas for work, this offers more bang for the buck than eating on the strip.", "I can't vouch for authenticity because my experience with Thai food is admittedly fairly limited, but it's simply delicious.  One of my favorite places to eat.", "I definitely would give this place a five star. Wait staff is attentive and the food was delicious. Hands down the best Thai food I've had ever! We waited an hour to eat but we were seated at the bar while we waited for a table. Great spot to converse and drink wine and beer. \n\nThe food did not fall short of expectations, it actually surpassed it. The atmosphere was very appealing. From the outside it looks like a hole in the wall, but it was actually very roomy and the decor was beautiful. Not to mention all the pictures of celebrities in their restaurant.\n\nI would definitely recommend their crispy duck Panang curry and soft shell crab drunken noodles. You cannot go wrong with these dishes. It's very appealing to the taste buds, I never knew duck could taste so good!!! \n\nI look forward to becoming a regular here!", "I don't understand where all the 4 to 5 stars are basing their taste buds on. When I first walked in, I could smell the musky coach roach scent in the air. I have the nose of a K9. Then the man who showed me to the table was rude. Maybe because I am also Asian and he thought I not worthy. He showed me the table and stopped me in mid stride as I was walking to it so that he could walk there first. Utterly ridiculous. \n\nI always ordered my Pad Thai with less sweet because most places dump a bucket load of sugar into this dish. No exception here. I specifically asked for less sugar but it came out a lot sweeter than I had asked. I just don't get it. Most other dishes I ordered are too sweet for my preference.\n\nWhen we were done and the waiter was not around, I went up to the cashier to pay. The young cashier girl told me to go back because apparently only the waiter could give me my check. House rules? Are they trying to run it like a 5 stars restaurant when the  smell of roaches waft in the air and foods are subpar at best? To add insult to injury, they tagged on 18% gratuity. Gratuity should never be mandatory. If they want to make it mandatory at the very least, treat their customers better. Needless to say, this is my first and last visit. If there's a zero star or less, I would give it that.\n\nI'm from LA where even the mid tier Thai restaurants are head and shoulders above this place. Pass this place if you're thinking of Thai food. You deserve better foods and better service.", "I had my doubts about this place seeing that it was a rundown strip mall. The location is a little bit on the shady side. Not exactly a place I would walk around alone at night time; however, we went for lunch so I was safe side. My friends had been talking about it for months on how amazing this place is but as a California resident I never come out as often as I'd like. I finally got to try it the other day, and all I can say is that this place is just RIDICULOUSLY AMAZING!!! \n\nWe had drunk noodles with Chilean Sea Bass, soft crab, crispy duck with panning curry, crab fried rice, garlic prawns, and the garlic beef to share between 6 guys. Normally, I would say Thai dishes specializes in a few things and I would be able to rate between least favorite to most, but I have to say everything was simply delicious. Between 6 guys it wasn't a lot, but just right. It was really something where you could appreciate each dish by itself. Eating it together was just heaven. \n\nI would say it's a little on the pricey side. We shared between 6 guys with each person getting a Thai iced tea or coffee and it came out to $200 or $33 per person. I suppose it could be cheaper if you go a la carte, but if you want to do Thai family style then you order dishes on dishes, but as a once in a while thing when I go to Vegas: WORTH IT! \n\nI can't wait to come out again and bring some of my friends to go visit the place. Real subtle twists on already tasty Thai food favorites. It was a real great end to an already successful trip!", "I like this place and have eaten here many times over the past 8 years. It is not the best in Las Vegas as some people say but it is still a great option. It's located in an old shopping center near the strip but it's convenient and there is a lot of parking nearby. The service is always good.", "I love Thai food and I really want to give this place five stars, but I can't. Yes, the food is delicious but outside the Khao Soi, everything else can be found at nearby Komol and Arawan for cheaper and without the hustle and bustle.", "I love this place! I always get the same 3 dishes: garlic prawns, pad sew ew and their pineapple duck curry. They are a must try! \n\nThere always seems to be a line so be sure to get there right when it opens!", "I love this place.  Every time we go to Las Vegas we come here.  This time it turned out that the place had uhmm.... grown slightly :)  Last time we were there this was a tiny restaurant but now it's rather giant and the line up to it was at a glance more than 40 ppl.  LOL. MAKE A RESERVATION! \nWell, we come for the sweet and sour chicken which is perfect here.  The sauce is perfectly spectacular and they make it just as spicy as you want which for me is \"tears in your eyes, flames in your mouth hot\" :) .  The chicken quality is great -- fresh and perfect.  The service is great -- the staff were very attentive and nice.  I'm very happy to say that despite having grown this place had not lost the quality of its food which is a HUGE relief since it's one of our favorite Thai places.", "I recently purchased Carpet and Lament flooring from Budget Flooring. The price and service was great. I will do it again 10 years from now.\nThanks again, Wayne Whiteman", "I spent a lot of time in San Francisco and I've got to be almost all the really bomb spots and Chinatown in downtown... This place is a world-class level... I highly recommend if you're in Vegas and want Chinese food stop by and check these guys out you won't be disappointed...Fried rice appetizer are on another level....Fried duck and shrimp drunken noodles Are a must try awesome", "I thought this place was phenomenal! With great, friendly/informative service and a great atmosphere, I really enjoyed my experience here. The noodles that they use for the pad thai were different than what I was accustomed to, but I thought it was great!!", "I travel in an RV all over the country. I am always looking for a good Thai restaurant. Thanks to Yelp, I found this one. I had pad woon sen and it may have been the best I have ever found. The staff was friendly.", "I've been coming here for years, originally for the lunch buffet and now for the occasional dinner. It's a little pricey and always packed in the evenings, and for good reason. This food is top notch, better than Komol or any other Thai restaurant I've been to in town. It's an an unassuming, unimpressive, and perhaps uninviting strip mall, but this area's always been home to a mix of dives and delights, don't judge the book by it's cover or the guy hitting you up for money in the parking lot.\n\nOnce inside, you'll see the space is kept up well and has a substantial wine collection. I can't comment on that since I've always thrown all my money into food and sometimes a thai tea. Their signature cuisine is northern Thai, and while I don't have other cuisine from that region to compare it to, it is delicious. That said, so are the more traditional dishes. The orange chicken, which was good during the lunch buffet, is outstanding when made to order. The pineapple fried rice has a great depth of flavor and is well-seasoned. Anything with crispy duck is excellent. The last time we had a northern Thai shrimp curry that was top notch. If you're not picky, just give the server some general parameters and they'll take care of it for you. You want a curry, pineapple rice, and crispy duck dish? Say no more. I haven't had something for dinner yet that I felt was \"meh.\" The only problem, if you can call it that, is that the menu is huge which can make it tough to decide but on the other hand always provides some room to explore. \n\nThis is a Vegas must. Call ahead to find out the wait time and see if you can put your name on the list. Expect a 45 minute wait for take-out. Don't think you can waltz in for dinner, any day of the week, without a 30 minute wait.", "I've been dying to eat at Lotus of Siam, so last week when I was in Vegas I made sure we had a reservation. \n\nI was not disappointed. \n\nThe garlic prawns were especially delicious. The prawns and skins are fried separately, then tossed in a sweet garlic sauce before serving. I had never eaten shrimp shells like this before and was completely mesmerized. Like the menu description, they really had the consistency of potato chips! \n\nThe only negative I can find is that the portions seemed a little small compared to the prices. But even with that in mind, it was worth every penny.", "I've been here more times than I can count, and way before it was on T.V. This place is definitely worth the wait!! It can be tricky to find if you're new, but a taxi will know where it is, or just remember to turn at the green building. The green chili lime prawns are amazing!! Everything is fantastic, and try something off their Northern Thailand Menu in the back. If possible, have someone in your group get there earlier to put in your reservation, they stopped answering their phones years ago. The strip mall may seem sketchy, but that's typical old Vegas. You won't need your gun in this part of town, you'll be too stuffed to use it anyways.", "I've been to Southeast Asia and live in the melting pot known as the Bay Area...this is the best Thai restaurant i have been to outside of SE Asia!!!! The Bay Area has nothing which compares!!! The soup is amazing and their shrimp dishes are beyond compare!! Order #52!!! Fresh seafood and amazing people!", "I've been wanting to come to Lotus of Siam for ages, finally made it . . . and I was underwhelmed. Sigh. \n\nSide note: if you find yourself in a sketchy strip mall and see a tiny storefront with a sign that says Lotus of Siam and are 70% sure you're in the wrong place, you're in the right place. \n\nOnce you get inside, the restaurant is actually really big. Decor is nothing to speak of, but definitely better than the outside would lead you to believe. \n\nPrepare yourself--the menu is overwhelmingly huge. After consulting Yelp and getting advice from our server, we went with the garlic prawns, drunken noodle with mixed seafood, crispy duck curry, a small Singha and a Thai lime drink, and sticky rice with coconut ice cream for dessert. Our bill, without tip, was almost $90. \n\nI don't have a problem paying good money for good food, but it just didn't seem like the price was warranted. Our meal was fine, but not outstanding. \n\nThe garlic prawns has a great texture but seemed oily and didn't have as much flavor as I would have hoped. The prawns are pulled out of the shells, but the shells are left attached at the tail, so you have the prawn and shell separately deep fried. I would never known that you are supposed to eat the shells, but, thanks to good ol' Anthony Bourdain, my husband is more up on these sorts of things than I. The texture of the breading and the shell, and the flavor and crunch of the cabbage slaw with cilantro underneath the prawns, which was coated with garlicky goodness, were the best parts of this dish. \n\nThe drunken noodles with mixed seafood weren't bad, but weren't better than any other drunken noodles I've had. \n\nThe crispy duck curry was by far my favorite dish. Red panang curry, a generous serving of duck breast with perfectly crisped skin, and some red bell pepper. Most flavorful dish on the table, with a little bit of heat. \n\nI loved the Thai lime drink--basically limeade, tart and sweet but not too sweet, with a tiny salt. \n\nThe sticky rice was meh, which was sad because sticky rice is one of my favorite things. Would've ordered it with mango, but they didn't have any, so went with coconut milk ice cream instead. \n\nMaybe we ordered the wrong things? Maybe they were having an off night? I don't know. The same meal for a more reasonable price would've gotten four stars from me, but it was way too expensive for what it was. \n\nThe service was great. Shout out to Ettel--he was absolutely amazing! He wasn't our server, but took our drink orders and cleared our table, and was SO friendly and attentive.", "I've dined at LoS at least a couple times a year and every time it's been enjoyable. It's a must-go-to every time I visit LV. Overall, the food is great and service is attentive and friendly. No wonder this place is always packed. Reservations are recommended especially if you have a larger group. \n\nThe Food:\nI can't think of an item/entr\u00e9e that I didn't like. The flavors are spot on and you can tell that they take pride in what they serve. The entr\u00e9es are family style, so everyone in our party can enjoy the tastes. \n\nHere are some of my favorites (that i remember from the top of my head)\n- Garlic Prawns\n- Pad Thai\n- Spicy Fried Rice\n- Seafood soup\n- Chicken satay (appetizer)\n- Roasted duck curry\n\nI know i've missed a few dishes but you can't really go wrong. A definite must-try if you love Thai food. Be sure to check out the seasonal items as well. \n\nOther notes:\nThe location is a bit hidden and sign (green at night) isn't flashy. You may also see a few people waiting outside. But when you walk in, you'll see that LoS proudly display articles and photos with celebs and people within the community. The restaurant is nicely lit and atmosphere can get a bit loud, but not annoying at all.", "I've wanted to try this place since I saw it on Munchies. I'm so glad I did. Though it's location is far from where I live, I feel like it's worth the drive and wait to go there. Trust me, I waited a year because i thought it would be so expensive. The prices were exceptional.\n\nWe didn't have reservations but we were quickly seated. Our server was very attentive. I never had to ask a single time for my drink to be refilled. Most restaurants have trouble with that on a busy night.\n\nOur appetizer was wonton bacon wrapped shrimp. I wanted to try it so bad that my husband and I took one each before I took a picture.\n\nWe ordered thier Tom yum catfish hotpot. We ordered it mild because I can't really take alot of spicy food. It was just the perfect amount of spicy.  \n\nWe also ordered pad Thai and penang curry duck. The serving for each dish was enough for 2 people to share. It's either that or we just really eat alot.", "If I ate at Lotus of Siam 4 times over a 4 day trip to Vegas...does that qualify me as an addict? Or just a regular on Yelp?\n\nFlying in Friday night from Newark, I search Yelp and online and find good reviews of Lotus of Siam, calling it one of the best Thai restaurants in the US. I'm a huge fan of Thai (like Somtum Der, Pam Real Thai and others in NYC) and decided to try it.\n\nThat first dinner was so good that next night, searching for healthier restaurants not far from the Strip, I decided it was easier to just go to Lotus of Siam again.\n\nOver 4 visits (3x for dinner and once for lunch), I tried:\n\nENTREES\n- Northern Larb. Think minced pork with chilis that explodes with flavor, whether you choose a spiciness level closer to 1 or 10. This was the only dish I ordered twice in my 4 visits. Be warned though, if you're not much for hot/spicy, choose a lower number.\n- Nam Prik Ong (Red chili dip). While I saw this dish mentioned in reviews, I wasn't too impressed. It's tasty, just not as much so as the Northern Larb.\n- Khao Soi. This was like a large bowl of flat egg noodles mixed with curry. Tasty but I preferred other dishes mixed with rice.\n- Kang Hung Lay (beef stew). Paired with rice, this dish was good. Fairly flavorful.\n- Isan sausages. This is Thai sausage sliced and served with a bunch of raw veggies (onions, Thai chili peppers, cabbage, etc). A good appetizer to share with friends (Though being hungry, I ordered this along with an entree for myself).\n- Pad kraprow with pork belly and minced chicken. This is usually my go-to dish at Thai restaurants (generally preferring rice to noodles) but in this case I waited a few visits to try this. If you like minced meat with basil and chilis, you'll probably like this. \n\nDRINK\n- A variety of different German Reislings. I haven't traditionally been into wine but admit I'm now sold on pairing them with Thai food.\n- Also Thai iced tea once to see what it was like. Par for the course, not mind-blowingly different.\n\nSUMMARY\nI liked this Thai restaurant so much I ate there 4 times over a 4-day visit. If you like delicious Thai food paired with wine and sake, it's hard to go wrong here.", "If I had to choose one place to eat at each time I'm in Vegas, it would have to be Lotus. Although it is off the strip, it's absolutely worth the trip. Every dish I've had here has not disappointed. I love the garlic prawns, crying tiger and chicken satay. I would suggest calling ahead to make a reservation or you'll have a long wait.", "Im in love with this Hidden Vegas GEM living here I have to say its one of the best", "In Vegas? \n\nStop gambling your life away, and Go Here NOW!\n\nI recommend the entire Northern menu.", "Incredible food, but the location is a little dicey.", "It was a good place but not as great as people made it sound.", "It's pretty expensive.  We ordered garlic prawn & whole red snapper w/ basil sauce.  The shrimp plate is looking good, but closer look half of them are skin.  The red snapper is the smallest red snapper I've seen, and I don't think it was red snapper at all; base on its texture & size, it's more like tilapia.  We're still hungry after $70 meal (for 2 dishes).  I don't think it's worth the price for the environment & taste.  I'm sorry, I don't think I've ever come back again.", "James, the technician, came in response to what we believed was a cracked shower pan in a second floor shower. Another plumber had looked at it and said he could fix the problem for \"only 800.00.\" James, after examining it, stated that it was not a crack, but a surface mark near the drain, and therefore was fine to use. After we looked closer, he was right, and we really appreciated his honesty. If we have another problem, we will have the number and name on file.", "Just above average. Certainly not worth the hype. I would maybe have given it one more star if it wasn't for the wait. I don't mind waiting for an exceptional restaurant, but slightly above average in quality and price makes it an overall loser in my book. My standards are high for Thai restaurants. Perhaps my expectations were too high but I would definitely not have gone to five stars even if there was no line.", "LOVE this place. The food is amazing! It's on the higher price, but if you know what to order, you leave satisfied and after all it is in Vegas, so you are there to spend some money. \n\nIt was quick to get seated, check out for reservations if you go on busy hours and weekends. I went there on a Thursday, it was very busy but did not wait more than 10 minutes for my table. \n\nI ended up with an almost $50 pp bill but I ordered app, side and entree. So while I don't think it's the best value restaurant, for sure high traffic and good flavor I think it is worth it. I had some gambling surplus :) \n\nI'd be back every chance I get, but I like to try new ones too. Parking is the easiest as it sits at a strip mall on Sahara avenue somewhat close to SLS hotel.", "Let's go ahead and be honest here... Lotus of Siam is easily the best Thai restaurant in the states.\n\nMy dad introduced me to this restaurant during our last trip to Vegas. The restaurant had a line outside of it even before it opened- proof that they're doing something right.\n\nA few of the things we ordered-\n\nIssan style beef jerky (delicious, not like the stuff in the bag at the gas station, but REAL, spicy beef jerky)\nPanang short ribs (spicy and perfect, the best Panang sauce I've ever had)\nSea bass over drunken noodles (my favorite)\nFried banana and mango with sticky rice (must try- I didn't try the coconut ice cream but it looked delicious).\n\nTotally worth the wait!", "Let's start by saying when there's a line before 5:30pm then you know something is good.  \n\nWhat a GEM!  \n\nMy friends and I arrived there at 5:35pm and oh my good gawd there was a line and people were already sitting down inside.  When we got to the front we were told that the wait for a table will be an hour.  Being that I've heard a lot of great things about this restaurant we opt to wait.  We grabbed a drink at the back bar and sat in that back room.  (Wish they made that room into a dinning area instead of a waiting room)\n\nEventually after 30 minutes we were seated.  YAY!  \nWe already knew what we wanted so at that time I sat and looked at all the photos on the wall of celebrities who ate at Lotus of Siam.  \n\nFood: \nCrispy duck with panang\nNAM KAO TOD: (Crispy rice mixed with sour cubed pork sausages, cilantro, green onions, grounded dry chilis, ginger, peanuts and lime juice)\nThai Fried Rice\nDRUNKEN NOODLE PRAWNS\n\nFoodGasmn!  The food was full of bold flavors and delicious.  Definitely a place to visit whenever I'm in Vegas.", "Located in Shopping Center and not facing Sahara so slow down before you get there.\nWorth the 30-45 minute wait. \nOne of the best Thai restaurants in Vegas if not the Southwest.", "Long wait but the food was worth it. Fried bananas and coconut ice cream dessert...yes please", "Lots of people told me I had to check this place out when I was in Vegas. Since I knew they had Northern Thai dishes that's the route I took. I had Khao Soi ( the best I've ever had) and a dish with pork and jack fruit that they recommended. I was not head over heals for the dish with the jack fruit ( you actually could barely tell there was jack fruit it blended in well, it just wasn't my favorite). If I could I'd give this place 4.5 stars ( it wasn't quite deserving of 5 in my mind). I was stuck in a little back room and felt a bit neglected. The server came around but I feel like I was forgotten about half the time. On the other hand I came with my luggage and they were very sweet and put it in their wine storage room ( they have a huge wine selection by the way). \nI'll be back next time I go to Vegas. Hopefully I won't be by myself so I can try more of the dishes. Also if anyone is wondering it was about a 12 dollar Uber from the middle of the strip.", "Lotus of Siam got off on the wrong foot with their call confirming our reservation in which they threatened to give away our reservation if we were more than five minutes late.  I know it's a popular spot but calm down.\n\nAdmittedly the food was tasty. The larb and sea bass with Suki sauce had the right amount of heat.  Even the more basic pad see ew was well made.  But our night out lasted less than an hour as food was delivered too quickly to enjoy the meal overall.\n\nThere are a lot of Thai and Asian options in Las Vegas.  Choose another like Chada Thai for a better experience.", "Lotus of Siam was every bit as good as everyone had told us it was. It graces a bunch of \"top 10 things to do in Vegas\" lists, and the last few food shows about Vegas we'd watched (like Bourdain's Parts Unknown) have visited it.\nWe arrived about fifteen minutes before they opened for lunch and there was already a group of people waiting in line, and as we waited four more groups pulled up. We were seated right after they opened, and followed everyone's advice to order from the Northern specialties page - I got the Khao Soi with chicken, and he got the Northern Laab. \nThe Khao Soi was amazing - nuanced layers of chile flavor and rich soup body of coconut and broth. I wish this were available from my local places, but then again, that's the whole point of Lotus of Siam - fantastically prepared dishes that we can't really get anywhere else.\nThe laab was good, a little strong for me but D liked it. He did find a small piece of clear plastic in the rice that needed to be picked out, but other than that it was a good dish.", "Loved this place! It was packed with a lot of fun people. Food was superb!  A lot of celebrities come here. Thats why it was recommended by our hotel valet. Delicious curry!  Mmmmmm!", "Man this place is popular....is quite the understatement.  My wife and I got  there about 30 minutes prior to opening and long and behold....50 people ahead of us.  This is a brick and mortar restaurant not some weird food truck phenom.\n\nThis place is 100% legit and I have to say it will be on the itinerary every single time.  The spicy nam prik goong and the crispy shrimps and all the delicious dishes that are too many to name.   BUT get there early as there will always be a line.  Something else that kinda scared us while we were getting out of the cab was that the cabby wanted to know if we wanted him to wait?  Must be a messed up hood if the cabbies are freaked out.   Love the food though.  But don't leave stuff in your car!\n\n\nCheers and happy eats!", "Man what a place, don't be fooled by the outside of the building or the area this is a gem in Las Vegas. Everything was great that we tried best Thai food I have ever eaten.", "My Pad Se Ew was exceptional. All of the flavors were right on and our waiter was attentive. We will definitely be visiting again to explore the menu some more. Cheers!", "My family and I came here for lunch because apparently dinner fills up with reservations, weeks in advance. I ordered the ginger shrimp which was very good and flavorful. I love spicy food and this was not spicy however I should have expected that. The food came out pretty quickly. The shrimp was very tender and served with peppers and onions. Overall the dish had great flavor! They have a huge menu with a large variety of Thai food to order from. They even have a Northern dish section which has very distinct flavors. My mom ordered the Khao Soi which is a curry dish with egg noodles and veggies. It was so full of flavor and one of the best Thai dishes I've ever tasted. The curry was so good that she ate it like a soup and finished the whole thing. It had just the right amount of spice so I would highly recommend it! The explosion of flavors and distinct/unique tastes really sets this Thai food apart from ordinary Thai food places. Not only that but the meat and fish were very good quality and that also really made this a much more exceptional and unordinary Thai restaurant. The meat and fish were just so tinder and fresh. The prices were also very reasonable, especially for the quality and quantity and being that they are in Vegas, they are one of the much cheaper restaurants.  Came here for lunch at about 2:15 (15 minutes before closing time). The waitress warned us that we may not get in because they stop giving out tables at 2:30 so obviously they would rather be done working by 3 than keep serving people. This is probably because they have so many customers that they it won't make a difference if they have one or two extra customers. However it was very apparent that they were ready to leave because the wait staff seemed pretty rushed to have us order and not exceptionally friendly towards us. Also, it was a little off the strip so the location was not very nice and the inside was just okay too. They could definitely use some renovations to make it nicer.", "My family just drove in and we were looking forward to some good Thai food.  We ordered the drunken noodles with prawns and the chicken fried rice to share.  The prawns were good but the drunken noodles were sober and dry.  It was all clumped together with barely any sauce.  The fried rice was decent but the portion you get for $10+ is ridiculous.  Barely enough to share amongst my 5 and 4 yr old.  A place this pricey and so highly reviewed needs to stay consistent.  Not going to be back.", "My mom and I were skeptical about this place because of its location. The place is super dark and sketchy looking outside. As we pulled up, we noticed all of the cars in the parking lot, but had no clue where all of these people could be. The outside of the restaurant was really dark and the place looked small...until we walked in....let me tell ya..THIS PLACE IS HUGE and now we know where all of the people went! The wait was about 45 minutes, so as we were waiting by the bar, we used Yelp to view other user's pictures and definitely had to try to Crispy Garlic Prawns (which is to die for)! We also ordered a bunch of other plates and shared it between 4 people. We ordered the panang yellow curry, tom yum, pad Thai, and the papaya salad. \nThis place is pretty good! Definitely will come back soon. I Would recommend this place to any Thai food lover.", "Next time you find yourself in the city Bugsy Siegel built do yourself a favor and leave bright lights of The Strip and head to Lotus of Siam for what will be the best Thai meal you'll ever have in the U.S.! \n\nMy first piece of advise is, be ready to wait. It's a big place that works like a well greased engine but it's always packed.\n\nBe adventures the menu is big with things that could sound scary to some but trust in your waiter (like I did) and you won't be disappointed.\n\nMy waiter recommend the three following dishes \n\nNam Prik Ong - a dish made with a blend of spices, herbs and ground pork you can adjust the heat to your liking. Out of the three it was my least favorite because it was weird to eat without some sort of lettuce leaf to but it in. Still very good and I can see why it's one of Ming Tsai's favorite things to eat. \n\nThe Nam Kao Tod- a crispy rice mixed with sour cubed pork sausage, cilantro, green onions, ground dry chilies  ginger peanuts and lime juice was my favorite dish of the night. I'd never had anything like it before and all the components come together perfectly in every bite. Tip: Watch out of the dry peppers ;-)  \n\nFor my main dish the waiter recommend the Khao Soi a Burmese egg noddles coconut curry dish that was absolutely perfect. Creamy but not buttery, spicy but not overriding. Add the red onions and lime and it will take the dish to another level.\n\nSo next time you're in Vegas go hit the jackpot at Lotus of Siam!", "Not much to look at but, jeez, great food!  Order the crispy rice and sour sausage to start, then the crispy duck in chu chee sauce, and garlic and pepper grilled shrimp.  \n\nYou'll probably need a reservation!", "Nothing amazing. Nothing horrible. Just a quick place to grab some Thai food.", "Of course, reading all the other reviews, this one will be similar. Lotus of Siam is amazing. For an appetizer, we had No. 14, some sort of fried rice with lime, cilantro, and ginger. Oh so delicious. I ordered the Chilean Sea Bass in Ginger. The fish was PERFECT. The fish was flaky and buttery and light and and and, just so wonderful. \n\nMy boyfriend ordered the drunken noodle prawns. Also very delicious. We both preferred the sea bass tho. \n\nThe level of spicyness was not as hot as we heard it to be. A level 5 spicy was barely hot for us, but that could be our tolerance. We were ok with it not being too spicy. \n\nMy only complaint is it takes a long time to get through to someone on the phone to make reservations.", "One of the best in town! They have dishes I never saw in other Thai restaurants", "One of the best places for Thai food in Las Vegas! Noodle dishes and fried rice are top notch, and don't forget the Thai iced tea. Wonderful!", "Only giving it 3 stars because the Food is good but the menu was too much. Lousy review I know but the duck curry northern style was delicious but then again Chada Street and Chada have the same style of cooking. Sorry.", "Poor location and not open for lunch. Server got our order wrong and became rude when we corrected her. Food is over rated from other reviews. Maybe it has gone down hill since previous ratings.", "Probably the best Northern Thai food you'll ever have outside of Thailand. We always get the garlic prawns that are crispy like potato chips and seasoned to garlicky perfection. Crab fried rice Paris well with those garlic prawns. Curries are also good, but beware the difference in spiciness: mild is medium, medium is hot, and hot is nuclear! Our last dish is the sweet, sour, spicy deep fried whole catfish. This is big enough for 4 to share! Definitely make reservations ahead of time to avoid the 1-2 hour wait for dinner. Once you're seated, they're quick and friendly. A one of a kind food experience that you MUST NOT MISS when you go to Vegas!", "Pros: food here is phenomenal. I especially love the papaya salad (the sauce is out this world good)\n\nThe pad Thai is another winner, best Thai I have ever had.\n\nDrunken noodle is also quite good (we had two other times we were here)\n\nThe green curry was smooth, not the best I have ever had but when paired with pad Thai and papaya salad it really sits in the back as the other two dishes are so powerful in flavor that the green curry just couldn't really take.  I would suggest getting the curry with a fish dish or something milder in flavor as to not get overshadow. \n\nThe fried bananas dessert is amazing, you get basically for rolls (egg roll size) of banana with minced coconut wrapped in egg roll wrapper and deep fried for $8.50 and a scoop of coconut ice cream (not heavy or too sweet- nice and light) $4 = $12.50 dessert good for 4 people (maybe another order of ice cream) drizzled with honey and powder sugar.\n\nFor more suggestions for Vegas, Seattle, Florida, Hawaii and more.. Check out our blog: http://uihleinstravels.blogspot.com", "Purchased 2015 Toyota Camry today from Nino Quality Motors. I must say the service we received today was outstanding. Matthew Service Manager/ Sales was great! Getting the car financed was easy and hassle free. I left the dealership with my new car feeling great about the service I received and purchasing a new vehicle on my own.", "Service was great. They have many people on staff to make sure you are taken care of. They also know how to give you space when you are eating. Prepare to wait in line, but they do take your number and text you when your table is ready. Atmosphere is nice  and great selection of wine. \n\nThe food was great. My favorite would have to be the crispy duck panang curry. Probably the best curry dish I have ever had. Even reheating it the next day was amazing. We wanted to immediately go back. The garlic prawns were pretty good. Not sure if I would order again though and lastly the Tom yum soup was good.", "Simply, the best thai food i've ever had in my life. Everything was outstanding!!!! I would love to go back when i visit las vegas.", "So, I wasn't so sure about this place when we walked up--it looks tiny and run-down from the outside but is quite big inside and oh so good! \n\nHighly recommend it.  Everything we had was amazing--soup, beef short ribs, pad Thai, duck. So, so good!!", "Some of the best thai food in the country, and certainly the best in Las Vegas.", "Sometimes gems are hidden in unsavory places. This restaurant is located in a horribly crime ridden part of Las Vegas, and set within a rundown strip mall; that being said once you walk inside you're pleasantly surprised by how clean and nicely decorated it is. I've dined here on several occasions and it is always very busy and packed with customers. During my last visit I ordered a garlic green chili prawns, and Braised Short Rib with Panang Curry. Both dishes were incredibly delicious, with the perfect amount of spice. I still dream about the Panang Curry, probably the best I've ever had.", "The Lotus of Siam is hard to find as it's in a plaza that's indiscriminate and no clear signs on the street side. It was worth the scavenger hunt as the food was delicious. I ordered the Garlic Prawns, Drunken Noodles, and Coconut/Sticky Rice Dessert. The Garlic Prawns were fantastically garlic ridden and crispy/crunchy. The fry was perfect and the prawn meat itself was juicy. The Drunken Noodles while small in portion, had a great flavor and \"dragon's breath\" flavor. The noodles themselves were cooked perfectly with just the right amount of chewiness. Lastly, to round out my meal I had their dessert: coconut/sticky rice. The coconut flavored ice cream tasted fresh and the steaming sticky rice gave the perfect contrast to the ice cream. Overall, a great Thai food restaurant and next time I'm in Las Vegas, I will definitely be hitting this place up again.", "The best Khao Soi since our travels to northern Thailand. The servers are friendly and helpful, this place is always busy and even the greeters always have a smile.  We've always made reservations a day before and have never had to wait more than 5 minutes.  If we don't make reservations, they wait can get long.  \n\nThe area is less than desirable and we're always greeted by people asking for money in the parking lot.  But once inside, it's an amazing place for Thai food.", "The best Pad Thai I've had thus far! The portion is fantastic, the #7 spice level was on point and the entire dish was VERY flavorful. HIGHLY RECOMMEND!", "The food is absolutely fantastic. Duck Panang was just outstanding and the BBQ shrimp had some of the most vibrant thai flavors I've ever had.  Worth the wait!", "The food is amazing, order of the Northern Thai menu", "The food is good, very good. Is it outstanding? No, but its very good. The problem here is that the owner-manager is very greedy. They cater to mostly tourists and so, sadly,  it became a tourist trap. They dont offer you a lunch menu if you are a tourist and you will have to pay full dinner menu prices plus they are not friendly at all. The owner manager has a huge chip in his shoulder and believes that he is so above the customers that he wont even answer questions.   He is un-polite and rude. So - go if you want but dont expect much anymore. What a shame.", "The food is really good at this restaurant in a run down shopping mall in a bad neighborhood about a mile from the good hotels in Las Vegas. No ambiance but there was a long line to get in.  You will need a reservation!", "The menu is very diverse and gives an overwhelming number of options, each one more enticing than the last. The food tastes fresh and is always flavorful. Tonight I had crispy rice with sausage massaman curry, pork belly with basil, and to kah khi soup. Everything tasted amazing. This is a hard place to get a reservation for and the quality of their food shows why", "The place looks like a dump friends m the outside, the walls are covered with pics of celebs that have dined here.  What your coming for is the food, so don't be surprised if you get get and have a 20 min wait for one of the 35 tables.", "The sauces alone would keep me coming back to Lotus of Siam.  I dined with 2 other people and we ordered about 6 or 7 different dishes to try everything, consisting of: the Papaya salad, the Mushroom salad, Pad See Ew, Larb, a Fish dish, and a few other small dishes.  All were delicious and none tasted the same, all uniquely flavored and seasoned.  \n\nMy main complaint would be how long the meal lasted.  This may be a Thai cuisine type of complaint, but the food came out so quickly that the meal only lasted about 45 minutes.  When dining out at a nicer place, I like to spend time to savor the meal and conversate.  Lotus of Siam cooks everything to perfection, but very quickly.  Beware if you're looking to spend the night out at Lotus, if so, it will be a very short night.\n\nPro tip: make a reservation.  They are very strict about showing up on time, but we were seated immediately, while we saw at least 4 parties waiting in line behind us.  Overall, a delicious and great meal", "The service is good but I wish they would open another spot towards the other side of town because it's a long trek to get to our fave Thai place. We ordered the $45 snapper panang and it was worth it AF!", "There just is no better place in Vegas to get AUTHENTIC Thai food.  Close friend took my family a few years ago who happens to be from Thailand and wanted us to experience the difference between other places we've tried and Lotus of Siam.  Needless to say, we've become loyal customers.  There is often a wait for a table if going for dinner, so it's best to make reservations.  Lunch is rarely busy, so if you can go mid week, it's probably a great time to try.  You'll soon make reservations for dinner if you do!  The wait staff is not only knowledgeable, but also extremely efficient and helpful to those of us that don't know what to order.  This place does it RIGHT!", "There's nothing bad to say about lotus of Siam. The food is absolutely delicious. It's extremely busy, so if you're planning on going make sure you make reservations 3 days ahead of time. Best Thai food in all of Vegas.", "They say this may be the best Thai food in the U.S. And they are not mistaken. This place is amazing!  From the decor to the service to the FOOD!  We had several things that we shared and there was not one thing we were not salivating over after we were done. It will be one of those places that I crave. Even if you are not a THAI food fan, there are things here that you will love!  This is a must if you are in Vegas!", "They're much busier during dinner than lunch. We tried coming here a couple times when we had family in town, but weren't able to secure reservations. So, we decided to come during lunch and were able to get a table immediately. It was Friday and still pretty busy, but as long as you don't have to wait, that's great.\n\nMy main focus at Lotus is their Northern Thai specialties. Besides these dishes, there are a lot of other Thai specialties that you don't typically find at other Thai restaurants in the valley. \n\nNam Kao Tod ($8.95): Crispy rice mixed with sour cubed pork sausages, cilantro, green onions, grounded dry chili, ginger, peanuts and lime juice. Tasty salad mixture with great texture from the crispy rice. Love all the herbs and flavors.\n\nSai Oua ($11.95): Northern Thai-style spicy pork sausage. Served with ginger, red onion, chilies, and Napa cabbage. One of my all-time favorite sausages. I love the lemongrass especially. The sausage is great with all the fixings, too.\n\nNam Prik Ong ($11.95): Northern Thai red chili dip composed of ground pork, tomato, and spices; served with assorted vegetables and fried pork rinds. This dip will remind you of a meat sauce (you could totally create a pasta with it). It has a good depth of flavor and it's not heavy.\n\nThum Ka Noon ($10.95): Pounded and shredded young jackfruit salad with ground pork, tomato, and northern Thai spices and seasoning. Another delicious Northern Thai specialty. I enjoyed the flavors of this salad more than the Nam Kao Tod and Nam Prik Ong. Goes well with rice.\n\nCrispy Duck Panang ($27.95): Crispy duck topped with Thai style red cream curry sauce with cognac. The duck is juicy and the skin is fantastically crispy. The panang is really great, too and definitely good with any choice of meat, but the crispy duck is the way to go!\n\nEverything is delicious and takes me back to my vacation in Chiang Mai. I'm definitely back for more specialties!", "This is a great restaurant. Lotus of Siam has been called the \"best Thai restaurant in North America\", and I think it's warranted.  I love the Duck Curry.  But be warned: if you say you want your food prepared \"spicy\", they make the food VERY spicy. Even if you think you can handle spicy food, you may want to order \"medium\"--which is still very hot.  The wait is usually quite long, so make a reservation if you can.", "This is a nice restaurant, hidden gem in a dated shopping plaza. Don't be deterred by the appearance of the parking lot. The food was all great, and fairly reasonably priced. Something to be noted is that spicy actually means spicy here. I usually like my food spicy, so I tend to order very spicy at other restaurants but was forewarned before coming and was glad I ordered medium spicy so that my food was still enjoyable. We had yellow curry, pad see ewe, laht nah, pork stew, beef salad and spicy mint leaf chicken. Everything was wonderful! Service was excellent. I actually thought I had left my purse there, and when I went back, they went above and beyond to be helpful, even checked surveillance cameras for me. The staff was amazing showing integrity in the way they do customer service! I will definitely be back!", "This is the best Thai restaurant I have been to. The Garlic Prawns is a must! Tried a few dishes & everything is amazing! I recommend this to all the foodies out there!", "This is worth a visit.  It is in a seriously strange group of buildings though.  Must get a reservation and DO NOT be late!  If you are early you can try out some of the other establishments, but don't get anything on you.  I will leave it up to you to find out what goes down in that town.", "This place is amazing! It's hard to get a reservation, especially since they don't have call waiting and only take calls between certain hours. It's off the strip, but so worth the trip. They actually have a really impressive wine list too. Everytime I'm in Vegas, I go here!", "This place is busy, not because of the location either.  Located in a challenged commercial center, Lotus was the only place hopping.  Waited 20 minutes to be seated.  The menu is extensive and amazing.  Tried new food that I can't pronounce but savored.  The wine selection - that'll blow your socks off.  Never been to Thai food and have the selection of wines like the offer - its pages and pages.  Sad that I've lived here for 30 years and never made it here.  Can't wait to go back.", "This place is great and everyone knows it. Huge menu, big nice place. Come early to beat the dinner rush.", "This place was way over hyped. Pad se-ew was mainly flavorless noodle. It contained very little chicken or broccoli. I also order Tom Yum noodle soup. The Tom yum had a variety of veggies that I haven't seen in the fish prior. The change of piece was different but I did enjoy it. Bit dishes were under salted. I have said it in every other review of a Thai restaurant but this place still can't compare to to Lucki Thai on the south side.", "This restaurant is...bizarre.  The exterior looks like a foot massage parlor. It's in very close proximity to SEVERAL foot massage parlors, actually. After driving here with your Zagat review in hand, you'll double-check and triple - check whether you're at the right place.\nBut step inside, and your anxiety is replaced with welcome  relief. The floor-to-ceiling wine bottles behind the glass wall near the door assures you that not only are you safe, but that you'll probably leave with a full stomach and maybe a buzz. The decor is plain but comfortable.\nThe food, however, is hit or miss. We ordered the chicken satay and agreed that it was the worst both of us have ever had (& coming from different cities, we've sampled our share of Thai food). The chicken was a semi-soft, almost artificial consistency and the seasoned exterior was somewhat slimy.  The flavor itself was average. Insert *blechh!*-faced emoji here...\nOur entrees were better, moving up to a solid, \"acceptable\". We ate them, but have had better. Mine was pad prik khing and hers was a curry shrimp dish.\nLastly, the dessert, coconut ice cream with sticky rice, was presented plainly (see pic), but really very good. As full as I was at that time, I didn't leave a grain of rice in that sadly empty little bowl.\nBottom line? \nProbably not worth the Uber trip cost, despite the fair prices. Stay on the strip.", "This review probably would have been higher if I didn't have to wait Two hours to sit and eat!!! You will need to reserve a table a few days before to have a better experience. I know what you're thinking, who in their right mind would wait that long to eat... \n\nMe! I've heard great things about this place and recently read an article that Lotus of Siam was one of the top 10 Thai Restaurants in the USA! So I had to try.. \n\nWe got the usual order, Pad Thai, Chicken Curry and Basil Fried Rice. All three were really good but not worth the wait. I should have tried their more exotic options on the menu like the crispy duck curry... maybe next time.", "This truly is a hidden treasure!!!  We are so glad that Yelp helped us discover it.  The place looks sketchy from the outside, but once you walk in the aromas are tantalizing.  We really enjoyed our crispy duck and catfish entrees, which were recommended by our great server.  The service was impeccable.  We look forward to a return visit!", "Thought my friends were exaggerating. But they were right! This is the best Thai food I ever had!  Garlic shrimp is to die for! Not too salty just perfect! The duck in panang curry sauce. So yummy. Can't wait to come back and try other dishes! I hear it's usually really busy but we can on a Monday afternoon and their was no wait.", "Tons of choices, all authentic, fresh, and delicious! Party of 5 with main dishes, appetizers and drinks less than a Ben Franklin. Great service and relaxing intimate atmosphere. Off the strip by 10 min and worth every effort. Second visit here to make sure it was no fluke the first time. Wasnt disappointed. Will go back soon!!", "Too long a wait and far too expensive", "Took a group of my coworkers here and every one of us was completely satisfied. Food was authentic and delicious, flavorful, good portions. Whether you like mild or spicy food, are carnivorous or vegetarian, you'll find something here for you. For 9 people, the food came out of the kitchen extraordinarily fast. I got the yellow curry and s Thai iced tea - perfect. For my colleagues I ordered the chicken satay, fried rolls, and spring rolls appetizers and we made very quick work of them. \n\nStaff was friendly and attentive. They can be difficult to get ahold of by phone, probably because of high call volume. They're popular for a reason. Interior was nice and clean (which makes up for the slightly shady-looking exterior... Its in a run down shopping center) they have an extensive wine list, too. I will be back!", "Touted as one of the best Thai restaurants in Vegas, I was very excited to try their food. Well, the food was just about average. My friend and I had their Pineapple fried rice, a curry dish, and fried prawn dish. Nothing exceptional, but about average. I've had better Thai food in Baltimore.", "Usually, Thai places are a hit and miss for me. So far everything we ordered were really delicious. I have no complaints. The service was fast too.", "Very good food, but a little slow on service and too much ice on my drink. Had to pay twice for what I consider \"sips\".", "Visited this place a few years back. So fantastic that we recommended to everyone visiting Vegas. Visited Vegas again in Dec 2015. Was looking forward to going to this place than anywhere this time. First, the place had a 1.5 hr wait for lunch. Understood, need to wait sometimes for good things to come. Next, when we got the table, the service was slow. When the food came, the main entrees came along with soup and appetizers. The food quality was mediocre at best and proportions small. What a let down for travelling across the country!! This place gets good business as they are recommended in travel books and also by their  previous  reputation. This place is done for us. Next time, I will go to other Thai restaurants in the same strip. Maybe, they believe in food quality and service.", "We came here after a long drive through Death Valley National Park on the recommendations of two different friends. We were so excited to have a meal here, and while the food was okay, we felt a little disappointed.\n\nFirst, we got seated quickly on a busy Sunday evening which was good. However, once seated, it took a while to get our orders placed and to get our food. This was pretty understandable, it's Easter weekend and things get busy fast - no big complaints. We ordered the garlic shrimp and the crispy duck on drunken noodles.\n\nWhile both dishes were tasty, it was a little too salty all around. The garlic shrimp felt like it had just been reheated (a few of the shrimp were a little cold and not warmed through all the way) and the drunken noodles were congealed in bunches. Overall, the food was tasty, but nothing I'd recommend going out of the way for.", "We came here from LA that has arguably has the best Thai in the country. This place is amazing and rivals some of my favorite places in LA. \n\n It's in a strip mall but the interior is welcoming. It is a nice place to beat The Strip's craziness. I will\ncome here for a local Vegas perspective. \n\nGARLIC PRAWNS!!! To die!", "We can't come to Vegas without coming here.  The food is always good and perfect for the spicy food lover.  Many dishes can be modified if spice isn't your thing.", "We decided to give it a try even though we love china town. The Garlic prawns were great as an appetizer $26, I had the beef short ribs in red curry and my wife had the sea bass on papaya salad. There was only Apple on her papaya salad. I was still good though. We didn't feel this restaurant matched it's pricing or the hype. $110 for lunch, no liquor, no appetizers. If they marked everything down 50% we would probably go back.\n Try it if you like but for half price you can get great or better food in China town including 2 full body massages for less money!!", "We hit there after the lunch rush. You would never guess from the front of the building that this is such a large restaurant. Coming in, you pass a lot of signed 8 x 10 glossies, Wine Spectator awards, and other testaments to the quality of the food. Unfortunately, I wasn't impressed with the service. We were seated at a table in a very large room that seemed to only have two waiters working the entire section. After 10 minutes of not being acknowledged (you know -- the not-making-eye-contact trick), I had to wave my arms to get some water and attention. By the reviews, this is obviously a very good restaurant. As for the food, the yellow curried chicken that I had was dry. My dining companion even said that it looked dry. The chicken looked like it had been boiled, shredded, and sprinkled with a curry sauce. There were a couple of what could only be described as chicken rinds on the plate. I get it. I probably came at the wrong time and ordered the wrong food. My bad. Would I come at dinner time and wait for hours for a table? I don't know.", "We love this place! Whenever my husband and I talk about Vegas we think of lotus of Siam. And they have a clever wait app/system.", "We made reservation to this place a month prior and was able to score a table for 3 at 6:30pm on a saturday night. Good thing we were able to do that otherwise the wait is 2 hours on the shady side of Vegas where there's nothing else to do around.\n\nLocation is odd as it's in a very empty looking strip mall. \n\nThe doors for dinner open at 5:30 and when we arrived there was a line out the door trying to get in. We were seated within 2 mins of checking in. \n\nThe interior reminds me of a 80s oriental style restaurant, but I came here for the food after reading rave reviews by Jonathan Gold and seeing a special on Parts Unknown (Vegas).\n\nThe place was already packed inside, a lot of large groups (family style type service). \nThe wall had a lot of photos of well known celebrities and celebrity chefs.Also had a wall of numerous awards.\n\nWe order a bowl of soup to share and a couple of dishes (Green curry chicken and pineapple fried rice). All three dishes had the right balance in taste. all very excellent compared to some of the best Thai places I've been to.\n\nPrice is very reasonable. \n\nService was very attentive even though the place was busy. \n\nWould definitely come back and try some of their more well known dishes of Northern Thailand but would def make a reservation in advance.", "We went there again. Arrived at 6 pm. No line! Great food at great price. The best Rioja that I had drink in the States. Right temp, excellent! $25.00. Amazing.", "We've been to this place a few times and quality has quickly declined. The menu makes very little sense, portions were tiny and entrees were cold. For very expensive Thai food, you should keep looking. We will not be back.", "Went to the restaurant on a high recommendation of a friend.  I was sooo disappointed.  First, there was a long wait of almost an hour for a Tuesday night.  A look around told me I was really in for it.  Seemed like a tourist place.  Ordered a porched Chilean sea bass on a salad.  The sea bass was totally overcooked, and the salad mainly consist of julian apples, onions, etc.  Totally bad.  Ordered a pork curry, which is more like a curry soup.  We complained that the sea bass was totally dry, and the answer I got was: \"It is supposedly cooked like that\"!  And the Chilean cost $30.00.  I will never go back to that place again!", "What can be said that hasn't already been said about Lotus of Siam? Amazing Thai food, plenty of seating, and great service. A restaurant as famous as Lotus of Siam doesn't need my paltry review to tempt you. Just go. You won't be disappointed!", "Worth the wait. Incredible menu with a great wine list as well. We came in with a group, shared our plates, and received great service. Easily the best Thai food I have ever had.", "Wow.  This was definitely worth the trip off: the strip.  Located on Sahara Ave in a part of town I would not otherwise have known to visit but for hearing great things about this place from various sources, including a fellow diner at Kabuto's.  \n\nWe got here at 8:45pm and was seated in 15 minutes.  Three dishes were ordered.\n\nDrunken Noodle with Soft Shell Crab.  A good balance of sweet, sour, spicy, and salt, along with the fragrant basil.  The noodles were not overcooked, and the dish was well balanced. \n\nCrispy Duck Khao Soi.  The components of this dish by themselves wee not that remarkable.  Noodles that could be purchased at the 99 store (as I've done in the past), along with duck that has been crispy fried, and the curry.  However, blended together this dish was different, fun, and tasty. \n\nGarlic Prawn - A generous portion, crispy, lightly battered, infused with garlic.  \n\nThis has moved to the top of the list of Thai restaurants that I enjoy.", "Yes, it is as good as its many awards, honors, and praises suggest. Order from the \"Northern\" part of the menu, which is towards the back pages of it.\n\nI went with a group of 8 and nobody was disappointed. I had the Khao Soi which was so hearty and flavorful. With spicy level 6, it just had a nice kick without being hot. Perhaps Northern Thai is a little more relaxed than other places I have been with they spicy level. Our table tried everything from En Tuan soup (beef tendon with a deep rich broth and a huge basil taste), to Kang Hung Lay (Pork \"stew\" curry). \n\nWhat the group liked the most was the lightness of the dishes. The focus on herbs, spices and not coconut cream really allowed us to fill up without feeling weighed down.\n\nMy only regret is not getting the Nam Prik Ong, but that will happen next time!", "You can't go wrong with Lotus of Siam. Wonderful selection and consistently solid. Make sure to have a reservation on weekend evenings, though.", "Yum! yum! yum! yum!\n\nI read the review and decided to try it. the lives up tt the reviews.  it is off the strip , just few light away. i got a pick up , wasn't sure of the neighbourhood", "Yum. Loved everything. So good and very reasonable, price wise! Will eat here again every time I'm in Vegas. The garlic prawns and crispy duck Penang are my favorite! Great wine list too.", "\"Big things poppin' and little things stoppin\" - TI\n\nThis place is wonderful.  Thank you anthony bourdain and jet tila for introducing this place to the world.  It is off the strip so a bit harder to get to but the food is poppin with flavor.   \n\n*****papaya salad - AAammazing spicy but amazing best i ever had\n**** garlic prawns - poppin with flavor\n** soft shell drunken noodle - it was ok\n\nStick with the dishes at the back of the menu", "it's true: you need to make reservations or be ready to wait a looooong time. try making them a week in advance if possible.\n\nas far as the food is concerned, we stuck mostly with the northern thai menu since that's the stuff you can't get elsewhere. if you just want some pad thai go elsewhere, this place will be wasted on you.\n\nthe garlic prawns were beyond awesome, though if i go again i'll probably try something else. there are so many options! the crispy duck with chili and basil leaves was amazing. it would be hard not to get that again. i've never had anything like the pounded and shredded jackfruit but it was so good i'd order that again in a heartbeat. we got some fried rice for the kids. it was pretty good and is a nice option if you have someone less adventurous in your group. but again, you don't go to lotus of siam for fried rice. \n\nnext time i'm in vegas i'll definitely be back, and maybe more than once.", "very good restaurang"]
[2016, "season2"]	["2 hour wait, whatttttttt?! I guess that's the norm here and everyone endures the wait. Would I do it again? Probably not. I would wait 30 minutes tops here. The Thai iced tea was excellent--it was the perfect amount of tea and creamer. The pad see ew with chicken and beef salad were also great. The yellow curry and garlic prawns were both mediocre. A lot of the prawns were simply shell and batter, no meat :( if you're lucky, you'll get some meaty, garlicky pieces. This is one of the better Thai restaurants I've dined at here in Vegas. I highly recommend this place if you have a couple hours to spare. Service was excellent and the hostesses were sweet.", "3.5\n\nI kept seeing write ups on this place as such a good place to check out, but I didn't think it was anything special.\n\nThe food was good to above average.  The service was friendly.  But that's about it.\n\nOishi Thai in Miami is such a better experience.", "4.5 stars ! \n\nThis place gets busy!!! So come right when they open. Their reservation list also gets filled quick so make reservations in advance. Me and my friends came here and waited like 30-45 mins. I find their service to be somewhat slow, not because our waiter was slow, but because their waitstaff was slow when setting up and cleaning the tables. The food came out at a decent time considering they were extremely packed on a Saturday night. \n\nThe only big problem I have with this place is that their portions are pretty small. If you plan on sharing with a big group of people, I suggest ordering two of the same dish. Their noodle & curry dishes were especially small. Also when we ordered the mango sticky rice, there wasn't that much rice, it was a horrible mango to rice ratio.\n\nMust get: according to my friends their crispy garlic prawns! This is a must, my friends were drooling over this dish for the longest time. They also said the duck curry is delicious as well. Oh and order the Thai tea as your drink. \n\nI tried their fried tofu, pad see ew and pad Thai. All these dishes taste the same everywhere else, it just cost more here and the portions are a lot smaller. \n\nMango sticky rice was bomb! Loved how the rice wasn't too sweet, it was perfect, just wish there was more rice. The fried bananas were also yummy as well if you like bananas. \n\nOverall a yummy dinner, this place is just expensive for the amount of food they give you.", "After reading all the reviews, we couldn't wait to try this place, but we were so disappointed.\nIt took forever to be seated and once we were seated, it took forever to get a waiter. Once we ordered, our appetizers came out on time, however, with our entrees we waited an hour! And they were cold. When we spoke with our server, he was rude and didn't offer to take back our entrees. \nWill never visit this place again.", "Amaaaazing Thai food...Northern Thai Cuisine is different than what most restaurants serve.  Flavors are more subtle but perfect for the palette.  Each dish is carefully crafted to mix just the right flavor with texture and yes...aroma.  Best Thai food EVER - hands down.", "Amaaaazing Thai food...Northern Thai Cuisine is different than what most restaurants serve.  Flavors are more subtle but perfect on for the palette.  Each dish is carefully crafted to mix just the right flavor with texture and yes...aroma.  Best Thai food EVER - hands down.", "Amazing. We are locals and have come here several times. Never disappointed. Saying \"authentic\" is such an overused term, but I have to say it here. Lotus is the most authentic Thai food you will get outside of Bangkok. I'm Thai and I'm a harsh judge of Thai food. Make reservations if you can, otherwise it's worth the wait if you don't. Staff is so gracious and kind. I can't say enough wonder things about LoS.", "Authentic Thai food, it's as good as it gets here in Vegas.", "Awesome food and quick service but the wait can get long. The price is also a lot pricier.", "Awesome service, awesome food, great ambiance - absolutely excellent experience.  I've taken my sister and niece, some friends who were visiting, and been there with local friends and each time, it has lived up to its reputation.", "Awesome! Make sure to try the appetizer with with bacon wrapped shrimp!! They have an extensive wine list from my wino's!", "Basis for my starred ratings (which skews heavily to the food or drink):\n1 star:  Never again.\n2 stars:  Poor food, poor experience, extraordinary measures in order for me to come back.\n3 stars:  Average, nothing really special, nothing particularly bad.\n4 stars:  Very good, would definitely return.\n5 stars:  A favorite, one of the best.\n\nThe finest Thai my wife and I have ever had.  Worth the trip off-strip.  We come here every trip now.\n\nExcellent wine selection for a Thai restaurant.  Spicy here actually means something, and even medium-spicy comes out with some good heat.  We've focused on the northern and Issan dishes here, but even the old classics here are done very, very well.\n\nThe papaya salad is one of the best, if not best, we've ever had.  The pad thai here is also very good - not the sweet mess that comes out at most Thai joints.\n\nWe have also had:\nKhao soi - my single favorite dish.  Excellent\nNorthern larb - very good, packs a kick\nNam prik hed - probably our least favorite, but it is not bad at all.  Just the weakest of a strong group.\nKang hung lay - excellent pork dish\nNam prik noom - quite good, lots of veggies with it\nKoi soi - a fine dish, not spectacular\n\nWe will always come back here and focus on the northern dishes.  Service here has been excellent, the food has been flawless, and I can't say enough good things about this place.", "Best Thai I've had. And upscale.", "Best Thai food I have ever had. The northern dishes are great. The pad Thai noodles were great. The appetizers were great.", "Best Thai food I've eaten and real quality food. Waiter was really informative and corrected my Indonesian pronunciation of \"Panang\" which I guess I was supposed to be right since it's based on the Malay language but they said it \"Paenaeng\". Since there are so many reviews, this review is just for my own record. Ordered off menu lamb shank with green peppercorn sauce. Lamb was too rare for my taste but I loved the tenderness and the sauce. Ordered crispy duck in panang sauce and friends loved it but I was ok with the duck honestly -- not as crispy as I thought it would be, but perhaps that's cos it took me a few minutes before getting to it. Also ordered special of the day seafood hot and sour soup. It was awesome except that the crab was all skin and hard to get the meat. The sauce was perfection tho and I became obsessed to research northern Thai food now! WOOOOOOO can't wait to try cooking these curry sauces! @.@\n\nAlways make a reservation. Reservation is hard to get and Sunday is more crowded than Saturday. I was able to push my reservation on a Saturday from 7  pm to 7.15 pm to 8 pm which I really appreciated of them to cooperate since I was only in town for 3 days even tho the lady seemed annoyed which I don't blame her for (I had lost my car key earlier then got stuck in traffic). We got a spot 8 minutes before 8! My friend who came the next day (Sunday) had to wait 30 mins+ even after her reservation.", "Best Thai food I've ever had. Everything was great! I wish they'd open up one in Los Angeles! High quality.", "Best Thai food in the country and I have been to quite a few in different states.  We used to go for their lunch buffet, when ever we came to Vegas from Los Angeles,  which is no loner available, boo hoo..because you can get little bites of a lot of their dishes that way..we still go for lunch or dinner and order from the menu but it makes it harder because we have to limit our dishes.  If you love Thai..you have to go here..yopu wont be disappointed..great service as well.", "Best Thai food since I visited Thailand! Hard to get a table, but when you do, it's worth it! This place is not about how fancy the decor, the silverware  nor the  glassware, it's all about the food! No they don't dress it up with garnishes or try to make it look pretty, just good old fashion good food.", "Best Thai place I've ever been, and I've been to quite a few. Gets crowded on weekends and evenings, but they do take reservations. Not cheap and not huge portions, but taste and quality are outstanding. Great wine menu as well.\nPapaya Salad, Garlic Prawns (shells fried crispy like chips) and Short Rib Penang are our favorites.", "Best Thai restaurant in Las Vegas! \n\nMUST ORDER:\n\nGARLIC PRAWNS\nDeep fried prawns with shells (almost like potato chips), saut\u00e9ed with our special garlic sauce, topped with ground black pepper.\n\nNAM KAO TOD\nCrispy rice mixed with sour cubed pork sausages, cilantro, green onions, grounded dry chilis, ginger, peanuts and lime juice.\n\nTOM YUM KOONG\nHot and sour soup with shrimp.\n\nANOTHER LIST OF GREAT DISHES:\n\nKHAO SOI\nCrispy duck served on a bed of egg noodles in a curry base sauce, garnished with sliced red onions, lime and pickled vegetables.\n\nGOLDEN TOFU\nDeep fried bean curd, served with homemade sweet and sour sauce with chopped peanuts & cilantro.\n\nCRAB FRIED RICE\nFried rice with crab meat, tomatoes, onions, and egg.\n\nDO NOT ORDER:\n\nKANG KA NOON \nSpicy Young Jack Fruit Curry - The curry was watery, which I did not expect nor like. It seemed more like a soup rather than a curry to me.", "Best meal! Crispy Duck !!! I dream about it!!! A must if your visiting!! Have tried to replicate our meal all over Maryland ... Can't compare!", "Best thai food ever. Amazing flavors, huge menu selection, affordable prices. It is hard to get a table at this place. You need to make reservations at least one week ahead and sometimes that is not enough. But the food is so worth it. You will not regret it.", "Best thai food i've ever had. I just left the place and i already want to go back. The service is good and fast. Can't wait to be hungry again so i can eat more.", "Best...Thai...Food...ever! \n\njust make sure you order their northern thai dishes, as that's what they specialize in. if you come here to order the pad thai, you're missing the whole point of visiting Lotus of Siam\n\nPrices are very reasonable, the fried banana desert is the bomb! I always make sure to stop by this place whenever in Vegas.", "Came in with with high, albeit reserved, expectations from all the hype and my expectations were still exceeded. I like spicy food but avoid punishment, so a 6 or 7/10 spice level works for me. \n\nKoi Soi [Steak Tartar - Issan Style] and drunken noodles were good. \n\nIssan sausage, tom yum, tom ka, chix fried rice, musaman were as expected.", "Can't say enough good thing about this place.  All my friends from out of town love this place because this is the first place we hit when they are in town.", "Could be the best Thai restaurant in the country, there is a reason you need to make reservations way in advance.\n  Everything I have had is the best i have eaten anywhere.\nThe drunken noddles are insane..\n The apps are great.\n  This is the best you can get without gong to Thailand.", "Delicious food. There's usually a wait 20 to 45 minutes, but it's wort it! Every time I visit Las Vegas I always make a point to come here!", "Delicious wine, delicious food in a large, packed restaurant full of happy people.  Wow!  My husband and I loved our meal here.   We were advised to order from the North Thai menu, and stick to their specialties.  We didn't order any of the stuff we would normally order (green curry, pad thai, larb, etc).  Instead we went all adventure - the shrimp with the shell (yum and I don't eat shrimp!), the jackfruit and pork, the massumam curry (a muslim curry - so creamy and seasoned perfectly).  The nam tok... crispy and perfect.\n\nI can't wait to get my butt back to Vegas for more Lotus of Siam.", "Do not allow the location to fool you, Amazing food, we tried an assortment of plates and it was BY FAR some of the best Thai food I've had. Their curry chicken is simply AMAZING!", "Don't be fooled by the exterior! We were a little skeptical based on the location being in a run down strip mall and it doesn't look like much from the outside. When you get inside, you realize it's huge and full of people! The food was awesome, the menu is extensive, and there are options you don't see in every Thai restaurant. If I lived in Vegas I'd be a regular! It's worth the drive if you love Thai food.", "Eh, service was great. our waiter was fast and attentive. I wasn't too impressed with the food after all.. \n\nIf you are tourist here in Vegas wanted to tried the most popular Thai food. here is the place for you. Want real home cook style Thai food? I will go to Komol, and yes I speaking from my personal experiences!", "Ehh bf took me here don't like it, he doesn't know what to order rather eat somewhere else", "Excellent Food and the best wine list I've ever seen at a Thai restaurant. Service was spot on. Look forward to coming here again.", "Excellent Thai food. One of the best I have ever had anywhere.", "Expect LONG lines. Come when the first open to be seated right away. This place gets packed, but luckily it's huge inside.\n\nOrdered the garlic prawns $28, for about 8 large prawns, delicious!! Kinda pricey but delicious.\n\nAlso got the pad see ew, drunken noodles with seafood, and papaya salad. You can choose a spiciness level 1-10. We chose 5 and it was super spicy!! \n\nEach entree is around  $10. Pretty good service too for a busy restaurant. \n\nI thought the entrees were okay, the garlic prawns was the best!", "Fantastic place to eat in Vegas. Authentic Thai food. A little off the main strip but worth the drive.", "Finally tried out this place after getting a lot of really good reviews from friends and family. It's by  the commercial center and it looks really small from the outside but when you come in, it's really big and nice plus they have a huge wine selection. \n\nThe food is delectable but It's a little pricey for a Thai restaurant. If you come here you should order their Pad Thai of course. Also their short rib and garlic prawns are very good. The staff here are well trained and know their food very well so just ask if you needed help with the menu.\n\nP.S. If you cannot tolerate spicy, just get 1-3 of 10 level range of spiciness. It is HOT!", "First I have to say, I hate giving bad reviews. If a restaurant is bad but I feel like they tried to accommodate the customer then I would just not review and let it be. However I have to stick to the 1 star for this restaurant and that is only because the food is good. \n\nI walked in at 7:50PM looking for a table for 2. It was well over an hour wait, which we were okay with, but after the hour had passed we had to physically go inside and fight for a table. Finally after being embarrassed and realizing that they had forgot about our party they gave us a table. Since it was late already and we knew what we wanted we ordered everything at once. Appetizer, entr\u00e9e and drinks. We got our appetizers right off the bat and it was some delicious Tom Kah Gia. It however took us over an hour once again to get our food. by that time the soup had turned cold. When we complained to the manager he stated that they offset meals by 10 to 20 mins, but I fought back and told him that we ordered everything at one time, so there should be no reason why things are late. He apologized and said he would take care of us and would do everything he can to make us happy. I thought that maybe this meant a discount on the bill.\n\nWhen the bill came it was full priced and no discount applied to anything. When I asked to see the manager one more time took about 20 mins for him to walk over to us and I had to remind the waiter multiple times to talk with manager, perhaps the worst customer service experience of my life. When he walked over I showed him the bill and asked what have you done to accommodate our hardships. He said \"oh yeah...\" and walked away. He then returned with some ice cream desert, but both me and my party were full and did not want dessert so he basically brought out something that was a complete waste, he should have just discounted the bill with the price of the ice cream. \n\nSo in the end I walked in at 7:50PM left the restaurant at 10:30PM very upset at how the manager had handled the situation. I will not be returning to this restaurant and will warn people of the service here. I don't care how famous the place is or how good the food is, the management is destroying the hard work the cooks and everyone else puts forth. \n\nMy previous experience was just the same, but they actually forgot to bring me an entr\u00e9e I ordered, that was 2 years ago. I am sad to see that things have not changed much :(", "From the outside, this place looks like it would be tiny because the plaza is a bit of a ghost town. When I walked inside the waiting area, I felt like my suspicion was confirmed. The hostess offered for us to wait at their bar (all I remember thinking was how how a place so small could possibly fit a bar), and that was when I found that they do have ample space in the restaurant. \n\nThe food we ordered for the most part were all good, but two notable dishes that pushed me to give 5 stars instead of 4 were the catfish salad and the garlic prawns.", "GREAT customer service.  Their spicy IS spicier than the usual so one of the head waiters Mr. TARN \"saw\"my pain while trying to enjoy our soup and he took it back to \"even it out\"...what a delight. Their food is delicious...definitely coming back. Thanks to my dentist for recommending", "Garlic prawns! A must try \n\nAll the other typical Thai dishes were mediocre. Was pretty expensive for the amount of food they give you. Service was fast, but seems like they were trying to rush you out so they can seat the next party. The restaurant was full within 10 minutes of opening at 530. There was already a couple people there around 515. I would actually give this place less than a 4 stars, but the garlic prawns were amazing! We also got the fried duck with drunken noodles and that was pretty good too.", "Get the whole fried snapper w sauce on the side. The snapper is peeeeeerfect. The sauce you can add as you please. Get the garlic fried shrimp....and eat the shells! They r so crispy, it.s like chips. Get the crispy fried rice. The rice is puffed instead of steamed. The coconut crispy duck panang was xcellent. The sauce is great. Eat it as soon as it gets to the table because the skin might get saucy. Everything was delicious.", "Good food and great atmosphere. Small from the outside but spacious inside. Did not wait in line even though we didn't have reservations.", "Good food, strange location.\n\nThis place is way out of the way in a commercial industrial shopping center. However, it's worth the effort to get here. They have a great selection of items, but I would highly recommend anything from the Northern menu.\nI'm told the chef here is from Northern Thailand and those dishes are his specialty. Be adventurous, it would be a shame to go there and order phad thai. Live a little.", "Good service but mediocre food. After reading all the rave yelp reviews about this place, I was really looking forward to trying out some of their classic dishes -- garlic prawns and crispy duck -- but the food turned out nothing special: it was merely comparable to other neighborhood Thai restaurants yet came with a higher price tag (hence two stars instead of three). I guess they are relying on one-time customers for their business.\n\nThat said, I somewhat appreciated their Bangkok-style soup which has an interesting, complex flavor thanks to the combination of coconut milk, mushrooms, and lemongrass.\n\nOverall, if you are looking for a reservation-worthy experience, I would recommend to look elsewhere...\n\nEdit: two days after I wrote my review, I received a comment full of insults. I sincerely hope this was a display of an inspired following of this restaurant (in that case, I am happy they found a place where they like to eat) rather than a regular business practice.", "Great chef, horrible wait staff and management. The waiter was a socializing so long that our food was cold by the time it came out (10 minutes after the table next to us got theirs, who came in 10 minutes after us). Too bad, the food tastes great, but was legitimately cold. We were starving so we ate half before we sent it back. It's a shame because chef is great but wait staff ruined our meal. Will stick with Chada Thai and Wera Thai, with great chefs and great for wait staff from now on.", "Great food!  Best Thai in town.  Don't expect a very attentive staff.  Make sure you ask for everything you need in anticipation of not seeing your server for a bit.  The wine and beer list is extensive and reasonable. Don't be fooled be the outside of the building.  This is a must try.", "Hands Down the best food in Las Vegas. Go when they first open,very busy every nite.The drunken shrimp is a must.", "Hands down, the BEST Thai restaurant I've ever been to. \n\nPlease make sure you get yourself over here if you make it to Vegas and you love Thai food.\n\nWe had the beef salad, yellow curry, pot stickers, and tom kha gai. We also had a few ciders and some sake. IT WAS ALL DELICIOUS. Just so good. And a HUGE sake list. \n\nThe restaurant itself was in a run down looking strip mall and once you are inside you can feel how long this place has been in business. They have photos on the wall of customers over the years. The place feels old and well loved.\n\nThe dining room was pretty large-two rooms I believe. We waited for our table at the bar and basically got our drinks when our table was ready. The service was friendly and fast and I really can't emphasize how good the food was.\n\nIt wasn't a fancy place, but you could certainly take a date here. \n\nMy only complaint would be it was a little loud, but I find that to be true of so many restaurants these days :)", "Holy hotness!  This place is absolutely delicious.  I am use to telling Thai places to give me the max hot level they have, but level 8 kicked my ass here. Loved it!  I'll be back next time I'm in town, their menu is long and there's lots to try!  Service was great too.", "I always come back here every time I go to Vegas.  Had I was writing this review 3 years ago, it would have been a 5 stars.  \n\nHowever, I am disappointed this time around.  The charbroiled shrimp with chili is still good, but the fried rice, the hot and sour soup with sea bass was not very good. The fish was not tender like before.   The sticky rice and mango was too soggy this time.  I had plan to eat here twice this time and my wife talked about it for the last 3 years she wants to go back to this place to eat.  However, the food disappoints.  I didn't believe my brother, who lives in Vegas; he said that  it is not the same as before.", "I always heard about this place while in Vegas, but never ventured far enough off strip until recently to try it. \n\nThe place is small and in a strip mall. The road to get there is slightly confusing and it feels like you're in a factory. The inside is quite nice but small, luckily there was no line.\n\nWe ordered a curry and a noodles dish. Serving sizes are smaller than we are used to compared to our normal Thai place in Los Angeles. Food was good, but not worth the \"hype\". In comparison, we still prefer our normal place in Los Angeles - Original Hoy Ka Noodles (see review).\n\nWorth trying for the hype, and the northern dishes. Slightly more pricey.", "I am never disappointed eating at Lotus. This is the only restaurant I have eaten at two nights in a row. The only restaurant I will wait an hour to get in.  I have eaten here at least a dozen times over the last three years. I always go with big groups no one has ever been disappointed. The garlic prawns, drunken noodle shrimp, Tom Kai soup and sea bass are amazingly good. I don't eat duck I really don't like it normally, but here they make it so juice and good that I love it.  I love the Chang beer it goes perfect with your meal. I recently have tried the rice with mango and it was delicious.\n\nHands down my go to restaurant when I am visiting Vegas.", "I did it! I went to a sketchy strip mall where pple almost hit our car twice because they were in a hurry to get to the liquor store across the mall. Outside and inside are day and night. Like another yelper said - wanna be fancy. We ordered over $100 worth of food and over all 2 were ok dishes - drunken noodle prawns and sticky rice and mango for dessert... For all the hype and what not really not worth it. Most of these wonderful awards they've won stopped around a few years ago. \n\nI'd say for the thrill of almost getting killed from the drivers and the sketchiness of the area. Stay for the adult day care located next door.", "I finally got to eat at Lotus of Siam this weekend and very glad that I did. \n\nFirst, I recommend making a reservation or prepare to wait in the long line outside. I book a reservation in advance and we sat down once our time came up. \n\nMy friends and I ordered a lot of food. I had the Green Curry with chicken and it was delicious. We finished our meal with the dessert combo, which included fried bananas, mango sticky rice, and coconut ice cream. It was the best ever. \n\nIt was definitely worth coming off strip to eat here. Would definitely come here again!", "I got the crispy duck khao moi and it was absolutely delicious. One of the best dishes I've had across different cultural eating. Great spice for me personally at 6/10 stars. I probably could have done the 7/8 but I didn't want to ruin my first experience by overdoing it. The duck was very crispy on the outside and the meat was still tender and juicy. The flavor of the curry was great and wasn't just spice. The noodles and pickled vegetables were a good balance to my palate. Great dish. Only comment on the bad side is that he cost of this dish is in the high 20's so I wanted to order more but would have ended up having a tab of almost 70 bucks for two dishes and an appetizer.", "I had the crispy duck and garlic prawns. They were very tasteful. However expensive for small portions.", "I have finally made it here. My first time and it was good. I am a novice to Thai food. I did follow the advice and ordered off the northern Thai part of the menu. I had the northern sausage, the red chili dip, crispy duck with mint and Thai basil and chili. I finished off with mango and sticky rice topped with coconut milk and mong bee seeds. \n\nI got the heat at 2-3. Next time I'll go for 4-5.", "I heard about this place on The Best I Ever Ate on the food network so I was super excited to try it out. It's of the strip away from the glitz of Vegas. even with that I was a little dismayed when I saw the exterior. IM GLAD I did not let that dissuade me. once you get through the door it's a nice clean grade A establishment and the food are AWESOME . if you go to Las Vegas Please give them a try the food is great and the staff is very friendly and inviting even when they are super super busy. the stuffed chicken wings are a MUST!!! I will always come here when I visit Sin City. I hope you will too", "I love coming here to eat whenever I travel to Vegas. I was just there a few days ago with my family & they loved every dish we picked off their menu with many varieties. The quality of their ingredients are always fresh & their food are very unique & flavourful. I find not many \"Asian\" restaurants in Vegas delivers the authenticity nor delicious flavours but this place is a hidden gem that lives up to my standards! I especially love their juicy satay skewers & green curry! (Drooling) The price is pretty reasonable for its deliciousness & in the city, however the portions are smaller than the usual Thai restaurants I go to. It is always packed especially on Fridays-Sundays, less waiting time to go during a weekday night! The outside looks very sketchy & the inside looks outdated, its decor consists of over 100 framed photos of famous people who ate there with a large display room of wine bottles. One of the things I wish they will improve on is providing free WiFi for its guests like most restaurants nowadays, especially when you have to wait over an hour for a table with no TV inside. You must check this place out if you're craving some Asian flare when you're in town! :)", "I mean seriously, Thai food doesnt get better than this. From the Bible sized wine list to the drunken seafood noodles, try it all! you won't be disappointed. Just one tip, be prepared to wait a while if you go on a weekend or during busy convention times or whatnot. Also, it's much less questionable looking inside than out... dont judge it by the scuzzy strip mall location.", "I saw this restaurant on parts unknown and definitely wanted to stop by next time I was in Vegas. I really admit that it did not disappoint. We got there and the hour wait was worth it. Just grab a drink at their bar and check out all the celebrity photos on the walls. \n\nThe food was amazing, the staff was beyond quick and courteous. They have a lot of thai staff there and they took care of us as if we were family. I wouldn't hesitate to come back.", "I was craving the soft shell crab but I didn't come here to not try their northern style dishes! And I definitely didn't haul ass from Arizona back to Vegas to eat pad Thai. \n\nThere were so many to choose from. We went with the Nam Prick Noom, Northern green chili dip dish, and the Nua Nam Tok beef dish. \n\nThe beef dish came out really quick. But it was luke warm. It was very flavorful. Many herbs and spices not used in Thai restaurants where I'm from. It tasted authentic. But there was a overpowering taste of cilantro. Loved the spice to it.\n\nThe chili dish wasn't what I expected. It was a cold dish. Green chili with additional items to bring out the flavor, including chicharrones?? Although weird, I really liked it.\n\nTip: don't forget to order a side of rice. It doesn't automatically come with the dishes.\n\nThe service was ok. I asked for recommendations and he just pointed out the northern Flavors page and the chief's specials. But I wasn't really given further advice. We weren't in a rush or anything but that's usually how I indicate that the service is slow. When I'm on my phone and realize 5 minutes passed and my check hasn't been picked up. Because we were there when they were closing till dinner, I'm almost positive we were forgotten a few times as they were focused on closing shop.\n\nThe place is decorated with a bunch of pictures of celebrities, reviews, and authentic pictures. A beautiful wine cellar to stare at. I'm glad I experienced it but my high expectations wasn't met.", "I was told to wait for 1 hour (Tuesday night). When I got in, there were many empty tables. Do they have to make it look like they are real busy? \n\nThe Tom Yum soup is way too sour.  It taste like vinegar. Took only 1 spoon. Yuck! Wasting $16 for the soup. \nGreen curry alone is $12 (round up from 11.95), added $3 for shrimp. $15 for a small bowl of curry. Ridiculous expensive.\nA small dish of seabass $31. Not even enough for 1 person. Ridiculous expensive. \nThai Salad with just salad and a small bowl of sauce $9. Ridiculous expensive. Should not even called a dish.\n18% gratuity automatic added to receipt for a party of 5.\n\nRidiculous expensive. Food is not good enough for that ridiculous high price. I will never come back.", "I went here at around 11.30 so there was no line at all. I was immediately directed to a table. One of the best thai restaurants I've ever had! The crispy duck with panang curry was super delicious. The crispiness of the duck skin and the content flavor of the panang curry made this dish really good! I also tried the garlic prawn and it was da bomb! I ordered the crispy pork with chinese broccoli but it was just okay. The only downside to this restaurant was the price! I spent around $80 to try those 3 dishes plus a Thai tea.", "I will not wait for 2 hours for this place but I will always make sure to eat here whenever I am in vegas~~~~\n\nTIP: go on a weekday during lunch right when they open and I guarantee that you will not wait in line or wait as much compared to dinner.\n\nWe feasted on:\nGarlic Prawns-- so meaty and the fried skins super crispy!! (make sure you dip them into the duck curry)\nTom Yum- the best i have had in my life- perfect balance of flavors- most of the thai food restuarants would have way too much sourness that ruins the rest of the ingredients natural flavors\nPad see wu- yum yum yummu chewy rice noodles in my tummy\n.. the duck curry?- didn't really like the consistency of the noodles but... the sauce- i will mixed it up with rice anytime\n\ngotta go back to try the rest of their menu soon ^^", "I've been going to Lotus since moving to Las Vegas 17 years ago and almost always gravitate to the d the steamed sea bass with ginger seasoning.  This dish is a true delight...always very high quality fish, usually prepared to preserve the delicate texture of the fresh fish and usually well seasoned.The bass is served on a bed of steamed veggies.  The Tom Yum Kai hot and sour soup with chicken, lime juice, lemon grass and straw mushrooms is spectacular and consistent in quality.\n\nSeveral years ago Lotus did a large expansion,  started catering to tour buses, and in my opinion, at the expense of small groups and locals.  That change has resulted in service screw ups, including forgetting parts of an order several times, being served the wrong entree,  unusually long waits for the arrival of food and at times wait staff that was non-communicative at their best and outright rude at their worst.\n\nCombine the above with the inability to make reservations online or by phone prior to their opening time each day, the inability to get anything but a busy signal once they open, and the mass feeding frenzy created by bus arrivals that has lowered the ambience from mediocre (hey, for years it's been about the food in spite of the mediocre ambience) to an ambience somewhere between an Army mess hall and a bus station waiting room, I've given up on going to Lotus.  When they're good they're really really good and when they are bad they are terrible.  In the past two years they have typically been close to or at terrible.\n\nOne way to enjoy the typically outstanding food is to order carryout.  I was uncertain the first time because I didn't know how well cooked fish would taste after a 20-minute car ride, but the answer is that is was excellent....excellent enough that we've used the carryout process several times recently.", "I've heard about the crazy long lines outside of this place and I've had it bookmarked for a while. I'm an avid Thai food eater so this place was definitely where I wanted to eat for my first non-partying weekend in Vegas. I went in on a rainy Friday evening, around 6:50pm, the weekend of the Pacquiao vs Bradley 3 boxing match. They quoted me for a wait time of 30mins but we actually got called to be seated in 3mins. They have an automated system where they text you when you're table is ready. \n\nThe inside was nice and cozy. I really like the glass wine case that you see when you walk in. The lighting was dim but not too dark to set the ambiance just right. The place seemed clean although I don't know how much I trust carpet in a restaurant..\n\nWe ordered a Pad Thai, Pad See Ew, beef Penang curry, and a Thai tea. They brought out the 2 noodle dishes first and then the curry. I ordered beef penang but the waiter brought out chicken. A minor hiccup, I simply told the waiter I had ordered beef and so he had it changed for me. \n\nI judge a Thai restaurant by their Pad Thai and their Thai tea. I must say I was a little disappointed with the pad Thai. It was a little dry and lacking in flavor. The Thai tea was great though. The beef Penang curry was good. I got a 3 on their spicy-ness scale and it was perfect for me. The Pad See Ew dish was the best thing we ordered though. It was moist and flavorful. I would definitely order the Pad See Ew over the Pad Thai the next time I come here.", "If you are deciding what great Thai place to go to this evening I would definitely choose \n\n*** Chada Thai & Wine ***\nor\n*** Thai Street Cafe ***\nover Lotus anyday. I'd have to say I was disappointed with the quality, size portion, and pricing at Lotus. Specifially for the portion and quality, it's one of those places that's Overrated. \n\nApps- we got the #14 Nam Kao Tod because everyone was raving about it on Yelp. I found it to be small in portion and very very salty. Also they doused it In way too many limes, that's all I could taste. \n\nMain Courses- my date and I chose to split the Roasted Duck Curry (4/5 stars - Chada has better duck dishes though)  & Shrimp Pad Thai (4/5 stars)- can't really mess up pad Thai. \n\nDessert - mango sticky rice 5/5 stars  Yum\n\nOverall it was a delicious place for dinner but for $80-100 I would chose somewhere else. \n\nAlso - my date and I both had stomach aches for 2 hours after we both ate and fiery bowel movements lol . I'm asain and my date and I both love spicy foods but we've never had any unpleasantness leaving Thai or spicy places. So I'm not sure if it was the spice or the food, we only got a standard 6/10 which is pretty much mild. Didn't taste that spicy either, but we had cramps all night. Beware.", "In the middle of the backside of an empty run down strip mall is the best Thai food I have ever had. Open the door and you are transported to a large bustling restaurant, nice big bar, and comfortable seating. Great energy.  The staff are all super friendly and attentive. \n\nThe menu is wide and deep with more than five types of Tom Yum you can order from, and a long list of Thai salads not off a traditional Americanized Thai menu.  \n\nDefinitely order from the northern menu. Khao Soi (it is awesome) or one of the Nam Prik dips. Crispy duck Penang is off the hook. The Penang is very creamy and rich. Soft shell crab with drunken noodles was good but nothing special. Would have been better if the soft shell wasn't battered and deep fried. \n\nBeen to Vegas 10+ times and this is the first restaurant that will be a \"must visit\" every time I return.", "It is an amazing Thai restaurant if you order the Northern Thai specialties. Don't get me wrong the other menu items are still very good such as their pad thai, but their brilliance shines on the northern food. Definitely the go to place in Las Vegas for amazing Thai food!", "It's amazing.  Stick to the Northern menu.  That's what they do so well that you just won't find anywhere else.  Maybe Northern Thailand.", "It's been, oh 5 years since I've step foot in Lotus of Siam. I had the lunch buffet and remember not being super impressed. So when my boss said we were going to Lotus of Siam for dinner, I was a bit confused. He said the food was amazing, and it turned out he was right. Unfortunately, the service was pretty terrible, so I won't be running back.\n\nWe had a \"reservation\" yet had to wait 10-15 minutes to get our table. With it being 110 degrees outside, that sucked. Once seated, it was another 20 minutes before we could order, and only because we pretty much tackled an employee to take our order. The ordering process was very rude, as we seemed rushed and weren't helped by any recommendations as we had asked for.\n\nWe were brought three different plates that weren't ours. We had ordered so much food we didn't know what was ours and what wasn't, and the staff kind of scolded us for beginning to eat a plate that was set on our table. Get your act together, guys!\n\nAs I said, the food was all pretty amazing. That's the only thing saving this from being a 2* review. Everything they put in front of us was delicious. I really don't remember a bad dish.\n\nWhen all was said and done, we were left with a $50 per person bill, which seemed like a lot for the style of restaurant we were in.", "Just had some lunch here after reading the reviews. A solid 3-star thai place for me. The best part was the very affordable pricing, I had a Thai Iced Coffee, and appetizer, and main soup for $25. \n\nThe iced coffee was delicious as it always is, the appetizer was the crispy rice with sour pork cubes. This was eh. Just deep fried rice and the \"pork cubes\" are really just cut up ham that you could get down the street at the super market. \n\nI had the Northern style (no coconut milk) Tom Kum Kai (chicken soup) but I subbed the chicken for prawns. This was good, not amazing, not really good, just...good. \n\nI'd go again, but if you're into Thai food, don't expect anything as amazing as the other reviews would have you believe.", "Last night a group of us had dinner here and it was one of the biggest let-down dining experiences I have ever had. First of all it was over \nan hour wait to be seated. Then then after a long wait for our food it arrived cold. When we complained we were told that as a rule they serve their food at room temperature!\nThis was food that was pricey and the portions were small. The service was terrible as they did not even make an effort to accommodate our preferences. We came because it had good ratings and we wanted to try it out based on it's advertised \"exquisite cuisine\". At least the food tasted good even though we lost our appetite with the way it was served and the bad service! Never going back again!!", "Lotus of Siam lived up to the hype. Went to the back of the menu and ordered from Northern Specialties. Got the curried egg noodle dish. Also the thai sausage. Sausage was a little dry, but still very tastey. Flavors are vibrant. The spice really hits you. Also got the basil fried rice which was excellent.", "Lotus of Siam really is worth the drive across town. I love Thai food and this restaurant is great. The service is fabulous. We had a reservation and when we arrived there was a line waiting to get in. We got in and we were sat right away. Our order for drinks and food was taken as well. Everything was prepared to perfection. I will definitely be returning. They have a wonderful and attentive staff. Food is excellent.", "Love this place never can decide with a wife menu but had a great time and loved the food", "Loved going here! As a non resident, it was great to find a local place in such an odd old strip mall like location. The \"strip mall\" is now kind of a foodie haven with various cool restaurants dotted throughout the U-shaped building structure. Once inside Lotus of Siam is a homey packed space with two dining rooms, quick service and authentic Thai. We ordered as a group and ate family style so it's hard to recollect all the dishes I had, but I had no complaints, except it seemed a bit pricey for thai.", "Loving this restaurant!!!\n\nI've been meaning to try this place, but always forgot to make RSVP early. This time, I called the day before, and got a late dinner reservation for next day. I was very nervous and afraid of the hype, but very pleased with the experience.\n\nFrom yelpers' recommendations, I got Garlic prawn, Drunken noodle with sea bass, Crispy duck panang, Nam Kao Tod and Pad Thai. Everything was very good, and I can't wait to try other dishes in our next visit. For us, the must order dishes were garlic prawn, and sea bass. The curry sauce is amazing, but the duck was just okay.\n\nI thought the dishes would be small, but it was plenty for the three of us. Our waiter even told us we had ordered too much, but ours eyes were bigger than our stomach :) \nService was better than the average Asian restaurants, so it was a plus. Pricing is higher, yet reasonable for the quality.", "Luckily we made advanced reservation. I was surprised how big the restaurant was. It had multiple big rooms all filled with customers. The service was attentive and polite. We ordered the Khao Soi, which is crispy duck over egg noodles and curry sauce, chicken larb, which is ground chicken tossed in a spicy, lime sauce, and crispy garlic prawns. The food was tasty, however, it was nothing exceptional for which we would come back. We also thought the food was overpriced- the Khao Soi and garlic prawns were each $27-28. The portion was average. The meal for two cost $77 before tips.", "Make a reservation before coming! If you don't, I would recommend getting to the restaurant before open (around 5 pm) to start standing in line- especially if you're trying to go on a weekend. \n\nThe crispy garlic prawns is definitely the highlight. Perfectly crispy and garlicky but consistently a little on the salty side for my taste. However, the flavor is so good that I can't complain. \n\nThe crispy duck panang curry is also very good. You could adjust the spiciness level (up to 10) and warning- their spicy is SPICY!! \n\nI wouldn't get some of the dishes you could order at normal thai restaurants. We ordered pad see ew and pad kee mao to supplement our meal and neither were memorable (i would even argue that it was not that great). Their papaya salad though was a perfect combo of tangy and sweet!", "Mmmm the duck curry got me here.. I can't even remember what else I liked about this place, but everything I have ever ordered is amazing! Expect to wait, this place can get crazy!", "Multiple choices but soooo yummy. Tom Kha soup and Prawns in a blanket for appetizers and delicious!", "My friend wanted to go here, and so we ventured out at 9:30 on a Wednesday night to find it. Passed it at least twice because it's hidden behind a mostly-dark, what appears mostly-vacant strip mall thing. We turned into it and, there, amidst other mostly-dark and sketchy-looking places, was Lotus of Siam. We really weren't sure we had the right place. We went in, asked to be put on the list, told it would be 40-45 minutes (let me say again, 9:30 on a Wednesday night), and we gave them our number to text. After about 10-15 minutes of wandering around the dark and sketchy area, we got a text, and sat down to one of the best meals I've had, Thai or otherwise. \n\nWe didn't have wine, but they have an amazing-looking glassed-in wine cellar. I ordered a red curry - smallish servings but AMAZINGLY good. My friend ordered a duck dish - I'm not a duck fan, but I would have eaten it all if he hadn't. Just simply amazingly good food. Go, don't be scared, you'll love it. I'd go back in an instant.", "My husband and I are in Vegas after the Memorial weekend.  I've heard about this place from a friend back at home so we want to check it out.  It's definitely worth a try!  The location is off of the main tourist section of LV so not easy to find.  It looks sketchy from the outside but you'll be surprised once you enter on the setting and ambiance of the restaurant. The staff are very friendly and attentive.  The food is not the best Thai food I've had but definitely up there in rank.  We would absolutely go back!", "My husband and I love Yelp because it never steers us wrong!!  This restaurant was delicious!!!  We got the potstickers appetizer, yum!  Then we followed it with the crispy duck in coconut milk, garlic prawn & pork belly!!  Man oh man was that an experience!  You will have an hours wait or so to get in, but believe me it's well worth it!!!  For just the duck alone was mouth-watering!:). The service was excellent!:) don't let the area of location throw you off!  It's amazing!  A definite must!", "My wife and I enjoyed dinner here. We often go to a Thai restaurant near our home but my wife thought to go here for a change. The food was similar to our other restaurant with a slightly higher price point. Service was great. Everyone there ( and there was a lot) was friendly and quick to help. I'd recommend  this place for smaller parties  (upwards of 4 at most)", "Normally I would not write a Yelp review unless I've frequented the place at least two times, but the food was so good that I just have to give it 5 stars. I've been to Thailand and understand that it can be difficult to replicated flavors because it's not always easy to get fresh kaffir leaves, Thai basil, fresh coconut, etc. But everything we ordered here reminded me of Thailand! However, I can't speak for the Northern dishes because I've never been there, but everything I tried was heavenly. Can't wait to come back here! \n\nBy the way, what other reviewers said about how the area is sketchy is true. Please Uber or taxi to and from for your safety.", "Not impressed by the food. Service was friendly but the food was not to par. Definitely has a Chinese fusion rather than authentic thai food.", "Not that this place needs my review, but I'm surprised I've never written one considering the number of times I've come. It's almost a tradition to come here for Thanksgiving day dinner.\nAlways make reservations. Always.\nIf you've heard of the dish in Utah, don't order it. It will just be something you've had before, but better. Order things that are Northern Thai specialities we don't see here. The best thing to do is put yourself into your server's hands. Tell him you want shellfish, or garlic, or duck, or ... Let him know the kind of spice level you tolerate. Then let him recommend dishes. I've never had a dish I didn't like the server recommended. Also, always get the Garlic Prawns. That's just a given. Also get the recommended fish dish. The sea bass they always have is a good starting point, if the server doesn't have anything better.", "O...m.....g. This place is so bomb. Don't even eat the pad thai or other entrees. The Shrimp and Duck is what you should come here for. It is so addicting and amazing. I take the challenge to find something similar to this flavorful Shrimp in Orange county. There has to be one !!!", "Once again - surprised at the quality of Asian choices once you get off The Strip.  This time Thai and Southeast Asian.  \n\nBut first - do not be alarmed when you actually find the place.  In a very shabby strip mall well off The Strip - a few crappy stores and eateries, a few boarded up places, a smattering of panhandlers and transients (trying real hard to be politically correct).  Look past all this and go in the front door - and prepare to be pleasantly amazed.\n\nVery large restaurant - crowded, hell of a wine cellar (in a Thai place - must be a Vegas thing).  Bit of a wait but not intolerable.  Polite and knowledgeable staff - and willing to take the time to explain the enormous menus and really help with your selection.\n\nStarted off with deep fried tofu and beef larb - off to a very good start.  A variety of main courses - and just a ridiculous amount of offerings to choose from.  Finally settled on the Rad Na, Nua Nam Tok and Koi Soi - all prepared well, plenty to eat and enough to share.  A good sampling for future visits.  Strong but not too strong Thai Ice Tea to wash it all down.\n\nJust remember - suck it up and make your way inside.  Well worth it", "One of the best kept secrets in Las Vegas for authentic, spicy, flavorful Thai food.\n\nI've been coming here for about 10 years now.  I love their Thai curries.  I used to love their lunch buffets but they stopped that about a year ago.  I don't know why because it was popular.\n\nThey lose one star because staff are consistently unfriendly & indifferent.  And, although the decor was updated a few years ago it still lacks ambience and privacy.\n\nTiming is everything.  If you want to be seated on a Friday or Saturday night make sure you have a booking first otherwise you'll be waiting outside for over an hour and their tiny waiting area only has a couple of seats.", "One of the best thai food I've ever had!...and also the most unique variation of it! There were so many options on the menu that I have never seen on other thai menus before. The Garlic Prawns lived up to the Yelp hype! Super crispy and oh so delicious! I never really liked eating shrimp shells that much, even when they were fried in Chinese cooking, but my oh my...this was totally different. It was so crunchy that it felt like I was eating potato chips (which is exactly how they described it) SO GOOD!! I wish I didn't save this place till the last night we were here to try it, or I would have been here a couple more times before our trip was over. This place will be my first stop on our next Vegas trip!", "Overall an enjoyable meal. We lined up about 30 min prior to opening and got the first diner seating.", "Place is great.  Had to wait about an hour but the food was well worth it.  Soups are great.  Will definitely be back. Nice break from the overpriced hotels on the strip.  Outstanding.", "Prefer Weera Thai which is a cute boutique Thai Restaurant with incredible food!\nWeera Thai Restaurant\nwww.weerathai.com\n3839 W Sahara Ave Ste 9, Las Vegas, NV 89102", "Price update! Crazy increases! It is starting to become to expensive to eat here!\n\nGarlic Prawns - from $24.95 to $27.95\nDrunken Noodle Sea Bass - from $29.95 to $30.95\nPanang Crispy Duck - from $24.95 to $27.95\n\nNew food I tried,\n\nPad Thai Chicken - $11.95 - The pad thai had a very strong deep tamarind sauce. The noodles were over cooked and mushy. Chicken was basic.\n\nThai Fried Rice Beef - $10.95 - Good rice dish. Nothing that blew my mind. \n\nTom Kah Kai - $14.95 - Very complex soup. You get the sweet coconut battling with the sour lime flavor. You get a ton of chicken and mushrooms. Good amount to share, we had 6 people, I do not think I could have this alone as a meal.\n\nStorypoint Cabernet Sauvignon - $30 a bottle\n\nStill the best overall meal I have had in Vegas. Prices are getting to be ridiculous though.", "Probably one of The best Thai restaurants in the country let alone Vegas.  Awesome wine list. Don't let the ugly shopping center detour you from eating at this restaurant.", "Probably one of the best authentic Thai cuisine here in Vegas. Most times this place is packed, so you better call first to check if you can get a reservation. But its totally worth the wait!", "Really great food! Tried several dishes and no complaints... Spicy chicken wings, crab fried rice, garlic fried prawns, crispy duck with curry, mango sticky rice, papaya salad, and more.", "Really great thai food! Try the pad won sen, pad se ew, or fried rice. Will definitely be returning", "Reduced portions and the soup was watered down. This place used to be good. I don't know what happened. Told staff that we were unhappy but they didn't care :/", "Review #666, written 06/06/16--because Lotus of Siam is devilishly good '(^^)'\n\nIn Asian literature, lotuses serve as a motif to symbolize inner beauty, because lotuses em emerge as elegant flowers amidst mundane lily pads in muddy waters. Lotus of Siam epitomizes this as an unpretentious restaurant serving Thai food so earth-shattering, it is as if a pack of elephants has trampled through your prior memories of pad Thai and tom yum.\n\nLotus of Siam was unearthed when a friend heard about it on an Anthony Bourdain show, and it was placed on the Vegas food list. Although the wait is notorious, we got there a little after 9pm and it was only a 10-minute wait, during which we perused the extensive menu (and it still took quite some time to decide once seated; the pages of Thai delicacies were endless!). The catch for the last seating is that the kitchen was taking last orders, so there was no chance to add anything. We decided to err on the side of ordering too much, and it was the best decision we made on the entire Vegas trip.\n\n(+++) GARLIC PRAWNS (deep fried prawns with shells, almost like potato chips, saut\u00e9ed with our special garlic sauce, topped with ground black pepper) Almost like potato chips. Love that description! The hype cannot be more real, and you likely won't be able to eat shrimp the same way again. The shrimp itself was fresh and succulent, and the highlight was the shell which was deliciously umami with a kick from the pepper and garlic. I devoured it even though I usually detest shrimp shells (hurray, finally I get my glucosamine). \n\n(+++) TOM KAH KAI (Bangkok Style; a distinctive soup of sliced chicken with coconut milk, straw mushrooms, galanga, lemon grass and a touch of lime juice) The spices and seasonings render a tantalizing complexity, bold and adventurous like an adventure to Thai street food, yet simultaneously unique and meticulous like a long-standing family recipe. I especially liked the touch of coconut milk, making it indulgent but not too creamy. Probably one of the more under-rated dishes as the garlic prawns steal the spotlight. As a bonus, this is served in a pot with an open flame, which looks exotic and neat in pictures (but the shape made it difficult to scoop the soup towards the end... when we were all craving more sopu)\n\n(++) KHAO SOI (typical Burmese influenced dish, served with egg noodles in a curry base with a touch of coconut cream, garnished with sliced red onions, lime and pickled vegetables) We decided to get the beef version since the famous duck khao soi was quite a lot pricier. Like the rest of the dishes, the flavors were untamed with rich curry paired with coconut cream, contrasted by lime and pickled vegetables. The noodles were soft and mild, quiescent in juxtaposition with the fiery broth, and the wonton crisps added a playful garnish. Beef was okay, nothing special (thankfully so since I'm running out of my repertoire of food description words)\n\n(++) PAD THAI (stir-fried thin rice noodles with eggs, green onions, bean sprouts and chopped peanuts on the side) Homey and more familiar, though still noticeably different from your typical pad Thai. Their version was not greasy and very well balanced, at the intersection of aromatic, spicy, and savory. We took the rest to-go and enjoyed heavenly leftovers two days later as our last meal in Vegas (even after our palates had been spoiled by Bacchanal).\n\nIt totaled $81 for 3 people, which is considerably more expensive than your typical Thai joint but a completely different level. The Northern Thai style is distinctive, made even more so by the chef's style. According to the website, she utilizes what has been passed down in generations. Lotus of Siam has no neon lights or Corinthian columns and is unimpressively located in a strip mall, but the food speaks for itself--flawless in technique, exotic in flavor profile, and interpretative in embedding the culinary tradition of the chef's roots.", "Saw this place from Anthony bourdain's tv\nShow. Place was packed on a Thursday afternoon. Got seated right away, avoided the buffet, went straight for garlic prawns and the back menu. Husband at a spicy curry with extra rice and I decided to go for the drunken shift shell crab. DELISH! Thai ice tea was amazing too. Now I see why this place has good reviews, authentic thai food made with amazing spices. Portions were large, and service was nothing to complain about. Just thought it was in a weird strip mall location. Def worth a shot if you're in Vegas and like thai food.", "Service is exceptional here.  Some of the best in the area.  I had the chicken shrimp salad which was a little spicy.  My daughter had Northern red curry with chicken and vegetables on a spicy level 5.  She liked it, but I had a taste and it was too spicy for me.  Looking forward to more visits at this fine establishment.", "Service was excellent.  Polite and gave good recommendations.\n\nFood listed in order of preference:\nCrispy shrimp\nSea bass\nDuck with Penang curry\nCrab fried rice\nChinese broccoli \nPad seew", "Simply awesome , great Thai food, there northern if you aren't into coconut , lots of wine to chose from , happy folks feeding the happy", "Skip the strip, get a ride to this sketchy hole in the wall. That reveals a world class thai restaurant. Definitely the best Thai outside of the Land. Try the Prawns with the flesh and the shell fried together.", "So overrated. Just because Anthony Bourdain liked this place,  doesn't mean the food is the best in the world. So expensive for thai dishes which were unremarkable and bland. The portions are small.  And the prices are big.  The only dish that was worth remembering was their popular egg noodles tossed in curry.  It was different, hence why I still remember it.  Other than that, everything else was unmemorable. I feel like this place is a tourist trap...and we definitely took the bait on this one :/", "Some of the things are really good. Curries are delicious and so are pad thai. However, I wouldn't recommend the stuffed chicken wings, too oily and the flavors are really heavy. Overall, I would recommend coming here.", "THE FOOD HERE IS DELICIOUS. You must have a reservation and do not be late because you will lose your spot.  If you do not have a reservation the line to get in is ridiculously long and you might not get a table. The staff is extremely attentive and the prices are very reasonable.", "Take away the hype and rave reviews, and you will see that Lotus of Siam delivers solid Thai food.\n\nFor years, I had heard only great things about Lotus of Siam.  I have had my fair share of Thai food so I did not understand how one place could be so highly regarded.  While I could honestly say I was not blown away by anything I tried, I did enjoy the flavors and the service leaving me with a great dining experience.  Plus, their menu is pretty extensive so if I am in Vegas again, I am ready to make another trip to try some of their other items.\n\nHere are some of the things that I tried on my first trip:\n\nNam Kao Tod: A crispy rice dish that sizzles with heat and flavor.  Each kernel of rice was almost fried to a crisp in an oil with a mixture of peppers and spices.  They provide several slices of cabbage and cucumber which help provide a nice counterbalance to the rice.  \n\nGarlic Prawns: Given the high regard for these, here I was a little underwhelmed.  When the dish arrives, you will see the piece of meat hanging from the shell, all of which had been fried to a nice crisp.  While it smells absolutely like something you would come to expect from a dish called garlic prawns, the meat itself was a little lacking in that garlic flavor.  The true flavor actually came from the shell itself which was not necessarily as enjoyable to bite into.  \n\nRoasted Duck Curry: A balance of spicy and sweet with generous pieces of duck make this a recommend.  Sure, in terms of flavor, it is what you would come to expect from your usual curries.  However, the actually chunks that were in the curry were impressive - fresh and vibrant. \n\nIn terms of service, they were really great.  The servers were very attentive to our needs and would do things to make sure everything was okay.  The parking lot is huge so no worries about that but you may have to worry about the wait.  It is usually recommended to make reservations which is possible online.  If you are unable to secure a reservation online, you can put your name on the waitlist online as well.  Make sure to arrive on time or you risk losing your spot in line!\n\nOverall, Lotus of Siam does have good Thai food that is definitely worth checking out!", "Taxi driver told us about it and it was pure bliss. Perfection. A total treat and so glad we went. We had the wings and duck curry and a few Thai iced teas. Glad I went for sure.", "The Lotus is going into my Vegas rotation from here on out. Despite visiting LV multiple times a year, I had never tried this well known Thai establishment. I was very impressed with the food and service. Based on Anthony Bourdain's recommendations on his TV show, I skipped right past the first dozen pages or so and went directly to the \"Northern Specialty\" pages. My party ordered the Khoa Soi, Red Chili Dip, and the Northern Larb. The waiter asked us how spicy we preferred on a scale of 1-10. Now I pride myself on enjoying very spicy food, but the #7 level of spicy really made me sweat. My table also ordered a sticky rice for every person at the table. DEFINITELY GET THE STICKY RICE. I wish I'd saved more room that day and ordered more at LoS, because the food was fantastic. In fact, I may need to push up my next trip to LV in order to get back to LoS ASAP!", "The best Thai resto I have ever been to. All the dishes we ordered were awesome esp the garlic prawns which are to die for. I wanna go back already! Too bad we have to drive 5hrs to get here.", "The best!!! Food is absolutely delicious!! Garlic prawns are to die for.. excellent service and definitely worth the wait. Go!!", "The crispy duck curry was amazing!!!!!! Enough said. The service was also on point, very attentive and super nice. Will be coming back whenever I go to Vegas.", "The food is very good without a doubt but very expensive when considering the portions. I did find that it had some Thai food that I've been looking for for a very long time and that no one else made so that was awesome. The garlic shrimp was great but the prices really are a bit much for what you are getting. We also ordered the crab drunken noodles and it was good but not as good as their garlic shrimp dish. This place is literally printing money.", "The food was ok. The waiters suck and food was pricey.  I politely asked for a few things (water and another side of rice) yet it did not come until the I had asked a third time. Of course when requesting my check, it did not come. I had to go to the desk.", "The food was really tasty. Try from the northern menu. Portions are medium sized. Lunch service may take a long time but it's worth it. Don't come here in a rush. Parking is very easy.", "The fried shrimp and the duck curry were both yummylicious!  I usually don't go off the strip for food in Vegas but I definitely will go back when I'm in town.\n\nI can eat a plate of fried shrimp and that duck curry all to myself (and I'm not even a duck fan).  Portions are unfortunately not that big and it is not cheap, especially for a Thai restaurant, but oh man the taste!", "The highest rated Thai restaurant on Zagat.  This restaurant lives up to that reputation.", "The portions of food are really large, curry taste very well, but the meat taste a little bit dry, and not very tasty when eat inside of meat. Pork has some fat which I don't really like, and some ducks aren't very crispy. I noticed this restaurant won the best of city in 2006,2007, but I feel not very satisfying considering the fame of this restaurant.", "The reason that I did not give them 5 stars is because I believe that Kung Fu on Valley View is a better and slightly less expensive restaurant.  But Lotus of Siam is very good.  Yelp wants the attire.  I believe that anything from full formal to basic shirt and pants would be just fine.  I would not go there in cut offs.", "There was a lot of hype created prior to coming here from my friends. Honestly, the location was a hole in the wall. From the outside, it looked pretty ghetto. However, the restaurant inside looked a lot better. There were plenty of pictures of past celebrities that has been through the restaurant.\n\nThe service was on point and attentive , nothing to complain about there.\n\nI'm not a big fan of Thai food, but this place lived quite up to the hype. We started with a squid salad and some soup that I thought were okay and a bit spicy for someone who doesn't eat spice ... Nothing special there. We ordered catfish, pad Thai, garlic prawn, and the duck dish. Out of all the dishes, the garlic prawn was my favorite and the duck would be next. \n\nOverall, if you like Thai food or want to try Thai food then I would definitely recommend this spot!", "They are best known for their garlic prawns so be sure to order it! They separate the shell but somehow leave it attached, then they deep fry the prawns to a golden brown, making it plump, succulent, yet crispy.  The idea is to make it so crispy you can even eat the shell.  Delicious! We also had the drunken noodles (like pad see ew) topped with your choice of duck, soft shell crab or sea bass (which was how we had it). Also good.  The crispy duck over noodles in a coconut curry was also a hit.  The least popular dish was the short ribs in the same, exact curry sauce as the duck...we could've skipped that one entirely. We enjoyed the meal a lot but I had to knock it down by 1 star because every dish we ordered was close to $30 which is way more than the average price of a similar dish in other restaurants within the same class/range. Yelp only has this marked as $$ which I think is misleading. They should be at     $$$.  If you are willing to spend the money then by all means, dine here!", "They open at 5:30.  No answering service or machine to leave a msg. or reservation.  So the phone stays busy until forever.  Going somewhere else where they can take a reservation or embrace some kind of technology.\n\nOk.  With so many stars I tried and got through my 5th try.  We had 5 dishes.  Panang Curry with duck was the best Thai dish I've ever eaten.   And I love Thai.", "This establishment was highly recommended to me by a friend to try during my visit in Vegas. We were able to skip the long wait by making a reservation so make sure to do that! Unless you are willing to wait a hour. We were seated at a nice table in their second section and was promptly served by a waiter. This waiter was clearly busy was still coming at perfect times during our dine in experience. We got the garlic prawns and drunken noodles with crispy duck. The stuffed chicken was amazing though! Definitely recommended that! They were both delicious however a bit overpriced. Maybe if they up the furniture and the front door upon walking in with the waiting room I would be a bit more at ease paying for this $$$ restaurant. This being a hole in a wall clearly had potential for greatness. The owner was very kind and overall food and service was great. 4/5 due to  it being a bit overpriced.", "This is a tough one, but its a solid 3.2 Stars (note I rate Din Tai Fung as 3.5 for reference).  3.2 = Solid, happy to come back.\n\nThey do take reservations and it is a must unless you want to wait a long while.\n\nThis place is called a \"Las Vegas Classic.\"  So hyped.  And as always, it is always hard to meet the hype and it fails a tad here at Lotus of Siam.  Why?  Mainly because the dishes seemed rushed out and you can taste a lack of that sweet care from the chef.  Understandable though because they need to turn tables as fast as possible due to such high demand.\n\nSo many famous people have come here, yes, its one of those places as you enter you see all the pictures on the wall of who's who that's has dined here.  The wine selection is stellar as you see it the moment you hit the dining room.  The Service is great, the hostesses are pleasant.  Now to the food.\n\nPapaya Salad - Solid.  The spice associated with the salad was mouthwatering.  This is a dish to order always as it starts it all off perfectly.  It is clean, light, fresh, prepares you for the rest of dinner.\n\nKhao Soy (Crispy Duck, Egg Noodle) - Now this dish is quite stellar.  It is the Northern Thai variant of Khao Soy.  The duck is crispy, but not like the garlic shrimp, more like a crispy, breaded type.  It is succulent, tender, just perfect.  Egg Noodles are perfect and the yellow coconut curry goes all perfectly together.  This is one of those dishes I can have 2-3x a week and I look forward to most when coming here.\n\nCrispy Garlic Shrimp - The hypness hits a roadblock here.  The most famous dish here.  You expect it to be jaw dropping, mouth watering.  It isn't.  The skin is perfectly done to a crisp (you eat it), and the shrimp are of a good size (see picture).  For what most everyone raves about here, I will say it is good, it is tasty, but the star of the restaurant?  Only for people who are novels to it.  Would I order it again?  Yes.  But I would tell my table its one of the entrees that are good here, not the, \"OMG WE HAVE TO ORDER THISSSSSS.\"\n\nPanang -  Decent.  Nothing to write home about.\n\nGreen Curry - Forgettable.  Wait, we had green curry?\n\nSea Bass -  Totally overpriced and small portion.  Skip this.  Nuff said.  This dish is almost a whole Star doc worthy.\n\nFried Banana with Coconut Ice Cream Dessert - Delicious.  Small chunks of banana fried in an egg roll style.  The delicate thin crispiness was very well appreciated by my mouth.  The coconut ice cream was light and heavenly.  Must Order Dish.\n\nVibe - Great.  The whole place is hummin along, happy, eatin, drinkin, laughing.  It is like all my Thai friends.  \n\nThe menu here is huge.  North and South.  Most of the good dishes seem to come from Northern menu.  We enjoyed it here but like I said, the dishes seemed rushed, but for understandable reasons.  Glad to have tried it.  Come back on next Vegas trip?  Probably not (mainly because Vegas has so many options).  \n\nBut damn that Khao Soy callin my name......", "This is a wanna be fancy restaurant when it's in a junky ghetto plaza and then they didn't change the carpet when it carpet is a 1970s carpet. They put in a wine rack and lots of wine selection but don't change the carpet. They need to do the whole shebang. \n\nI had lunch special chicken curry. It was good and it has grape in it. I thought that was unique but not fancy. Like I said they is a wanna be fancy.", "This is hands down the best Thai Restaurant I've ever eaten at!!! The seafood drunken noodles are to die for, the bar has definitely been raised after eating here!", "This is the best place ever!! I will always recommend this place to my friends", "This is truly one of the best meals I've ever had.\n\nI'm a chef. I came here with 5 friends and we ordered 14 dishes and dessert. Everything was solid. Not a single misstep. The restaurant was full and food came out way faster than expected. This place is addicting. I wish I had one of these at home. It baffles me that Lotus of Siam has 4 stars on Yelp. Shows how much bullshit the rating system is. Also everyone who posted a pic and reviewed this place only posted pad Thai. What a bunch of fucking horse shit. This place has so many authentic northern Thai dishes. Every singl one, crazy delicious. Fuck you Yelp", "This is usually one if the restaurants that I bring Family and Friends from out of town. It's kind of a \"secret\" restaurant. Don't let the exterior fool you. The inside is very clean and really \"elegant\" looking. The portions are kind of on the small side, but still very satisfying. I would of have given 5 stars but the portion sizes kind of upset me. When we go out to eat, we are celebrating and usually don't want to worry about portion sizes. Other than that, enjoy!", "This place is F'ing awesome awesome awesome awesome awesome awesome awesome awesome!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!", "This place is on several TV shows as fantastic Thai food.  And it really is.  I wish the portion sizes were bigger given the price.  But man Oh man,  it is so so so good.", "This place is tucked away in a non descript strip mall off of Sahara.  We got there right when lunch service was ending but they still seated us.  Food was very good but the serving size was on the small side.  Looked like they had a really good wine selection too.", "This place looks a bit sketchy from the outside and is slightly tricky to find, but keep looking and don't let the outside appearance scare you.  Once you start chowing you will be hooked.  I can't wait to go back.\n\nI told the waiter what I was interested in and he guided me to select something off the menu and it was awesome and spicy.  It was on a bed of cabbage with boiled sea bass and the spicy sauce from one of the salmon dishes.  I had it for an entree but would have preferred to share as an appetizer.", "This place used to be awesome. Met our friends from out of town at this place and was shocked how the quality has gone DOWN. The portion sizes are pitiful now. Food still tastes okay but I never thought it was that amazing compared to any other Thai restaurants in town. \n\nI was also taken aback when we made our reservation and they said that if we were more than 5 minutes late, they would cancel it! FIVE MINUTES!?!?! The standard in restaurant industry is 15. We had a large party as well and people were arriving separately. I guess they don't want to encourage locals to come here. \n\nI think it's time to find a new Thai restaurant to recommend to my friends who are visiting Vegas.", "This place will have you swinging! No, I'm not referring to the swingers club that shares the parking lot, instead the \"off the chains\" food. Arrive early or attempt to get reservation if you want to visit Lotus of Siam. From the outside it's unassuming and quiet but once inside it's bustling with excited foodie patrons. The menu is large, offering numerous dishes from multiple regions of Thailand. Do yourself a favor and order from the Northern or Chef Specials sections, you will not be disappointed. \n\nOur party of 4 tried:\n\nKoong Sarong - Very good, not greasy at all. Good dish for the less adventurous people in your party.\nNam Kao Top - (Spicy Level 4) While very limey, it's balanced much better when eaten with the cabbage.\nGarlic Prawns - My favorite dish of the night. I was not a huge fan of eating the shell but I tried it and enjoyed one. The shell was much more tender than I thought it would be but a little on the salty side. The actual prawn meat was delicious, perfectly cooked with a slight crisp on the outside.\nCrispy Duck with Panang - (Level 3) While I'm not a huge fan of duck, I had heard a lot about this dish and had to try it. The duck was cooked perfectly, crispy skin and moist on the inside. The meat was not overly fatty like I'm used to eating and the curry sauce was different (no coconut milk) but a great addition to the overall flavor.\nNua Nam Tok - (Spice Level 4) Very similar to the flavors of the Nam Kao Top, good but not great.\n\nWe noticed many people ordering the soups, especially the Fish Soup but it was over 105 degrees that day and soup was the furthest thing from what I wanted. It looked wonderful and will be my order when I go back in the winter.\n\nLotus is perfect for taking visiting friends from out of town who want to experience Vegas food off the strip. The food is good, the service was incredibly good, way better than I expected. If you're lucky you can start up a conversation with the James Beard winning Chef Saipin Chutima who was spotted multiple times walking through the dining area.\n\nThis is a must visit for anybody who lives in Vegas.", "This restaurant doesn't look like much on the outside, but inside it's lavish. They even showcase their cold wine room in glass.\n\nThe food, based on northern Thai, was superb! We had the pad woon sen and their original dish kang ka noon made with Jack fruit, $10.95 each. Both were delectable and a good size. Total price was $23.68 but worth it since it's fresh. \n\nThe service was extremely friendly and patient with our order, since they have a large menu! As Thai connoisseurs from LA, since we frequent Thai Town often, we recommend!", "This was beyond good! Friends of us (from Vegas) suggested this restaurant. Off Strip. In - for us - the middle of nowhere. A desolate piece of commercial space. We had to search for right adress because it's on not on the road side.\n\nThe Lotus of Siam is so popular that's reservations only. If you're not there on time (5 minutes prior to your reservation) they give away your table. Outside the're lines. And we know why.\n\nWe're a party of six with one real Thai Lady. Just in the USA for less than six months. Even she liked and approved the meals.\n\nWe had different dishes to share. The dishes that most impressed were the crispy duck, the pineapple rice and the Tom Kah Kai. All together we order two hot pot's of soup, the garlic shrimps and seven main courses. With a few alchoholic consumptions the total bill ran up tot $250 for six people. Not much for such a nice meal. We'll definitly be back.", "Very good Thai food in a very dull setting. Overall, I really enjoyed the food, but I feel this place  is a bit overhyped, perhaps due to lack of good Thai in Vegas overall? If you have good Thai food where you live, don't go out of your way to eat here unless you're really in the mood, as there was nothing here terribly out of the ordinary. If I were in Vegas, with a serious hankering for Thai, I would go back, but don't go here expecting an otherworldly food experience, unless of course, you've never had goo Thai to begin with.  The curries we ordered, and the jack fruit salad were our favorites, we weren't quite as impressed with the noodle dishes.", "Very unassuming place in a very shady looking strip mall. If you are anything like us and you drove by and didn't know its reputation you would probably take a pass. But this place is the real deal, believe the hype! \n\nFood is absolutely amazing. I will say that service is not the best. They rush you and are a bit rude but with food like this I can deal. Don't come here expecting to be treated like a princess, experiment with the menu and do some research. You won't regret it. \n\nSoooooo good!!", "Was so looking forward to eating here. With all the accolades was expecting authentic delicious food. I should of known better when seeing all the celebrity pictures on the wall. \nI've lived in Thailand, learned how to cook from grandmothers and professionals cooks. The food here is watered down sweet interpretation of Thai food. Great job in marketing poor job on taste!", "We came here because we were stopping through LV and my dad recently hopped onto the Anthony Bourdain hypetrain. Therefore, whatever AB says is good, we try. \nIf you want to come and you're from out of town, definitely reserve a week or at least a few days prior. You will not regret it. Service was great though we still waited 20 minutes to get a table set up. Not a big deal, since it was 7 o'clock and clearly the dinner rush. \n\nWe ordered Nam Kao Tod, Khao Soi, Mango and Sticky Rice, Red Pork Curry, and the Young Jackfruit Salad. People urged us to order from the Northern Thai Menu and avoid ordering stuff like Pad Thai. \nI didn't really know what to expect because I had never had these dishes before, but the Nam Kao Tod and the Jackfruit definitely stood out to me. I was also really hungry and we ordered such a vast variety of stuff I think I forgot how to appropriately savor my food and kind of put everything into my face hole. Oops. The Khao Soi is delicious too, it's kind of like a red coconut curry with noodles in it. It didn't wow me, but it was still very good. \n\nI kind of wish I did get typical Thai fare like Pad Thai/Rad Na or whatever and compare it to the stuff I usually get in San Diego/Portland, but I'm glad we explored N. Thai cuisine! \n\nThanks AB.", "We knew that this trip, we needed to try Lotus. \nWe tried for dinner on a Thursday night and wait was 1.5 hours, reservations for dinner were booked a week out :( the host suggested we come back when they open at 11. Lunch is first come first serve.\nFlash forward to Friday morning, we show up about 11:05 and there were about 4 tables already sat and a steady stream of tables after us.\nI got the drunken noodle prawn off the chefs recommendation , the FI got a street vendor special that was on the northern specialty menu and we go the #14 appetizer that our waiter suggested. \nNo joke, best Thai food we've had. The originality the menu had, the last 4 pages...that's what you come here for.\nSlap yourself if you get Pad Thai....\nFood has major flavor....like an explosion of spice and heat and layer upon layer of it. Oh man....yep. that good.", "We were directed to this place by a friend of ours who ate there a few weeks ago. We're really glad we tried it. No it's not in the fancy area of Las Vegas but don't let that dissuade you. Their food is really good and the service is even better. They also have an unbelievable wine selection.", "Went there 3 times,so dissapointed,My food is over cooked.T thai food restaurant at upper jones and flamingo much better.", "What can I say?  This place is so amazing.  Everything I've tried is fantastic.  Like spicy?  Ask for #11.  And a fire extinguisher for your tongue.", "When we arrived we had to wait over forty minutes to get a table. We ordered three different main courses to share. The food all arrived cold. We asked them to remake the food and all they did was microwave it and bring it back to us. The Penang curry had about half as much chicken as any standard Thai restaurant and the chicken was very tough. The rice that came with the curry was smaller than a single ice cream scoop, so not enough for even one person. The crispy duck with drunken noodles was not crispy, but actually squishy. The Pad Thai was flavored well, but had almost no chicken in it. I think we were able to count three or four tiny pieces of chicken. Overall, I was not impressed. The duck was nearly $30 and there wasn't even enough food for one person. We left hungry and decided not to risk ordering a dessert. I know this place has high reviews, but all I can think is that people who review it highly haven't had much Thai food. Most Thai restaurants provide better food for better prices than this restaurant.", "While we ate here, I did not think it lived up to the hype...  Service or quality.  I probably wouldnt go back if someone else didnt recommend it.", "Wow! Garlic shrimp is to die for! Our whole meal was amazing. Wife and I are making this a must stop every time we go to Vegas! Thanks for a great meal and great staff!", "Wow, this place lived up to the hype. I ordered beef pad see ew to go and it was hands-down the best I have ever had. Not overly greasy and the noodles tasted very fresh-almost like they make their own from scratch. It was awesome.", "Yes it's a hole in the wall in Las Vegas but it is definitely a must. Even the locals know to go here. \n\nThe must-haves:\n\nCrispy Duck in Panang - OMG!!! Died and went to heaven. \nGarlic Prawns - large portion big enough to share.\n\nWe also had the green papaya salad but I didn't care for the preparation. I'm used to it being served with less fish sauce and thinly sliced shrimp. This version was a bit saturated in sauce. \n\nThe location is somewhat hard to find in a strip mall, and the front looks unassuming. Once you enter the restaurant you're surprised as it's much nicer inside. You can tell it's famous by all the pictures of celebrities on the wall. \n\nI will definitely be back.", "authentic Thai place and very decent food. a bit of overpriced and kind of over hyped by all the other reviews.", "believe the hype!!! thank you, that is all.\n\njk... but seriously, this place is realllllly good.  YOU MUST GET THE GARLIC PRAWNS AND CRISPY DUCK WITH PANANG.  We had other dishes - papaya salad, green chili dip, and a soup noodle i can't remember the name of and a couple thai teas & coffees.  Everything was what thai food is suppose to be - sweet, spicy, salty and sour.   Uhhhg SO GOOD!  We went here with my family for lunch and wanted to go back for dinner in the same day.", "if you expect to eat here, make sure you come with a lot of patience.  This is the worst experience I have ever had in a restaurant and I have been in restaurants all over the world. \nLet's start off with the wait; over an hour to be seated. Add an additional hour to get your food and finally when you do get your food, it's cold, but the waiter tells you, \"we serve all our food at room temperature\"...are you kidding me?\nThe portions are small but what's more is the horrible attitude of the wait staff. \nWith all the amazing restaurants to eat in Vegas, save yourself a trip.", "nam prik noom, kang hung lay,? thum ka noon - jack fruit salad, northern larb, khao soi,  only order the northern thai.", "the hype is real! haha...after years of hearing about this place, i finally got to try it during a recent trip to vegas. we stopped here for lunch on the way into town on Friday around 1pm and we only had to wait about 10 minutes for a party of 3 so not bad at all. the menu is pretty overwhelming since there is so much to selection and even after scouring yelp reviews, we still didnt know what to get haha...so we left the choice up to our trusty server. we asked him for the most popular dishes and without hesitation had his top 3 choices for us (but since we were hungry, we asked for his top 4 picks instead haha).\n\nwe ordered:\ngarlic prawns - so much great garlic flavor, freshly fried but with a light better. such a nice crisp to it and you cant even tell that it's fried with the shell still on it\ndrunken noodles with sea bass - my favorite dish of my lunch! the sea bass was fried with a light batter that almost reminded me of like an agedashi tofu dish. it was so delicious though and paired with the fat noodles - the best!\nbeef dish w/peanut sauce - cant remember the name of this dish but it was strips of steak with mixed veggies over this amazing peanut sauce that we were pretty much just dipping in everything haha\ncrispy duck in red curry - another amazing dish. luckily we had ordered this only at a spice level 2 out of 10 and it had the right amount of kick to it where we could still appreciate the flavor of the curry without having our mouths on fire haha.\nfried banana for dessert - even this simple dessert at most restaurants came out way above average haha. banana was fried in more of an egg roll wrapper and freshly fried with a great crisp/crunch to it. (seriously whatever they're doing here to fry their food is amazing haha)\n\ntotally amazing lunch and was a great start to our weekend in vegas! the restaurant is pretty pricey but definitely worth it!"]
